***
A Michael Sam joke
 After being drafted by the St. Louis Rams, Michael Sam celebrated by kissing his boyfriend. This is historic because it’s the first time anyone has celebrated being drafted by the St. Louis Rams. - Conan O'brien
***
Two beggars were sitting side by side on a street in Rome...
...One held a Cross in front of him; the other one was holding the Star of David. Many people passed by, looked at both beggars, but only put money into the hat of the beggar holding the Cross. 
 
The Pope came by and stopped to watch the number of people giving money to the beggar who held the Cross, while none gave to the beggar holding the Star of David. The Pope approached the beggar with the Star of David and said, "My poor fellow, don't you understand? This is a Catholic country; this city is the seat of Catholicism. People aren't going to give you money if you sit here with a Star of David in front of you, especially when you're sitting beside a beggar who is holding a Cross. In fact, they would probably give more money to him just to prove a point."
 
The beggar with the Star of David listened to the Pope, smiled, and turning to the beggar with the Cross, said, "Moshe, look who's trying to teach the Goldstein brothers about marketing!"
***
A priest goes golfing
He tees up on the first hole, takes a swing, and the ball curves to the right. "Ah shit," the priest says before he realized what slipped out of his mouth. He quickly covers his mouth, apologizes to god, and continues playing golf.

A couple holes down, he tees up and the ball curves hard to the left. "Ah shit," the priest yells again.

The sky gets dark and a voice is heard above.

"You are supposed to set an example, watch your language!"

A couple holes down, the priest misses a terribly easy putt. "Shit shit shit!" The priest yells as he breaks his putter.

The sky gets even darker than before, and a lightning bolt comes down and strikes the caddie.

The voice in the sky goes, "Ah shit."
***
A kid is walking down the street with a jar of money and dragging along a dead frog on a string...
And he walks into a whorehouse. He sets the jar of money on the counter and proclaims to a woman in the lobby "I want to have sex with the dirtiest, nastiest woman you have here." She glares at him and replies "get outta here. you're too young to be here." The kid retorts, pointing at the jar and says "look, lady- I'm paid. Let me do what I want."

She agrees, and points him towards a door down the hall. "Meet Evelynn, she's a veteran." He does the deed and walks out of the room, still zipping up. The lady in the lobby asks him if he realizes the consequences of his actions. He replies, "Yes. I came here hoping for an STD, and I've gotten what I wanted." Confused, she asks him why.

He replies,

"My mom and dad are on vacation. When I get home, the babysitter is going to have sex with me. That's what she's into. She's going to get an STD. When mom and dad get home, mom will go to the grocery store and dad will have sex with the babysitter. He will have an STD. Once mom gets home, she will have sex with dad and SHE will get an STD. When dad leaves for work in the morning, mom is going to have sex with the Mailman... and HE's the motherfucker who ran over my frog."
***
22 mph speed limit
Sitting on the side of the road waiting to catch speeding drivers, a state trooper sees a car puttering along at 22 mph. He thinks to himself, "This driver is as dangerous as a speeder!" So he turns on his lights and pulls the driver over.

Approaching the car, he notices that there are five elderly ladies, two in the front seat and three in the back, wide-eyed and white as ghosts.  The driver, obviously confused, says to him, "Officer, I don't understand. I was going the exact speed limit. What seems to be the problem?"

The trooper, trying to contain a chuckle, explains to her that 22 was the route number, not the speed limit. A bit embarrassed, the woman grinned and thanked the officer for pointing out her error. "But before you go, ma'am, I have to ask, is everyone in this car OK? These women seem awfully shaken."

"Oh, they'll be all right in a minute, officer.  We just got off Route 136." 

***
A husband and wife head to the golf course...
A husband and wife who are avid golfers have been happily married for 30 years, and on the day of their 30th anniversary they enjoy a wonderful day together. They have a delicious breakfast in bed, then proceed to one of their favourite golf courses. They play through to the 9th hole, both having an amazing game. The husband watches his beautiful wife tee off and feels a rush of emotion and guilt. 
"Honey, I have to tell you something. At the very beginning of our marriage,  I slept with another woman. It only happened once and I've been faithful ever since. It was a mistake and I hope you can forgive me." 
The wife looks fondly at him. "I forgive you. We've had a very happy life together. I love you."  
The husband is so relieved, feeling light as a feather. They play a few more holes in bliss when suddenly the wife turns to her husband.
 "Honey, I too have something to confess." 
The husband smiles and says, "Anything dear - you were so gracious to me, and we can make it through anything." 
"Before we met, I had a sex change. I used to be a man."
The husband throws his club down and starts swearing and kicking up turf. The wife is in shock. "But I forgave you for your secret!" 
The husband, red faced, turns to her.
"All these years! All these years you've been teeing off from the ladies tee box you cheating piece of shit!"

***
The Cabbie
A successful businessman flew to Vegas for the weekend to gamble. He lost the shirt off his back, and had nothing left but a quarter and the second half of his round trip ticket. All he needed to do was somehow get to the airport, and then he'd be home-free. 
So he went out to the front of the casino where there was a cab waiting. He got in and explained his situation to the cabbie. He promised to send the driver money from home. He offered him his credit card numbers, his drivers license number, his address, etc... 
The cabbie said, ''If you don't have fifteen dollars, get the hell out of my cab!'' 
So the businessman was forced to hitchhike to the airport and was barely in time to catch his flight. 
 One year later the businessman, having worked long and hard to regain his financial success, returned to Vegas and this time he won big. Feeling pretty good about himself, he went out to the front of the casino to get a cab ride back to the airport. Well who should he see out there, at the end of a long line of cabs, but his old buddy who had refused to give him a ride when he was down on his luck. 
The businessman thought for a moment about how he could make the guy pay for his lack of charity, and he hit on a plan. 
 The businessman got in the first cab in the line, ''How much for a ride to the airport,'' he asked?
 ''Fifteen bucks,'' came the reply.
 ''And how much for you to give me a blowjob on the way?''
 ''What?! Get the hell out of my cab.'' 
The businessman got into the back of each cab in the long line and asked the same questions, with the same result.
 When he got to his old friend at the back of the line, he got in and asked, ''How much for a ride to the airport?'' 
The cabbie replied, ''Fifteen bucks.'' 
The businessman said, ''OK,'' and off they went. Then, as they drove slowly past the long line of cabs, the businessman gave a big smile and thumbs up sign to each of the other drivers. 
***
Divorce
An elderly man in Phoenix calls his son in New York and says, "I hate to ruin your day, but I have to tell you that your mother and I are divorcing; forty-five years of misery is enough."
"Pop, what are you talking about?" the son screams.
"We can't stand the sight of each other any longer," the old man says. "We're sick of each other, and I'm sick of talking about this, so you call your sister in Chicago and tell her," and he hangs up.
Frantic, the son calls his sister, who explodes on the phone. "They're not getting divorced if I have anything to do about it," she shouts, "I'll take care of this."
She calls Phoenix immediately, and screams at the old man, "You are NOT getting divorced. Don't do a single thing until I get there. I'm calling my brother back, and we'll both be there tomorrow. Until then, don't do a thing, DO YOU HEAR ME?" and hangs up.
The old man hangs up his phone and turns to his wife and says, "Okay, they're coming for Thanksgiving...now what do we tell them for Christmas?"
***
A Jew, an Irishman, and a black man are in a maternity ward...
A Jew, an Irishman, and a black man are in a maternity ward waiting room. The nurse walks in and explains that there's been a terrible mix up with the babies, and that the fathers are going to have to figure out amongst themselves which baby belongs to whom. The Irishman springs up out of his chair and volunteers to go first.

A few minutes later the Irishman returns holding a newborn black-skinned baby in his arms.

The black man shouts in anger "Now, I KNOW that baby is MINE!" to which the Irishman replies: "One of those babies is Jewish, and I'm not taking any chances!"
***
How to use a condom
First Time with a Condom!
I recall my first time with a condom, I was 16 or so. I went in to buy a package of condoms. There was a beautiful woman behind the counter, and she could see that I was new at it. She handed me the package and asked, if I knew how to wear one.
I honestly answered, "No."
So she unwrapped the package, took one out and slipped over her thumb, She cautioned me to make sure it was on tight and secure. I apparently still looked confused. So she looked all around the store. It was empty.
"Just a minute," she said, and walked to the door, and locked it.
Taking my hand, she led me into the back room, unbuttoned her blouse removed it. She unhooked her bra and laid it aside. "Do these excite you?" she asked.
Well, I was so dumb-struck that all I could do was nod my head. She then said, it was time to slip the condom on. As I was slipping it on, she dropped her skirt, removed her panties and laid down on a desk.
"Well, come on", she said, "We don't have much time."
So I climbed on her. It was so wonderful, that unfortunately, I could no longer hold back and hwoogluh, I was done within a few minutes. She looked at me with a frown. "Did you put that condom on?"
I said, "I sure did," and held up my thumb to show her.
***
"G'Day mate, Aussie help line here..........What's the problem,.... Cobber?"
 "I'm in Darwin with my sheila and she's been stung on the minge by a wasp, and now her pussy has completely closed up."
  
"Bummer, mate...!!!"
  
"Thanks mate, I hadnt thought of that. Bye."
***
Irish funeral
A man was leaving a convenience store with his morning coffee when he noticed a most unusual funeral procession approaching the nearby cemetery. A black hearse was followed by a second black hearse about 50 Feet behind the first one. Behind the second hearse was a solitary man walking a dog on a leash. Behind him, a short distance back, were about 200 men walking single file.
The man couldn't stand the curiosity. He respectfully approached the man walking the dog and said:
"I am so sorry for your loss, and this may be a bad time to disturb you, but I've never seen a funeral like this. Whose funeral is it?"
"My wife's."
''What happened to her?"
"She yelled at me and my dog attacked and killed her."

He inquired further, "But who is in the second hearse?"

The man answered, "My mother-in-law. She was trying to help my wife when the dog turned on her."

A very poignant and touching moment of brotherhood and silence passed between the two men.

"Can I borrow the dog?"

The man replied, "Get in line."

***
A priest and a lawyer
A priest and a lawyer had both died, after what seemed like eternity they finally stood before the pearly gates of heaven.

Suddenly the gates open and a bright angel of God apears before them.

"Welcome to the kingdom of Heaven, please get in my carriage and I will show you to your new homes" says the angel.

The priest and the lawyer oblige and climb aboard. As they travel they see roads of gold and jewels. Houses large and small. Finally they approach the first house. It is large and beautiful, crowned with jewels, a pool and beautiful women. The priest thinks "WOW, this is beautiful, surely all my years serving God is finally being rewarded".
The angel depards the carriage and say "okay lawyer this is yours"

The lawyer is exstatic, jumps out of the carriage and runs in joy to his new home.

This priest think "wow if this is what he gets then i am surely graced"

They pull away and as they travel the priest notices things aren't so nice, the roads barely look paved, the houses are run down and the sky becomes cloudy and dull. They pull up to a shack and the angel gets out and says "this is yours" the priest looks confused and ask the angel "but how could this be? I have served God all my life, ive never experienced the touch of a woman, or the taste if alcohol. Why would i get this shack but the lawyer gets that!"

The angel giggles a little and say "we have many preists in heaven. But that is the first lawyer to ever make it here!"
***
The pope goes for a cruise
The pope arrives in new york and is getting into his limo when he pauses and asks the driver if he could drive. The driver says of course, you are the pope who am I to tell you no. So the pope is driving around New York with his driver in the back. It's been far too long since since he's been behind the wheel and his driving shows it. His eyes are old and can't see very well, he's swerving in and out of his lane. Inevitably he ends up getting pulled over. The cop comes up to the car sees who's driving and without saying a word slowly turns and walks back to his cruiser. He goes to his partner and says "we've got an extremely important person in the limo." his partner replies "who is it, the mayor?" "Bigger" the cop says. "what like the governor?" "BIGGER" the cop replies again. "It isn't the president, is it?" "I don't know who's in the back, but whoever it is has the fucking pope driving them around!"
***
So I met a Pirate...
- Mobile user, please excuse phrasing.

So the other day I met a pirate. I mean this guy was the real deal, peg leg, hook for a hand, eye patch, the works. I just had to ask him about it.

"Can I ask how you got the peg leg?". 
"Aye, twas a dark, stormy night. I was at sea, surveying for land, when a giant shark came up out of the briny and took me leg clean off!"
"WOW! That's quite a tale!" I said, "and what about you hand?"
"Aye," he continued,  "I was on the lower deck, inspecting the cannons, when a giant squid reached up through the porthole and tore me hand clean off!"

"UNBELIEVABLE", I said, and I had to know more. "So what about your eye?"
"Arr, twas not long after the squid, I was back on deck preparing to invade a small clipper ship, when a bird flew over and shit right in me eye!"
"Wow and that cost you your eye?"

"No, it was me first day with the hook..."


Edit: Pirate lingo.
***
A blonde finds herself sitting next to a lawyer on a plane..
A blonde who finds herself sitting next to a lawyer on an airplane. The lawyer just keeps bugging the blonde wanting her to play a game of intelligence. Finally, the lawyer offers her 10 to 1 odds, and says every time the blonde can not answer one of his questions, she owes him $5, but every time he cannot answer hers, he’ll give her $50. The lawyer figures he could not lose, and the blonde reluctantly accepts.      
The lawyer first asks, “What is the distance between the Earth and the nearest star?”  
Without saying a word the blonde hands him $5. The blonde then asks, “What goes up a hill with 3 legs and comes back down the hill with 4 legs?”  
Well, the lawyer is puzzled. He takes several hours, looking up everything he can on his laptop and even placing numerous air-to-ground phone calls trying to find the answer. Finally, angry and frustrated, he gives up and pays the blonde $50  
The blonde put the $50 into her purse without comment, but the lawyer insists, “What is the answer to your question?”  
Without saying a word, the blonde hands him $5.
***
This is Gold
Ever since I was a child, I’ve always had a fear of someone under my bed at night.  So I went to a Psychiatrist and told him I’ve got problems.  Every time I go to bed I think there’s somebody under it.  I’m scared.  I think I’m going crazy. "Just put yourself in my hands for one year," said the psychiatrist. "Come talk to me three times a week and we should be able to get rid of those fears." "How much do you charge?" "Eighty dollars per visit," replied the doctor. "I’ll sleep on it and if needed I will come back to you," I said.  Six months later the Psychiatrist met me on the street. "Why didn’t you come to see me about those fears you were having?" he asked. "Well, Eighty bucks a visit three times a week for a year is an awful lot of money! A bartender cured me for $10. I was so happy to have saved all that money that I went and bought me a new SUV." "Is that so!" With a bit of an attitude he said, "and how, may I ask, did a bartender cure you?" "He told me to cut the legs off the bed – ain’t nobody under there now!"
***
A Cold Winter
Late fall and the Indians on a remote reservation in North Dakota asked their new chief if the coming winter was going to be cold or mild. Since he was a chief in a modern society, he had never been taught the old secrets. When he looked at the sky, he couldn't tell what the winter was going to be like.

Nevertheless, to be on the safe side, he told his tribe that the winter was indeed going to be cold and that the members of the village should collect firewood to be prepared.But, being a practical leader, after several days, he got an idea. He went to the phone booth, called the National Weather Service and asked, 'Is the coming winter going to be cold?'

‘It looks like this winter is going to be quite cold,' the meteorologist at the weather service responded.

So the chief went back to his people and told them to collect even more firewood in order to be prepared. A week later, he called the National Weather Service again. 'Does it still look like it is going to be a very cold winter?'

'Yes,' the man at National Weather Service again replied, 'it's going to be a very cold winter.'

The chief again went back to his people and ordered them to collect every scrap of firewood they could find. Two weeks later, the chief called the National Weather Service again. 'Are you absolutely sure that the winter is going to be very cold?'

'Absolutely,' the man replied. 'It's looking more and more like it is going to be one of the coldest winters we've ever seen.'

'How can you be so sure?' the chief asked.

The weatherman replied, 'The Indians are collecting a shitload of firewood'.
***
I Want A Divorce
A judge was interviewing a South Carolina woman regarding her pending divorce and
asks, "What are the grounds for your divorce?"

"About four acres and a nice little home in the middle of the property with a stream running by."

"No," he said, "I mean what is the foundation of this case?"

"It is made of concrete, brick, and mortar," she responded.

"I mean," he continued, "what are your relations like?"

"I have an aunt and uncle and 12 cousins living here in town, as well as my husband's parents."

The judge took a deep breath and asked, "Do you have a real grudge?"

"No,we have a two-car carport and have never really needed one cuz we don't have a car."

"Please," he tried again, "is there any infidelity in your marriage?"

"Yes, both my son and daughter have stereo sets. We don't necessarily
like the music - all that hip hop and rap tap - but we can't seem to do anything about it."

"Ma'am, does your husband ever beat you up?"

"Yes, he gets up every morning before I do and makes the coffee."

The judge asked, "Is your husband a nagger?"

"Oh, hell no, he's as white as you and me!"

Finally, in frustration, the judge asked, "Lady, why in hell do you want a divorce?

"Oh, I don't want a divorce," she replied. "I've never wanted a divorce, my husband does. The damn fool says he can't communicate with me."

***
A woman has twins...
A woman has twins, and gives them up for adoption. One of them goes to a family in Egypt and is named 'Amal.' The other goes to a family in Spain, they name him Juan'. Years later; Juan sends a picture of himself to his mum. Upon receiving the picture, she tells her husband that she wished she also had a picture of Amal. Her husband responds, "But they are twins. If you've seen Juan, you've seen Amal." '          
***
A Policeman on his horse says to little girl on her bike, "Did Santa get you that?"
 "Yes," she replies.

"Well tell Santa to put a reflector light on it next year," and fines her £5. 

The little girl looks up at the Policeman and says, "Nice
horse you've got there. Did Santa bring you that too?"

The Policeman chuckles and replies, "He sure did!" "Well," says the little girl, "Next year, tell Santa the fuckin dick goes under the horse, not on top of it"!
***
Russian Joke: A little girl goes up to her mother...
...and asks her, 

"Mommy, why does everyone say my face looks like an ass?"

Her mother replies, 

"Oh honey no, you're beautiful! Don't listen to them, just go talk to your father."

So the little girl finds her father and asks him,

"Papa, why does everyone say that my face looks like an ass?"

And her father replies,

"No honey...don't listen to them. You're my beautiful little princess! Why don't you go talk to your grandfather? He's outside digging a well nearby."

So the little girl goes outside and finds the well, which her grandfather is inside of, digging. She leans over the edge and shouts down the well,

"Grandpa! Grandpa!"

And her Grandfather looks up, squints his eyes, and then suddenly shouts in panic,

"DON'T SHIT! DON'T SHIT!!!"
***
A man escapes from prison
A man escapes from prison where he has been for 15 years. He breaks into a house to look for money and guns and finds a young couple in bed. He orders the guy out of bed and ties him to a chair, while tying the girl to the bed he gets on top of her, kisses her neck, then gets up and goes into the bathroom.

While he's in there, the husband tells his wife: "Listen, this guy's an escaped convict, look at his clothes! He probably spent lots of time in jail and hasn't seen a woman in years. I saw how he kissed your neck." If he wants sex, don't resist, don't complain, do whatever he tells you. Satisfy him no matter how much he nauseates you. This guy is probably very dangerous. If he gets angry, he'll kill us. Be strong, honey. I love you."

To which his wife responds: "He wasn't kissing my neck. He was whispering in my ear. He told me he was gay, thought you were cute, and asked me if we had any vaseline. I told him it was in the bathroom. Be strong honey. *I love you too!*
***
A priest, a doctor, and an engineer were waiting one morning for a particularly slow group of golfers...
A priest, a doctor, and an engineer were waiting one morning for a particularly slow group of golfers...

The engineer fumed, "What's with those guys? We must have been waiting for fifteen minutes!"

The doctor chimed in, "I don't know, but I've never seen such inept golf!"

The priest said, "Here comes the green-keeper. Let's have a word with him."

He said, "Hello George, what's wrong with that group ahead of us? They're rather slow, aren't they?"

The green-keeper replied, "Oh, yes. That's a group of blind firemen. They lost their sight saving our clubhouse from a fire last year, so we always let them play for free anytime."

The group fell silent for a moment. The priest said, "That's so sad. I think I will say a special prayer for them tonight."

The doctor said, "Good idea. I'm going to contact my ophthalmologist colleague and see if there's anything he can do for them."

The engineer said, "Why can't they play at night?"


**Edit:** added line breaks ;)
***
The teacher asks, "Flora, what part of the human body increases ten times when excited?"
The teacher asks, "Flora, what part of the human body increases ten times when excited?" Flora blushes and says, "That's disgusting, I won't even answer that question." 

The teacher calls on Johnny: "What part of the human body increases ten times when excited?" "That's easy," says Johnny. "It's the pupil of the eye." "Very good, Johnny," responds the teacher. "That's correct." 

She then turns to Flora and says, "First, you didn't do your homework. Second, you have a dirty mind. And third, you're in for a BIG disappointment." 
***
How do you get into Heaven?
When Tim was just a wee lad, he went regularly to Sunday School. One day, his teacher decided to test Tim to see if he understood the concept of getting to Heaven. She asked him, "If I sold my house and my car, had a big garage sale and gave all my money to the church, Would that get me into Heaven?"


"NO!" Tim answered.


"If I cleaned the church every day, mowed the yard, and kept everything neat and tidy, would that get me into Heaven?"


Again, the answer was, "NO!"


By now, the teacher was starting to smile. Hey, this was fun!


"Well, then, if I was kind to animals and gave candy to all the children, and loved my husband, would that get me into Heaven?"


Again, Tim answered, "NO!"


The Sunday School teacher was just bursting with pride for him.


Well, she continued, "then how can I get into Heaven?"


A very confident young Tim shouted out, "YOU GOTTA BE DEAD." 
***
Can anyone use the word "contagious" in a sentence?
Julia raises her hand. “Yes, Julia?” She answers, “I was at the dentist’s office with my mom, and she said not to play with the toys in the waiting room because the other kids were contagious.”

“Very good, Julia!” the teacher said, “Anyone else want to try?” Shazza raises her hand. “Yes, Shazza?” She answers, “My dad tells me not to yawn because then everybody else yawns. He says yawning is contagious.”

“Excellent work, Shazza! Very creative,” the teacher praises. “Okay, one more volunteer.” Bruce raises his hand. “Yes, Bruce?”

“Well,” he says, “I was helping my dad in the yard last week, and we saw the neighbor painting his house. He was using a small brush, so I asked my dad, ‘Daddy, why is he using such a small brush?’ and he says, ‘I don’t know son, but it’s gonna take that contagious.’”
***
A woman is in a coma
and the nurse tending to her notices that whenever she is sponge bathing the woman, the woman’s vital signs jump a little on all of the machines an screens. So the nurse calls the husband and says ’come down to the hospital, i think i know how to get your wife out of this coma.’ so the husband hurries down, and asks the nurse what he can do. The nurse says, ’ i think that oral sex will bring her out of her coma, it will arrouse her enough to bring her out of the coma.’ so the nurse closes the cutains, and leaves the husband with his wife in the room. Moments later, the man comes running out of the room, flustered. The nurse, worried, asks him what happened. the husband says, ’I don’t know, I think that she started choking.’ 
***
A Father has three daughters..
Daughter 1: Dad,  why did you name me Rose? 

Dad: Because sweetie,  a Rose petal fell on your head when you were born. 

Daughter 2: Dad,  why did you name me Lily? 

Dad: Because sweetie,  a Lily petal fell on your head when you were born. 

Daughter 3: hghghdnbgh!!? dnbgh!??!  nfhriirb!!? Jfjebdjhcb!!??! 

Dad: SHUT THE FUCK UP CINDERBLOCK! 
***
Three surgeons are sitting in a bar...
... getting drunk and talking about the great successes in their careers. The first takes a shot and says, 'I had a a patient, a concert pianist. He severed all ten of his fingers in a freak cooking accident with a very sharp knife. I meticulously reattached them, and within a year, he played a concert for the Queen of England.' The second surgeon hears this, knocks back a shot, and says, 'You think that's something, listen to this. I had a patient that lost both his legs and his left arm in a freak combine accident. I reattached all three limbs and a year later, he won a triathlon gold medal at the olympics.' The third surgeon sits back and laughs. He buys a round of shots, and says, 'That's nothing. Get this. I had a patient, the man was an equestrian. Well, one day, he was out riding and he lost track of where he was, and he and his horse were hit by a freight train. After the accident, all I had to work with was his toupee and a horse's ass, and today... That man is winning the US Republican presidential primary.'
***
Missing wife
A husband went to the police station to file a "missing person" report for his missing wife:

Husband : -I lost my wife, she went shopping hasn't come back yet. 
Inspector : -What is her height? 
Husband : -Average, I guess. 
Inspector : -Slim or healthy?. 
Husband : -Not slim, but probably healthy. 
Inspector : -Color of eyes? 
Husband : -Never noticed. 
Inspector : -Color of hair?
Husband : -Changes according to season. 
Inspector : -What was she wearing? 
Husband : -Not sure, either a dress or a suit. 
Inspector : -Was she driving? 
Husband : -Yes. 
Inspector : -Color of the car?

Husband : -Black Audi A8 with supercharged 3.0 litre V6 engine generating 333 horse power teamed with an eight-speed tiptronic automatic transmission with manual mode. And it has full LED headlights, which use light emitting diodes for all light functions and has a very thin scratch on the front left door... and then the husband started crying...

Inspector: -Don't worry sir,...We will find your car.
***
All the organs of the body were having a meeting, trying to decide who was the one in charge...
"I should be in charge," said the brain , "Because I run all the body's systems, so without me nothing would happen." 


"I should be in charge," said the blood , "Because I circulate oxygen all over so without me you'd waste away."


"I should be in charge," said the stomach," Because I process food and give all of you energy." 


"I should be in charge," said the legs, "because I carry the body wherever it needs to go." 


"I should be in charge," said the eyes, "Because I allow the body to see where it goes." 


"I should be in charge," said the rectum, "Because Im responsible for waste removal."

All the other body parts laughed at the rectum And insulted him, so in a huff, he shut down tight. Within a few days, the brain had a terrible headache, the stomach was bloated, the legs got wobbly, the eyes got watery, and the blood Was toxic. They all decided that the rectum should be the boss

The Moral of the story? Even though the others do all the work.... 
The ass hole is usually in charge 

***
Panda Definition
A Panda Bear walks into a café and orders a
sandwich and a drink. After he is finished eating,
the waiter comes over to bring him the check.
When the waiter arrives at the table, he just
starts to ask 'Would you like any des...' Then the
Panda Bear reaches into his fur, pulls out a gun,
and shoots the waiter dead. The Panda Bear then
wipes off his chin with his napkin, gets up, and
starts to walk out. Just as he is about to go
through the door, the manager grabs him. 'Wait a
minute!' he yells, 'You just killed my best waiter!
Besides that, you didn't even pay for your
sandwich!'

The Panda Bear grasps the manager by the
throat, jacks him up, and growls, 'Hey man! I'm a
PANDA! Do you know what that means? Why
don't you look it up!'

At this the Panda walks out the door and ambles
down the street. The manager, shaken, returns to
his office and consults a dictionary. He reads:
'panda - a large mammal of the Asian mountain
forests related to raccoons and true bears and
characterized by bold black and white markings.
Eats shoots and leaves.'

Source : A joke book I read somewhere

-might be repost... I don't know, I'm new-
***
One night Raul comes back home totally drunk and falls into bed beside his sleeping wife.
Later he sees himself at the pearly gates of heaven. There, he is told that he had died in his sleep. Raul protests 'but I love life. You cannot let me die. Please'. After pleading he is told he can return on one condition; he has to return as a chicken. Raul, loving life and devoid of choices accepts it. Sure enough he feels his body covered in white feathers. He feels something weird in his belly. He looks around at the other chicken who tell him that he was about to give birth. A little later he lays an egg. It felt immaculate to give life. Another egg follows and a third one comes out. Raul is ecstatic. He never thought he would enjoy being a chicken so much. All of a sudden someone taps him on the shoulder. It is his wife screaming 'Raul you retard. You are shitting in bed'.
***
Sam walks into his boss’s office.
“Sir, I’ll be straight with you, I know the economy isn’t great, but I have over three companies after me, and I would like to respectfully ask for a raise.” 

After a few minutes of haggling the boss finally agrees to a 5 per cent raise, and Sam happily gets up to leave. 

“By the way”, asks the boss as Sam is getting up, “which three companies are after you?” 

“The electric company, water company, and phone company”, Sam replied. 
***
There was a papa mole, a momma mole, and a baby mole.
There was a papa mole, a momma mole, and a baby mole. They lived in a hole out in the country near a farmhouse. Papa mole poked his head out of the hole and said, "Mmmm, I smell sausage!" Momma mole poked her head outside the hole and said, "Mmmm, I smell pancakes!" Baby mole tried to stick his head outside but couldn't because of the two bigger moles. Baby mole said, "The only thing I smell is molasses." - 
***
A bear goes into a bar
he sits down and immediately mauls to death and devours the woman on the stool next to him. 
he then calmly orders a beer

bartender: "sorry, we don't serve drug users in here"
bear: "but I don't do drugs"
bartender: "what about that barbitchyouate"

***
A Scotsman, an Englishman and an Indian man were waiting outside the delivery room.
The matron comes out and explains that the hospital has accidentally mixed up  the babies. 

The Scot goes straight in and picks up the brown baby.

The Indian says "Are you sure that's your baby?"

The Scot says "No, but there's no way I'm going to risk leaving here with an English baby."
***
The U.N. initiates a poll...
The United Nations initiated a poll with the request, "Please tell us your honest opinion about the lack of food in the rest of the world." 

The poll was a total failure. 

The Russians did not understand "Please". The Italians did not know the word "honest". The Chinese did not know what an "opinion" was. The Europeans did not know "lack", while the Africans did not know "food". Finally, the Americans didn't know anything about the "rest of the world".
***
The deeply religious Jim and Joan are freshly married
As they begin to consummate their marriage, Jim moves straight for anal. Joan stops him "No, that's not the right hole."

"How would you know?" Asks Jim

"I was late after choir practice one day, and Father Henry and I talked about the sins of the flesh. Then he showed me how it was done so I could stay away from it and be wise and virtuous."

"Well that's weird." says Jim. "When we had that discussion, Father Henry put it in my ass."
***
I had a flat tire the other day...
I had a flat tire on the I-95 yesterday; so, I pulled over, got out of the car and opened my trunk.

I took out my cardboard men, unfolded them and stood them at the rear of my car facing oncoming traffic.
They look so lifelike you wouldn't believe it!
Just as I had hoped, cars started slowing down looking at the men which made it much safer for me to work
on the side of the road.
People honked and waved, and it wasn't long before a police car pulled up behind me.

He wanted to know what the heck I was doing, so I calmly explained that I was changing my flat.
He told me he could see that, but demanded to know what the heck the naked cardboard men were
doing standing at the rear of my car.
I couldn't believe he didn't know!
So I told him .... "Well, I explained to the angry Policeman ....
They're my Emergency Flashers!!!!"

I go to court in August.
***
A Priest, a Drunkard, and an Engineer
On a beautiful Sunday afternoon in the midst of the French Revolution the revolting citizens led a priest, a drunkard and an engineer to the guillotine. They ask the priest if he wants to face up or down when he meets his fate. The priest says he would like to face up so he will be looking towards heaven when he dies. They raise the blade of the guillotine and release it. It comes speeding down and suddenly stops just inches from his neck. The authorities take this as divine intervention and release the priest.

The drunkard comes to the guillotine next. He also decides to die face up, hoping that he will be as fortunate as the priest. They raise the blade of the guillotine and release it. It comes speeding down and suddenly stops just inches from his neck. Again, the authorities take this as a sign of divine intervention, and they release the drunkard as well.

Next is the engineer. He, too, decides to die facing up. As they slowly raise the blade of the guillotine, the engineer suddenly says, "Hey, I see what your problem is ..."
***
I personally don't believe in bros before hoes or hoes before hoes..
There needs to be a balance. A homie-hoe-stasis
***
Pedro was driving down a street when...
Pedro was driving down the Panjim street in a swift because he had an important meeting and couldn't find a parking place.

Looking up to heaven he said, "Lord take pity on me. If you find me a parking place I will go to Mass every Sunday for the rest of my life and give up my whiskey. I will give up gambling and womanising too!!"

Miraculously, a parking place appeared.

Pedro looked up again and said," Never mind, I found one ! Sorry I bothered you !!"
***
This is my favorite joke to tell. A man's car breaks down outside of a monastery.
So a man is driving home from a buisness trip. He has a pretty low paying job, so obviously he doesn't have the best of cars.

After a few hours of driving, he drives past a monastery. That kind with all the monks.

And holy tits, his car breaks down right in front of the monastery.

Being a man of God, he obviously figures, "I bet the monks will let me stay with them while my car is repaired." So he goes to the front gate and knocks on the door. A man in robes answers.
He tells the monk his predicament and the monk, being a monk, lets him stay the night, and even helps with repair costs for his car.

While the business man is sleeping that night, he hears this strange noise.
It just perplexes him, and for the life of him, he can't figure out what it is. He decides when he wakes up in the morning, he'll ask the monks about it.

When he wakes up, he finds the monk who he met when his car first broke down, and asks him, "Can you tell me what that noise I heard was last night?"

The monk replies, "I'm sorry, brother. I cannot tell you, for you are not a monk." The man accepts this. He thanks the monks for their graciousness, and goes about his way when he gets his car back.
3 years later, he is driving on another buisness trip. And wouldn't you know it, his car breaks down in front of the monastery again.

Again, he figures, he can stay the night. And, of course, the monks let him stay and offer him the same help as before.

And once again, during the night, he hears that noise. He has no idea what it could be. He decides to ask the monk once again, with hopes that he would trust him more this time around.
In the morning he meets the monk again, and asks, "I'm sorry for asking again, but what is that noise!?"

The monk replies, "I cannot tell you, for you are not a monk."

The man says, "Alright! I'll become a monk! What do I need to do!?"

The monk replies, "I need you to travel the world, and count every blade of grass if you truly wish to become a monk."

The man swiftly accepts and leaves all of his worldly possessions behind him to travel the world on this mission.

He goes to all corners of the globe counting grass blades.

After 50 years, he comes back to the monastery.
He gives the monk accurate numbers and the monks give him monk-hood.
And obviously, the first thing he wants to do is find out what that noise was. So he asks the head monk.

The head monk beckons him to follow him and he does.
After a few minutes of walking through corridors and rooms, they happen upon a wooden door. 

The man can hear the noise. He gets excited. The head monk hands him a brass key.
He reaches with the key to the lock, and unlocks the door.

There is another door though. This time iron. And the monk hands him an iron key.

This happens again and again.
So many types of doors and keys. Every thing you could imagine. Glass doors, gold doors. Everything

Finally, they get to a door made of solid diamond. The noise is louder than ever. The monk hands the man the final key.

He opens the door and finally sees what has been making the noise.

But I can't tell you what it is, because you aren't a monk.
***
First condom
“I recall my first time with a condom, I was 16 or so. I went in to buy a packet of condoms at the pharmacy. There was this beautiful woman assistant behind the counter, and she could see that I was new at it. She handed me the package and asked if I knew how to wear one. I honestly answered, ‘No, this is my first time.’

So she unwrapped the package, took one out and slipped it over her thumb. She cautioned me to make sure it was on tight and secure. I apparently still looked confused. So, she looked all around the store to see if it was empty. It was empty.

‘Just a minute,’ she said, and walked to the door, and locked it. Taking my hand, she led me into the back room, unbuttoned her blouse and removed it. She unhooked her bra and laid it aside. ‘Do these excite you?’ She asked.

Well, I was so dumb-struck that all I could do was nod my head. She then said it was time to slip the condom on. As I was slipping it on, she dropped her skirt, removed her panties and lay down on a desk.

‘Well, come on’, she said, ‘We don’t have much time.’ So I climbed on her. It was so wonderful, that unfortunately, I could no longer hold back and KAPOWWWWWWWW, I was done within a few moments.

She looked at me with a bit of a frown. ‘Did you put that condom on?’ she asked.

I said, ‘I sure did,’ and held up my thumb to show her.

She fainted.”
***
Morning coffee in a US government job . . .
A guy goes to the Post Office to apply for a job.

The interviewer asks him, "Are you allergic to anything?"

He replies, "Yes, caffeine. I can't drink coffee."

"OK, have you ever been in the military service?"

"Yes," he says, "I was in Afghanistan for one tour."

The interviewer says, "That will give you 5 extra points toward employment."

Then he asks, "Are you disabled in any way?"

The guy says, "Yes. A bomb exploded near me and I lost both my testicles.

The interviewer grimaces and then says, "Okay. You've got enough points for me to hire you right now."

"Our normal hours are from 8 am to 4 pm. You can start tomorrow at 10 am and plan on starting at 10 am every day."

The guy is puzzled and asks, "If the work hours are from 8 am to 4 pm, why don't you want me here until 10 am?"

"This is a government job," the interviewer says. "For the first two hours, we just stand around drinking coffee and scratching our balls.
So no point in your coming in for that."
***
A woman was sick of her husband always farting in bed...
she would plead with him to stop ripping them off because it was making her sick. He told her he couldn't stop it and that it was perfectly natural. She told him to see a doctor, she was concerned that one day he would blow his guts out. The years went by and he continued to rip them out. Then one Christmas day morning, as she was preparing the turkey for dinner and he was upstairs sound asleep, she looked at the innards, neck, gizzard, liver and all the spare parts, and a malicious thought came to her. She took the bowl and went upstairs where her husband was sound asleep and, gently pulling the bed covers back, she pulled back the elastic waistband of his underpants and emptied the bowl of turkey guts into his shorts. Sometime later she heard her husband waken with his usual trumpeting which was followed by a blood curdling scream and the sound of frantic footsteps as he ran into the bath room. The wife could hardly control herself as she rolled on the floor laughing, tears in her eyes! After years of torture she reckoned she had got him back pretty good. About twenty minutes later, her husband came downstairs in his blood stained underpants with a look of horror on his face. She bit her lip as she asked him what was the matter. He said, “Honey you were right… all these years you have warned me and I didn't listen to you.” “What do you mean?” asked his wife. “Well, you always told me that one day I would end up farting my guts out, and today it finally happened, but by the grace of god, some Vaseline and two fingers. I think I got most of them back in
***
What body part grows 10 times it's size when stimulated?
The 6th grade science teacher, Mrs. Parks, asked her class, "Which human body part increases to ten times its size when stimulated?"

No one answered until little Mary stood up and said, "You should not be asking sixth graders a question like that! I'm going to tell my parents, and they will go and tell the principal, who will then fire you!"

Mrs. Parks ignored her and asked the question again, "Which body part increases to 10 times its size when stimulated?"

Little Mary's mouth fell open. Then she said to those around her, "Boy, is she going to get in big trouble!"

The teacher continued to ignore her and said to the class, "Anybody?"

Finally, Billy stood up, looked around nervously, and said, "The body part that increases 10 times its size when stimulated is the pupil of the eye."

Mrs. Parks said, "Very good, Billy," then turned to Mary and continued. "As for you, young lady, I have three things to say:

One, you have a dirty mind. Two, you didn't read your homework And three, one day you are going to be very, very disappointed."

***
Two Prostitutes (Kim & Chloe) walking down the street at night....
Kim says to Chloe, "Wait, someone is coming over." Chloe surprised and asks, "How can you tell? Its so dark out here." Kim explains, "You know I have this gift of smelling dick from a far." Chloe laughs and says, "No silly, I just burped."
***
Legs up in the Air
One day little Susie went into her back yard and found her dog Muffles lying dead with its legs up in the air. She asked, "Daddy, Daddy why is Muffles legs in the air?" Thinking quickly, her dad replied, "This way Jesus can come down and take Muffles to heaven easier."

The next day when Susie's dad came home she ran up to him and said, "Daddy, Daddy, Mommy almost died today." Flustered, her father said, "Honey what happened?" And Susie said, "Well Mommy's legs were up in the air and she was screaming 'Oh Jesus I'm coming I'm coming' and if it wasn't for the milkman holding her down she would have been a gonner."
***
An Australian walks into a US bar...
...with a crocodile under his arm. The bartender takes one look and says, "Hey! You can't bring that dangerous animal in here!"  
  
"Dangerous? That ridiculous!" the Aussie proclaims. "Watch this!"  
  
He places the croc on a table and grabs a nearby newspaper, rolling it up. He hits the croc over the head. The croc's jaws slowly open. The Australian whips out his dick, lays it over the crocodile's teeth, and hits it on the head again. The croc closes it's mouth ever-so-gently, not breaking his skin.  
  
"Anyone else wanna try it?" the Australian asks.  
  
A blonde woman raises her hand and says, "I will...if you don't hit me with the paper."
***
Johnny was in class one day...
and the teacher was asking everyone what their parents do. One said her dad was a firefighter, another said his mom was a nurse. When the teach asked Johnny what his dad does Johnny said "Well my dad is a stripper in a gay bar, and if the guy looks good and the money is right he'll have sex with him out back in the alley." The teacher asked everyone to take their seats and sit quietly, then asked Johnny to step into the hall. She asked Johnny if his dad was really a stripper in a gay bar and Johnny said "Absolutely not. He's the quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys, but I was too embarrassed to say that."
***
The Sex Shop Fatality.
A man walks into a sex shop to purchase some see-through lingerie for his wife. He is shown several possibilities that range from £50 to £150 in price, the more see-through, the higher the price. He opts for the sheerest item, pays the £150 and takes the lingerie home. He presents it to his wife and asks her to go upstairs put it on and model it for him.  
Upstairs the wife thinks 'I have an idea. It's so see-through that it might as well be nothing. I won't put it on - do the modelling naked, return it tomorrow and get a £150 refund and keep the money for myself'.  
So she appears naked at the top of the stairs and strikes a pose.  
"Stone me!" exclaims her hubby. "It wasn't that creased in the shop!"    
His funeral is on Thursday.
***
A boy goes into confession...
The boy tells the priest, "Father I'm afraid I've been with a loose girl."
"Hmm, ok son, what was the girls name?"
"Oh I can't say."
"Was it Mary Jane?"
"No Father."
"Adalina Mozarelli?"
"My lips are sealed."
"How about Cindy King"
"I can never say."
"Oh come on boy, I'll find out soon enough. It was Tina King wasn't it!?"
"No."
"It has to be Tracy Cummings though!"
"Father I will never tell you."
"Ok fine, but for your sin you can't be alter boy for four months."
"Ok, Father"
The boy leaves and his friend asks, "So what'd you get?"
The boy responds, "Five good leads, and a four month vacation!"
***
No Sex Tonight!
I've never quite figured out why the sexual urges of men and women differ so much.

And I never have figured out the whole Venus and Mars thing or why men think with their head and women with their heart.

For example… One evening last week, my wife and I were getting into bed.

Well, the passion started to heat up, but then she said "I don't feel like it, I just want you to hold me."

I said "WHAT??!! What was that?!"

So she said the words that every husband on the planet dreads to hear..."You're just not in touch with my emotional needs as a woman enough for me to satisfy your physical needs as a man."

She responded to my puzzled look by saying, "Can't you just love me for who I am and not what I do for you in the bedroom?"

Realizing that nothing was going to happen that night, I went to sleep.

The very next day, I opted to take the day off of work to spend time with her. We went out to a nice lunch and then went shopping at a big, high-end department store. I walked around with her while she tried on several very expensive outfits. She couldn't decide which one to take so I told her we'd just buy them all. She wanted new shoes to compliment her new clothes, so I said lets get a pair for each outfit. We went on to the jewellery department where she picked out a pair of diamond earrings.

Let me tell you...she was so excited. She must have thought I was one wave short of a tsunami. I started to think she was testing me because she asked for a tennis bracelet when she doesn't even know how to play tennis. But, I think I threw her for a loop when I said, "That's fine, honey."

She appeared to be almost nearing sexual satisfaction from all of the excitement. Smiling with excited anticipation she finally said, "I think this is all dear; let's go to the cashier."

I could hardly contain myself when I blurted out, "No honey, I don't feel like it."

Her face just went completely blank as her jaw dropped with a baffled, "WHAT?"

I then said "Honey, I just want you to HOLD this stuff for a while.

You're just not in touch with my financial means as a man, enough for me to satisfy your shopping needs as a woman."

And just when she had this look like she was going to kill me, I added, "Why can't you just love me for who I am and not for the things I buy you?"

Apparently, no sex tonight either!



Edit: Didn't expect to make front page but glad lots of you got a laugh out of it!

Edit 2: Thank you for the gold! 
***
Swing Low Sweet...
Haven't been on here for a bit but haven't seen this one so thought I should post it.. (apologies in advance if you have heard before)  
  ....  
A teacher asked her class to write on a piece of paper the type of work their daddies did.  
The children got very excited and started scribbling their answers. One by one the teacher asks each child to stand and describe the job they have written down.  
  
By now all the children where excitedly chatting away, apart from little Timmy. "what's wrong Timmy" asked the teacher.  
  
Timmy slowly rose to his feet and stated "My Dad's a stripper in a gay bar, Sometimes he doesn't come home and my Mum cries herself to sleep".  
  
The class had fallen to a hush as Timmy continued, "Sometimes he sells his body for other men's pleasure".  
There are gasps around the classroom and the teacher quickly dismisses the class for an early break time. She walks up to little Timmy and asks, "Is that all true, Timmy?".  

"No not at all, Miss. He really plays rugby for England but I was too embarrassed to say"
***
A boy is studying for his geography quiz
His mom asks him:

"What is the capital of Germany?"

"Berlin", says the boy.

"What is the capital of France?"

"Berlin."

"What is the capital of Russia?"

"Berlin."

"You're so smart, Adolf, I know you'll do great on your quiz."
***
So the boy said "Grandpa"
A little boy and his grandfather are raking leaves in the yard. The little boy finds an earthworm trying to get back into its hole. He says, "Grandpa, I bet I can put that worm back in that hole." The grandfather replies, "I'll bet you five dollars you can't. It's too wiggly and limp to put back in that little hole." The little boy runs into the house and comes back out with a can of hairspray. He sprays the worm until it is straight and stiff as a board. Then he puts the worm back into the hole. 

The grandfather hands the little boy five dollars, grabs the hairspray, and runs into the house. Thirty minutes later the grandfather comes back out and hands the little boy another five dollars. 

The little boy says, "Grandpa, you already gave me five dollars." The grandfather replies, "I know. That's from your grandma." 



EDIT: Wow this made top page, thanks guys ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)

***
A Free Trip to Italy
A young New York woman was so depressed that she decided to end her life by throwing herself into the ocean, but just before she could throw herself from the docks, a handsome young man stopped her.

“You have so much to live for,” said the man. “I’m a sailor, and we are off to Italy tomorrow. I can stow you away on my ship. I’ll take care of you, bring you food every day, and keep you happy.”

With nothing to lose, combined with the fact that she had always wanted to go to Italy, the woman accepted.

That night the sailor brought her aboard and hid her in a small but comfortable compartment in the hold. From then on, every night he would bring her three sandwiches, a bottle of red wine, and make love to her until dawn. Two weeks later she was discovered by the captain during a routine inspection.


“What are you doing here?” asked the captain.

“I have an arrangement with one of the sailors,” she replied. “He brings me food and I get a free trip to Italy .”

“I see,” the captain says.

Her conscience got the best of her and she added, “Plus, he’s screwing me.”


“He certainly is,” replied the captain.

“This is the Staten Island Ferry.”
***
Two girls die and go to Heaven...
They meet up there, realizing they know each other and are surprised to see the other one dead.

"Wow! What happened to you?" Asks the firs one.

"Hypothermia.. It was soo cold, but after a while I just wanted to sleep and looks like I am never waking up. How about you?"

"Heart attack"

"Whaat! You are in your twenties! What happened? "

"Well, for a while now I've been suspecting that my husband cheats on me. So this one night I told him I was gonna be working late, but I came home early. I was damn sure there was a girl there. I looked everywhere, but to no avail. Under the bed, in the closet, in the bathroom, in the basement. I was so frustrated by the end, that my heart just collapsed."

"Well" said the other one "Had you checked the fridge, we both would've been alive right now"

EDIT: formatten'
***
Delivering The Best Toast
A contest was held to see who could deliver the best toast.

Murphy won the contest for the best toast of the night, which was: "Here's to the best years o' me life, spent between the legs o' me wife."

When he got home, his wife asked him how the Toastmasters meeting went. "I won the contest for the best toast of the night," he replied.

She then asked what his toast was. He said, "Here's to the best years o' me life, spent in church with me wife." "How sweet of you to include me in your toast," his wife replied.

While out shopping the following morning, Mrs. Murphy ran into the local policeman on the beat, who also attended the Toastmasters meetings.

"Mornin' Mrs. Murphy," he said. "That was a wonderful toast your husband gave last night. He won first prize."

"Well, I'm afraid he wasn't quite honest with the facts," Mrs. Murphy replied. "He's only been there twice. The first time he fell asleep, and the second time I had to pull him by the ears to make him come."
***
The mathematician's interview
A mathematician is interviewing for a prestigious job. To make sure he has the right morals, the interviewer gives him the following situation: 

"You're late for a meeting, when you come across a burning house, a fire hydrant, and a fire hose lying across the street. What do you do?"
 
The mathematician responds: 

"People's lives are more important than the meeting. I screw the fire hose into the hydrant and put out the fire before coming to the office." 

The interviewer is impressed, but asks him a followup question just to make sure: 

"You're late for a meeting when you pass a fire hose connected to a hydrant, next to a perfectly safe house.  What do you do?" 

The mathematician thinks for a moment, then replies: 

"I unscrew the fire hose, carry it across the street, and set the house on fire. Then I've reduced it to a problem I've already solved."
***
While on a walk two men pass a bar...
Two friends are out walking their dogs on a hot summer day when they pass a bar.

"Let's stop and grab a drink"

"They don't allow pets - let's just keep going"

"Follow my lead"

The first man walks into the bar, his dog in tow.

"Sorry but we don't allow dogs in here."

"Excuse me but this is my seeing eye dog."

The bartender gives the man and the dog a once over. Seeing his sunglasses and a German Shepard, he quickly apologizes "Pardon me sir, first round is on the house!"

He quickly flashes a smile back at his friend and makes his way to a table.
The second man walks in, with both sunglasses and dog, doing his best to mimic the confidence his friend wielded.

"Umm, sorry but we do not allow pets here."

"Well excuse me but this is my seeing eye dog."

The bartender narrows his gaze and sighs.

"You're telling me that Chihuahua is a seeing eye dog?"

Taking a moment to collect himself, the friend says, "They gave me a Chihuahua?!?!"
***
Putting it in.
A married Irishman went into the confessional and said to his priest,

'I almost had an affair with another woman.'

The priest said, 'What do you mean, almost?'

The Irishman said, 'Well, we got undressed and rubbed together, but then I stopped.'

The priest said, 'Rubbing together is the same as putting it in.  You're not to see that woman again. For your penance, say five Hail Mary's and put $50 in the poor box.'

The Irishman left the confessional, said his prayers, and then walked over to the poor box.

He paused for a moment and then started to leave.

The priest, who was watching, quickly ran over to him saying, 'I saw that. You didn't put any money in the poor box!'

The Irishman replied, 'Yeah, but I rubbed the $50 on the box, and
according to you, that's the same as putting it in!'
***
Two men are walking down the street
When they see 3 guys across the road beating up an older woman. Fred turns to George and says 
"Hey, isn't that your mother in law over there?"
"So it is." replies George
"Well aren't you going to help?!" Fred asked. 
"Nah," George replied, "I think 3 should be enough"
***
SFW Joke my Granddad used to tell, i was the only one who ever found it funny
A guy gets sent to prison. His first day in the yard they are told to walk in a circle, no talking allowed between the prisoners. After a few minutes somebody yells "16" and the whole yard errupts with laughter. They continue walking in circles when someone else shouts out "54" and again everybody starts dying laughing. 
The new guy, being confused, whispers to the guy in front, "Hey whats with the numbers?"
The other prisoner tells him , "well since we arent allowed to speak to one another we've memorized jokes and assigned numbers to them all. When somebody shouts out a number, we think of the joke and then laugh".

Wanting to make a good impression on his first day, the new guy waits his turn. More numbers are called and everyone is laughing as they walk. Finally the new guy decides to make his mark, "18" he yells....but nobody laughs.

After a few minutes he whispers to the guy in front again, "Hey what the hell man?"
The guy turns to him and says, "ahh well its all in the way you tell it".



Thanks for listening Reddit. RIP Grandad
***
GRANPA, GRANPA CROAK LIKE A FROG
 

A six-year-old goes to the hospital with her mother to visit her Grandpa.  When they get to the hospital, she runs ahead of her mother and bursts into her Grandpa's room.  "Grandpa, Grandpa," she says excitedly, "as soon as my mother comes into the room, make a noise like a frog!"

 

"What?" said her Grandpa.

 

"Make a noise like a frog because my mom said that as soon as you croak, we're all going to Disney World!”

 
***
A joke my granddad once told me.
I always loved this one, my granddad told it to me years ago. Still one of my favourites.



An elderly woman wakes one morning and looks out of her bedroom window. Across the road she sees two men from the local council office slowly making their way up the grassy embankment at the side of the road.



The man in front starts to dig a hole in the embankment and after some time moves forward and begins digging another hole. The second man then proceeds to immediately fill in the hole which the first man had only just finished digging. Perplexed by the odd behaviour of the men, the old woman continues to watch them to see if they will do the same with the next hole.



Surely enough, the men from the council continue this pattern for a good 30 minutes before the old woman, agitated with confusion and curiosity; decides it's time to find out what the men are doing.



"Excuse me young man, what on earth is the point of this, what are you doing?" Says the old woman, "The point?" Says the first man, "The point is to improve the appearance of the roads in this area, to give them a more natural look". 



"Natural?" Exclaims the woman, "How exactly does this make the road look more natural? All you're doing is digging holes and then filling them in again!", the two men exchange a disheartened glance before the second man yells "Well it normally looks better, but the fella who plants the trees is off today!"
***
That's how to do it...
Bob and Marty were out drinking one night and were talking. Bob: I just can't seem to fool my wife, no matter what I do. I park the car a block from the house and walk the rest of the way. I  enter the house as quietly as I can. I take of my shoes before I slowly climb the stairs. I get undressed in the bathroom, and climb into bed as quietly as I can, but the Wife always wakes up and yells at me for being out drinking so late. Marty: You're doing it all wrong. I speed up to my house and slam on the brakes, squealing the tires, I slam the front door loudly and stomp up the stairs. I then bounce into bed, solidly grab my wife's ass, and drunkenly slur, "Hey honey, how 'bout a little?", She then always pretends to be asleep.
***
So drunk he can't stand up
An Irishman's been drinking at a pub all night. When he stands up to leave, he falls flat on his face. He tries to stand one more time, but to no avail. Again, he falls flat on his face. He figures he'll crawl outside and get some fresh air and maybe that will sober him up. Once outside, he stands up and, sure enough, he falls flat on his face. The Irishman decides to crawl the four blocks to his home.

When he arrives at the door, he stands up and falls flat on his face. He crawls through the door into his bedroom. When he reaches his bed, he tries one more time to stand up. This time, he manages to pull himself upright but he quickly falls right into bed. He is sound asleep as soon as his head hits the pillow.

He awakens the next morning to his wife standing over him, shouting, "So, you've been out drinking again!"

"Why do you say that?" he asks innocently.

"The pub called. You left your wheelchair there again."

---------
**EDIT** - Read the sidebar if you don't like the joke! Glad I could make most of you have a laugh :)
***
The Marine and the Liberal Arts Major
A crusty old Marine Sergeant Major found himself at a gala event hosted by a local liberal arts college. There was no shortage of extremely young, idealistic ladies in attendance, one of whom
approached the Sergeant Major for conversation.

"Excuse me, Sergeant Major, but you seem to be a very serious man. Is something bothering you?"

"Negative, ma'am. Just serious by nature."

The young lady looked at his awards and decorations and said, "It looks like you have seen a lot of action."

"Yes, ma'am, a lot of action."

The young lady, tiring of trying to start up a conversation, said, "You know, you should lighten up a little. Relax and enjoy yourself."

The Sergeant Major just stared at her in his serious manner.

Finally the young lady said, "You know, I hope you don't take this the wrong way, but when is the last time you got any?"

"1955, ma'am."

"Well, there you are. You really need to chill out and quit taking everything so seriously! I mean, no nookie since 1955!"

She took his hand and led him to a private room where she proceeded to "relax" him several times.

Afterwards, panting for breath, she leaned against his bare chest and said, "Wow, you sure didn't forget much since 1955!"

The Sergeant Major, glancing at his watch, said in his matter-of-fact voice, "I hope not, it's only 2130 now."
***
A trucker walks into a whorehouse..
The Madam walks up to the trucker and says "How can I help you?" to which the trucker replies " I have $1000, I want the ugliest, meanest, foul mouthed women you have." The Madame says "for $1000 you have can the sexiest, smoothest, most beautiful lady we have." the Trucker replies" ma'am I mean no disrespect, but I'm not horny, I'm homesick" 

Courtesy of my late grandfather. 
***
"Bro, that last chick was hot but...
 ...I'm still horny as fuck. What can I get with $3?" The Brothel Manager says: "Well, we can give you a Chimp."

Man takes the chimp into a room & gets down to business. Still unsatisfied, he goes back to the manager.

Man: "Hey man, the chimp was alright but I'm still horny as fuck. What can I get for a nickel?  

Manager: "Well, we have a live peep show you can jack off to."

The man goes to a corridor where a bunch of dudes were looking thru peep holes. He looks into one and sees a beautiful woman fucking a dog.  

Man: "Holy crap. This is insane!"
Another guy next to him said: " No man, this is nothing. Just awhile ago, we saw this dude fucking a chimp!"
***
Birthday sex
Adam was talking to his friend at a bar. He said, "I don't know what to get my wife for her birthday. She has everything, and besides, she can afford to buy anything she wants, so I'm stuck." His friend said, "I have an idea! Why don't you make up a certificate saying that she can have 60 minutes of great sex, anyway she wants it. She'll probably be thrilled." So Adam decided to listen to his friend's advice. The next day at the bar, his friend said, "Well? Did you take my suggestion?" "Yes, I did," Adam replied. "Did she like it?" "Oh yes! She jumped up, thanked me, kissed me on the forehead, and ran out the door, yelling, "I'll be back in an hour!"
***
A farmer buys a rooster
to service his 200 hens. When he gets the rooster into the barnyard, he tells him, "Randy, I want you to pace yourself now. You've got a lot of chickens to service here, and you cost me a lot of money. Have fun, but take your time."

The farmer points him toward the henhouse and the rooster takes off like a shot.

WHAM! Randy nails every hen in the henhouse, three or four times. Randy runs out and sees a flock of geese down by the lake. WHAM! He nails all the geese. Randy runs to the pigpen, the cow pasture -- soon, he's been on every animal on the farm.

The farmer is distraught, worried that his expensive rooster won't even last the day.

Sure enough, the farmer wakes up the next morning to find Randy laid out flat in the middle of the yard, buzzards circling overhead.

The sad farmer shakes his head and says, "Oh, Randy, I told you to pace yourself."

Randy opens one eye, glares and nods towards the sky..."Quiet you fool....they're getting closer."
***
Little 8 year old Susie is in her back yard digging a hole..
..Her neighbor Mr. Johnson peeks over the fence and says *"Gee Susie, what's going on?"*


Susie says, *"I'm digging a hole, it's pretty obvious"*


Mr. Johnson asks, *"Why are you digging a hole?"*


Susie replies, *"I'm burying my gold fish"*


Mr. Johnson laughs and asks *"Why is the hole so big?"*
Susie replies, *"Because my goldfish is inside your fucking cat".*
***
Penis Van Lesbian
Back in the 50's, a man walked into a Hollywood agent's office. He told the agent that he wanted to be a big star and that he wanted the agent to represent him. The agent asked the man's name, to which he proudly replied, "Penis Van Lesbian."
Taken aback, the agent said, "If you want to be a big star, you will have to change your name."
The man, somewhat offended, told the agent, "The Van Lesbian name goes back centuries and I am very proud of my name! I will never change my name! Ever!"
"Then I won't be able to represent you."  Said the agent.
"Then good day to you, sir!" The man yelled as he stormed out of the office. 

Five years later, the agent received a letter along with a check for $50,000, written out to him. He wondered if it was sent to him by mistake until he read the letter. 

The letter said,

Dear Sir,
Five years ago, I came into your office wanting to become an actor in Hollywood and you told me I needed to change my name. Determined to make it with my God-given birth name, I refused. You told me I would never make it in Hollywood with a name like Penis Van Lesbian.
After I left your office, I thought about what you said. I decided you were right. I had to change my name. I had too much pride to return to your office, so I signed with another agent. I would never have made it without changing my name, so the enclosed check is a token of my appreciation.
Thank you for your advice..

Sincerely,

Dick Van Dyke
***
A German baby's parents are concerned that he never speaks...
It has gotten to the point where he is five years old and has said not a word, so his parents take him to the doctor. Everything's fine, he's healthy, not messed in the head. So then one day the German baby is having some apfelstrudel when he says "mother, zis strudel is quite tepid." The parents are amazed! "Wolfgang, you've finally spoken  after all these years! What's happened?" 

"Up until now, everyzing has been satisfactory."
***
Is this OC? I thought of it in the shower. Help with making it better would be appreciated.
A farmer is eating dinner with his lovely daughter.  The local merchants son, known for being honest and trustworthy, walks in and says "sir I'd like to lay with your daughter."  The farmer in a rage asks "Why the hell would I let you do that?"  To which the merchants son reply's "I was just diagnosed with a disease that will kill me tomorrow and your daughter is the loveliest creature I have ever set eyes on.  I would like to lay with her so I won't die a virgin."  The farmer taken aback sits down, thinks and finally agrees to the request.  The young pair leave the house.  Soon after the farmers wife arrives.  She starts unpacking groceries while he sits there quietly and she starts to tell her husband about her day "I was asked by the young market boy if he could date our daughter.  I told him the only way you would let anyone lay a finger on her would be if they were going to die the next day."  The farmer goes to the closet and gets his shotgun.  The wife, alarmed, asks "what's that for?"  Farmer "I've just got to make sure that I keep that boy honest."

Alt Punchlines : 1. "Honey, where is my crossbow? It's time to finish playing cupid." For around Valentine's day or for archers - didnt_like_my_old_na

2."Have you seen my shotgun?" "Why?" "Need to keep that boy honest." - tylerthehun

*EDIT : Dinner not diner

**EDIT2 : "so I won't die a virgin." from "so that I can die not a virgin." and Alt Punchlines
***
A young woman in Cape Town was so depressed...
 that she decided to end her life by jumping into the ocean. She went down to the docks and was about to leap into the frigid water when a handsome young deck hand saw her tottering on the edge of the pier, crying. 

He took pity on her and said, "Look you have a lot to live for. We're off to Europe in the morning, and if you like, I can stow you away on this ship. I'll take good care of you and bring you food everyday."

Moving closer he slipped his arm around her shoulder and added, " I'll keep you happy and you'll keep me happy, Ok?"

The girl nodded yes. After all what did she have to lose? Maybe a fresh start in Europe would give her life new meaning. That night, the sailor brought her aboard and hid her in a life boat.

From then on, the sailor brought her three sandwiches and a piece of fruit, and they made passionate love till dawn. Three weeks later, during a routine inspection, the captain discovered her. 

"What are you doing here?" The captain asked. "I have an arrangement with one of the sailors", she explained. 

"I get food and a trip to Europe, and he's screwing me." 
"He sure is, lady" the captain said.
This is the Robben Island Ferry making trips between Robben Island and the Waterfront.
***
Two guys are walking their dogs down the street...
One has a golden retriever the other a Chihuahua. As they are going along the one with the retriever sees a bar. He turns to his friend and suggests they go in for a quick drink. His friend says "That would be great but see the sign, no dogs allowed". The guy turns to him and says "Don't worry, just do what I do". So the guy puts on some sunglasses and goes into the bar with his retriever. The tender turns to him and says "Hey! No dogs allowed". The guy quickly retorts "Oh no, this is my seeing eye dog". The bartender says ok and lets him sit.


His friend thinks about it and figures, why not. He puts on some sunglasses and walks in. The tender quickly turns and yells, "Hey! No dogs allowed in the bar!"


The friend quickly replies "No, you don't understand. This is my seeing eye dog!"


The bartender replies skeptically "A Chihuahua is your seeing eye dog?"

"THEY GAVE ME A CHIHUAHUA?!"
***
So these two ladies die
and are waiting in purgatory to hear the results of their life audit. A door opens and two men walk in. An angel walks in with an ugly, hunch backed gremlin of a man. The angel says "Nancy, in 1982 you killed a duck, your punishment will be to spend your eternal life with this man". He slaps the the shackles on each of their arms and are sent off for eternity.  A little while later another angel walks in with a gorgeous hunky stud. He slaps the shackle on her and the handsome man and are sent on their way. During their walk shes thinking she must have be a good person during her life on earth, when she's interrupted by the man's muttering "I shouldn't have killed that duck". 
***
Before and After Marriage
**Before Marriage:**

Her: Hey!

Him: Finally, I have been waiting for so long..

Her: Do you want me to leave?

Him: No, I wouldn't even dare think about that

Her: Do you love me?

Him: Ofcourse, a lot!

Her: Did you ever cheat on me?

Him: NO, why would you ask me that?

Her: Do you want to kiss me?

Him: Every time I get the chance!

Her: Will you ever hit me?

Him: No, I'm not that kind of a person.

Her: Can I trust you?

Him: Yes

Her: Darling

**After Marriage: Read the joke from the bottom to the top**

^^This ^^joke ^^translated ^^worse ^^than ^^I ^^had ^^hoped..

Edit: Corrected Typo (Derling --> Darling)
***
While playing in the backyard,
Little Johnny kills a honeybee. His father sees him killing the honeybee and angrily says, "No honey for you for one month!"

Later that afternoon, Johnny's dad catches him tearing the wings off a butterfly. "That's it! No butter for you for one month!" says his dad.

Later that evening as Johnny's mother cooks dinner, a cockroach run across the kitchen floor. She jumps and stomps on it, and then looks up to find Little Johnny and her husband watching her.

Little Johnny looks at his father and says, "Are you going to tell her, Dad, or do you want me to?"
***
How many tumblrinas does it take to change a lightbulb?
You may think that a burnt out bulb needs to change just because the room is too dark *for you* to see anything, so it *must* be changed, but I don't care, it's beautiful, you should respect its right to be burnt out and learn to be more accepting of darker rooms, check your filament privileges you ableist scum. Anyone who disagrees with this is a burnt-out-bulbophobe and a darknessphobe. Thanks for being so understanding.
***
An elderly man lay dying in his bed.
An elderly man lay dying in his bed.

In death's agony, he suddenly smelled the aroma of his favorite chocolate chip cookies wafting up the stairs.  He gathered his remaining strength, and lifted himself from the bed.  Leaning against the wall, he slowly made his way out of the bedroom and with even greater effort forced himself down the stairs, gripping the railing with both hands. With labored breath, he leaned against the doorframe, gazing into the kitchen. Were it not for death's agony, he would have thought himself already in heaven: there, spread out upon newspapers on the kitchen table was literally hundreds of his favorite chocolate chip cookies.

Was it heaven? Or, was it one final act of heroic love from his devoted wife, seeing to it that he left this world a happy man? Mustering one great final effort, he threw himself toward the table, landing on his knees in a rumpled posture.  His parched lips parted; the wondrous taste of the cookie was already in his mouth; seemingly bringing him back to life. The aged and withered hand shakily made its way to a cookie at the edge of the table, when his wife suddenly smacked it with a spatula. 

"Stay out of those," she said, "they're for the funeral."


An old one but one of my favorites...
***
The 10th grade teacher asks Jessica: "What part of the human body increases to 10 times it's normal size when excited?"
Jessica responds: "That's disgusting! I don't have to answer that question!" So the teacher asks little Johnny, who responds: "That's easy...the pupil of the eye." "That's correct, Johnny. Very good!" And turning to Jessica, she says: "I've three things to say to you, young lady... first, you didn't do your homework; second, you have a dirty mind; and third, you're in for a big disappointment!"
***
Yet another genie in the lamp joke
A sales rep, an administration clerk, and their manager are walking to lunch when they find an antique oil lamp. 

They rub it and a Genie comes out. The Genie says, 'I'll give each of you just one wish.' 

'Me first! Me first!' says the admin clerk. 'I want to be in the Bahamas, driving a speedboat, without a care in the world.' Poof! She's gone. 

'Me next! Me next!' says the sales rep. 'I want to be in Hawaii, relaxing on the beach with my personal masseuse, an endless supply of Pina Coladas, and the love of my life.' Poof! He's gone. 

'OK, you're up,' the Genie says to the manager. The manager says, 'I want those two back in the office after lunch.' 
***
A man and an alligator walk into a bar.
The bartender says, "Whoa man, you can't have an alligator in here!"
The man replies, "Don't worry, its a trained alligator."
Bartender, "I don't care if its trained or not, you can't have a fucking alligator in a bar."
Man, "Alright, check this out." The man then opens the alligator's mouth, takes out his dick, places it in the alligators mouth, closes it, then grabs a stick and starts bashing the alligator over the head.  After a few whacks, the man calmly places down the stick, opens the alligators mouth, and pulls out his unharmed dick. "And anyone in the bar could do the same thing."
An old woman in the back of the bar raises her hand and says, "Well, I'll give it a try, but I don't want you smacking me over the head with that stick."
***
A college girl once had a very active sex life...
She especially loved hooking up with frat boys and men who had been sentenced to prison. Those were kind of her fetishes, and she didn't know why. She didn't really like to use condoms, though, which was very dumb of her, and she knew that, but she thought it felt so much better without one. Also, she was on birth control.

Only, one day, her period didn't come as expected. She thought it was probably nothing, but she was suspicious nonetheless. She went to the store and bought a pregnancy test, and, lo and behold, she was indeed pregnant. Well, shit. Due to her active sex life and having slept with all those prisoners and frat boys, she didn't really know, which one of them had gotten her pregnant. She thought about what she was to do. Should she keep the baby? How could she find the father? And then it hit her.

She had to make a list of all the bros and cons.
***
For the Australians out there!
Tony was at school this morning when the teacher asked all the children what their fathers did for a living.

All the typical answers came out: Policeman, Fireman, Salesman, etc. But Tony was being uncharacteristically quiet and so teacher asked him about his father.

'My father is an exotic dancer in a gay club and takes off his clothes in front of other men. Sometimes if the offer is really good he'll go out with a man, rent a cheap hotel room and let them sleep with him.'

The teacher quickly set the other children some work and took little tony aside to ask him if that was really true.
'No' said Tony, 'He plays cricket for Australia, but I was just too embarrassed to say'.

***
A proctologist quits his job...
A proctologist named Bill decides he is tired of practicing medicine and quits his job to pursue his dream of being a car mechanic. He enrolls in a trade school and after some time the final exam is given. The test solely consists of disassembling and reassembling a car engine. The teacher tells the students, "You have as long as you need to complete the exam, so take your time and work at your own pace." Twenty-eight hours after the exam began, Bill completes the reassembly of the engine and returns home.

The next day the teacher calls Bill up to give him the results of his test. Bill is absolutely floored to find that he received a 150 on the exam.

"How could I get a 150 on the exam if the test only had 100 points?!" Bill asked.

"Well, I gave you 50 points for a flawless disassembly of the engine," replied the teacher.
"And another 50 points for reassmbling the engine perfectly."

"I'm extremely pleased with the results!" Bill exclaimed.
"But where did the last 50 points come from?"

The teacher paused for a moment and responded, "Well, I gave you the extra 50 points for doing the whole exam through the tailpipe."
***
A man was constipated, so he decided to go to the doctor. The doctor examined him and explained,
The doctor examined him and explained:"I'm going to give you some suppositories. 

I'll insert one now, and then I'll give you another one for later this evening."
 
Later that evening, the man asks has his wife to insert the suppository. 

She agrees reluctantly, puts one hand on his shoulder and inserts the suppository. Suddenly, her husband shrieks,

"Aahhhhh!"

"What's wrong? Did I hurt you?" she asks.

"No... I just realised that the doctor had both his hands on my shoulders!"
***
Little Johnny At The Park
Little Johnny sees his Daddy's car passing the playground and going into the woods.

Curious, he follows the car and sees Daddy and Aunt Jane kissing.

Johnny finds this so exciting and can barely contain himself as he runs home and starts to tell his mother excitedly.

"MOMMY, MOMMY, I WAS AT THE PLAYGROUND AND DADDY AND...."

Mommy tells him to slow down, but that she wants to hear the story.

So Johnny tells her. "I was at the playground and I saw Daddy's car go into the woods with Aunt Jane. I went to look and Daddy was giving Aunt Jane a big kiss, then he helped her take off her shirt, then Aunt Jane helped Daddy take his pants off, then Aunt Jane laid down on the seat, then Daddy...."

At this point, Mommy cut him off and said, "Johnny, this is such an interesting story, suppose you save the rest of it for supper time. I want to see the look on Daddy's face when you tell it tonight."

At the dinner table, Mommy asks Johnny to tell his story.

He describes the car into the woods, the undressing, laying down on the seat, and, "Then Daddy and Aunt Jane did that same thing Mommy and Uncle Jeff used to do when Daddy was in the Army."
***
The boss!
One day a man goes to a pet shop to buy a parrot. The assistant takes the man to the parrot section and asks the man to choose one. The man asks, ''How much is the yellow one?''
The assistant says, ''$2000.'' The man is shocked and asks the assistant why it's so expensive. The assistant explains, ''This parrot is a very special one. He knows typewriting and can type really fast.''
''What about the green one?'' the man asks.
The assistant says, ''He costs $5000 because he knows typewriting and can answer incoming telephone calls and takes notes.''
''What about the red one?'' the man asks.
The assistant says, ''That one's $10,000.''
The man says, ''What does HE do?''
The assistant says, ''I don't know, but the other two call him boss.''
***
Son of a Bitch
A priest was fishing in the old country when he caught a really big fish. He hauled it up on the bank and this guy walked up and looked at it. He looked over at the priest and said, "Wow, that's a big son of a bitch!"  The priest looked over and said, My son, I'm a man of the cloth. You shouldn't talk like that."  The guy looks at him and says, "That's what we call those fish in this part of the country."  The priest was like, oh, okay.

 So, the priest takes the fish back to where he lives and a nun walks up and says,  "Wow, did you catch that on your fishing trip?"  The priest proudly holds the fish up and says, "Yes, I caught this son of a bitch!"  The nun looks at him and says, "Father!"  The priest says, "That's what they call these fish where I caught it!"  The nun says, "Would you like for me to clean that son of a bitch for you?"  The priest says, "That will be fine."  So the nun is carrying it to clean when another nun walks up and ask where she got it. The nun carrying the fish replies,"The father caught this son of a bitch!"  The nun that asked says, "Sister!"  The nun carrying the fish says, "That's what the father said they're called!"  The other nun says, "I'll bake that son of a bitch after you clean it then!"  

Well, low and behold the pope shows up for dinner. Everyone finishes dinner and the pope is sitting there and he looks around, leans back and says, "That was a fine meal you cooked for the Pontiff."  Well the priest didn't want to be outdone and he jumps up and exclaims, "I caught that son of a bitch!"  The nun that cleaned it jumps up and says, "I cleaned that son of a bitch!"  Well the other nun didn't want to be left out and she jumps up and says, "And I baked that son of a bitch!"  Upon hearing this the pope looks around and says with a loud voice, "You know what?  You motherfuckers are alright!"
***
A preacher is reaching....
...the end of his sermon. He tells the congregation "Now for next week, I need everyone to read Leviticus chapter 28. It ties into my sermon" A week passes. The preacher reached the pulpit and asked "How many of you read Leviticus chapter 28?" Everyone raised their hands. The preacher looked and said "Ladies and gentlemen, there is no 28th chapter to Leviticus. Now let me start my sermon on lying."
***
On his 74th birthday, an old man received a gift certificate from his wife...
The certificate paid for a visit to a medicine man living on a nearby reservation who was rumored to have a wonderful cure for erectile dysfunction.     

After being persuaded to go, he drove to the reservation, handed his ticket to the medicine man and wondered what he was in for. 

The old man handed a potion to him, and with a grip on his shoulder, warned, "This is a powerful medicine. You take only a teaspoon and then say '1-2-3'." When you do, you will become more manly than you have ever been in your life and you can perform as long as you  want."     

The man was encouraged. As he walked away, he turned and asked, "How do I stop the medicine from working?"   

"Your partner must say '1-2-3-4,'" the medicine man responded, "but when she does, the medicine will not work again until the next full moon."     

The man was very eager to see if it worked so he went home, showered, shaved, took a spoonful of the medicine and then invited his wife to join him in the bedroom. When she came in, he quickly took off his clothes and said, "1-2-3!" Immediately, he was the manliest of men. His wife was excited and began throwing off her clothes as she asked "What was the 1-2-3 for?"      

And that, boys and girls, is why we should never end our sentences with a preposition, because we could end up with a dangling participle.
***
Heisenberg and Schrodinger are in a car...
they get pulled over. The officer approaches the car and asks Hiesenberg "Do you know how fast you were going?" "No, but I know exactly where I am." "You were doing 50 in a 35" "Well fuck, now I'm lost" The officer senses something is off. "Are you boys doing anything illegal? Is there anything in the car I should know about?" Schrodinger chimes in, "There's a cat in the trunk" "Open the trunk Sir" Schrodinger opens the trunk and the officer walks to the back. "This cat is dead" says the Officer "Well he is now you asshole" replies  Schrodinger 
***
Daddy's Call
“Hello?”, “Hi honey. This is Daddy. Is Mommy near the phone?”

“No Daddy. She’s upstairs in the bedroom with Uncle Paul.”
After a brief pause, Daddy says, “But honey, you haven’t got an Uncle Paul.”
“Oh yes I do, and he’s upstairs in the room with Mommy, right now.”
Brief Pause. “Uh, okay then, this is what I want you to do. Put the phone down on the table, run upstairs and knock on the bedroom door and shout to Mommy that Daddy’s car just pulled into the driveway.”
“Okay Daddy, just a minute.”
A few minutes later the little girl comes back to the phone.
“I did it Daddy.”
“And what happened honey?” he asked.
Well, Mommy got all scared, jumped out of bed with no clothes on and ran around screaming. Then she tripped over the rug, hit her head on the dresser and now she isn’t moving at all!”
“Oh my God!!! What about your Uncle Paul?”
“He jumped out of the bed with no clothes on, too. He was all scared and he jumped out of the back window and into the swimming pool. But I guess he didn’t know that you took out the water last week to clean it. He hit the bottom of the pool and I think he’s dead.”

***Long Pause***

***Longer Pause***

***Even Longer Pause***

Then Daddy says,
“Swimming pool? …. Is this 486-5731?”

***
A Man And his Duck go to the vet...
They go through to the treatment room and the doctor says; "Sir, what can I do for you today?" The man says; "I've brought my duck in today because its really not well and I think its on its last hours." the doctor feels the duck and says; "I'll see what I can do."

The doctor brings in a dog, the dog licks the duck all over its body. The duck lifts its head up, but puts it back down again.

"It didn't work." The man said.

The doctor leaves the room once again and this time brings in a cat. The cat sniffs the duck all over its body. The duck lifts its head up, but keels over and dies.

"No, my duck! It's Dead!" The man screamed.

"I'm sorry, but that will be $3000 please."

"What? $3000? You didn't do anything at all!"

"It's $1500 for the Lab Test, and $1500 for the CAT scan."
***
Biting Boobies
An old man is walking down the street when he sees a beautiful brunette walk by with a truly gigantic set of knockers. He turns around and catches up to the woman and says to her: "I'll give you $100 to let me bite your boobs" "Get away from me you perv!" she shouts back and continues walking. The old man catches up to her again and says: "I'll give you *$1,000* to bite your boobs" "I said no!" she replies and walks away. The old man catches up to her again and says: "I'll give you **$10,000** to bite your boobs. The lady thinks about it for a bit and decides that $10,000 dollars is a lot of money so she might as well do it. So she flips up her shirt and removes her bra. The old man begins touching and feeling and squishing the boobs in his hands. After a while the lady says: "Well are you gonna bite them?" The old man replies: "Nah, too expensive."
***
Definitely a repost but it will make some people laugh.
At Penn State University , there were four sophomores taking chemistry and all of them
had an 'A' so far. These four friends were so confident that the weekend before finals, they
decided to visit some friends and have a big party.
 
They had a great time but, after all the hearty partying, they slept all day Sunday and didn't make it back to Penn State until early Monday morning.
 
Rather than taking the final then, they decided that after the final they would explain to their professor why they missed it. They said that they visited friends but on the way back they had a flat tire.
As a result, they missed the final.
 
The professor agreed they could make up the final the next day. The guys were excited and relieved. They studied that night for the exam.
 
The next day the Professor placed them in separate rooms and gave them a test  booklet. They quickly answered the first problem worth 5 points.
 
Cool, they thought! Each one in separate rooms,
thought this was going to be easy ... then they turned the page. On the second page was written...
 
For 95 points:
Which tire? _________
 
***
"Speeding"
Tom is cruising down the highway way over the speed limit. Cop pulls him over.
"Sorry officer, guess the speedometer got away from me. Happens every time I get hammered and try to drive home."
"What?! You're intoxicated?"
"Well I needed a stiff drink after I shot that guy! It's okay though, I managed to fit the body in the trunk."
"Sir, keep your hands where I can see them. Give me your license and registration right now."
"Well I would but it's in the glove box where I threw the gun, it's still pretty bloody and I don't want it to fall out until it's dried."
"Do. Not. Move. I'm calling for back-up."
Back-up gets there. Second officer gets out, and says
"Sir, please open your trunk."
Tom opens it. Clean as a whistle.
"Please show me your glove box."
Tom opens it. Clean as a whistle, along with his license and registration.
"I'll need you to take a breathalyzer."
Tom blows a .00
"Well what's going on? This officer said you had a dead body in the trunk, a bloody gun in the glove box and were drunk."
Tom says,
"Ha, I bet he said I was speeding, too."
***
An American walks into an Irish pub...
He slams some money on the counter and loudly announces "These 100 Pounds go to the man who can drain ten pints of guinness without pausing!" He then orders the bartender to line up ten pints, and asks "Anyone who thinks he can do it?"
After a moment, Paddy gets up and says "I'll have a go at it, but before that, can I go outside for a few minutes?" "Sure, why not" comes the answer.
So Paddy walks out and, after a little while, comes back in. "Okay, I'm ready" he says, picks up one pint after another and drains all of the glasses. The American is very impressed, but as he hands out the money, he has to ask: "Say, where did you go just before you won my little bet here?"
"Ah, just went to Reilly's pub next door to see if I could do it!"
***
A wicked man who lived in Chicago died and went to Hell
A wicked man who lived in Chicago died and went to Hell. As punishment for his many sins, the Devil shoved him into a room and proceeded to crank up the heat and humidity.

But the man just smiled and said, “Oh, this is just like Chicago in the Spring.”

So, the Devil cranked up the heat and humidity even more, but the man just took off his coat, smiled again, and said, "Well, this is just like Chicago in the summer."

Getting angry now, the Devil put the heat and humidity to the highest possible setting; however, yet again, the man just smiled, took off his shirt and tie, and said, “Ahhhh! Good old August Chicago heat!”

Enraged, the Devil was about to seek an even hotter inferno but then got an idea…

He shut off the heat to the man’s room and instead turned on the air conditioner. Within seconds, the room was frozen solid, colder than anything the man had ever experienced during his time on Earth.

Confident he had finally gotten the best of the man, the devil walked away to take care of other matters. He returned several hours later only to find the man cheering wildly and dancing around.

“What the HELL are you DOING?!?!” The Devil roared. 
"Celebrating!” The man shouted back. “The Cubs won the World Series! The Cubs won the World Series!"
***
A boy asks a girl to prom..,
..and she says yes. Overexcited, he is told he must show up with a limo and a tuxedo. So he goes to the limo rental and waits in the limo line, and he gets the limo. Then, he goes to the tuxedo rental and waits in the tuxedo line. Finally, the big day comes, and he brings his date to prom. She asks him to get some punch. He goes over to get some punch, and realizes there is no punch line.
***
"The Best Little Johnny Joke"
My mate told me this, describing it as the best Little Johnny Joke. I'm inclined to agree.

Little Johnny's neighbour had a baby.  Unfortunately, the baby
was born without ears.
 
When mother and new baby came home from the hospital, Johnny's
family was invited over to see the baby. Before they left their house,
Little Johnny's dad had a talk with him and explained that the baby had no ears.
 
His dad also told him that if he so much mentioned anything about
the baby's missing ears or even said the word ears, he would get the
smacking of his life when they came back home.
 
Little Johnny told his dad he understood completely.  When
Johnny looked in the crib he said:
"What a beautiful baby." The mother
said, 'Why, Thank you Johnny." 
Johnny said:
"He has beautiful little feet, beautiful little
hands, a cute little nose and really beautiful eyes. Can he see all right?"
 
"Yes", the mother replied, "we are so thankful; the Doctor said he
will have 20/20 Vision."
 
"That's great", said Little Johnny, "cos he'd be fucked if he
needed glasses!"
***
Bill Clinton died and went to heaven.
As he stood in front of Saint Peter at the Pearly Gates, he saw a huge wall of clocks behind him. He asked, "What are all those clocks?" 

Saint Peter answered, "Those are Lie-Clocks. Everyone on Earth has a Lie-Clock. Every time you lie, the hands on your clock will move. 

"Oh," said Bill, "whose clock is that?"

"That's Mother Teresa's. The hands have never moved indicating that she never told a lie."

"Whose clock is that?"

"That's Abraham Lincoln's clock. The hands have only moved twice telling us that Abe only told 2 lies in his entire life."

"Where's Hillary's clock?" Bill asked.

"Hillary's clock is in Jesus' office. He's using it as a ceiling fan." 
***
Obama goes on vacation to South Carolina and goes for an ocean swim...
And begins to drown! A young lifeguard swims out and rescues him, pulling him back to shore.

"Thank you so much for saving me young lady. Please, tell me what I can do to repay you."

"Aw shucks, I don't need nuthin', sir, it's just ma job!" She says.

"Listen, I'm the President of the United States, I can give you anything you want!"

She thinks for a moment and says "Well, I'd mighty like a plot at the Arlington National Cemetery if ya can do that fer me."

"Why does a young woman like you want a burial plot at the cemetery?"

"Because" she said, "When my friends and family find out what I just did they'll kill me!"
***
I, the Penis, hereby request a raise in salary for the following reasons:........

I do physical labor.

I work at great depths.

I plunge head first into everything I do.

I do not get weekends or public holidays off.

I work in a damp environment.

I work in a dark workplace that has poor ventilation.

I work in high temperatures.

My work exposes me to contagious diseases.

Sincerely,
P. Niss

The Response:

Dear P. Niss:

After assessing your request, and considering the arguments you have raised, the administration rejects your request for the following reasons:

You do not work 8 hours straight.

You fall asleep after brief work periods.

You do not always follow the orders of the management team.

You do not stay in your designated area and are often seen visiting other locations.

You do not take initiative - you need to be pressured and stimulated in order to start working.

You leave the workplace rather messy at the end of your shift.

You don't always observe necessary safety regulations, such as wearing the correct protective clothing.

You will retire well before you are 65.

You are unable to work double shifts.

You sometimes leave your designated work area before you have completed assigned task.

And if that were not all, you have been seen constantly entering and exiting the workplace carrying two suspicious-looking bags.

Sincerely,
V. Gina
***
Seen this one in the paper... gave me a giggle
An elderly Irish man lay dying on his bed. While suffering the agonies of impending death, he suddenly smelled the aroma of his favourite cheese scones wafting up the stairs. He gathered his remaining strength, and lifted himself from the bed. Leaning against the wall, he slowly made his way out of the bedroom and, with even greater effort, gripping the railing with both hands, he crawled downstairs. 

With laboured breath, he leaned against the doorframe, gazing into the kitchen. Were it not for deaths agony, he would have thought himself already in heaven, for there, spread out upon the waxed paper of the the kitchen table, were dozens of his favourite scones. 

Was it heaven? Or was it one final act of heroic love from his devoted Irish wife of sixty years, seeing to it that he left this world a happy man?

Mustering one great effort, he threw himself towards the table, landing on his knees in a rumpled posture. His parched lips parted. He could almost taste the cheese scone before it was in his mouth, seemingly bringing him back to life. The aged and withered hand trembled on its way to the nearest scone at the edge of the table, when his hand was suddenly smacked with a spatula by his wife...

"Clear off" she said, "They're for the funeral."
***
Mr Wright (Slightly NSFW)
Read this a while ago, still probably my favourite joke, and felt I should share it for those who haven't seen it before.
A lawyer gets home after a long trial in which it was decided his client-Mr Wright-would be hanged later that night. He is greeted at the door by his wife.
"You're home late. And you're tracking mud all over the place...For gods sake, take off your shoes!"
"Look, I've had a hard day at work, can you just leave me alone?"
After some mumbling from his wife, the lawyer walks upstairs to take a bath. A while later, the phone rings, and the wife answers, to be greeted by her husbands boss, who explains that due to the appearance of new evidence, Mr Wright isn't going to be hanged that night. Realising what a hard day her husband must have had, she goes upstairs to tell her husband the news, she opens the bathroom door to see her husband bending over drying his feet, balls dangling between his legs.
"They're not hanging Wright tonight"
"GOD DAMN IT WOMAN, CAN YOU JUST STOP CRITICISING ME FOR ONE MINUTE!?"

EDIT: Thanks for the grammar check. 
***
Confensual sex
A couple had been married for 40 years, and decided for their anniversary they would go to the same spot they went on their honeymoon those 40 years ago. It was a nice little spot by a farm, with rolling hills visible in the distance.

As they strolled down a path next to the cows, the husband smacked his wife on the behind and said "You know honey, 40 years ago we had sex right here, up against this fence. You remember?"

She replied "Yes, I do remember. We sure were something back then, werent we?"

He answered "Indeed. How about we do it again for old time's sake?"

With that, they proceeded to have sex up against the same fence that they done it against as newlyweds.

When finished, the old man exclaimed "Wow honey, you really had a good time, didnt you? You havent moved that much in a long time, in fact, I dont even know if you moved that much when we had sex here 40 years ago!"

She said "Well, 40 years ago that fence wasnt electrified."
***
Farmer Joe's bull breaks down the barbed wire fence again...
Joe is getting fed up with constantly replacing his fence posts and barbed wire. Chasing down the bull and getting him back to the field is no easy task either. So he goes to his neighbor Steve for advice. Steve being the nice neighborly farmer says "I've got plenty of barbed wire you can use to replace that fence, but I'm getting too old for the hard work. Why don't you hire some of the folks at r/jokes? I hear they're the best at reposting"
***
Any flavor you want.
Two good ol' boys are riding down the road in their truck one afternoon. As they travel down the road, they pass by an orchard of peach trees. On the side of the road, there's a sign that says "Peaches any flavor you want".

The younger boy says, "Hey, man, did you see that? They got peaches any flavor you want!".

The older boy says "Nah, they don't. They're just trying to get your attention."

The younger boy says "Aw, come on! Let's go get one!"

The older boy just utters "Fine..." and quickly does a U-turn back towards the orchard. He parks the truck next to the sign and says "Alright, get your peach and I'll wait here."

The younger boy jumps out of the truck and runs towards an old house off in the distance. When he gets there, he sees an old man sitting on a rocking chair on the front porch.

The younger boy says "Hey, that sign said 'Peaches any flavor you want'. Is it true?".

The old man replies with "Sure is. I got peaches any flavor you want." 

The younger boy says "Got any flavored like peanut butter and jelly?"

The old man points at a tree, and says "Sure do. It's that tree just over yonder."

The younger boy walks over to the tree and picks a peach. He takes a bite, and sure enough, it tastes just like peanut butter. But there's no hint of jelly.

"I can taste the peanut butter, but where's the jelly?" said the younger boy.

"You just turn that peach on over, son." says the old man

The younger boy flips the peach over and takes a bite.  The peach tastes just like grape jelly. Excited over this, he runs back to the truck.
 
"It's true! They got peaches any flavor you want!" said the younger boy.
"Alright, I gotta see this..." said the older brother as he gets out of the truck.

The older brother makes his way up to the old man's house.

"Alright, he says you got peaches any flavor you want. Is it true?" said the older boy

"Sure is, sonny. I got all kinds of flavors." said the old man

The older boy gets a smug look, and replied "OK... You got one that tastes like pussy?"

With a sly grin, the old man points to a tree and says "Sure do. It's that tree just over there."

The older boy walks to the tree and picks a peach. He hesitates, but then takes a big bite. He's disgusted by the taste.

"Ugh, this tastes like shit!" says the older boy

From the distance, he hears the old man yell "WELL, TURN IT OVER!"




Edit: A few spelling corrections.

***
Little Kevin
A teacher asks the kids in her 3rd grade class:

"What do you want to be when you grow up?"

Little Kevin says: "I wanna start out as a Marine Pilot, then become a billionaire, go to the most expensive clubs, find me the finest whore, give her a Ferrari worth over a million bucks, an apartment in Copacabana, a mansion in Paris, a jet to travel throughout Europe, an infinite Visa Card, and all while banging her like a loose screen door in a hurricane."

The teacher, shocked, and not knowing what to do with this horrible response from Little Kevin, decides not to acknowledge what he said and simply tries to continue with the lesson...

"And how about you, Sarah?"

"I wanna be Kevin's whore."
***
An engineer goes to hell...
An engineer dies and goes to Hell. He's hot and miserable, so he decides to take action. The A/C has been busted for a long time, so he fixes it. Things cool down quickly. The moving walkway motor is jammed, so he unjams it. People can get from place to place more easily. The TV was grainy and unclear, so he fixes the connection to the satellite dish, and now they get hundreds of high def channels.


One day, God decides to look down on Hell to see how his grand design is working out and notices that everyone is happy and enjoying umbrella drinks. He asks the Devil what's up?
The Devil says, "Things are great down here since you sent us an engineer."
"What?" says God. "An engineer? I didn't send you one of those. That must have been a mistake. Send him upstairs immediately."
The Devil responds, "No way. We want to keep our engineer. We like him."
God demands, "If you don't send him to me immediately, I'll sue!"
The Devil laughs. "Where are you going to get a lawyer?"
***
An Italian man meets the girl of his dreams...
An Italian man meets the girl of his dreams. He falls madly in love with her and decides that he is gonna marry this girl...but first he needs to introduce her to his mother.

So he calls his mother, "Ma, I've met the one. I met the girl I want to spend the rest of my life with. I want you to met her, but since you think you know me so well I'm gonna bring 3 girls home and I want you to try to figure out which one I'm gonna marry"

So that Sunday the man brings 3 beautiful women to dinner. They enjoy the meal together and the mother starts to clean up the dishes. The son follows her into the kitchen and confronts her, "So ma, which one of these girls am I gonna spend the rest of my life with? Which one of these girls am I gonna marry?"

"The one in the middle," says the mother

The man is shocked, "That's the one! I gotta know how you knew, ma?"

"Outta the three girls, that's the one I don't like"
***
"free"
A guy walks into the bar of a restaurant and goes to the bartender and asks "how much for a beer?"  The bartender replies "free".  The customer completely amazed, orders a beer then asks the bartender  "Well then how much for a NY sirloin, with side of mashed potatoes and salad, and an entire cheesecake for desert?" The Bartender reply's "free".  The guy still amazed then orders everything and after he is done eating his meal then says "Wow, this place is amazing, I really wish I could meet the owner of this place".  The bartender then says "Oh well, he's upstairs in his office with my wife".  The guy looks all confused then asks "What is he doing upstairs in his office with your wife?"  The bartender then says "The same thing I'm doing to his business".
***
A General wants to reserve a Jeep from the motor pool.
A general wants to reserve a jeep from the motor pool. His assistant is out so he makes the call himself.

"Motor pool"

"Hello, yes, I'd like to reserve a jeep for General Franklin"

"Well it better be a big jeep if fatass Franklin wants to go for a ride in it."

The General is furious over the insult.

"SON! DO YOU KNOW WHO YOU'RE ADRESSING?"

"No" replies the motor pool attendant

"THIS IS GENERAL FRANKLIN!"

"Well General, do you know who you are adressing?"

"NO! WHO?" the geneal screams.

"Bye fatass..." and the soldier hangs up the phone.
***
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a Spaniard and a German are all standing watching a street performer do some excellent juggling.
The juggler notices that the four gentlemen have a very poor view, so he stands up on a large wooden box and calls out, "Can you all see me now?" 

&nbsp;

"Yes."

"Oui."

"Si."

"Ja."
***
A married Irishman went into the confessional...
... and said to his priest, 'I almost had an affair with another woman.' 
The priest said, 'What do you mean, almost?' 
The Irishman said, 'Well, we got undressed and rubbed together, but then I stopped.
The priest said, 'Rubbing together is the same as putting it in. You're not to see that woman again. For your penance, say five Hail Mary's and put $50 in the poor box.' 
The Irishman left the confessional, said his prayers, and then walked over to the poor box. 
He paused for a moment and then started to leave.
The priest, who was watching, quickly ran over to him saying, 'I saw that. You didn't put any money in the poor box!' 
The Irishman replied, 'Yeah, but I rubbed the $50 on the box, and according to you, that's the same as putting it in!' 
***
An old Italian man lived alone in the country...
It was Spring and he wanted to dig his tomato garden, as he had done every year, but it was very hard work for the aging man as the ground was hard. His only son, Vincent, who used to help him, was currently in prison. The old man wrote a letter to his son and described his predicament:

"Dear Vincent,
I am feeling pretty bad because it looks like I won't be able to plant my tomato garden this year. I'm just getting too old to be digging up a garden plot. If only you were here my troubles would be over. I know you would dig the plot for me.
Love Dad"

A few days later he received a letter from his son:

"Dear Dad,
Don't dig up that garden. That's where I buried the bodies.
Love Vinnie"

At 4 a.m. the next morning, FBI agents and local police arrived at the old man's house and dug up the entire area. However, they didn't find any bodies, so they apologized to the old man and left.

That same day the old man received another letter from his son.

"Dear Dad,
Go ahead and plant the tomatoes now. That's the best I could do under the circumstances.
Love Vinnie"

***
A chicken walks into a library...
... and goes up to the librarian at the front desk. 

**Librarian**: *Can I help you?*

**Chicken** (stares at her for a minute, then says): *Book!*

The librarian is confused, but gives the chicken a random book, who looks happy and leaves.

The next day, the chicken returns looking a bit irritated, and returns the book.

**Librarian**: *Oh, hi. Can I help you again?*

**Chicken**: *Book book book!*

The librarian is still confused, but gives the chicken three random books, which it takes under its wing and goes on its way.


The next day, the librarian sees the chicken come back to the library again, returning all three books. Before she has a chance to ask anything the chicken clucks:

**Chicken**: *Book, book book book, book!*

Taken aback, the librarian gives the chicken five more books before it leaves. But the librarian is curious about what exactly is going on here, so she takes her break and follows the chicken out of the building. Eventually, she sees the chicken go into a house, so the librarian sneaks up to the window and looks inside. There, she sees a sick frog, with a cast on its leg, resting in bed. The chicken suddenly comes into the room, gives the frog a hug, and hands over the books it got from the library. The frog then takes a glance at each book, but looks bored and says:

**Frog**: *Reddit, reddit, reddit, reddit, reddit*
***
Little Johnny
Little Johnny was getting ready to leave school when he heard his friend panicking. He walks to his friend

LJ: "Hey, are you okay? What's wrong?"

Girl: "LITTLE JOHNNY! You have to help me! I am bleeding and I do not know why and I am so scared and I do not know what to do! You have to help me! Please!"

LJ: "You're bleeding?! Okay, okay, where are you bleeding?"

*She points down at her skirt*

LJ: "Hmm, now I see some of the blood, well, I guess I can take a look and give you my opinion?"

She pulls down her skirt and underwear. Little Johnny takes a look, a few seconds go by...

Girl: "So, Little Johnny, what do you think is wrong?!"

LJ: "Well, I ain't a doctor, but one thing is for sure. Looks like someone tore your balls off."
***
John murders his wife
Shortly after he is hiding the body and his neighbor, Jeff, comes round and sees what’s happening. John quickly tackles Jeff to the ground and ties him up. 

“Please” Jeff pleads, “let me live and I won’t tell a soul.”

Knowing Jeff was a man of his word and not wanting to have two murders on his hands, John let’s Jeff go free. 

A few months later after a policy enquiry John is called into court for murder. As he walks in he sees Jeff in the witness stand and looks at the Judge. 

“Fuck” he whispers to his lawyer.

“What’s wrong?” the lawyer asks

“I made that witness promise he wouldn’t tell a soul about what he saw. 

“So what’s the problem?” the lawyer asks again

“The judge is a fucking ginger.”

***
Wine Taster!
At a wine merchant's warehouse the regular taster died, and the director started looking for a new one to hire. A retired Marine A-4 pilot drunk and with a ragged dirty look came to apply for the position. The director wondered how to send him away. They gave him a glass to drink.

 The old pilot tried it and said, "It's a Muscat three years old, grown on a north slope, matured in steel containers. Low grade but acceptable."

 "That's correct", said the boss. "Another glass, please."

 "It's a cabernet, eight years old, south-western slope, oak barrels, matured at eight degrees. Requires three more years for finest results."

 "Absolutely correct. A third glass."

 "It's a pinot blanc champagne, high grade and exclusive," calmly said the drunk.

 The director was astonished and winked at his secretary to suggest something. She left the room and came back in with a glass of urine.

 The alcoholic tried it, "It's a blonde, 26 years old, three months pregnant, and if I don't get the job, I'll name the father."
***
Superman is flying around, super horny.
He's flying over a building when he sees Batgirl on the roof, totally naked, legs spread, moaning, "Give it to me. Give it to me!" 
Superman thinks he might get in trouble with Batman if he bangs Batgirl, but she's begging for it and he can just use his super speed to get the job done quick. So he does. He flys down to the roof and, super fast, humps the hell out of Batgirl. He's done in a few seconds and, wanting to avoid any confrontation, flys off just as fast. 
Batgirl is shocked. "What the hell was that?!?!" 
"I don't know but it hurt like hell", says the invisible man. 
***
A young boy caught his mom cheating.
A woman takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work.

One day, her 9-year-old son hides in the closet during one of her romps. Her husband comes home unexpectedly, so she hides the lover in the closet.

The little boy says, “it’s dark in here.”
The man whispers, “yes, it is.”
“I have a baseball,” the boy responds.
“That’s nice.”
“Want to buy it?”
“No, thanks.”
“My dad’s outside.”
“Okay, how much?”
“$250.”

In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom’s lover end up in the closet together.

“It’s dark in here,” the boy begins.
“Yes, it is.”
“I have a baseball glove.”
The man thinks about the last time they were in the closet together, and decided to cut to the chase — “How much?”
“$750.”
“Fine.”

A few days later, the father says to the boy, “grab your ball and glove. Let’s go outside and play some catch!”
“I can’t. I sold them.”
“How much did you sell them for?”
“$1,000,” the boy replies, smilingly widely.
His father responds, “it’s terrible to overcharge your friends like that. That’s way more than those two things cost. I’m going to take you to church to confess.”

The two go to church, and the boy’s father escorts him to the confession booth. Once inside, the boy states, “it’s dark in here.”
The priest replies, “don’t start that crap again!”
***
A guy is caught by a ranger eating a Bald Eagle...
A guy is caught by a ranger eating a Bald Eagle and is consequently put in jail for the crime. On the day of his trial, the conversation went something like this:

Judge: "Do you know that eating a Bald Eagle is a federal offense?"

Man: "Yes, I did. But if you let me argue my case, I'll explain what happened."

Judge: "Proceed."

Man: "I got lost in the woods. I hadn't had anything to eat for two weeks. I was so hungry. Next thing I see is a Bald Eagle swooping down at the lake for some fish. I knew that if I followed the eagle I could maybe steal the fish. Unfortunately, in the process of taking the fish I killed the eagle. I figured that since I killed the eagle I might as well eat it since it would be more disgraceful to let it rot on the ground."

Judge: "The court will take a recess while we analyze your testimony."

15 minutes goes by and the judge returns.

Judge: "Due to the extreme circumstance you were under and because you didn't intend to kill the eagle, the court will dismiss the charges. But if you don't mind the court asking, what does a Bald Eagle taste like?"

Man: "Well, your honor, it is hard to explain. The best I can describe it is maybe kind of between a California Condor and a Spotted Owl."
***
(NSFW) Getting Screwed Thousand Times
Johnny wanted to have sex with a girl in his office, But she belonged to someone else...
One day, Johnny got so frustrated that he went up to her and said, "I'll give you a £100 if you let me have sex with you. But the girl said NO.
Johnny said, "I'll be fast. I'll throw the money on the floor, you bend down, and I'll be finished by the time you pick it up. "
She thought for a moment and said that she would have to consult her boyfriend... So she called her boyfriend and told him the story.
Her boyfriend says, "Ask him for £200, pick up the money very fast, he won't even be able to get his Pants down."
So she agrees and accepts the proposal. Half an hour goes by, and the boyfriend is waiting for his girlfriend to call.
Finally, after 45 minutes, the boyfriend calls and asks what happened.

...

She responded, "The bastard used coins!"
***
A rope walked into a bar...
A rope walked into a bar. The bartender said, "We don't serve your kind here! No ropes allowed!" The rope left, tied his top end, and fluffed out the fringe. He reentered the bar, and the bartender said, "Hey! Aren't you that rope I just threw out?" "No," the rope said. "I'm a frayed knot."
***
A mother-in-law stopped by unexpectedly to a recently married couple's house...
She knocks on the door, then immediately walks in. She is shocked to see her daughter-in-law laying on the couch completely naked. 
"What are you doing?" She asked.

"I'm waiting for Jeff to come home from work," the daughter-in-law answered. 

"But you're naked!" the mother-in-law exclaimed.

"This is my love dress," the daughter-in-law explained.

"Love dress? But you're naked!"

"Jeff loves me to wear this dress! It makes him happy and it makes me happy."

The mother-in-law on the way home thought about the love dress. When she got home she got undressed, showered, put on her best perfume and expectantly waited for her husband, lying provocatively on the couch.

"What are you doing?" he asked.

"This is my love dress," she replied.

"Needs ironing," he says " What's for dinner?"

***
A man is speaking with Saint Peter at the gates of Heaven.
Saint Peter asks him if he has done any good deeds in his time on Earth to merit entry into paradise.

Thinking for a moment, he says, "I was once in a bar in Arizona.  I noticed a beautiful woman sitting alone, but before I could introduce myself a bunch of Hell's Angels stormed in and started wrecking the place.  Then they scooped the woman off of her bar stool and started throwing her around and terrorizing all of the other guys there."

Saint Peter asks, "And what did you do?"

"Well, first I went outside and kicked their motorcycles over, then I went back in and found the biggest, ugliest, meanest one of them I could.  Slapped him in the face, then snatched one of his earrings out and said, 'Listen up.  Either you and your friends clear out of here and leave that woman alone or you're going to have to deal with me'."

Clearly impressed, Saint Peter asks, "When did this happen?"

"About five minutes ago."
***
I was at my bank today waiting in a short line.
There was just one lady in front of me, an Asian lady, who was trying to exchange yen for dollars. It was obvious she was a little irritated. She asked the teller, "Why it change? Yesterday, I get two hunat dolla of yen. Today I only get hunat eighty? Why it change?" The teller shrugged his shoulders and said, "Fluctuations." The Asian lady says, "Fluc you white people too!"
***
Several men are in the locker room of a golf club.
Several men are in the locker room of a golf club. A cell phone on a bench rings and a man answers the phone, puts it on speaker, and begins to talk. Everyone else in the room stops to listen.

MAN: "Hello"

WOMAN: "Honey, it's me. Are you at the club?"

MAN: "Yes."

WOMAN: "I'm at the mall now and found this beautiful leather coat. It's only $1,000. Is it OK if I buy it?"

MAN: "Sure, go ahead if you like it that much."

WOMAN: "I also stopped by the Mercedes dealership and saw the new 2016 models. I saw one I really liked."

MAN: "How much?"

WOMAN: "$65,000."

MAN: "OK, but for that price I want it with all the options."

WOMAN: "Great! Oh, and one more thing. The house we wanted last year is back on the market. They're asking $950,000."

MAN: "Well, then go ahead and give them an offer, but just offer $900,000."

WOMAN: "OK. I'll see you later! I love you!"

MAN: "Bye, I love you, too."
The man hangs up. The other men in the locker room are looking at him in astonishment. 

Then he smiles and asks: "Anyone know whose phone this is?"
***
Seeing eye dogs.
A man with a German Shepherd goes into a pub and sits down at the bar. The bartender says "Sorry, you can't bring that dog in here." The man replies "But this is a seeing eye dog!" The bartender then says "Well, okay then, I guess it can stay". 

After a while, the man and the German Shepherd get up to leave. As they're going out the door, another man with a Chihuahua is coming in. The first man says "The bartender won't like you bringing that dog in here, but just tell him it's a seeing eye dog and then it'll be okay". The second man looks dubiously at his tiny Chihuahua, thinks a few seconds, then thanks the first man and goes on in. The bartender says "Hey! You can't bring that Chihuahua in here!" The man stares straight ahead and exclaims "What? They sold me a Chihuahua?!"
***
Rye Bread
Two old guys, one 80 and one 87, were sitting on a park bench one morning.

The 87-year-old had just finished his morning jog and wasn't even short of breath.

The 80-year-old was amazed at the guy's stamina and asked him what he did to have so much energy.

The 87-year-old said, "Well, I eat rye bread every day. It keeps your energy level high and you'll have great stamina with the ladies."

So, on the way home the 80-year-old stopped at the bakery.

As he was looking around, the saleslady asked if he needed any help.

He said, "Do you have any rye bread?"

She said, "Yes, there's a whole shelf of it. Would you like some?"

He said, "I want five loaves."

She said, "My goodness, five loaves! By the time you get to the 3rd loaf, it'll be hard."

He replied, "I can't believe everybody knows about this shit but me."
***
Great Vampire joke I saw on here before.
3 vampires are having a competition to prove who's the most vicious vampire among them.



The strongest one started 1st,
"watch this," He said as he flies so fast, about 100 miles/hour. After only 10 minutes, he comes back with blood all over his mouth. "what happened?" they asked. "did you see that house over there?" "yes?" "well.. I killed the entire family and sucked the blood dry!" "wow!? fascinating, as expected from the strongest vampire"
Then the eldest one takes the next turn "watch and learn," he said as he flies even faster, about 120 miles/hour. After only 5 minutes, he comes back with blood all over his mouth and his neck. "what happened??" they asked. "did you see that village over there?" "ye..yes?" "well.. I killed every last person on that village and sucked the blood dry!" "wow!? magnificent! truly amazing, we can expect no less from the eldest one!"
Finally the last turn belongs to the fastest one, "don't blink or you'll miss it" he said as he flies really fast, even faster than the other two, about 140 miles/hour. After only a mere 30 seconds, he comes back with blood all over his mouth, his neck, and his nose. "wh..what happened???" they asked. "did you see that big ass tree over there?" "ye..yes?!" "well.. I didn't"

***
Reporter doing an interview
A famous TV reporter was doing a report on location in Uzbekistan about the local customs of the people of Uzbekistan. During his report he interviewed one of the local town elders and asked him:

"Tell me a story about somthing that has happened in your life that you will never ever forget as long as you live".

The old man laughed, and began to tell the story. 

"One day, a long, long time ago I lost my goat on that mountain. As is the local custom, all of the men in the village got together to smoke the magic herb and we went up the mountain to find the goat. When we finally found the goat - as per our custom - we all smoked more of the magic herb and each man, one at a time had sex with the found goat. It was quite a scene."

The reporter was shocked, to say the least. But he pressed on... "I'm very sorry, sir... but I don't think our network can air that story. Perhaps you have another story with a happy ending that you could share with us?"

The old man laughed and said, "Ok, ok.... I have a better story for you that has a happy ending..... One day, a long, long time ago my neighbor lost his wife up on that mountain. As is the local custom, all of the men in the village got together to smoke the magic herb and we went up the mountain to find our neighbor's wife. When we finally found her - as per our custom - we all smoked more of the magic herb and each man, one at a time had sex with her. It was the best time of my life! What a party that was!"

The reporter was taken aback, shocked. He was getting frustrated and finally asked the old man "Let's try a different angle... Maybe you can tell me about somthing extremely sad that has happend to you that you will never forget as long as you live?"

The old man lowered his head, and tears began to swell in his eyes..... he paused momentarily, then said:

"One day, a long, long time ago I got lost on that mountain..."
***
Back in Soviet Russia...
...there was a man working at a Siberian coal mine. Every Friday he would take a wheelbarrow full of dirt home. Every time he did this the security guard would stop him, make him dump out the dirt and sift through it searching for coal or other stolen valuables. The security guard always found nothing so he would reluctantly let the man reload the dirt and go home.

This goes on for 25 years until the man finally retired. On his last day the the bewildered security guard pleaded with him "I know you've been smuggling something out of here all of these years. Please just tell me what it was?" The man replied with a sly wink "Wheelbarrows".
***
A professor, a CEO, and a janitor are in a forest when they discover a magic fairy.
The fairy says "I will give you what you most desire if you do someone else's job for a day."

The professor says "I'll be an elementary school teacher. What can be so hard about teaching a bunch of 6-year-olds how to read?" so he is teleported into a classroom. After a few minutes, all the kids' screaming gets to his nerves, so he throws all his supplies and gives up.

The C.E.O says "I'll be a waiter. All you do is carry food back and forth. This'll be a breeze" so he is teleported to a restaurant. After about an hour, all the annoying customers drive him insane, so he smashes his plates on the ground and gives up.

The janitor says "I'll be an artist" so he is transported to an art facility. He glues all the classroom supplies and shattered plates to a canvas, then sells it for a billion dollars. The fairy asks the janitor how he was so clever.

The janitor says "I got a masters degree in art."
***
"A young man with his pants hanging half off his rear, two gold front teeth, and a half inch thick gold chain around his neck, walked into the local welfare office to pick up his check.
He marched up to the counter and said, "Hi. You know, I just HATE drawing welfare. I'd really rather have a job. I don't like taking advantage of the system, getting something for nothing."

The social worker behind the counter said "Your timing is excellent. We just got a job opening from a very wealthy old man who wants a chauffeur and bodyguard for his beautiful daughter. You'll have to drive around in his 2014 Mercedes-Benz CL, and he will supply all of your clothes."

"Because of the long hours, meals will be provided. You'll also be expected to escort the daughter on her overseas holiday trips. This is rather awkward to say, but you will also have, as part of your job, the assignment to satisfy her sexual urges as the daughter is in her mid-20's and has a rather strong sex drive."

The guy, just plain wide-eyed, said, "You're bull-shittin' me!"
The social worker said, "Yeah, well . . . You started it . . . . “﻿
***
A Jew, a Catholic, and a Mormon are drinking together.
The Jew boasts about his fertility

"I have 4 sons; one more and I'll have a basketball team!"

"That's nothing," says the Catholic, "I have 10 sons! I almost have a football team!"

The Jew and Catholic looked expectantly at the Mormon. "Well?"

"I have 17 wives. I almost have a golf course!"
***
Table manners
Teacher:"Michael, if you were on a date having dinner with a nice young lady, how would you tell her that you have to go to the bathroom?"


Michael: 'Just a minute I have to go pee.'


Teacher: 'That would be rude and impolite. What about you Sherman, how would you say it?'


Sherman: 'I am sorry, but I really need to go to the bathroom. I'll be right back.'


Teacher:'That's better, but it's still not very nice to say the word bathroom at the dinner table. And you, little Johnny, can you use your brain for once and show us your good manners?'


Johnny: 'I would say: Darling, may I please be excused for a moment? I have to shake hands with a very dear friend of mine, whom I hope to introduce to you after dinner.' 

***
A guy and his dog went into a bar and made a bet with the bartender...
A guy and his dog went into a bar and made a bet with the bartender. The guy said his dog could talk and he bet the bartender 1 free drink for him if the dog could answer a question. The bartender says okay because there's know way a dog could talk. The guy asks the dog, "What grows on trees?" "Bark" says the dog. The bartender refuses to give him a drink and makes him ask another question. "What's on top of a house?" asks the man. "Roof" says the dog. Once again, the bartender refuses and makes him ask another question. "What's the best baseball player of all time?" "Ruth" The bartender makes them leave. On the way home the dog asks, "Do you think I should have said Rodriguez?" 
***
A woman accompanies her husband to the doctor
A woman accompanies her husband to the doctor. After the husband's check-up, the Dr. ask's the woman if he can have a word with her in his office.

"Certainly Dr. anything for my husband", the woman replies.

The Dr. says, "Your husband is suffering from a very rare and severe disorder, combined with horrible stress. If you don't do the following, he will die".

"Each morning you must fix him a healthy hearty breakfast. You must be pleasant and make sure he is in good humor.
For lunch make him a nutricious meal and for dinner prepare an especially nice meal for him.
Don't burden him with any chores, as he is probably had a hard day. Don't discuss any of your problems with him, it will only make his stress worse."
The Dr. continues to say, "Do all of these things and he should continue to live a happy healthy life for 15 to 20 yrs". 

The wife takes all this into consideration and exits the Dr. office.

On the drive home, the husband asked the wife, "What did the doctor have to say to you ?"

She replies, "He said you're going to die."

***
A guy runs into a saloon and yells "everybody clear out, Big John's comin' to town!"
A couple minutes later a mountain of a man rides into town on an ox and he's dragging a mountain lion on a chain behind him. He gets down and punches the ox and slams the mountain lion and says "You guys stay here."

He walks into the saloon, ripping the doors off the hinges. Walks up to the bartender grabs him by the shirt and says "Give me a bottle of beer." Bartender does, guy bites the top right off, chugs it down in one gulp and slams it down on the bar.

Bartender asks, "Ca-ca-can I getcha another?"

Guy says "Naw. I gotta get out of here. Big John's coming to town."
***
A couple, both age 78, went to a sex therapist's office.
The doctor asked, "What can I do for you?"

The man said, "Will you watch us have sex?"

The doctor looked puzzled, but agreed.

When the couple finished, the doctor said, "There's nothing wrong with the way you have sex," and charged them $50.

This happened several weeks in a row. The couple would make an appointment, have sex with no problems, pay the doctor, then leave.

Finally, the doctor asked, "Just exactly what are you trying to find out?"

"We're not trying to find out anything," the husband replied.
"She's married and we can't go to her house. I'm married and we can't go to my house. The Holiday Inn charges $90. The Hilton charges $108. We do it here for $50...and I get $43 back from Medicare.
***
A train company is hiring mining companies to dig a tunnel
A train company wishes to dig a new high-speed train tube from London to New York and is taking proposals from various companies. To save time the chosen company will need to begin digging 2 tunnels simultaneously from the two exits and attempt to line it up perfectly into one finished tunnel.

A representative from a German corporation comes to the train company to presents their proposal, "It will cost you 2 billion dollars and will take 7 years to complete and there is a 5% chance that the two tunnels will be off by .2 meters."  

The executives at the train company appreciate the offer but keep looking. 

A representative from a Chinese corporation comes to the train company to presents their proposal, "It will cost you 1.5 billion dollars and will take 5 years to complete and there is a 3% chance that the two tunnels will be off by .4 meters."    

The executives at the train company appreciate the offer but keep looking.  

Finally a representative from a Russian corporation comes to the train company to presents their proposal, "It will cost you 100,000 dollars and will take 1 year to complete and worst case scenario you'll have two tunnels."   


(i translated this joke from russian so hopefully the humor carried through)
***
Diary Entries of a Married Couple
Wife's  Diary:

Tonight, I thought my husband was acting weird. We had made plans to meet at a nice restaurant for dinner. I was shopping with my friends all day long, so I thought he was upset at the fact that I was a bit late, but he made no comment on it. Conversation wasn't flowing, so I suggested that we go somewhere quiet so we could talk. He agreed, but he didn't say much.  I asked him what was wrong; He said, "nothing." I asked him if it was my fault that he was upset. He said he wasn't upset, that it had nothing to do with me, and not to worry about it.

On the way home, I told him that I loved him. He smiled slightly, and kept driving.  I can't explain his behavior. I don't know why he didn't say, 'I love you, too.'

When we got home, I felt as if I had lost him completely, as if he wanted nothing to do with me anymore. He just sat there quietly, and watched TV.  He continued to seem distant and absent.

Finally, with silence all around us, I decided to go to bed. About 15 minutes later, he came to bed. But I still felt that he was distracted, and his thoughts were somewhere else. He fell asleep; I cried. I don't know what to do. I'm almost sure that his thoughts are with someone else. 

My life is a disaster.

 
Husband's  Diary, same day:
  
A two-foot putt.. Who the hell misses a two-foot putt?

***
A Marine received a "Dear John" letter from his girlfriend back home...
It read as follows:

---

*Michael*,

*I can no longer continue our relationship. The distance between us is too great and too long. I must confess that I have cheated on you twice, and this situation is not fair for either of us. I'm really sorry.*

*Love, Elizabeth*

*P.S. Please return the picture you have of me*

---

The Marine, his feelings hurt, asked his fellow Marines for any snapshots they had of mothers, sisters, girlfriends, cousins, ex-girlfriends, or aunts they had. After a while he had obtained a sizeable collection, and so he stuffed them all 62 of them into an envelope, including the picture of Elizabeth, along with this letter:

---

*Elizabeth,*

*I can't quite remember what you look like. Please take your picture from the pile and return the rest.*

*Take care, Michael*
***
Mike.
A small boy named Mike lived in a tiny Irish village. All his classmates hated him for his stupidity especially his teacher who was always yelling at him "you're driving me crazy, Mike" 

...One day, his mother went to check out how he was doing at school and the teacher told her honestly her son is simply a disaster, getting very low marks and that never had she seen such a dumb boy in her whole career... His mum simply could'nt accept such a feedback and she took her son out from that school. She even shifted to another city...


25 years later, that teacher got a cardiac disorder and all the doctors advised her to go for an open heart operation which only one surgeon could perform.

Left with no other choice, she went for it, and the surgery was successful ...when she opened her eyes, she saw a handsome doctor smiling to her, staring at her face which started turning blue. She was raising her hand trying to tell him some thing but in vain and eventually died...

The doctor was shocked and was trying to understand what just happened, til he turned back and saw our friend Mike working as a cleaner in that hospital who had unplugged the ventilator to connect his vacuum cleaner.


If you were thinking that Mike became a doctor, you've been watching too many soap operas.
***
Two Irish men came down to give Mrs. O'Mally some bad news.
"We have some terrible news about your beloved husband, he fell into a vat of beer and drowned."
"Oh my poor Patrick" she moaned "At least he died a sudden death and didn't suffer."
"Well I don't know about that Mrs. O'Mally, he got out three times to go pee."
***
Wrong Number
Having just moved into his new office, a pompous, new Colonel was sitting at his desk when an airman knocked on the door. Conscious of his new
position, the Colonel quickly picked up the phone, told the airman to enter, then said into the phone, "Yes, General, I'll be seeing him this afternoon and I'll pass
along your message. In the meantime, thank you for your good wishes, sir."

Feeling as though he had sufficiently impressed the young enlisted man, he asked, "What do you want ?"

"Nothing important, sir," the airman replied, "I'm just here to hook-up your telephone."

***
A blonde finds herself in serious money trouble...
Lost her job and she's in dire financial straits.

She's desperate so she decides to ask God for help. She begins to pray... "God, please help me. I've lost my job and if I don't get some money, I'm going to lose my house as well. Please let me win the lottery."

Lottery night comes, and somebody else wins.

She again prays... "God, please let me win the lottery! I've lost my job, my house and I'm going to lose my car as well."

Lottery night comes and she still has no luck.

Once again, she prays... "My God, why have you forsaken me? I've lost my job, my house, and my car. My children are starving. I don't often ask You for help, and I've always been a good servant to You. PLEASE let me win the lottery just this one time so I can get my life back in order."

Suddenly there is a blinding flash of light as the heavens open.

The blonde is overwhelmed by the Voice of God, Himself...."Sweetheart, work with Me on this.... Buy a ticket."
***
Blonde boards a airplane
A blonde gets on an airplane and sits down in the first class section of the plane. The stewardess rushes over to her and tells her she must move to coach because she doesn’t have a first class ticket. The blonde replies, “I’m blonde, I’m smart, I have a good job, and I’m staying in first class until we reach Jamaica.” The disgusted stewardess gets the head stewardess who asks the blonde to leave. The blonde yet again repeats “I’m blonde, I’m smart, I have a good job and I’m staying in first class until we reach Jamaica.” The head stewardesses doesn’t even know what to do at this point because they still have to get the rest of the passengers seated to take off; the blode is causing a problem with boarding now, so the stewardess gets the copilot. The copilot goes up to the blonde and whispers in her ear. She immediately gets up and goes to her seat in the coach section. The head stewardess asks the copilot in amazement what he said to get her to move to her correct seat. The copilot replies, “I told her the front half of the airplane wasn’t going to Jamaica.”
***
An Army Ranger, a Recon Marine, a Navy SEAL, and a member of Delta Force are sitting around a camp fire.
An Army Ranger, a Recon Marine, a Navy SEAL, and a member of Delta Force are sitting around a camp fire. The Army Ranger, bragging about his exploits says "You guys aren't so tough, I once parachuted down, marched fifty miles, and killed everyone in sight." The Recon Marine is unimpressed, and says, "That's nothing, I once made a beach landing, marched 60 miles, and killed everyone in sight." The SEAL is unimpressed, he says "That's nothing, I once swam 10 miles to shore, marched 70 miles, and killed everyone in sight with my bare hands." Thoroughly impressed, they all look over at the Delta Force member, and he's dead silent, just stirring the coals of the fire with his dick. 
***
Blonde is pulled over by a blonde cop..
A blonde woman was speeding down the road in her little red sports car and was pulled over by a woman police officer who was also a blonde. The blonde cop asked to see the blonde driver's license. She dug through her purse and was getting progressively more agitated. 'What does it look like?' she finally asked. 

The policewoman replied, 'It's square and it has your picture on it.' 

The driver finally found a square mirror in her purse, looked at it and handed it to the policewoman. 

'Here it is,' she said. 

The blonde officer looked at the mirror, then handed it back saying, 'Okay, you can go. I didn't realize you were a cop too.'

Edit: heres the comic that I have never seen until it was posted in the comments :-) 
http://img0.joyreactor.com/pics/post/auto-blondes-officer-driver-200267.jpeg
***
Do you drink beer?
Woman:
Do you drink beer?
Man: Yes

Woman:
How many beers a day?

Man:
Usually about 3

Woman:
How much do you pay per beer?

Man: $5.00 which includes a tip

Woman:
And how long have you been drinking?

Man:
About 20 years, I suppose

Woman:
So a beer costs $5 and you have 3 beers a day which puts your spending
each month at $450. In one year, it would be approximately $5400
…correct?

Man:
Correct

Woman:
If in 1 year you spend $5400, not accounting for inflation, the past
20 years puts your spending at $108,000, correct?

Man:
Correct

Woman:
Do you know that if you didn't drink so much beer, that money could
have been put in a step-up interest savings account and after
accounting for compound interest for the past 20 years, you could have now bought
a Ferrari?

Man:
Do you drink beer?

Woman:
No

Man:
What color is your Ferrari?

***
A German, an Austrian, a nun and a young attractive woman on a train
A German, an Austrian, a nun and a attractive woman sit on a train. The lights in their car are broken so in every tunnel it gets really dark.

The train drives through a tunnel, it gets dark and suddenly you hear a slap and someone cries out in pain. When it gets bright again its obvious that the Austrian was slapped in the face.

The nun thinks: Well he tried to grope the young woman, so she slapped him.

The young woman thinks: He tried to grope me but messed up and touched the nun, who slapped him.

The Austrian thinks: That german guy tried to grope the woman and she tried to slap him, missed and hit me.

The German thinks: In the next tunnel ill hit him again.
***
On his 74th birthday, a man got a gift certificate from his wife...
The certificate paid for a visit to a medicine man living on a nearby
reservation that was rumored to have a wonderful cure for erectile
dysfunction. After being persuaded, he drove to the reservation, handed his ticket to the medicine man, and wondered what he was in for.

The medicine man slowly, methodically produced a potion, handed it to him, and with a grip on his shoulder, warned, 'This is powerful medicine. It must be respected. You take only teaspoonful, and then say '1-2-3.' When you do that, you will become manlier than you have ever been in your life, and you can perform as long as you want."
The old man was encouraged. As he walked away, he turned and asked, "How do I stop the medicine from working?" "Your partner must say '1-2-3-4,'" he responded, "but when she does, the
medicine will not work again until next full moon."

The old man was very eager to see if it worked so he went home, showered, shaved, took a spoonful of the medicine, and then invited his wife to join him in the bedroom. When she came in, he took off his clothes and said, "1-2-3!"

Immediately, he was the manliest of men. His wife was excited and began throwing off her clothes, and then she asked, "What was the 1-2-3 for?"

And that, boys and girls, is why we should never end our sentences with a preposition, because we could end up with a dangling participle.
***
A happy family.
Son: Dad, I like this awesome girl and want to date her. 

Dad: Who is she? 

Son: Our next door neighbor's daughter, Sandra.

Dad: Ohhh I wish you hadn't said that son. I have to tell you something but promise me that you will not tell your mom. Sandra is actually your sister.  


The boy is obviously bummed out. He finds another girl, but dad tells him that is his sister too. This happens a few more time and he gets frustrated. So he decides to tell his mom.


Son: Mom, I am so mad at dad. I fell in love with 4 girls but can't date any of them because dad is their father. 

His mom hugs him affectionately and says, 

Mom: Son, you can date anybody you want. Don't listen to him. He is not your father. 


***
Two old ladies were having a smoke
Jane and Arlene were outside their nursing home, having a drink and a smoke, when it starts to rain. Jane pulls out a condom, cuts off the end, puts it over her cigarette, and continues smoking.

**Arlene:** *What in the hell is that?*

**Jane:** *A condom. This way my cigarette doesn't get wet.*

**Arlene:** *Where did you get it?*

**Jane:** *You can get them at any pharmacy.*

The next day, Arlene hobbles herself into the local pharmacy and
announces to the pharmacist that she wants a box of condoms.
The pharmacist, obviously embarrassed, looks at her kind of strangely (she is, after all, over 80 years of age), but very delicately asks what size, texture, brand of condom she prefers.

*'Doesn't matter Sonny, as long as it fits on a Camel.'*
***
David received a parrot for his birthday
The parrot was fully grown with a bad attitude and worse vocabulary. Every other word was an obscenity. Those that weren't expletives, were to say the least, rude. David tried hard to change the bird's attitude and was constantly saying polite words, playing soft music, anything he could think of. Nothing worked. He yelled at the bird and the bird yelled back. He shocked the bird and the bird just got more angry and more rude. Finally, in a moment of desperation, David put the bird in the freezer, just for a few moments. He heard the bird squawk and kick and scream-then suddenly, there was quiet. 

David was frightened that he might have hurt the bird and quickly opened the freezer door. The parrot calmly stepped out and said "I believe I may have offended you with my rude language and actions. I'll endeavor at once to correct my behavior. I really am truly sorry and beg your forgiveness." David was astonished at the bird's change in attitude and was about to ask what had made such a dramatic change when the parrot continued, "May I ask what did the chicken do?"
***
Bill Clinton and the Pope die at the same time.
There's an administrative mix up in purgatory and the Pope is sent to Hell and Clinton to Heaven.

After 20 minutes the mistake is discovered and the mistake rectified. As they're heading down the escalator Clinton down, the Pope up, the pope says to Clinton "I'm really looking forward to meeting the virgin Mary".

To which Clinton replies "You're about five minutes too late"
***
Why are Jewish men circumcised?
Because Jewish women won't touch anything unless it's at least 20% off.

Edit: Wow. So to all you humorless twats getting offended over a joke, I heard this while visiting my grandmother in the hospital. The Jewish woman (who was probably a little senile) that shared a room with her told me this. 

You guys are probably just mad that the first time you got head it was your mohel. (Which she said is why Jewish men have short tempers.)
***
Donald Trump and his chauffeur are driving on a country road
Donald Trump and his chauffeur are driving on a country road. Suddenly, a pig runs in front of the car.

The chauffeur has no time to react, and runs over it, giving it instant death. 

The chauffeur stops the car, gets out and looks around. He spots a small farm-house in the distance. Donald says to his chauffeur, "You should at least tell them that you've killed the pig" 

The chauffeur does as he's told.

A couple of hours later, the chauffeur stumbles out of the farmhouse, covered in lipstick kiss-marks and a bottle of champagne in each hand.

As he stumbles to the passenger side window, Donald exclaims, "Jesus, what did you tell them?"

"Exactly what you told me boss...Hi I'm Donald Trump's chauffeur and I've just killed the pig...."

***
So, this guy works at a pickle factory...
...and one day when he comes home from work, his wife can immediately tell something is wrong. "What's the matter?" she asks. "Well," says the husband, "Lately, at work, I've been having bad thoughts... really bad. I feel compelled to stick my dick in the pickle slicer." "That's horrible!" shouts his wife, "What's wrong with you?! You need therapy!" "You might be right," says the husband.

So, he starts going to therapy, and things seem to be going well for while. But, then one day he comes home from work and his wife can see on his face that he's been crying. "No!" she cries, "Tell me you didn't do it!" "I sorry, honey" her husband sobs, "I couldn't help myself. I did it. I stuck my dick in the pickle slicer!" "So, what happened?!" asks his wife. "Well, I got fired." says the husband. "No!" his wife yells, "What happened with the pickle slicer?!" "Oh," says her husband, "Well, she got fired too."
***
Two Jehovah's Witnesses knock on someone's door
The house owner opens the door. "Good morning, would you like to learn about God today?" The houseowner was a little bored, and slightly curious, so he lets them in. They slowly enter, and sit down on the couch across from the houseowner. After a few seconds of silence, the houseowner asks, "Well?" The Jehovah's Witnesses look at each other and says to the houseowner, "We don't know what to say, we've never made it this far."
***
A guy dies and wakes up on a beach.
Nice weather, hot girls playing beach volleyball, barbeques everywhere, laughter and joy. All of a sudden, Satan comes up to him. "Welcome to hell. Enjoy yourself, have a drink, have a hamburger and check out the area. If you need anything or have a question, feel free to ask me." he says. The guy walks along the beach, has a few drinks with a nice girl. He walks over a hill, when he sees a hole in the ground, full with tormented people, flames rising up from the hole. The guy runs towards the beach until he finds Satan. "Hey, I found this hole and all these people are being tormented... What´s that about?" "Oh," Satan says, "that´s for the Christians, they want it that way."
***
A woman walks into a sex shop looking for a dildo.
She asks the clerk "How much for the white one?". He says "That one's $25." She asks "How much for the black one?" He says "That one's $45." She looks around for a bit then asks "Mmmm, how much for the plaid one?" Clerk responds "Ummm, that one's $65." "Great I'll take it." she says. The store owner returns later in the day and asks the clerk "So how'd it go today?" Clerk says "Well, I didn't sell any merchandise but this woman came in and bought my thermos for $65."
***
The maid asked for a raise, and the wife was upset.
The maid asked for a raise, and the wife was upset.

She asked, "Now, Helen, why do you think you deserve a pay increase?"

Helen: "There are three reasons. The first is that I iron better than you."

Wife: "Who said that?"

Helen: "Your husband."

Wife: "Oh."

Helen: "The second reason is that I am a better cook than you."

Wife: "Who said that?"

Helen: "Your husband."

Wife: "Oh."

Helen: "The third reason is that I am better at sex than you."

Wife: "Did my husband say that as well?"

Helen: "No, the gardener did."

Wife: "So, how much do you want?"
***
Quiet guy in class had this gem of a response
Military history class. We have this one guy in class who doesn't really say much and tends to keep to himself; just figured one of those 'man of few words' kinda guys. One day, we were discussing the planes used in WW2. Ensuing discussion goes as such

Professor: So what planes did we have during that time?

Student 1: Well we had the Cobra and Mustang

Professor: Ok and what did the Japanese have?

Student 2: Japanese had zeros

Professor: And what was the main difference between us and them?

Quiet kid: We didn't crash as much

The professor tried to keep it together but started rolling, dropped his marker, and said 'Class dismissed'. We had 20 minutes left. Thanks quiet kid
***
An old Arab lived close to New York City for more than 40 years.
He would have loved to plant potatoes in his garden, but he is alone, old and weak. 


His son is in college in Paris, so the old man sends him an e-mail. 
He explains the problem: "Beloved son, I am very sad, because I can't plant potatoes in my garden. I am sure, if only you were here, you would help and dig up the garden for me. I love you, Your Father." 


The following day, the old man receives a response e-mail from his son: "Beloved Father, please don't touch the garden. It's there that I have hidden 'the THING'. I love you, too, Ahmed" 
At 4pm the US Army, The Marines, the FBI, the CIA and the Rangers visit the house of the old man, take the whole garden apart, search every inch, but can't find anything. Disappointed they leave the house. 

A day later, the old man receives another e-mail from his son. "Beloved Father, I hope the garden is dug up by now and you can plant your potatoes. That's all I could do for you from here. I love you, Ahmed."
***
Dad, what is the difference?
An eleven year old boy comes home from school and tells his Dad, "Dad, I keep hearing the boys at school use the bad words Pussy and Cunt but I don't know what the difference is."  
Dad: "Go get that Penthouse magazine in my nightstand and I'll show you."  
The boy runs off to get the magazine and returns breathless.  
Dad: Opens the magazine to a picture of a nude woman lying on a bed and draws a circle around the Pussy with his pen.  "Son, you see that circle?  Everything inside that circle is the Pussy."  
Son: "So what is a Cunt then?"  
Dad: "Everything outside the circle."
***
So I was sitting on the bus just reading a book when somebody tapped me on the shoulder.
I turned around and saw an old lady.  She said to me,  "Sonny,  would you like some nuts? I've got a couple hazelnuts and almonds if you'd like." 

"Sure.",  I replied.  Then she gave me a handful of nuts and went back to sit with her friends. 

"What a nice lady", I thought,  while happily munching on the nuts. 

A few minutes later,  I felt another tap on my shoulder and there she was again,  offering some nuts.  I gladly accepted and she went back to her seat.  

After about 10 minutes,  she tapped me on the shoulder,  once again offering some nuts. 

I asked her,  "Why don't you eat them yourself?" 

"Because we've got no teeth",  she replied. 

"Then why do you buy them?", I asked. 

"Oh,  because we just love the chocolate around them."




***
A minister dies..
..and is waiting in line at the Pearly Gates. Ahead of him is a guy who's dressed in sunglasses, a loud shirt, leather jacket, and jeans. 

Saint Peter addresses this guy, "Who are you, so that I may know whether or not to admit you to the Kingdom of Heaven?" The guy replies, "I'm Joe Cohen, taxi-driver, of New York City." Saint Peter consults his list. He smiles and says to the taxi-driver, "Take this silken robe and golden staff and enter the Kingdom of Heaven." 

The taxi-driver goes into Heaven with his robe and staff, and it's the minister's turn. 

He stands erect and booms out, "I am Joseph Snow, pastor of Saint Mary's for the last forty-three years." Saint Peter consults his list. He says to the minister, "Take this cotton robe and wooden staff and enter the Kingdom of Heaven." "Just a minute," says the minister. "That man was a taxi-driver and he gets a silken robe and golden staff. How can this be?" 

"Up here, we work by results," says Saint Peter. "While you preached, people slept; while he drove, people prayed."
***
I paid a homeless lady in Nashville $1 for two jokes. Wanna hear em? NSFW.
She was advertising two jokes for $1 so don't think I just walked up to her and said "I'll give you a dollar if you tell me two jokes." 

"Why can't miss piggy count to seventy? Because every time she gets to 69 she get a little frog in her throat." 

"How can you tell your man has a high sperm count? You have to chew before you swallow." 

My boyfriend paid a dollar and got these - 

"Two condoms were walking down the street. They passed a gay bar and one looks at the other and says 'hey want to go inside and get shit faced?'"

"How do you get a dog to stop humping your leg? Pick it up and suck it's dick."
***
A woman was having an orgy with 3 army men, then she heard her husband coming in the house...
She frantically told the 3 guys to gather all their uniforms and hide in the balcony, and they did. The husband greeted her and didn't suspect a thing. She tried to distract him from going to the balcony but then he became adamant about grilling since it was so nice outside. He opened the balcony door and to his surprise he sees 3 nervous looking guys. 

The husband looked very confused until one of the guys finally spoke. "Please help us!! Our plane crashed and we had to parachute to this balcony!!". The husband became very concerned for them and insisted that they stay for dinner before leaving. The 3 guys couldn't believe that the trick worked and they played along. The husband was very hospitable and generous and he made the guys feel pretty much at home. However, the guys felt very very bad about deceiving him and wanted to tell him the truth. 

They asked him: "Don't you find it odd that 3 army men happened to land on your balcony?" 

The husband said: "Not really, just last week 3 NAVY SEALs happened to find their way to my bathtub" 
***
A visitor to Harvard asks a professor...
A visitor to Harvard asks a professor, "Excuse me, but would you be good enough to tell me where the Harvard Library is at?"

"Sir," came the sneering reply, "at Harvard we do not end a sentence with a preposition."

"Well, in that case, forgive me," said the visitor. "Permit me to rephrase my question. Would you be good enough to tell me where the Harvard Library is at, jackass?"
***
A Dutch, English and Chinese man wash up on an island
A Dutch, English and Chinese man survive a boat accident and wash up on an island. They need food, water and supplies to survive the night. 
The Dutch guys says that he will gather the food, the English man will get water and the Chinese man is send for supplies.

When the Dutch and the English man come back with food and water the Chinese man is nowhere to be found. They wait a bit till they can't wait longer and start preparing the food.

The Dutch and English guy start eating and out of nowhere the Chinese guy jumps out the bushes and shouts: " SUPPLIES ".
***
A kid walks into a whore house carrying a dead frog..
A kid walks into a whore house with a dead frog. He goes to the front desk and sets his dead frog up on the counter top. The man at the desk says, we don't allow kids here. The kid puts $100 bill on the counter and the man replies, ok what do you want? The kid says, I want to have sex with the girl here that has the most STD's I can get. We don't have women like that here sorry buddy. The kid then puts another $100 bill on the table. Ok kid, all the way down the hall last door on the left. The kid comes out of the room after awhile and as he's walking out the front door the man stops him. Hey kid, why in the world would you do that? You basically just killed yourself. The kid looks up at him and says, I'm going to go home and fuck my babysitter. My parents are going to come home then my dad will take the babysitter home and he will fuck the babysitter. My dad will come home and he will fuck my mom. My dad will leave for work in the morning and the mail man will come and my mom will fuck the mail man and that's the mother fucker who ran over my frog. 
***
A man walks into a bar...
A man walks into a bar, goes up to the bartender, and asks for a beer. The bartender stops him, and says "Well, before you order, let me tell you about our special." 

He directs the man's attention down to the end of the bar, where there are two huge chunks of meat hanging on meat hooks. 

"If you can run down to the end of the bar, jump up, and take a bite out of one of those pieces of meat, you get to drink free here for the rest of your life. But I'll warn you, if you try it and fail, you have to buy all of the drinks for the rest of the bar all night."

The man replies "Well, let me think about it. Mind if I take a look?" The bartender lets him, so he saunters down to the end of the bar, and takes a nice, long look at the hanging meat, before turning around and coming back.

"Nah, I think I'll just order a beer."

"Alright, but just curious... why aren't you taking the challenge?"

"Buddy, the steaks are just too high."
***
One day Jesus is helping St. Peter at the Gates to Heaven...
One day Jesus is helping St. Peter at the Gates to Heaven when an old man approaches.

"What have you done to enter Paradise?" Jesus asks.

"Me?" replies the old man, "not much, I am just a simple carpenter but my son makes me worthy."

"Your son?" asks Jesus

"Yes, my son. He was born under remarkable circumstances and underwent a miraculous transformation. He was loved by many and continues to be loved to this very day. His name will never be forgotten."

Jesus approaches the man and hugs him tightly, "Father!"

The old man hugs him back, "Pinocchio?"

***
Welfare Cheque
"A young man with his pants hanging half off his rear, two gold front teeth, and a half inch thick gold chain around his neck, walked into the local welfare office to pick up his cheque.
He marched up to the counter and said, "Hi. You know, I just HATE drawing welfare. I'd really rather have a job. I don't like taking advantage of the system, getting something for nothing."
The social worker behind the counter said "Your timing is excellent. We just got a job opening from a very wealthy old man who wants a chauffeur and bodyguard for his beautiful daughter. You'll have to drive around in his 2014 Mercedes-Benz CL, and he will supply all of your clothes."
"Because of the long hours, meals will be provided. You'll also be expected to escort the daughter on her overseas holiday trips. This is rather awkward to say, but you will also have, as part of your job, the assignment to satisfy her sexual urges as the daughter is in her mid-20's and has a rather strong sex drive."
The guy, just plain wide-eyed, said, "You're bull-shittin' me!" The social worker said, "Yeah, well . . . You started it . .
***
A drunk guy walks out of a bar
There's a cop outside who asks him, "What's your name, son?"
The drunk guys answers, "I'm Jesus Christ!"
Cop says, "You are not Jesus Christ. What's your name?"
Drunk guy replies, "I'll prove it. Follow me." The cop follows him back into the bar. 
As they enter, the bartender yells, "Jesus Christ! Are you back again?!"
Drunk guys turns to cop and says, "See?"
***
Didn't I???
A lonely woman, aged 70, decided that it was time to get married. She put an ad in the local paper that read: 

HUSBAND WANTED! 
MUST BE IN MY AGE GROUP (70's), 
MUST NOT BEAT ME, 
MUST NOT RUN AROUND ON ME, 
AND MUST STILL BE GOOD IN BED! 
ALL APPLICANTS PLEASE APPLY IN PERSON. 

On the second day she heard the doorbell. Much to her dismay, she opened the door to see a gray-haired gentleman with no arms or legs sitting in a wheelchair. The old woman said, "You're not really asking me to consider you, are you? Just look at you.... you have no legs!" The old man smiled, "Therefore I cannot run around on you!" 

She snorted. "You don't have any hands either!" Again the old man smiled, "Nor can I beat you!" 

She raised an eyebrow and gazed intently. "Are you still good in bed?" With that, the old gentleman leaned back, beamed a big broad smile and said, "I rang the doorbell, didn't I?"
***
The strong young man at the construction site was bragging...
...that he could outdo anyone in a feat of strength. He made a special case of making fun of one of the older workmen.

After several minutes, the older worker had enough. "Why don't you put your money where your mouth is," he said. "I will bet a week's wages that I can haul something in a wheelbarrow over to that building that you won't be able to wheel back."

"You're on, old man," the braggart replied. "Let's see what you got."

The old man reached out and grabbed the wheelbarrow by the handles. Then, nodding to the young man, he said, "All right. Get in." 
***
An engineer dies and goes to Hell
Dissatisfied with the level of comfort, he starts designing and building improvements. After a while, Hell has air conditioning, flush toilets, and escalators.

The engineer is a pretty popular guy.

One day God calls and asks Satan, "So, how's it going down there?"

Satan says, "Hey things are going great. We've got air conditioning and flush toilets and escalators, and there's no telling what this engineer is going to come up with next."

God is horrified. "What? You've got an engineer? That's a mistake -- he should never have gone down there! You know all engineers go to Heaven. Send him up here!"

Satan says, "No way. I like having an engineer on the staff. I'm keeping him."

God says, "Send him back up here or I'll sue."

"Yeah, right," Satan laughs, "and where are you going to get a lawyer?"

(crossposted from /r/funny)
***
Aussie Helpline
"G'day mate, Aussie Helpline here ...What's the problem,cobber?"

"I'm in Darwin with my Sheila and she's been stung on the minge by a wasp, and now her pussy has completely closed up."

"Bummer, mate..!"

"Thanks mate, I hadn't thought of that, Bye."
***
The Half-Wit
A man owned a small ranch near Great Falls, Montana. The Montana Labor Department got a tip that he was not paying proper wages to his help and sent an investigator out to interview him.

"I need a list of your employees and how much you pay them," demanded the investigator.

"Well," replied the rancher, "there's my ranch hand who's been with me for 3 years. I pay him $1200 a week plus free room and board."

"The cook has been here for 18 months, and I pay her $1000 per week plus free room and board."

"Then there's the half-wit. He works about 18 hours every day, with no days off, and does about 90% of all the work around here. He makes about $10 per week and pays his own room and board."

"But, I buy him a bottle of bourbon every Saturday night, and he also sleeps with my wife occasionally."

"That's the guy I want to talk to... the half-wit," says the investigator.

"You're talking to him," replied the rancher.
***
The little black box
A couple was married for 23 years and were very open and honest with each other. The only exception to this was the woman made her husband promise to never look in her little black box.

One evening he could no longer fend off his curiosity, he opened the box. To his surprise he found 1 quarter and 298 dollars.

Later that night, when his wife arrived at home, he told her, "I'm sorry honey, I couldn't resist, I looked in your little black box. But I don't understand, what is the quarter for?"

She responded hesitantly, "Well.. the quarter represents the number of times that I cheated on you."

After a sudden outburst the man finally calmed himself down, "Well I still love you and want to work this out, one time in 23 years isn't that bad. By the way, what is the $298 dollars all about?"

Casually she said, "Well I kept running out of room to put the quarters"
***
A lady goes into a pharmacy and asks for cyanide...
A nice, calm and respectable lady went into the pharmacy, right up to the pharmacist, looked straight into his eyes, and said, "I would like to buy some cyanide." The pharmacist asked, "Why in the world do you need cyanide?" The lady replied, "I need it to poison my husband." The pharmacists eyes got big and he exclaimed, "Lord have mercy! I can't give you cyanide to kill your husband! That's against the law! I'll lose my license! They'll throw both of us in jail! All kinds of bad things will happen. Absolutely not! You CANNOT have any cyanide!" The lady reached into her purse and pulled out a picture of her husband in bed with the pharmacist's wife. The pharmacist looked at the picture and replied, "Well now. That's different. You didn't tell me you had a prescription."
***
State Trooper
   A  State Trooper was patrolling late at night off the main 
highway.

   He sees a couple in a car, with the interior light brightly glowing.

   He carefully approaches the car to get a closer look. Then he sees a 
young man
   behind the wheel, reading a magazine.

   He immediately notices a young woman in the rear seat, filing her 
fingernails.

   Puzzled by this surprising situation, the trooper walks to the car and 
gently raps
   on the driver's window.

   The young man lowers his window. 'Uh, yes, Officer'?

   The trooper asks:  'What are you doing'?

   The young man says:  'Well, Officer, I'm reading a magazine'.

   Pointing towards the young woman in the back seat the trooper says:  'And 
her,
   what is she doing'?

   The young man shrugs:  'Sir, I believe she's filing her fingernails'.

   Now, the trooper is totally confused.


   A young couple, alone, in a car, at night in a lover's lane ...

   And nothing obscene is happening!

   The trooper asks: 'What's your age, young man'?

   The young man says: 'I'm 22, sir'.

   The trooper asks: 'And her,  .... what's her age'?

   The young man looks at his watch and replies:  'She'll be 18 in 11 
minutes.. '

***
Bacon Tree...
There are two guys who have been lost in the desert for weeks, and they're at death's door. As they stumble on, hoping for salvation in the form of an oasis or something similar, they suddenly spy, through the heat haze, a tree off in the distance.

As they get closer, they can see that the tree is draped with rasher upon rasher of bacon. There's smoked bacon, crispy bacon, life-giving juicy nearly-raw bacon, all sorts. 

"Oh my, John," says the first bloke. "It's a bacon tree! We're saved!" 
"You're right!" says John.

So John goes on ahead and runs up to the tree salivating at the prospect of food. But as he gets to within five feet of the tree, there's the sound of machine gun fire, and he is shot down in a hail of bullets. 

His friend quickly drops down on the sand, and calls across to the dying John.

"John, John! What on earth happened?"

With his dying breath John calls out

"It's not a Bacon Tree"

"It's a Ham Bush"
***
A tourist backpacking the highlands of Scotland enters a bar, and inside there's only a bar tender and an old man nursing a beer. They sit in silence until the old man looks over to the tourist and says, "You see this bar? I built this bar with my bare hands."
The old man continues, "I found the finest wood in the county, gave it more love than my own child, but do they call me McGregor the bar-builder? No!"

He points out the window, "You see that stone wall out there? I built that stone wall with my bare hands; found every stone, placed them just so, through the rain and the cold. But do they call me McGregor the stone wall builder? No!"

The old man points out the other window, "You see that pier on the lake out there? I built that pier with my own bare hands, drove the pilings against the tide of the sand, plank-by-plank. But do they call me McGregor the pier builder? No!"

The old man looked down, took a swig from his mug, 

and turned back to the tourist.

...


"But you fuck one goat.."
***
A blonde and a lawyer are on a plane.
The lawyer keeps trying to get a blonde to play a game with him. After awhile she finally agrees.The lawyer explains the game to her. He says that he will ask her a question and if she can't answer it she will give him $50.Then she will ask him a question and if he can't answer it he will give her $500. She agrees. He ask her to say the first seven prime numbers in order. She thinks for awhile then gives him $50.She then ask him what has no legs, three arms, and is covered in fur.He thinks for awhile then gives her $500.Curious he asks her what the answer is.She gives him $50.
***
Paddy Has A Broken Leg
Paddy has a broken leg and his buddy Mick comes over to see him.

Mick says, "How you doin'?"

Paddy says, "Okay, but do me a favour mate, run upstairs and get me slippers, me feet are freezing."

Mick goes upstairs and sees Paddy's gorgeous 19-year old twin daughters lying on the bed.

He says, "Your dad's sent me up here to have sex with both of you."

They say, "Get away with ya... Prove it."

Mick shouts downstairs, "Paddy, both of 'em?"

Paddy shouts back, "Of course both of 'em, what's the point of fuckin' one?"
***
A woman calls her butler into the bedroom
A woman calls her butler into the bedroom and says:

"Jeeves, take off my gloves." 

Jeeves replies: "Yes my lady."

The lady then continues by saying:

"Now Jeeves, I want you take off my dress and corset."

Jeeves replies: "Of course, my lady."

The lady then says:

"Jeeves, now I want you to take off my undergarments."

Jeeves obliges the request and says: 

"As you wish.  Will there be anything else my lady?"

The lady replies:

"Yes Jeeves, please don't ever wear my clothes again."
***
False Teeth
A little boy is waiting for his mom to come out of the changing room while shopping with her. The little boy gets bored and when his mom comes out, she finds him sliding his hand up a mannequin's skirt.

 'Get your hand out of there!' she shouts. 'Don't you know that women have teeth down there?'

 The little boy quickly snatches his hand away and thanks his lucky stars he didn't get bitten. For the next ten years, this little boy grows up thinking all women have teeth between their legs.

 When he's 16, he finds himself a girl. One night, while her parents are out of town, she invites him over for a little action. After an hour of making out and grinding on the sofa, she says 'you know, you could go a little further if you want.'

 'What do you mean?' he asks.

 'Well, why don't you put your hand down there?' she says, pointing to her crotch.

 'Hell no,' he cries, 'you've got teeth down there.'

 'Don't be ridiculous,' she responds, 'there's no teeth there.'

 'Yes there are,' he says, 'my mom told me so.'

 'No there aren't,' she insists. 'Here, look for yourself.'

 With that, she pulls down her pants and gives him a little peek.

 'No I'm sorry' he says. 'My mom already told me that all women have teeth down there.'

 'Oh for Christ's sake!' she cries. She whips off her panties, throws her legs behind her head, and says, 'Look, I don't have any teeth down there.'

 The boy takes a good long look, then replies: 'Well, with the condition of those gums I'm not surprised.'
***
A Mafia leader tells his right-hand man to......
, "Go into the bathroom, jerk off and bring it out." Then he hands him a plastic cup. Unsure of what's going on, the right-hand man goes into the bathroom, jerks off into the plastic cup, and comes out. The Mafia leader says, "Good, good. Now do it again. Don't forget to bring it out." The Mafia leader hands him a new cup. So the guy goes back into the bathroom and does the same thing. He walks out with much less in the cup than the first time. The Mafia leader sees this and says, "Very good, very good. Do it one more time." He hands him a new cup and the guy goes back into the bathroom. He comes out and there's only a tiny drop in the cup. The Mafia leader now says, "Alright Steve, I want you to drive my daughter to Manhattan."
***
A father wants to have "the" talk with his 14 year old son
'Son, the time has come for me to tell you how children are actually made!'

The boy puts his hands over his ears and yells:

'No! I don't wanna know!'

'But why not?' asks the father, surprised.

'Look, Dad! When I was 7, you told me that Santa doesn't exist. When I was 8, you told me the Easter Bunny doesn't exist either. But I'll be *really* pissed now if you tell me that we don't have to screw girls to make kids!'
***
Two old guys, one 80 and one 87, were sitting on a park bench one morning.
The 87-year-old had just finished his morning jog and wasn't 
even short of breath.

The 80-year-old was amazed at the guy's stamina and asked him what he did to have so much energy.

The 87-year-old said, "Well, I eat rye bread every day.
It keeps your energy level high and you'll have great stamina with the ladies."
So, on the way home the 80-year-old stopped at the bakery.
As he was looking around, the saleslady asked if he needed any help.

He said, "Do you have any rye bread?"

She said, "Yes, there's a whole shelf of it. 
Would you like some?"

He said, "I want five loaves."

She said, "My goodness, five loaves! By the time you get to the 3rd loaf, it'll be hard."

He replied, 
"I can't believe everybody knows about this shit but me."
***
Trying to think of a new password
WINDOWS:
Please enter your new password.

USER:
cabbage
 
WINDOWS:
Sorry, the password must be more than 8 characters.

USER:
boiled cabbage

WINDOWS:
Sorry, the password must contain 1 numerical character.

USER:
1 boiled cabbage
 
WINDOWS:
Sorry, the password cannot have blank spaces.

USER:
50fuckingboiledcabbages
 
WINDOWS:
Sorry, the password must contain at least one upper case character.

USER:
50FUCKINGboiledcabbages
 
WINDOWS:
Sorry, the password cannot use more than one upper case character consecutively.

USER:
50FuckingBoiledCabbagesShovedUpYourAssIfYouDon'tGiveMeAccessNow!
 
WINDOWS:
Sorry, the password cannot contain punctuation.

USER:
ReallyPissedOff50FuckingBoiledCabbagesShovedUpYourAssIfYouDontGiveMeAccessNow

WINDOWS:
Sorry, that password is already in use.
***
Risky Burial
A man and his ever-nagging wife went on vacation to Jerusalem. While they were there, the wife passed away.

The undertaker told the husband, "You can have her shipped home for $5,000, or you can bury her here, in the Holy Land, for only $150."

The man thought about it and decided he would just have her shipped home for $5000.

The undertaker asked, "Why would you spend $5,000 to ship your wife home, when it would be wonderful to be buried here and you would spend only $150 ?"

The man replied, "Long ago a man called Jesus Christ died here, was buried here, and three days later he rose from the dead...I just can't take that chance."
***
Royal Wedding
On the day of the Royal wedding, Sophie was getting dressed, surrounded by all of her family. She suddenly realised she had forgotten to get any shoes. Panic!
Then her sister remembered that she had a pair of white shoes from her wedding so she lent them to Sophie for the day. Unfortunately they were a bit too small and by the time the festivities were over Sophie's feet was hurting real bad.
When she and Edward withdrew to their room the only thing she could think of was getting her shoes off.
The rest of the Family crowded around the door to the bedroom and they heard roughly what they expected, grunts, straining noises and the occasional muffled scream. Eventually they heard Edward say 'God, that was tight.'
'There,' whispered the Queen. 'I told you she was a virgin.'
Then, to their surprise, they heard Edward say. 'Right. Now for the other one.' Followed by more grunting and straining and at last Edward said. 'My God. That was even tighter.'
'That's my boy,' said the Duke. 'Once a sailor, always a sailor.
***
Four men are watching a juggler...
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a Spaniard, and a German are watching a man do some juggling on the street. The juggler notices that the men can't see very well, and stands on some boxes.
"Can you all see me now?" He calls
"Yes."
"Oui."
"Sí."
"Ja."
***
The driest, most esoteric joke I know.
A horse walks into a bar. The bartender asks the horse if it's an alcoholic considering all the bars he frequents, to which the horse replies ~~I don't think I am"~~ "I think not!" POOF! The horse disappears. 

This is the point in time when all the philosophy students in the audience begin to giggle, as they are familiar with the philosophical proposition of Cogito ergo sum, or I think, therefore, I am.

But to explain the concept aforehand would be putting Descartes before the horse.
***
What organ can expand to 10 times it's size...
The 6th grade science teacher, Mrs. Parks, asked her class, "Which human body part increases to ten times its size when stimulated?"

No one answered so the teacher picked on a random student

Little Mary stood up and said, "You should not be asking sixth graders a question like that! I'm going to tell my parents, and they will go and tell the principal, who will then fire you!"

Mrs. Parks ignored her and asked the question again, "Which body part increases to 10 times its size when stimulated?"
Little Mary's mouth fell open. Then she said to those around her, 

"Boy, is she going to get in big trouble!"

The teacher continued to ignore her and said to the class, 

"Anybody?"

Finally, Billy stood up, looked around nervously, and said, "The body part that increases 10 times its size when stimulated is the pupil of the eye."

Mrs. Parks said, "Very good, Billy," then turned to Mary and continued. 

"As for you, young lady, I have three things to say:
One, you have a dirty mind. Two, you didn't read your homework And three, one day you are going to be very, very disappointed."
***
A fight breaks out at a Newfie wedding...
Chairs are flying and women are crying. The police show up and arrest all the men involved in the scuffle. 

They all are brought to the court house and all you hear is chatter. "Order in my court", screams the judge. "Can someone come up and please explain what happened?".

Jimmy speaks up, "Well you sees judge, at a Newfie wedding its tradition for the first mate have a dance with the bride. So I gets up there and I'm dancing with the bride. She was grinding up on me you see and Tommy didn't take to kindly to that. So Tommy walks up and kicks her right in the pussy!!!"

"Right in the pussy?!?" The judge cringes as he says, "That must have hurt".

Jimmy says, "Hurt!!?? Broke three of me fingers!!!"
***
A man went in for an interview...
A man went in for an interview for a job as a sales man. The interview went quite well, but the trouble was that he kept winking.

The interviewer said, "Although you have a lot of the qualities we are looking for, the fact that you keep winking could put a lot of our potential customers off."

"Oh, that is no problem," said the man. "I stop winking if I take a couple of aspirin."

"Show me," said the interviewer.

So the man reached into his pocket. Embarrassingly he pulled out loads of condoms of every variety - ribbed, flavoured, coloured and everything before he found the packet of aspirin. He took an aspirin and soon stopped winking.

The interviewer said, "I do not think we could employ someone who would be womanizing all over the country."

"Excuse me!" exclaimed the man, "I am a happily married man, not a womanizer!"

"Well, how do you explain all the condoms, then?" asked the interviewer.

The man replied, "Have you ever gone into a drug store, winking, and asked for a packet of aspirin?"
***
Big vote today in England. If Leave wins I predict :
Brexit to be followed by Grexit. Departugal. Italeave. Fruckoff. Czechout. Oustria. Finish. Slovakout. Latervia. Byegium
***
A rabbit is running hastily through the forest
And suddenly sees a deer relaxing under a tree smoking some hash. "What're you doing here, are you crazy?" says the rabbit, "We're in nature in the clean air, and you're smoking hash? Get up so we can run together and clean out our lungs!" "Youre right!" says the deer, and he gets up and starts running with the rabbit. 
As they were running, they can across a fox hopped up on cocaine. "Mr. Fox!" says the deer "aren't you ashamed of yourself? We're in nature filled with  clean air, and your snorting coke? Get up and run with us so we can open up our lungs!" "You're right!" Says the fox, and he gets up and starts running with the other two. 
A little further down the path they ran into a wolf getting ready to shoot up some heroin. "Mr. Wolf are you crazy?!" yells out the Fox, "We're in nature filled with clean air, and you want to get strung out? Get up and run with us so we can exercise and clean our lungs!"  "Why don't you all go fuck yourselves." says the wolf "Every time the rabbit takes ecstasy we have to go running like jerk offs in the forest?"
***
The Pope goes for a drive
The Pope goes to New York. He is picked up at the airport by a limousine. He looks at the beautiful car and says to the driver, ''You know, I hardly ever get to drive. Would you please let me?'' 

The driver is understandably hesitant and says, ''I'm sorry, but I don't think I'm supposed to do that.'' 

But the Pope persists, ''Please?'' 

The driver finally lets up. ''Oh, alright, I can't really say no to the Pope.'' 

So, the Pope takes the wheel, and boy, is he a speed demon! He hits the gas and goes around 100 mph in a 45 zone. A policeman notices and pulls him over. The cop walks up and asks the driver to roll down the window. Startled and surprised, the young officer asks the Pope to wait a minute. He goes back to his patrol car and radios the chief. 

Cop: ''Chief, I have a problem.'' 

Chief: ''What sort of problem?'' 

Cop: ''Well, you see, I pulled over this guy for driving way over the speed limit but it's someone really important.'' 

Chief: ''Important like the mayor?'' 

Cop: ''No, no, much more important than that.'' 
Chief: ''Important like the governor?'' 

Cop: ''Wayyyyyy more important than that.'' 

Chief: ''Like the President?'' 

Cop: ''More.'' 

Chief: ''Who's more important than the President?!'' 

Cop: ''I don't know, but he's got the Pope DRIVING for him!''
***
The morning of my wife's birthday, I handed her her first gift.
As she unwrapped it she said, "It's a fucking wand! What do I want with a fucking wand?"

"It's not just any wand," I replied, "It's a magic wand!"

"Really?" she said. "What does it do?"

"Why don't you give it shake," I told her, "and don't forget to say the magic words."

"Okay," she said shaking the wand. "Abracadabra!"

"Fuck me, love!" I said, peering down the side of the bed. "You're not going to believe this."

"What is it?" she asked all excitedly.

I said, "You've just made all your other presents disappear!"
***
A man tattoos his girlfriend's name on his penis.
A man is dating a woman named Wendy, and as a "romantic" gesture, he gets her name tattooed on his penis, but when he's flaccid, only the first W and final Y are visible. 

One day, while he and his girlfriend are on holiday in Jamaica, he is standing at a urinal, when a black Jamaican man walks up next to him. 

The man glances down and sees a W and a Y tattooed on the black man's penis. 

So the man says to him, "Your girlfriend's name must be Wendy, too. I see we have the same tattoo." 

The response comes, "No, I'm a tour guide. Mine says, 'Welcome to Jamaica. Have a nice day.'"
***
Three engineers and three accountants were traveling by train...
Three engineers and three accountants were traveling by train to a conference. At the station, the three accountants each bought tickets and watched as the three engineers bought only one ticket. 
"How are three people going to travel on only one ticket?" asked an accountant. 
"Watch and you'll see", answered an engineer. 
They all boarded the train. The accountants took their respective seats, but the three engineers all crammed into a rest room and closed the door behind them. Shortly after the train departed, the conductor came around collecting tickets. He knocked on the restroom door and said, "Ticket, please". 
The door opened just a crack and a single arm emerged with a ticket in hand. 
The conductor took it and moved on. 
The accountants saw this and agreed it was a quite clever idea. So, after the conference, the accountants decide to copy the engineers on the return trip and save some money (being clever with money, and all that). When they got to the station, they bought a single ticket for the return trip. To their astonishment, the engineers didn't buy a ticket at all. 
"How are you going to ride without a ticket"? said one perplexed accountant. 
"Watch and you'll see", answered an engineer. 
When they boarded the train, the three accountants crammed into a restroom and the three engineers crammed into another one nearby. The train departed. Shortly afterward, one of the engineers left his restroom and walked over to the restroom where the accountants were hiding. He knocked on the door and said, "Ticket, please."
***
How my Husband and I Terrified a Taxi Driver
My husband and I were dressed and ready to go out for a lovely evening of dinner and theatre.

Having been burgled in the past, we turned on a 'night light' and the answering machine, then put the cat in the backyard. When our cab arrived, we walked out our front door and our rather tubby cat scooted between our legs inside, then ran up the stairs. Because our cat likes to chase our budgie we really didn't want to leave them un-chaperoned so my husband ran inside to retrieve her and put her in the back yard again.

Because I didn't want the taxi driver to know our house was going to be empty all evening, I explained to him that my husband would be out momentarily as he was just bidding goodnight to my mother. A few minutes later he got into the cab all hot and bothered, and said (to my growing horror and amusement) as the cab pulled away.

"Sorry it took so long but the stupid bitch was hiding under the bed and i had to poke her ass with a coat hanger to get her to come out! She tried to take off so i grabbed her by the neck and wrapped her in a blanket so she wouldn't scratch me like she did last time. But it worked! I hauled her fat arse down the stairs and threw her into the backyard....she had better not shit in the vegetable garden again."

The silence in the taxi was deafening.....
***
A mom buys an old parrot from a whorehouse..
A mom buys an old parrot in a whorehouse and proceeds to bring it home for the family to enjoy their new pet.

As she brings the parrot inside the house the parrot says "ah, new house!" and she bursts in laughter.

Later that day, the daughters arrive from school and promptly the parrot says "ah, new house, new prostitutes!" and they all burst in laughter.

Some time goes by, and after a long day of work the dad finally arrives home, and without wasting time, the parrot says "ah, new house, new prostitutes, same old customers. Good night Mr. Williams"


***
Joe was heading towards the end of a round of golf...
...when hit his ball into the woods and found it in a patch of pretty, yellow buttercups. Trying to get his ball back in play, he ended up thrashing just about every buttercup in the patch.

All of a sudden, POOF! In a flash and puff of smoke, a little old woman appeared.

She yelled, “I’m Mother Nature! Do you know how long it took me to make those buttercups?

Just for doing what you have done, you won’t have any butter for your popcorn for the rest of your life.

Better still, you won’t have any butter for your toast for the rest of your life.

As a matter of fact, you’ll never have any butter for anything for the rest of your life!!!”

Then POOF! she was gone!

After Joe recovered from the shock, he hollered for his friend, “Bill, where are you?”

Bill yells back, “I’m over here in the pussywillows.”

Joe shouts back, ‘DON’T SWING, BILL. FOR THE LOVE OF GOD, DON’T SWING !

***
A college teacher noticed that his exchange student, Dave, suddenly had started attracting a lot of female attention.
So, one day he asked Dave about his secret. Dave replied: "Well, before sex I simply whip out my willy and smack it against the bedside table, like a hammer. It numbs it up and makes me last longer".  
Later that day, the college teacher gets home to his wife and finds her in the shower - a welcome opportunity for sex. So, he quickly undresses and starts banging his dick against the dresser, just before hearing his wife calling from the shower:  
"Is that you, Dave?".
***
A farmer goes into town to purchase a young cock for his farm. (long)
He finds a pet shop selling roosters and asks around for the youngest, most fit cock they have available to service his hens. In no time at all the salesrep directs him to a magnificent specimen, a real champ in the making, lean, strong, and quick as a switch to do his deed and be on to the next one.

Thinking the asking price is fair for such a good rooster, the farmer buys him and when they get home he shoos the rooster toward the hen house and watches in amazement as the new cock takes straight to his task, servicing one, two, three, four hens in as many minutes. Within fifteen he's still going strong, and the farmer calls out, "You better slow down there boy, you're going to die if you keep up that pace!"

The rooster keeps going with no mind to the farmer and the man decides to get on with the rest of his own duties for the day, assuming sooner or late the newcomer will tire out.

To his amazement he finds the cock mounting the cows in the field some time later, and then the horses in the barn, and by mid afternoon the pigs in the sty! "He's insatiable," the farmer says, wondering exactly how long this will go on. By nightfall the rooster's filled every animal on the farm and seems to show no sign of slowing down as the moon rises.

The next day when the farmer awakens and goes to check on things, he finds the rooster laying dead in the middle of the yard with the telltale shadow of vultures circling about overhead. He can't help but admire the cock's tenacity and stamina and walks out to its corpse, squatting down to pat it on the back. "I warned you," he says with a sigh.

The rooster's head leans up and responds, "Ssh, you'll scare away the vultures."
***
Two Armies are Matched Against Each Other
Both armies are rather large in size, and have been fighting on the front for many days. Both sides are running very low on ammo, and have already run out of ammunition for their cannons, so they continue to fire with their rifles.
Eventually, all of the ammo for their rifles runs out. A private runs up to his general:
"General, we've used all of our ammunition! The only form of defense we have is our fists!"
"Our fists?"
"Yes, sir!"
"Well," said the General, "I have a plan. We'll have all of our troops line up, run collectively up to the enemy, and then, once we approach them, we'll beat them up! They'll never see that coming!"
The private smiles. "That's a great idea, sir!"
"I'll put it into action," the General said. He yelled loudly to all of his troops:
"Okay men, let's set up a punchline!"

(I'm so sorry)

***
Haven't done that in a year..
A Dad wakes up and starts making breakfast on New Years Day. The son comes down to the kitchen and as the Dad serves him eggs he goes:

"Morning son, it looks like you haven't eaten all year."

 The son scowls at the terrible Dad joke and digs into his eggs. The daughter comes down to the breakfast table and the Dad pours her a glass of orange juice:

"Good morning Daughter, you must be thirsty. It looks like you haven't had anything all year. " 

both children scowl and continue their breakfast. The wife finally comes down to the table and as she sits down the father rolls some sausages on to her plate.

"Good morning Wif--"

The son interupts:

"OKAY DAD WE GET IT. TAKE A DAILY ACTIVITY, SAY YOU HAVEN'T DONE IT IN A YEAR- NOT FUNNY"

The Dad calmly keeps serving breakfast and says:

"Son, I was just telling your Mother to enjoy her sausages. The joke wouldn't work since this would be her second serving today."

Edit: He winks

Edit Edit: Wife winks back

Edit Edit Edit: "In a year" to "all year"
***
This got legs in a comment thread yesterday so thought I would share.
A man is fishing when he hears a voice. Fish over here. He looks down and sees a frog. Really fish over here. So he does and catches his limit. The man decides to take the frog home when it says a branch is gonna fall just as the man moves out of the way saving both their lives. Deciding the frog is lucky he takes it to vegas. Put it all on 00 on roulette.  Doing so the man hits it for a million. So he rents the presidential suite and they bask in the hot tub for a while and lay on the bed. The man says wow, you've done so much for me I wish there was something I could do for you. The frog says kiss me so he soes and poof! The frog turns into a beautiful 17 year old girl and I swear to god that's how she got there your honor.
***
What do you call a waffle you drop in the desert?
San Diego

 ^^San-dee-eygo
  ^^^^sandee-eygo
  ^^^^^sandy-eggo
  ^^^^^i'll ^^^^let^^^^myself^^^^out
***
Thomas is 32 years old and he is still single.
One day a friend asked,

"Why aren't you married? Can't you find a woman who will be a good wife?"

Thomas replied, "Actually, I've found many women I wanted to marry, but when I bring them home to meet my parents, my mother doesn't like them." 

His friend thinks for a moment and says, "I've got the perfect solution, just find a girl who's just like your mother." 

A few months later they meet again and his friend says, "Did you find the perfect girl? Did your mother like her?" 

With a frown on his face, Thomas answers, "Yes, I found the perfect girl. She was just like my mother. You were right, my mother liked her very much." 

The friend said, "Then what's the problem?"

Thomas replied,

 "My father doesn't like her."
***
A Dirty Joke from the 14th Century
The joke comes to us from Jean de Conde of Hainaut, born 1275:

A game of truth-telling is being played at court by a Queen and her retinue. A knight is asked by the Queen if he has fathered any children; he is forced to admit that he has not. 

The Queen nods in assent, saying "you do not have the look of a man who could please his mistress when you hold her naked in your arms. For your beard is little more than the kind of fuzz that ladies have in certain places, and it is easy to tell from the state of the hay whether the pitchfork is any good."

On his turn, the knight asks "Lady, answer me without deceit. Is there hair between your legs?" When she replies, "none at all", he comments, "Indeed I do believe you, for grass does not grow on a well-beaten path."
***
An old Arab lived close to New York City...
An old Arab lived close to New York City for more than 40 years.  He would have loved to plant potatoes in his garden, but he is alone, old and weak.  His son is in college in Paris, so the old man sends him an e-mail.  He explains the problem: "Beloved son, I am very sad, because I can't plant potatoes in my garden. I am sure, if only you were here, you would help and dig up the garden for me. I love you, Your Father."  The following day, the old man receives a response e-mail from his son: "Beloved Father, please don't touch the garden. It's there that I have hidden 'the THING'. I love you, too, Ahmed"  At 4pm the US Army, The Marines, the FBI, the CIA and the Rangers visit the house of the old man, take the whole garden apart, search every inch, but can't find anything. Disappointed they leave the house.  A day later, the old man receives another e-mail from his son. "Beloved Father, I hope the garden is dug up by now and you can plant your potatoes. That's all I could do for you from here. I love you, Ahmed."
***
A man is walking along the street when he sees a ladder...
...stretching well up into the clouds. Being the adventurous type, Harry begins to climb.

After a short while he stops at a cloud and sees a large, ugly looking woman lying there.

"Take me now or climb the ladder to success," she said.

He decided that he was definitely not drunk enough for this so he continued climbing.

Soon after he saw another woman lying on the cloud, this time slightly thinner and with average looks. 

"Take me now or climb the ladder to success," she said.

Noticing the pattern, Harry climbs further and sees an attractive woman with a good figure.

"Take me now or climb the ladder to success," she said.

Getting excited, he continued climbing.
On the next cloud was the most stunning woman he had ever seen - perfect body, slim curves, full set of gorgeous breasts - the lot. 

"Fuck me now or climb the ladder to success," she breathed seductively.

Despite the beauty of this woman, Harry's greed got the better of him and he continues climbing.

"The next one will have to be Aphrodite or the like," he thinks to himself.

Suddenly a latch locks behind Harry and he is trapped inside a dark room.
An enormous 6 ft 5, 120kg biker-looking bloke with a full set of tattoos and a great bushy beard stands up and starts walking towards him menacingly.

"Who the fuck are you?!" Harry asks.
The man grins and replies "I'm Cess."
***
A priest, a doctor, and an engineer
were waiting one morning for a particularly slow group of golfers. The engineer fumed, "What's with those guys? We must have been waiting for fifteen minutes!" 

The doctor chimed in, "I don't know, but I've never seen such inept golf!" 

The priest said, "Here comes the green-keeper. Let's have a word with him." 

He said, "Hello George, what's wrong with that group ahead of us? They're rather slow, aren't they?" 

The green-keeper replied, "Oh, yes. That's a group of blind firemen. They lost their sight saving our clubhouse from a fire last year, so we always let them play for free anytime." 

The group fell silent for a moment. 

The priest said, "That's so sad. I think I will say a special prayer for them tonight."

The doctor said, "Good idea. I'm going to contact my ophthalmologist colleague and see if there's anything he can do for them." 

The engineer said, "Why can't they play at night?" 
***
wee bit perfectionist
An extraordinarily handsome man decided he had the responsibility to marry the perfect woman so they could produce beautiful children beyond comparison. With that as his mission he began searching for the perfect woman. 

Shortly thereafter he met a farmer who had three stunning, gorgeous daughters that positively took his breath away. So he explained his mission to the farmer, asking for permission to marry one of them. The farmer simply replied, "They're lookin' to get married, so you came to the right place. Look 'em over and pick the one you want." 

The man dated the first daughter. The next day the farmer asked for the man's opinion. "Well," said the man, "she's just a weeeeee bit, not that you can hardly notice...pigeon-toed." 

The farmer nodded and suggested the man date one of the other girls; so the man went out with the second daughter. The next day, the farmer again asked how things went. "Well," the man replied, "she's just a weeeee bit, not that you can hardly tell...cross-eyed."
 
The farmer nodded and suggested he date the third girl to see if things might be better. So he did. The next morning the man rushed in exclaiming, "She's perfect, just perfect. She's the one I want to marry." 

So they were wed right away. Months later the baby was born. When the man visited the nursery, he was horrified. The baby was the ugliest, most pathetic human you can imagine. He rushed to his father-in-law asking how such a thing could happen considering the beauty of the parents. 

"Well," explained the farmer, "she was just a weeeee bit, not that you could hardly tell...pregnant when you met her."

***
Little Jimmy in the car.
Little Jimmy is in the car with his mother and shes driving down the highway.
A truck in front of them contains adult sex toys.
All of a sudden a large black dildo falls off the truck and hits the windscreen of the car.
"What was that mummy" says Jimmy,
"Oh... it was a fly" replies the mother, slightly embarrased,
"Jesus!" says Jimmy, "Did you see the size of the cock on him!"
***
A woman wakes her husband up at 2 AM, saying
"Quick, who's scored the highest number of goals in football, ever?"

"Klose", replied the groggy husband.

"And how many episodes of Breaking Bad are there in total?"

"Huh? Wait, let me...55, no, 62, there's 62 total episodes" he replied.

"Who was that girl in that 'Saved by the Bell'  show, Kapowski?"

"Tiffani Thiessen, played Kelly Kapowski"

"And also, when'd that new girl, Sandy, move downstairs again?"

"Two months next Wednesday. What's going on honey?" asked the husband, now irritated.

"Yesterday was my birthday."
***
The Irishman's parking space
An Irishman is trying to find a parking space outside his local pub on a busy evening, but cannot find a single one.

He looks skyward and says, "Lord, if you grant me this space, I'll come to Church every Sunday like a good Catholic should."

Low and behold, a space opens up right in front of him at which time, he looks skyward again and says, "Never mind, I found one."
***
A Chinese guy walks into a bar...
A Chinese guy walks into a bar, and sits next to Jeff, and starts drinking his beer. Jeff asks him :


• My friend, do you know any martial arts, kung fu, karate or other stuff?


• Why do you ask, is it because i'm Chinese? 


• No, it's because you are drinking my beer.
***
On his 70th birthday, an old man received a coupon from his wife...
The coupon paid for a visit to a medicine man living on a nearby reservation who was rumored to have a wonderful cure for erectile dysfunction.  
After being persuaded to go, he drove to the reservation, handed his ticket to the medicine man and wondered what he was in for.  
The old man handed a potion to him, and with a grip on his shoulder, warned, "This is a powerful medicine. You take only a teaspoon and then say '1-2-3'." When you do, you will become more manly than you have ever been in your life and you can perform as long as you want."  
The man was encouraged. As he walked away, he turned and asked, "How do I stop the medicine from working?"  
"Your partner must say '1-2-3-4,'" the medicine man responded, "but when she does, the medicine will not work again until the next full moon."  
The man was very eager to see if it worked so he went home, showered, shaved, took a spoonful of the medicine and then invited his wife to join him in the bedroom. When she came in, he quickly took off his clothes and said, "1-2-3!" Immediately, he was the manliest of men. His wife was excited and began throwing off her clothes as she asked "What was the 1-2-3 for?"  
And that, boys and girls, is why we should never end our sentences with a preposition, because we could end up with a dangling participle.
***
There's a flower shop in my town...
...that always had great business until one day, a group of local monks opened a flower shop right across the street. Of course, everybody wanted to buy flowers from the brothers. The original flower shop began losing a dangerous amount of business. The owner of the shop began visiting the friars every day to try to ask, beg, and bribe the monks into shutting down their store. They were utterly unsuccessful. Finally, the shop owner went down to the local pub to enlist the help of Hugh McTaggert, the biggest, baddest drunkard in town. Hugh broke into the monks' flower shop in the middle of the night and absolutely trashed the place from top to bottom. He left with a note that said "leave now." Not surprisingly, the monks packed up the very next day and headed back to the monastery. The moral of the story: Hugh, and only Hugh, can prevent florist friars.
***
A priest and a shepherd...
... from Australia participate in a gameshow on TV. After answering all the questions, there is a tie. So both are given one final assignment. It is to write a poem in three minutes, using the word "Timbuktu". It's a city in Africa.

The priest returns with the fruit of his inspiration:

"I was a father all my life,
I had no children, had no wife,
I read the bible through and through
on my way to Timbuktu ... "

The poem makes a great impression, and the priest smells a sweet victory. But then comes the shepherd, with his poem:

"When Tim and I to Brisbane went
We met three ladies cheap to rent.
But they were three and we were two,
So I booked one and Tim Booked Two ... " 
***
Santa needs advice.
Cop on horse says to little girl on bike, "Nice bike you've got there. Did Santa bring you that?"  "Yes," replies the little girl.  "Well tell him to put a reflector light on it next year!" and fines her $5.  The little girl looks up at the cop and says, "Nice horse you've got there, did Santa bring YOU that?"  The cop chuckles and replies, "He sure did!"  "Well," says the little girl, "Next year tell Santa that the dick goes under the horse, not on top of it!"
***
Non-Racist Joke
An American man, a Chinese man, and a Mexican man are on a plane.

The plane is going to crash unless they lose some excess weight.

The Mexican man throws beans off the plane, he says, "In my country, we have too many beans."

Next, the Chinese man throws rice off the plane, he says, "In my country, we have too much rice."

Next, the American man throws the Mexican man off the plane,

He says,

"That bastard slept with my wife."
***
Little Timmy was told that everybody has a secret.
Little Timmy was told at school today, that everybody had a secret, so dark that they would do anything to keep it a secret.

So he decided to test this out.

He went to his mom and looked straight into her eyes and said : Mom I know your secret.
And without a moment passing his mom burst in tears and handed him 20 dollars, telling him to keep the secret to himself.

With 20 dollars in his pocket, he was quick running to his father, staring at him the way he stared at his mom stating : Dad... I know your secret.

With shaking hands his dad, grabbed his wallet from his pocket, dragging out a 100 dollar bill, handing it to Timmy , stating. "Don´t tell anyone about it".

Could this be? Timmy thought to himself and wow already got 120 bucks for this. And as he was going outside he was greeted by the post man.

Thinking that he could gain a quick buck he stared intensely at the mail man and with a clear sound voice he said to him. " I know your secret "

And in that same moment the postman, fell to his knee´s. "Come here son, I am so happy you finally know!"
***
An american walks into a swiss bank...
The bank is very full so it takes a long time for it to be his turn.

After an hour wait he finally gets to go up to the counter. The woman asks him how she could assist him. 


He looks around, making sure he cant be heard and whispers into her ear "I would like to deposit $1 million into a bank account"


The woman looks a bit startled and says out loud "oh dont worry sir! You dont have to whisper, here in Switzerland its no shame to be poor."
***
A man walks in to a bar...
...and the barman says "Can I get you a drink, sir?"

"That's very kind of you to offer, thank you." replies the man. "I'll have a whiskey, please."

The man finishes the drink and starts to leave. When the barman asks for payment, the man says "but you offered to get me a drink, I was under the impression that you were paying."

Although he isn't happy about it and knows he was conned, the barman agrees to pay for the drink and the man leaves.

A few months later the man walks back into the same bar. The barman recognises him instantly.

"Oh no you don't, buddy. You're not getting served in here again."

"Why not?" asks the man.

"Because of the drink you conned out of me last time."

"I have no idea what you mean." replies the man.

"Don't give me that. You were here a few months back."

"I honestly don't know what you're talking about." insists the man. "This is the first time I have ever set foot in this bar."

"Oh," replies the barman, a little confused. "In that case you must have a double."

"Very kind. Whiskey, please."
***
Two gay men are travelling...
...on a plane. Let's call them Steve and Bill.

"Dude, what if we had sex?" asks Steve.

"You crazy? Here, on the plane? It would be awkward, everyone would watch us doing it..."

"Man, nobody is even paying attention to anything. Look!"

Steve stands up and asks loudly:

"Could I have a pencil, please?"

Nobody gives a damn. Everyone is sleeping, reading, looking out the window, etc.

"They really wouldn't care then, would they?" says Bill.

So Steve and Bill have wild sex on the plane.

Later, when the plane arrives to the airport and the people are leaving, the stewardess sees an old man who threw up all over his shirt, even his pants are soaking in the filth.

"Sir, you should've asked for a bag!"

"I didn't dare" whispers the old man. "A few rows ahead I saw a man asking for a pencil and he got fucked in the ass..."
***
A priest and a rabbi get into a car accident...
A priest and a rabbi get into a car accident at an intersection. They get out of their cars and find that neither is hurt, which is surprising because it was a horrible accident. The cars are a mangled mess. 

The priest says to the rabbi, "Thank the lord that we are both uninjured! That was *terrifying.* I still can't stop shaking. I was so frightened!"



The rabbi says, "Friend, I feel the same way.  I saw my life flash before my eyes, but those airbags saved us. Look, I had this bottle of Manischevits wine on the seat next to me and it didn't even break! Here, let's have a drink to calm our nerves. " as he hands the bottle to the priest 

"Yes, and also to celebrate still being alive!" the priest says as he takes a long drink from the bottle. 

He hands the bottle back to the rabbi who, instead of drinking, closes the bottle and puts it in his pocket. 


"Aren't you going to have a drink?" the priest asks

"Not until after the cops get here. "


***
A man is walking by his son's room, when he hears him praying...
...and he decides to poke his head in the door to see what he is saying. 

"Dear God, I love Mommy, Daddy, and Grandma. Bye bye Grandpa." 

The father thought this was strange, but didn't pay much mind to it, as his young son was just expressing his feelings. 

The next day the man comes home from work to find out that the Grandpa had died earlier that day of a surprise heart attack. 

The day after the funeral the man is going to bed when he hears his son praying again. He decides to listen in again, afraid he might be traumatized by the death. 

"Dear God, I love Mommy and Daddy. Bye bye Grandma." 

This time he was more than a little freaked out by this, but still didn't take too much notice to the apparent coincidence. But then... 

The next day the father returns home from work to find out the Grandma died that day from a surprise heart attack. The father was starting to worry about his son at this point. He listened in every night to see if he prayed but he didn't... at least not until the day after the funeral. 

The father did his usual check on his son, when he heard him distinctly praying again. He slowly poked his head through the door to listen. 

"Dear God, I love Mommy. Bye bye Daddy." 

Of course, the father was more than worried about this, he was downright paranoid. The next day at work, he was avoiding anything that could potentially harm him. He hid under his desk, and kept a phone nearby in case something happened. After the longest day of his life, he safely returned home to discover several police cars around his house blaring lights and putting up caution tape everywhere. 

He wanders up to the door, confused, when his wife leaps into his arms, and starts crying. He asked what happened, and she says: 

"Oh the most terrible thing happened today! The mailman died of a terrible heart attack right on our doorstep!" 
***
The Most Successful lawyer...........
A local United Way office realized that the organization had never received a donation from the town's most successful lawyer. The person in charge of contributions called him to persuade him to contribute.

"Our research shows that out of a yearly income of at least $500,000, you give not a penny to charity. Wouldn't you like to give back to the community in some way?"

The lawyer mulled this over for a moment and replied, "First, did your research also show that my mother is dying after a long illness, and has medical bills that are several times her annual income?"

Embarrassed, the United Way rep mumbled, "Um ... no."

The lawyer interrupts, "or that my brother, a disabled veteran, is blind and confined to a wheelchair?"

The stricken United Way rep began to stammer out an apology, but was interrupted again.

"or that my sister's husband died in a traffic accident," the lawyer's voice rising in indignation, "leaving her penniless with three children?!"

The humiliated United Way rep, completely beaten, said simply, "I had no idea..."

On a roll, the lawyer cut him off once again, "So if I don't give any money to them, why should I give any to you?"
***
George W. Bush is sitting with his aides...
and he is getting debriefed on the world news of the day. The news is rather mundane and unexciting, but one of his aides states that 3 Brazilian people perished in a plane crash early this morning.

 Dubya's reaction is pure shock and grief, he's shaking and can't control his emotions. 

Tearfully looking over to the man who broke the news, he asks him, "How many is a Brazilian?"
***
The Commandments
God went to the Arabs and said, 'I have Commandments for you that will make your lives better.'

The Arabs asked, 'What are Commandments?' And the Lord said, 
'They are rules for living.'

'Can you give us an example?'

'Thou shall not kill.'

'Not kill? We're not interested..'

So He went to the Blacks and said, 'I have Commandments.'

The Blacks wanted an example, and the Lord said, 'Honor thy Father and Mother.'

'Father? We don't know who our fathers are. We're not interested.'

Then He went to the Mexicans and said, 'I have Commandments.'

The Mexicans also wanted an example, and the Lord said 'Thou shall not steal.'

'Not steal? We're not interested.'

Then He went to the French and said, 'I have Commandments.'

The French too wanted an example and the Lord said, 'Thou shall not commit adultery.'

'Sacre bleu!!! Not commit adultery? We're not interested.'

Finally, He went to the Jews and said, 'I have Commandments..'

'Commandments?' They said, 'How much are they?'

'They're free.'

'We'll take 10.'
***
Billy's dead canary
Billy's canary was dead lying on the bottom of his cage. Billy asked his Dad why when things die they lay on their back with their eyes closed and their legs in the air. His Dad told him it was so God could grab them by their feet and take them to heaven. A few days later when his Dad was pulling into the driveway after work, Billy came running out screaming ..."Daddy, Daddy..Mommy nearly died today !" "What happened ?" Asked Billy's Dad. "Well" said Billy " I came home from school today and there was Mommy in the bedroom on her back with her eyes closed and her legs in the air, just like my canary, and she was saying 'God I'm coming...God I'm coming' and if it hadn't been for the mailman holding her down...he would have got her !" 
***
A frustrated middle eastern man is walking along the beach... (NSFW)
When suddenly he stubs his toe on something in the sand. He reaches down under the sand and discovers a golden lamp. He picks it up and excitedly brushes it off when suddenly a enormous genie appears.

"I am the Genie of the Lamp and I shall grant you one wish, if it is within my power."

The man thinks hard and slowly reaches into his pocket. He pulls out a map of the world and points out where he is from to the genie.

"My homeland is a sad, unhappy place. There is suffering and many people are dying. There have been decades of war and bitter feuding." The man points to all the countries in the region plagued by conflict and hardship, explaining to the genie the years of loss and troubles. "The children of these countries have no hope for a prosperous future if this continues." He ends by holding out the map to the genie and says, "My greatest wish is for peace in all the lands of the middle east so that happiness and joy returns to the hearts of all the people who live there." 

The genie is touched by the man's selfless yearning. But he solemnly replies "I cannot grant this wish. It is too great a task. Even I, the All Powerful, cannot achieve such a feat. But your character has moved me and I will allow you another wish."

The man sadly puts away the map and thinks for a long time. He then says, "My wife of many years and I loved each other very much when were first married. Lately, her flame of passion has gone dim. If you would inspire her and make her give me a blowjob I would be a happy man."

The genie pauses and looks blankly at the man for a short time. He quickly replies, "Let me see that map again..."
***
Help Requested: A friend of mine has two tickets for the 2017 Super bowl.
A friend of mine has two tickets for the 2017 Super bowl. They are box seats plus airfares and hotel accommodations. He didn't realize when he bought them that this is the same day as his wedding - so he can't go.


If you're interested and want to go instead of him, it's at St. Peter's Church in New York City at 5 PM. Her name is Donna. She will be the one in the white dress.
***
One of the smarter jokes I've picked up...
An engineer, a theoretical physicist, an experimental physicist and a philosopher are walking the hills of Scotland when they spot a black sheep.  The engineer exclaims "well whaddaya know! the sheep in Scotland are black!"  The theoretical physicist replies, "..well, SOME of the sheep in Scotland are black." The experimental physicist retorts, "we can safely say, at least one sheep in Scotland is black." 

The philosopher says, ".... on one side, anyway."
***
Her farts don't stink
A little old lady goes to the doctor and says, "Doctor I have this problem with gas, but it really doesn't bother me too much. They never smell and are always silent. As a matter of fact I've farted at least 20 times since I've been here in your office."   
The doctor says, "I see. Take these pills and come back to see me next week."   
The next week the lady returns. "Doctor," she says, "I don't know what  you gave me, but now my farts are still silent but stink terribly".
   
"Good," the doctor said. "Now that we've cleared up your sinuses, let's work on your hearing."
***
"32 years old"
Fred is 32 years old and he is still single. 

One day a friend asked, "Why aren't you married? Can't you find a woman who will be a good wife?" 

Fred replied, "Actually, I've found many women I wanted to marry, but when I bring them home to meet my parents, my mother doesn't like them." 

His friend thinks for a moment and says, "I've got the perfect solution, just find a girl who's just like your mother." 

A few months later they meet again and his friend says, "Did you find the perfect girl? Did your mother like her?" 

With a frown on his face, Fred answers, "Yes, I found the perfect girl. She was just like my mother. You were right, my mother liked her very much." 

The friend said, "Then what's the problem?" 

Fred replied, "My father doesn't like her."
***
A math professor, John, has problems with his sink .....
so he calls a plumber. The plumber comes over and quickly fixes the sink. The professor is happy until he gets the bill. He tells the plumber, "How can you charge this much? This is half of my paycheck." But he pays it anyways.
The plumber tells him, "Hey, we are looking for more plumbers. You could become a plumber and triple your salary. Just make sure you say you only made it to 6th grade, they don't like educated people."
The professor takes him up on the offer and becomes a plumber. His salary triples and he doesn't have to work nearly as hard. But the company makes an announcement that all of their plumbers must get a 7th grade education. So they all go to night school.
On the first day of night school they all attend math class. The teacher wants to gauge the class so he asks John, "What is the formula for the area of a circle?" John walks up to the board and is about to write the formula when he realizes he has forgotten it. So he begins to attempt to derive the formula, filling the board with complicated mathematics. He ends up figuring out it is negative pi times radius squared. He thinks the minus doesn't belong so he starts over, but again he comes up with the same equation. After staring at the board for a minute he looks out at the other plumbers and sees that they are all whispering, "Switch the limits on the integral!"
***
I was in the queue at Starbucks this morning.
The man getting served in front of me, asked for a mocha. "Sorry sir, but we're out of mochas". The guy was fuming "I have a mocha every morning when I come in here!", he raged, "I'll just have to have a latte!". He went and sat down.

I went to the counter and said "I'll have a large latte too, please". They asked me for my name. I asked why they needed it and they told me that they'd write it on my cup and shout it when it was ready.

So I told them my name was Mocha.
***
Daddy's Call
Just found this online. Had to see what the Reddit world thought:

“Hello?”, “Hi honey. This is Daddy. Is Mommy near the phone?”

“No Daddy. She’s upstairs in the bedroom with Uncle Paul.”

After a brief pause, Daddy says, “But honey, you haven’t got an Uncle Paul.”

“Oh yes I do, and he’s upstairs in the room with Mommy, right now.”

Brief Pause. “Uh, okay then, this is what I want you to do. Put the phone down on the table, run upstairs and knock on the bedroom door and shout to Mommy that Daddy’s car just pulled into the driveway.”

“Okay Daddy, just a minute.”

A few minutes later the little girl comes back to the phone.

“I did it Daddy.”

“And what happened honey?” he asked.

Well, Mommy got all scared, jumped out of bed with no clothes on and ran around screaming. Then she tripped over the rug, hit her head on the dresser and now she isn’t moving at all!”

“Oh my God!!! What about your Uncle Paul?”

“He jumped out of the bed with no clothes on, too. He was all scared and he jumped out of the back window and into the swimming pool. But I guess he didn’t know that you took out the water last week to clean it. He hit the bottom of the pool and I think he’s dead.”

***Long Pause***

***Longer Pause***

***Even Longer Pause***

Then Daddy says,

“Swimming pool? …. Is this 486-5731?”
***
Mother & Daughter Are on a Plane...
Mother & daughter are on a plane. Daughter asks mother, "Mommy, if big dogs have baby dogs & big cats have baby cats, why don't big planes have baby planes?"

The mother stumbled and didn't have an answer for that one so she desperately looks around and replies, "I don't know sweetie, why don't you go ask that nice flight attendant, I'm sure she'll have an answer." 

So the little girl goes up the the flight attendant and asks, "If big dogs have baby dogs & big cats have baby cats, then why don't big planes have baby planes?"

Immediately the flight attendant is suspicious, "Did your mother tell you to come over here and ask me that?"... "Yep", answers the little girl.

So the flight attendant thinks on it for a few seconds then kneels down to the daughters level.

"You go over there and you tell your mother it's because Southwest Airlines always pulls out on time."

:)
***
Two nuns sare coming back from the market late at night
- "Sister Andrea, it's already dark and we are still quite fare from the covent"

- "Yes Sister Dulce and did you notice that a man is following us??"

- "Yes! and what do you think he wants ?"

- "logical, rapes us... what should we do??"

- "logical: we split way, you on the left me on the right"

The man starts following Sister Dulce. Sister Andrea arrives to the Covent,  and is worried because Sister Dulce is not arrived yet. After 1 hour here she comes.

- "What happened??"

- "Well I started running and obviously as did the man"

-  "and??"

- "Logical: he reached me.."

- "Oh dear god! And what did you do??"

- "Logical: I lifted my dress up"

- "And what did he do??"

- "Logical: He dropped his pants"

- "god.... and??"

- "Logical no? A nun with her dressed up runs faster than a man with his pants down"

ps: Sorry my english is not my first language :)
***
So aliens from Mars comes down to Earth...
...And they're friendly! The leaders of the world and the aliens plan a huge televised event where the leaders can ask questions on whatever they want.

During this event, the pope is up to talk to the aliens.

"I know this question may sound odd to you gentlemen," the pope starts to ask, "but I was wondering if you and your kind knew about Jesus Christ?"

"Jesus Christ?!?" the alien leader exclaims, "how do we not! He swings by our planet every two years or so. Awesome guy!"

Now this obviously starts a huge debate within the UN, as this information now has implications to everything they knew. The pope, however, is not exactly a happy person as his brain is on other information.

"EVERY TWO YEARS OR SO?!?" The pope exclaims, "We've still been waiting for his SECOND coming!"

Trying to calm down the pope, the aliens say "Well maybe he didn't like your chocolate."

The pope, upon hearing this news, takes a few moments to calm down. When he finally regains his composure, he states calmly, "Forgive me, but what does chocolate have anything to do with this?"

The aliens respond, "Well when he was on our planet, we would give him huge boxes of chocolates. Why, what did you guys do when he was here?"
***
Johnny finally makes it to college...
On the first day his psych professor begins a perception exercise by telling the students to close their eyes and feel around for an object, then describe the object and tell her what it is. 

First she calls on Kyle who says "I feel something big round and bumpy.  It's a globe!" 

The professor says "Good Kyle! I like the way you think.

Next she calls on Suzie who says "I feel something flat and coarse. It's paper!" 

The professor says "Good Suzie! I like the way you think."

Finally she calls on Johnny. He sticks his hand in his pocket with a creepy smile and says "Teacher, I feel something round, hard, and it has a head on it. 

The professor interrupts him shouting "Johnny, That's disgusting!" 

He replies, "No teacher it's a quarter, but I like the way you think."

***
Always a hole behind
A man, while playing on the front nine of a complicated golf course, became confused as to where he was on the course. Looking around, he saw a lady playing ahead of him. He walked up to her, explained his confusion and asked her if she knew what hole he was playing. She replied, "I'm on the 7th hole and you are a hole behind me, so you must be on the 6th hole." He thanked her and went back to his golf. 

On the back nine the same thing happened and he approached her again with the same request. She said, "I'm on the 14th, and you are a hole behind me, so you must be on the 13th." Once again he thanked her and returned to his play. 

He finished his round and went into the club house where he saw the lady sitting at the end of the bar. He asked the bartender if he knew the lady. The bartender said that she was a sales lady and played the course often. 

He approached her and said, "Let me buy you a drink to show my appreciation for your help. I understand that you are a sales lady ... well, I am in sales also. What do you sell?" 

She replied, "If I told you, you would only laugh." 

"No I wouldn't," he said and persisted that she tell him what she sold. 

"Well if you must know", she answered, "I sell Tampons." 

With that, he fell on the floor and laughed so hard he almost lost his breath. 

She said, "See I knew you would laugh." 

"That's not what I'm laughing at," he replied, "I'm a toilet paper salesman, so I'm still a hole behind you!"
***
It's Only A Game?
At the golf course one Sunday, Bernie's about to putt, when a funeral procession turns the corner just off the course and begins to roll by. Bernie straightens up from his putter, takes his hat off, and holds it over his heart. He stands there silently like that, facing the procession, until it passes. Then he bends over again and makes his putt.
      "That was a very thoughtful gesture," a member of his foursome says to him as they walk towards the next tee. "You are one compassionate guy."
     "Thank you," replies Bernie. "We would have been married 25 years next Tuesday."
***
A Pole, a German and a Russian go to prison...
A Pole, a German and a Russian are sent to prison. They each receive a 50-year sentence with no parole. The guard, when putting them in their cells, shows mercy on them and offers to give each of them a small supply of their favourite things to occupy their times. The Pole picks a collection of books by his favourite author, the German picks a case of strong beer, and the Russian picks a huge pack of cigarettes. After the 50 years pass, the guard checks on his prisoners. The Pole thanks the guard for allowing him to gain knowledge in his time, the German complains that he ran out of alcohol a week into his sentence, and the Russian asks the guard for a lighter.
***
Ladies night out...
So, two ladies ditch their husbands for a ladies night out on a Friday night and they go do whatever middle-aged women think is cool to do on a Friday night. One thing leads to another and these two ladies have drunk a little bit too much and decide to head home and sleep it off. So they're driving home and on the way they realize they have to pee... bad. They try to hold it, but when you gotta go you... (you get it). Finally, they just can't take it anymore and they pull over to the side of the road near a cemetery and decide to drop their underwear and just go.
One lady simply take off her underwear and wipe with those, but the other remembers that hers are a gift from her husband. However, she spotted a wreath that was on a grave and proceeded to wipe herself with it. After finishing, they went home. 
That weekends their husbands were at the pub chatting and one says, "These ladies nights out are getting out of hand they really need to stop, last night my wife cam home with out any panties on."
The other man finishes his beer and says, "You think that's bad... My wife came home with a card in her buttcrack that said 'On behalf of the whole fire department, we'll never forget you."
***
A couple want to have children but the wife can't get pregnant...
...so they go to see a priest for advice. The priest tells them they came at the right time, since his superior just sent him to Rome for 10 years, and he's leaving tomorrow.

'As soon as I'll get there, I'll immediatly light a candle for you,' he promises.

Time passes and the priest returns to the little town after 10 years. The first thing he does is visit the couple's home. He can hear a crazy loud noise when he knocks on the door. The wife opens the door; three little children on her arms, a couple of them hiding under her skirt, and others behind her playing around. The priest counts as many as ten of them!

'Well this is quite a pleasant surprise,' exclaims the priest. 'It seems like God listened to my prayer. But where is your dear husband?'

'My husband travelled to Rome,' says the wife with a tired look on her face.

'To Rome? Why on earth would he go to Rome?'

'To blow out that bloody candle you lit!'
***
Three sons left home, went out on their own and prospered.
Getting back together, they discussed the gifts that they were able to give to their elderly mother.

The first said: "I built a big house for our mother."

The second said: "I sent her a Mercedes with a driver."

The third said: "I've got you both beat. You know how Mom enjoys the Bible and you know she can't see very well. I sent her a brown parrot that can recite the entire Bible. It took twenty monks in a monastery 12 years to teach him. I had to pledge to contribute $100,000 a year for twenty years but it was worth it. Mom just has to name the chapter and verse, and the parrot will recite it."

Soon thereafter, Mom sent out her letters of thanks.

She wrote to the first son: "Milton, the house you built is too big. I live in only one room, but I have to clean the whole house."

She wrote to the second son: "Marvin, I am too old to travel. I stay home all the time, so I never used the Mercedes and the driver is so rude."

She wrote to the third son: "Dearest Melvin, you were the only son to have the good sense to know what your mother likes. The chicken was delicious!"
***
Martians arrive on earth...
They're peaceful and happy and everyone loves them.  Obviously humanity has tons of questions they'd like to ask them so the U.N. decides to arrange a conference.  All the world leaders, public intellectuals and religious heads are in attendance to ask their most burning questions.  Finally it is the pope's turn to ask a question...

"I was wondering...have you ever heard of our lord and savior Jesus Christ" the pope asks.

"Jesus? Yes of course! He stops by our planet every couple of years and we all have a big party" the aliens respond

The pope looks baffled and says "You must be mistaken...Jesus Christ was here about two thousand years ago but he left and we've been waiting for his return ever since...why would he visit you so often?"  

"well..." they look at each other "...maybe your chocolate wasn't good" the aliens offer

"Pardon me?" the pope asks

"Well, when Jesus first showed up on our planet we gave him really great chocolate...what did you guys do?"
***
A man walks into a bar and orders a rum and coke
Bartender: "Hold on" as he puts an apple on the bar

Man: "What's this?"

Bartender: "Try it"

Man: "It tastes like rum!"

Bartender: "Turn it around."

Man: "This side tastes like coke!"

Another man walks into the bar and asks for a gin a tonic, and the bartender places another apple onto the bar

Man2: "What's this?"

Man1: "Try it, just trust me."

Man2: As he takes a bite "This tastes like gin!"

Man1: "Now turn it around."

Man2: "This side tastes like tonic!"

A third man walks into the bar and the bartender asks him what he would like.

Man3: "I don't know, what do you got?"

Bartender: "Well we have apples that taste like all sorts of things."

Man3: "You got one that tastes like pussy?"

The bartender places an apple on the bar

Man3: As he bites into the apple "Ew! This tastes like shit!"

Bartender, Man1, Man2: "Turn it around!"
***
Woman tries to get on the bus.
As the bus stopped and it was her turn to get on, she became aware that her skirt was too tight to allow her leg to come up to the first step of the bus.

Slightly embarrassed and with a quick smile to the bus driver, she reached behind her to unzip her skirt a little, thinking that this would give her enough slack to raise her leg.

She tried to take the step, only to discover that she couldn't. 

So, a little more embarrassed, she once again reached behind her to unzip her skirt a little more, and for the second time attempted the step.

Once again, much to her annoyance, she could not raise her leg.

With a little smile to the driver, she again reached behind to unzip a little more and again was unable to take the step.

About this time, a large man standing behind her picked her up easily by the waist and placed her gently on the step of the bus.

She went ballistic and turned to the would-be Samaritan and yelled, "How dare you touch my body! I don't even know who you are!"

The man smiled and said, "Well, ma'am, normally I would agree with you, but after you unzipped my fly three times, I kinda figured we were friends."
***
I wouldn't say Scotsmen are cheap but...
A Scotsmen and a Jewish man were having a magnificent meal at one of the most expensive restaurants in The world. After the meal their waiter came over to present the check and a Scottish voice said "that's all right laddie just gae the check to me".

Headlines in the local newspaper next day read: "Jewish ventriloquist found beaten to death".

***
College Student's Response to a Chemistry Mid Term Bonus Question.
Bonus Question: Is Hell exothermic (gives off heat) or endothermic (absorbs heat)?

Most of the students wrote proofs of their beliefs using Boyle's Law (gas cools when it expands and heats when it is compressed) or some variant.

One student, however, wrote the following:

First, we need to know how the mass of Hell is changing in time. So we need to know the rate at which souls are moving into Hell and the rate at which they are leaving. I think that we can safely assume that once a soul gets to Hell, it will not leave. Therefore, no souls are leaving. As for how many souls are entering Hell, let's look at the different religions that exist in the world today.

Most of these religions state that if you are not a member of their religion, you will go to Hell. Since there is more than one of these religions and since people do not belong to more than one religion, we can project that all souls go to Hell. With birth and death rates as they are, we can expect the number of souls in Hell to increase exponentially. Now, we look at the rate of change of the volume in Hell because Boyle's Law states that in order for the temperature and pressure in Hell to stay the same, the volume of Hell has to expand proportionately as souls are added.

This gives two possibilities:



1. If Hell is expanding at a slower rate than the rate at which souls enter Hell, then the temperature and pressure in Hell will increase until all Hell breaks loose.



2. If Hell is expanding at a rate faster than the increase of souls in Hell,then the temperature and pressure will drop until Hell freezes over.



So which is it?



If we accept the postulate given to me by Teresa during my Freshman year that, "It will be a cold day in Hell before I sleep with you," and take into account the fact that I slept with her last night, then number two must be true, and thus I am sure that Hell is exothermic and has already frozen over. The corollary of this theory is that since Hell has frozen over, it follows that it is not accepting any more souls and is therefore, extinct......leaving only Heaven, thereby proving the existence of a divine being which explains why, last night, Teresa kept shouting "Oh my God."
***
German Baby Joke I saw on QI
A British couple decided to adopt a German baby. They raised him for years, however they began to get worried because he never spoke, and they believed that he was mentally handicapped, going as far as to take him to therapy, which was fruitless.
Then, when the child was 8 years old, he had a Strudle, and said "It is a little tepid."

His parents, of course shocked that he was suddenly speaking, asked: "Wolfgang, why have you never spoken before?", to which the child replied:
"Up until now, everything had been satisfactory."

***
Mom's birthday gifts
3 guys, who were brothers, were all discussing what gifts they were getting for their elderly mother for her birthday. 

The first brother, named Michael, said, "I bought mom her very own Lexus and chauffeur. She was always complaining about not being able to drive well."

Jeremy, the second brother, said,"Well I bought mom a penthouse apartment. She always complains about the house she lives in."

Lucas, the third brother, said, "Since mom always complains about not being able to read her bible well due to her poor vision, I bought a parrot that can recite bible verses perfectly!"

3 weeks later, the boys receive a letter from their mother. It read:

        "To my 3 dear boys:
Thank you for all your nice gifts. However, I couldn't use the car that Michael gave me because I'm too old to go out anymore and the chauffeur is mean. The new penthouse is nice, but it is too big for me to clean each day and I'm only ever in the bedroom. But Lucas, you did a fine job in choosing a gift. The chicken was delicious."
***
The rectum stretcher
While she was flying down the road yesterday (20 miles over the limit), a woman passed over a bridge only to find a cop with a radar gun on the other side lying in wait.

The cop pulled her over, walked up to the car, and with a classic patronizing smirk asked, "What's your hurry?"

She replied, "I'm late for work."

"Oh yeah?," said the cop, "What do you do?"

"I'm a rectum stretcher," she responded.

The cop stammered, "A what? A rectum stretcher? And just what does a rectum stretcher do?"

"Well," she said, "I start by inserting one finger, then I work my way up to two fingers, then three, then four, then with my whole hand in I work from side to side until I can get both hands in, and then I slowly but surely stretch, until it's about 6 feet wide."

"And just what the hell do you do with a 6 foot asshole?" he asked.

She politely replied, "You give him a radar gun and park him behind a bridge..."

***
The Talking Dog
A guy is driving around the back woods of Montana when he sees a sign in front of a broken down house ‘Talking Dog For Sale’. He rings the bell and the owner tells him the dog is in the backyard.

The guy goes into the backyard and sees a nice looking Labrador sitting there.

“You talk?” he says.
“Yep” the dog replies.

After the guy recovers from the shock of hearing a dog speak, he says “So, what’s your story?”

The Lab looks up and says, “Well. I discovered I could talk when I was pretty young. I wanted to help the government, so I told the CIA. In no time at all they had me jetting from country to country, sitting in rooms with spies and world leaders, because no one figured a dog would be eavesdropping.”

“I was one of their most valuable spies for eight years running, but the jetting around really tired me out, and I knew I wasn’t getting any younger so I decided to settle down. I signed up for a job at the airport to do some undercover security, wandering near suspicious characters and listening in. I uncovered some incredible dealings and was awarded a batch of medals.”

“I got married, had a mess of puppies, and now I’m retired.”

The guy is amazed. He goes back in and asks the owner what he wants for the dog.

“Ten dollars.” the guy says.

“Ten dollars? This dog is amazing! Why on earth are you selling him so cheap?”


“Because he’s a liar. He never did any of that shit.”
***
A mathematician, a physicist, and an engineer are all found guilty of treason...
and are sentenced to beheading by guillotine.

On the day of the triple execution, they are brought to be beheaded. The priest blesses the execution, saying all is done in God's name, and the King orders the three executed.

The mathematician is to be killed first, and the executioner gives him two options: would he like a hood on or off, and would he like to be face up or face down.

So the mathematician says "Well, they all arrive at the equivalent state of beheading, so it's an arbitrary choice. I suppose I'll take no hood and face down, since it's the simplest solution."

So they lock him into the guillotine, the executioner drops the blade... and it stops inches from his neck.

The priest exclaims "It's a sign from God! This man is innocent! He must be let free!"

The King agrees, pardons the mathematician, and lets him go.

Next up to be killed is the physicist. He is given the same options: hood on or off; face up or face down.

So the physicist thinks, and says "Well, I've spent my whole life looking up at the stars and studying them... but it's broad daylight. I will take the hood to make it dark like night, and face up towards the Heavens."

So they lock him into the guillotine, the executioner drops the blade... and it stops inches from his neck.

The priest exclaims again "It's a sign from God! This man is innocent! He must be let free!"

The King agrees, pardons the physicist, and lets him go.

Finally, it's the engineer's turn to face the guillotine. He's given the same options: hood on or off; face up or down.

The engineer ponders, and says "I've spent my whole life studying machines and mechanical devices. If I am to be killed by the most efficient killing machine of all time, then I will look at its workings while I die! Hood off and face up!"

So they lock him into the guillotine, and the executioner is about to drop the blade, when the engineer exclaims: "I see the problem!"
***
"Most adults are hiding at least one dark secret!!!"
At school, Little Johnny's classmate tells him that most adults are hiding at least one dark secret, so it's very easy to blackmail them by saying, "I know the whole truth." Little Johnny decides to go home and try it out.

Johnny's mother greets him at home, and he tells her, "I know the whole truth." His mother quickly hands him $20 and says, "Just don't tell your father." Quite pleased, the boy waits for his father to get home from work, and greets him with, "I know the whole truth." The father promptly hands him $40 and says, "Please don't say a word to your mother." 

Very pleased, the boy is on his way to school the next day when he sees the mailman at his front door. The boy greets him by saying, "I know the whole truth." The mailman immediately drops the mail, opens his arms, and says, "Then come give your Daddy a great big hug!"

***
Three old guys are hanging out in the nursing home
They're old friends, and every day they sit together and shoot the breeze.

One day, Bob, the 70 year old, says "You know, I don't mind getting old. I can still play golf, flirt with the ladies - life's good! But you know what I miss? I miss peeing. Lord, I haven't had a good piss in years - I'd give anything for a good long piss!"

Fred, the 80 year old, replies: "Well Bob, life's pretty damn good for me too. But the thing I miss, is pooping. I don't think I've had a satisfying, solid shit in years. Man, I'd give almost anything for one good shit!"

Then Stan, the 90 year old, chimes in. "You guys are such wimps! Why, every morning - and I mean *every* morning - I take a good, long piss. Always at 9AM too - why it must be about a quart! And every morning I take a really big dump. And by big I mean *big*. And right on schedule, like clockwork, at 10AM....

Now... what *I'd* really like though, is to wake up - just once - sometime before 11AM..."
***
A guy walks into a bar with a box...
He sits down and starts ordering several drinks.
"What's in the box?" Asks the bartender 
"Ugh, just get me another drink...? Grumbles the man. 
Bartender says "show me what's in the box and the next ones on the house."

The man nods places the box on the bar and takes out a small piano and a man about a foot tall comes out and starts playing the most beautiful music he has ever heard.

"where the hell did you get that?" Asks the bartender.

The man replies "There is a genie out side granting wishes but..."

Before he can finish the bartender runs out side and sees the genie, and yells "I wish for a million bucks!"

After a puff of smoke there are a million ducks walking around quaking.
The bartender runs back inside and yells at the guy
 "Hey you didn't tell me the genie was hard of hearing!"
The guy turns around slowly and says with a smirk, "Did you think I really wished for a 12 inch pianist
***
After every flight, pilots fill out a form, called a gripe sheet which tells mechanics about problems with the aircraft.
The mechanics correct the problems, document their repairs on the form, and then pilots review the gripe sheets before the next flight. Never let it be said that ground crews lack a sense of humor. Here are some maintenance complaints submitted by pilots and the solutions recorded by maintenance engineers. By the way, the airline these came from is the only major airline that has never, ever, had an accident.

> Pilot: Left inside main tire almost needs replacement. 

Engineers: Almost replaced left inside main tire.

-
> Pilot: Test flight OK, except auto-land very rough. 

Engineers: Auto-land not installed on this aircraft.

-
> Pilot: Something loose in cockpit. 

Engineers: Something tightened in cockpit.

-
> Pilot: Dead bugs on windshield. 

Engineers: Live bugs on back-order.

-
> Pilot: Autopilot in altitude-hold mode produces a 200 feet per minute descent. 

Engineers: Cannot reproduce problem on ground.

-
> Pilot: Evidence of leak on right main landing gear. 

Engineers: Evidence removed.

-
> Pilot: DME volume unbelievably loud. 

Engineers: DME volume set to more believable level.

-
> Pilot: Friction locks cause throttle levers to stick. 

Engineers: That's what friction locks are for.

-
> Pilot: IFF inoperative in OFF mode. 

Engineers: IFF always inoperative in OFF mode.

-
> Pilot: Suspected crack in windshield. 

Engineers: Suspect you're right.

-
> Pilot: Number 3 engine missing. 

Engineers: Engine found on right wing after brief search.

-
> Pilot: Aircraft handles funny. 

Engineers: Aircraft warned to straighten up, fly right, and be serious.

-
> Pilot: Target radar hums. 

Engineers: Reprogrammed target radar with lyrics.

-
> Pilot: Mouse in cockpit. 

Engineers: Cat installed.

-
> Pilot: Noise coming from under instrument panel. Sounds like a midget pounding on something with a hammer. 

Engineers: Took hammer away from midget
***
A student goes to talk to his professor about his grade.
The student comes up to the professor, "What is this, why did you grade me an 80?"

The professor looks at the exam again, "Yep, an 80 is what you deserve"

The student takes the exam back, and asks "If I'll bite my own eye, will you give me an 85?" 
The professor is surprised, but still he agrees, at which point the student then takes out his glass eye - and bites it. 

The shocked professor then takes the exam back, and marks it 85.
The student then says "If I'll bite my nose, will you give me a 90?"
The professor is once again shocked, "He can't pull out his nose" he thinks to himself.
He finally agrees, at which point the student takes out his dentures, and bites his own nose.

The professor then once again takes the exam, and marks the grade 90.

The student then makes another offer: "If I'll get up on this table, and pee the perfume Coco Chanel on you, will you give me a 100?"

The professor now has to see what this kid can do, so he agrees.
The student goes on the table, and pees all over the professor, the professor's shirt is soaking wet, as he goes to to sniff it. "What the hell?! This isn't Coco Chanel! This is piss!" 

The student then goes "Fine, we'll leave it at 90".
***
Yoda is working at a hotel as a concierge and a man walks up to the desk.
Yoda is working at a hotel as a concierge and a man walks up to the desk.

Yoda: Hello, welcome, you are.

Man: Hi, I'd like to book a triplex for the weekend.

Yoda: Sorry I am, only duplex we have.

Man: Are you sure? I really need the triplex.

Yoda: There is no tri, only du.
***
As the result of an accident, a man lost teeth and had to have a partial plate made.
His dentist built a standard dental plate and fitted it into his mouth and it worked just fine.

In three months, the man was back at his dentist. The dentist looked in his mouth, and the plate he had just put in was so deteriorated it was beyond repair.

The dentist was shocked that it had only lasted three months, so he constructed a new plate and had stainless steel used as the basis.

But again in about three months the patient was back, and the stainless steel plate was corroded and failing.

This time he had the plate made with titanium, but once more it only lasted a matter of months before deteriorating beyond repair.

Totally baffled, he sent the patient to a dental professor known to be an expert in the construction of dental plates to see if he could solve this puzzle.

The professor examined his mouth and quizzed the man about his dental hygiene and diet. "There must be something very acidic that you eat a lot of." The dentist said.

"To tell the truth," the man replied, "My wife makes the absolute best hollandaise sauce in the world. I put it on everything."

"Aha!" The professor exclaims. "Have your dentist make you a new plate out of chrome and you shouldn't have any more problems!"

"Chrome?" The patent asks. "Why chrome?"

"Because," the dentist replies, "There's no plate like chrome for the hollandaise!"


***
Why was 6 afraid of 7?
Since seven was a child, he has always been a prime number. He excelled at everything he did, but he was kind of odd. Seven was very vengeful and quick to anger. Even though he was popular and well praised, he couldn't stand the sight of six, who was well rounded and has a good circle of tight friends.

When prom came, seven was alone and bitter. Of all his achievements, not one helped him land a date. Then six came in with his +1. Filled to the brim with jealousy, seven spread rumors that 6 and 9 were performing unspeakable acts. Six was alone again.

While walking to class, six saw seven with six's former +1 and averted his eyes. As they passed by eachother, seven whispered into six's ear "now, we're even".

***
Obama, Putin and Merkel at the baltic sea
Obama declares: Our submarines can stay submerged for ten days before needing air. 

Putin promptly says: That's nothing. Russian submarines can stay submerged for up to a month. 

Merkel is embarrassed and stays silent. 

Suddenly a submarine emerges. The hatch opens and the man yells: Heil Hitler! Is the war over?
***
A woman wakes up in a hospital bed to find that she's been in a coma after a car accident.
She sees a doctor next to her and quickly asks, "Where's my son? He's really good at soccer and has a long career ahead of him." 

The doctor replies, "I'm so sorry- in the accident he lost his leg. He will not be able to kick a soccer ball any more."

Getting anxious, the woman asks about her daughter. "Doctor, where is my daughter? She's a tennis prodigy, and will likely win the US Open one day!"

The doctor says, "Sorry, but in the accident she lost her arm and will not be able to pick up a racket ever again."

The woman begins to cry.

"Doctor, how long have I been in this coma?"

"About a month," he replies.

"So what's the date?" asks the woman.

"April 1st," the doctor says, grinning.

The woman begins to laugh. "Ha, so you were joking all along, weren't you?"

Chuckling, the doctor says, "Yep! They both died on impact!"
***
Son : "Daddy, I fell in love & want to date this awesome girl!"
Father : "That's great son. Who is she?"

Son: "It's Tina, the neighbor's daughter".

Father : "Ohhh I wish you hadn't said that.I have to tell u something son, but you
must promise not to tell your mother.Tina is actually your sister."

The boy is naturally bummed out, but a couple of months later

Son : "Daddy, I fell in love again and she is even hotter!"

Father : "That's great son. Who is she?"

Son: "It's Peny, the other neighbor's daughter."

Father : "Ohhhh I wish you hadn't said that. Peny is also your sister."

This went on couple of times and the son was so mad,he went straight to his mother
crying.

Son : "Mum I am so mad at dad ! I fell in love with six girls but I can't date any of them because daddy is their father!"

The mother hugs him affectionately and says:

"My love, you can date whoever you want. Don't listen to him. He is not your
Father."!!!

***
There was a couple that was married 50 years
They were sitting at the breakfast table one morning when the man said to his wife, 

"Just think, honey, we've been married for 50 years."

"Yeah," she replied, "Just think, fifty years ago we were sitting here at this breakfast table together." 

"I know," the man said, "We were probably sitting here naked as jaybirds fifty years ago." 

"Well," she snickered, "What do you
say...should we get naked?" 

Where upon the two stripped to the buff and sat down at the table. 

"You know, honey," the lady breathlessly replied, "My nipples are as hot for you today as they were fifty years ago."

"I wouldn't be surprised," replied Gramps. "One's in your coffee and the other is in your oatmeal!"
***
A city boy was getting ready to move to the country...
He went a local horse breeder and bought a fine looking horse for a $1000 and told the man he'd be back in a week when he moved in to pick it up.

A week later the city boy drives his brand new truck and horse trailer to the breeder's ranch to pick up the horse.

The rancher says, "Sorry mister, the horse you bought died just yesterday."

The city man thinks about this for a moment and says, "Okay, load it up in the trailer."

"The dead horse?" the rancher asks.  "Yep" says the city man.

A month later the rancher sees the city man at the local feed mart and says, "Say, what did you do with that dead horse?".

"I auctioned it off for $5 a ticket.  I sold 500 tickets and made $2500 and bought myself an even better horse!" says the man.  The rancher says "But what did you do after the drawing?"

"Well, I told the winner that the horse had died and I gave him his $5 back."
***
A man walks into a bar and orders three drinks.
The barman serves him and then watches as the man alternates between each drink until all three are empty.

"Why do you drink them in that fashion?" asks the barman.

The man replies "I have two brothers, and they've both recently moved away. One is in Portugal, and the other is in Peru. But we've decided that we should still all drink together once a week, so right now my brothers are doing the exact same thing."

The barman, thinking it a wonderful idea, happily prepares the three drinks week in week out.

Then, one day, the man walks in, picks up two of the drinks, walks slowly to his table, and starts drinking.

The barman instantly knows exactly what this means and approaches the man's table and says "I'm terribly sorry for your loss."

The man replies "Don't worry, my brothers are fine. I just decided to quit drinking."
***
Two Muslim families move from Afghanistan to the US....
The fathers in each family make a bet to see who could be more Americanized after one year.

They meet a year later and the first father says,  "I just took my son to baseball practice, had McDonalds for breakfast and I've racked up more debt than I'll ever be able to pay off."

The second father says, "fuck you, raghead".
***
A mother takes her three son’s to enroll in school. The teacher asks.
A mother takes her three son’s to enroll in school. The teacher asks.

Teacher: What are your son’s names?

Lady: This boy’s name is Leroy, this other boy’s name is Leroy, and Leroy here is my third son’s name.

Teacher: Isn’t it confusing having all three boy’s named the same?

Lady: Oh no, you see when it’s time for lunch I just holler out the door, Leroy! it’s time for lunch, and they all come a runnin. When it’s time for dinner I just holler out the door, Leroy! it’s time for dinner and they all come a runnin.

Teacher: Ok, so what do you do when you want a specific boy?

Lady: Oh, well then I just holler out their last name.
***
A Man Escapes From Prison
A man escapes from prison where he has been for 15 years. He breaks into a house to look for money and guns and finds a young couple in bed. 

He orders the guy out of bed and ties him to a chair, while tying the girl to the bed he gets on top of her, kisses her neck, then gets up and goes into the bathroom. While he's in there, the husband tells his wife:

"Listen, this guy's an escaped convict, look at his clothes! He probably spent lots of time in jail and hasn't seen a woman in years. I saw how he kissed your neck." If he wants sex, don't resist, don't complain, do whatever he tells you. Satisfy him no matter how much he nauseates you. This guy is probably very dangerous. If he gets angry, he'll kill us. Be strong, honey. I love you."

To which his wife responds: "He wasn't kissing my neck. He was whispering in my ear. He told me he was gay, thought you were cute, and asked me if we had any vaseline. I told him it was in the bathroom. Be strong honey. I love you too!!"
***
A car with three physicists is pulled over by a cop.
Inside are Heisenberg, Schrödinger and Ohm.

The cop asks Heisenberg "Do you know how fast you were going?"

Heisenberg replies, "No, but we know exactly where we are!"

The officer looks at him confused and says "you were going 110 miles per hour!"

Heisenberg throws his arms up and says, "Great! Now we're lost!"

The officer looks over the car and asks Schrödinger if the three men have anything in the trunk.

"A cat", Schrödinger replies.

The cop opens the trunk and yells "Hey! This cat is dead."

Schrödinger angrily replies, "Well he is now."

The cop proceeds to arrest the three.

Ohm resists and gets tased.
***
A man is driving through the desert when he notices a sign.
The sign reads "Turn here to speak to the native American with the most incredible memory"

Curious, the man takes the turning. He comes across the native American man standing at the side of the road.

He approaches him and gives his best "How!"

The native American replies "How!"

"Is your memory really as good as the sign suggests?" asks the man.

"Try me" replies the native American.

"Okay, what did you have for breakfast on July 18th 1986?"

The native American thinks for a moment and then replies, "Eggs."

Amazed, the man thanks the native American and gets back in his car and continues his journey.

15 years later, he is travelling through the same desert and notices the same sign. Having forgotten all about the native American until seeing the sign, he decides to go ask another question.

Upon reaching the native American, he again gives his best "How!"

"Scrambled"
***
My Son Has Gonorrhoea
'Doc, I think my son has gonorrhea,' a patient told his urologist on the phone. 'The only woman he's screwed is our maid.'

'Ok, don't be hard on him. He's just a kid,' the medic soothed. 'Get him in here right away and I'll take care of him.'

'But, Doc. I've been screwing the maid too and I've got the same symptoms he has.'

'Then you come in with him and I'll fix you both up.' Replied the doctor. 'Well,' the man admitted, ' I think my wife now has it too.'

'Son of a bitch!' the physician roared. 'That means we've all got it!'
***
The young bride approached her awaiting husband on their wedding night and demanded $20 for their first love-making encounter...
The young bride approached her awaiting husband on their wedding night and demanded $20 for their first love-making encounter.
  
In his highly aroused state, he readily agreed.

This scenario was repeated each time they made love for the next 30 years, him thinking it was a cute way for her to buy new clothes, etc. 

Arriving home around noon one day, she found her husband in a very drunken state.

Over the next few minutes she heard of the ravages of financial ruin caused by corporate down sizing and it's effects on a 50 year old executive. 

Calmly, she handed him a bank book showing deposits and interest for 12 years totaling nearly $1 million dollars.

Pointing across the parking lot she gestured toward the local bank while handing him stock certificates worth nearly $2 million dollars and informing him that he was the largest stockholder in the bank.

She told him that for 30 years she had charged him each time they had sex, and this was the result of her investments. 

By now he was distraught and beating his head against the side of the car.  

She asked him why the disappointment at such good news and he replied, "If I had known what you were doing, I would have given you all of my business!"
***
A young man visits his girlfriend's parents for the first time...
He and his girlfriend's father are sitting in the living room while the girls make dinner. At the foot of the boyfriend's chair lies the family dog, Rover. After a few minutes, the young man feels the uge to fart. Unable to hold it in, he attempts to let it out silently, but it comes out audible. 

"Rover!" Yells the father.

Feeling relieved the dog was blamed, the young man let's another rip, this time a bit louder.

"ROVER!" Yells the father again.

Feeling one last wave of gas, the boyfriend let's out a nasty, wet, stinker.

"ROVER, GET OUTTA THERE BEFORE HE SHITS ALL OVER YOU! "
***
Donald Trump is flying over New York City
He looks out of the window and says to his family, "You know what, I'm gonna throw ten $100 bills out of the window and make ten people very happy!"

His son looks at him and says, "Dad, why don't you throw two hundred $5 bills out of the window? Then you can make two hundred people happy."

Donald says, "Son, that's a great idea!"

His wife turns to him and says, "Donald, why not throw one thousand $1 bills out the window? You could make one thousand people happy!"

Donald looks at her and says, "Babe, that is a fantastic idea! The best I've heard!"

The pilot turns and looks at Trump and says, "As long as you're at it, why don't you throw yourself out of the window and make millions of people happy?"
***
A man gets drunk...
and stumbles straight into a baptism being performed on the river bank.

The priest asks the man, 'Are you ready to find Jesus?'

The drunk agrees, and the priest dunks him into the water. The drunk is gasping for air.

'Have you found Jesus, Brother?'

'No mate, I haven't'

The priest dunks him in again and pulls him back out. The drunk thrashes around for a bit.

'Now have you found Jesus?'

'Nah bro, I haven't.'

The priest rolls his eyes and dunks the drunk one more time, and pulls him back up violently.

'HAVE YOU FOUND JESUS YET?'

The drunk, near suffocation, replies, 'Are you sure this is where he fell in?'
***
Two statues (one nude male, one nude female) sit beside each other at the entrance of Central Park…
One day, very early in the morning, an angel comes down from heaven. He looks the statues up and down, and with a flick of his wrist, *POOF!* he turns the statues into real people.

The man and woman stare at each other in amazement, but their attention soon turns to the angel, who's quite satisfied with himself, grinning from ear to ear.

He says to the couple, "You guys have been staring at each other while locked in stone for the last 100 years, completely unable to do a thing about your urges for each other." He pauses, and then adds: "It's still pretty early, and people don't usually get to the park for another 30 minutes. You two should go into that covered area and…well, just have a good time."

The man caught the eye of the woman, who had a twinkle in her eye and wore a mischievous grin. She bit her lip seductively, and with that the man grabbed her hand and the two ran off to the bushes.

The angel then found himself privy to giggles, laughter, rustling, and squeals of delight. Fifteen minutes later, the couple emerged from the bushes hand-in-hand, out of breath and faces flush.

The angel glanced at his watch. "You still have fifteen minutes, you know. You can have another round if you'd like!"

The woman turned excitedly to the man and exclaimed, "Ok! But this time, *you* have to hold the pigeon while *I* get to shit on its head!!"
***
The world's toughest cowboy.
Three cowboys are sitting around a campfire, out on the lonesome prairie, each with the bravado for which cowboys are famous. 

A night of tall tales commences. 

The first says, "I must be the meanest, toughest cowboy there is. Why, just the other day, a bull got loose in the corral and gored six men before I wrestled it to the ground, by the horns, with my bare hands." 

The second chimes in, "Why that's nothing. I was walking down the trail yesterday and a fifteen foot rattler slid out from under a rock and made a move for me. I grabbed that snake with my bare hands, bit its head off, and sucked the poison down in one gulp. And I'm still here today." 

The third cowboy remained silent, slowly stirring the coals with his penis.
***
Two Jewish friends pass a Catholic Church.
Two Jewish friends pass a Catholic Church on which a large poster addresses non-Catholics: "Come to us, accept Catholicism, and you instantly get $30,000 in cash!" While walking away, the two friends become engaged in a debate about whether the offer is meant seriously. A week later the two friends meet again in front of the same church, and one of them confides to the other: "I still wonder if that offer is serious." the other replies condescendingly: "Ah you Jews, all you think about is money!"
***
Man's best friend...
A man has a dog that snores in his sleep. 

Annoyed, because she can't sleep, his wife goes to the vet to see if he can help. 

The vet tells the woman to tie a ribbon around the dog's testicles and he will stop snoring.

A few hours after going to bed, the dog is snoring as usual.
 
Finally, unable to sleep, she goes to the closet and grabs a piece of ribbon and ties it around the dog's testicles, and sure enough, the dog stops snoring. 

The woman is amazed!

Later that night, her husband returns home drunk from being out with his buddies. 

He climbs into bed, falls asleep, and begins snoring very loudly. 

The woman thinks maybe the ribbon will work on him. 

So she goes to the closet again, grabs a piece of ribbon, and ties it around her husband's testicles. 

Amazingly, it also works on him!

The woman sleeps very soundly.

The next morning, the husband wakes up very hung over.

He tumbles into the bathroom to urinate. 

As he is standing in front of the toilet, he looks in the mirror and sees a blue ribbon attached to his privates.

He is very confused, and, as he walks back into the bedroom, he notices a red ribbon attached to his dog's testicles.

He shakes his head, looks down at the dog and says: "Boy, don't remember where we were or what we did, but, by God, we got first and second place!"



***
Oversmart
A famous art collector is walking through Greenwich Village when he notices a mangy old cat lapping milk from a saucer in front of a store. And the collector does a double take when he sees the saucer. He knows it's very old and very valuable. 

So he saunters casually into the store and offers to buy the cat for two dollars.

But the store owner says to him, 'I'm sorry, but the cat isn't for sale.'

And the collector says, 'Please. I need a hungry old tomcat around the house to catch mice. I'll give you ten dollars for him.'

And the owner says, 'Sold,' and takes the ten dollars.

Then the collector says, 'Listen, I was wondering if, for the ten dollars, you might include that old saucer. The cat seems to be used to it. It'll save me a dish.'
And the owner says, 'Sorry, buddy. That's my lucky saucer. So far this week, I've sold sixty-eight cats!'
***
A Priest and a Nun go golfing...
The priest lines up his shot, adjusts his lucky cap, takes a deep breath, and swings! And misses. 

"Fuck!" he shouts.

The nun is scandalized and warns the priest-'Father! Watch your language!'
The priest apologizes and decides to move onto the next hole.

He lines up his shot, adjusts his lucky cap, takes a deep breath, and...swings! This time the ball falls into a lake.  

He throws his club down, screaming 'Fuck!'

The nun admonishes him, 'Father-you had better watch your language, or the Lord may strike you down!' 

Again the priest apologizes and decides to move onto the next hole.

The priest lines up his shot, he adjusts his lucky cap and focuses intently on the ball. He takes a deep breath. He swings! And misses again!

'FUCK FUCK FUCK!' he screams.

The sky darkens as billowy storm clouds rush in. Suddenly, BOOM, a bolt of lightning strikes the green! 

The nun lies dead as a doornail as the priest gawks to the side.

A rumbling voice from the heavens speaks:

"FUCK."


Edit: slightly modified wording as per /u/LanAlMadragoran's suggestion
***
What's the difference between Mick Jagger and a Scottish Highlander?
Mick Jagger sings, "Hey you, get off of my cloud . . ", while the Scottish Highlander yells, "Hey McCloud, get off of my ewe!"
***
Confession...
An elderly Italian man, who lived on the outskirts of Rimini Italy, went to the local church for confession. When the priest slid open the panel in the confessional, the man said, "Father, during World War II, a beautiful Jewish woman from our neighborhood knocked urgently on my door and asked me to hide her from the Nazis. So I hid her in my attic."

 The priest replied, "That was a wonderful thing you did, and you have no need to confess that."

 "There is more to tell, Father... she started to repay me with sexual favors. This happened several times a week, and sometimes twice on Sundays."

 The priest said, "That was a long time ago and by doing what you did, you placed the two of you in great danger, but two people under those circumstances can succumb to the weakness of the flesh. However, if you are truly sorry for your actions, you are indeed forgiven."

 "Thank you, Father. That’s a great load off my mind. I do have one more question."

 And what is that?" asked the priest.

 "Should I tell her the war is over?"
***
Heaven is full
One day God approaches St. Peter:

"Peter!"

"Almighty father, what can I do for you?"

"Heaven is getting crowded, I need to buy some time while I expand."

"What would you have me do?"

"Only allow those who died truly horrible deaths in, until I tell you otherwise."

"Yes father."

Shortly after the first man arrives at Heaven's Gate.

"To pass, you must tell me about your death."

"Okay.  So I was like 100% sure my wife was cheating on me while I was at work.  So I decided to go home for lunch, which I never do, and sure as shit there she is naked in bed.  She had clearly been busy getting fucked, so I began searching for the guy.  I cant find him anywhere though, and we live on the tenth story so the only way in or out was through our front door.  I knew he had to be somewhere in the apartment, and I finally found him hanging from my balcony; naked!  I didn't even give him a chance to speak, I stomped on his hands till he fell.  Can you believe this asshole survived!  The bushes broke his fall.  So I push my refrigerator onto the balcony, and flip it over the edge.  As it was going over the power cord caught my foot and pulled me with it.  I hit the pavement,  and now I'm here."

"Oh my, that is horrible.  Please come in."

Just then, a second man arrives.

"To pass, you must tell me about your death."

"Well, I lived in an eleventh story apartment.  I loved the view from my balcony, and I would often workout in the nude there.  I tripped over one of my weights and was flung over the railing, though I managed to grab hold of the balcony below.  Then the guy who lives there comes out just screaming at me, something about fucking his wife whom I've never even met.  Before I can explain, he stomps on my hands until I fall.  Somehow the bushes broke my fall, but then this asshole literally throws his refrigerator off the balcony at me.  At least I got to see that it pulled him over with it, hope he missed the bushes.  Anyways the fridge landed on me and now here I am."

"Oh dear, I see.  Well that is just awful.  Welcome."

The third arrival is now walking up to the gate.

"To pass, you must tell me about your death."

"Hahaha.. okay.  So get this, I'm hiding in this refrigerator..."

***
A man was having some stomach pains, so he went to see his doctor..
The doctor looked him over and declared, *"Sir, you have a tapeworm. Please come back in three days, and bring...a BANANA."*



The man is confused, but he trusts the doctor so he returns in three days with
a banana. The doctor tells the man to take off his pants and bend over,
whereupon the doctor...introduces the banana into the man's system. The
man is shocked.

The doctor says, *"Excellent job. Now please come back in three days with
another banana."* 

The man trusts his doctor, so in three days he returns with
another banana. 

The doctor again asks the man to remove his pants and again he introduces
the banana...into the man's system. The man is extremely confused, but his
stomach pains aren't as bad anymore so he will continue to follow his doctors
orders.

The doctor says, *"Great job. Now please come back in three days with..a
HAMMER."*

The man returns with a hammer three days later. He is extremely confused,
but upon seeing the doctor he receives his instructions. 

*"Please take off your pants and lie on your side on the examination table,"* says the doctor. 

The man lays there for a few minutes with his rear end bare. The doctor breathlessly
grips the hammer and waits. The tapeworm pops out of the man's butthole, looks at the doctor and says, *"Hey where the fuck is my banana?"*

BAMBAMBAMBAMBAMBAMBAM
***
Priest and Rabbi
A priest and a rabbi were having lunch and the priest asked, "Have you ever strayed from not eating pork?" The rabbi said, "Well, once, but there was absolutely nothing else to eat, so I had a ham sandwich."

Then the rabbi asked the priest, "Did you ever stray from your vow of celibacy?" The priest said, "Yes, just once."

And the rabbi said, "Sure beats a ham sandwich, doesn't it?"
***
Liam Neeson struggles with being unappreciated after saving his family.
Taken 4: Granted

EDIT: To the people who think I "stole" this joke for "internet points" despite this being a self-post... http://i.imgur.com/hrZyIyv.jpg
***
Found this one on Wikipedia of all places
Two young women are drinking tea together. Suddenly, the doorbell rings. One of the women opens the door and finds a courier with a big great bouquet of roses. She walks inside and reads to her friend: *"Much love from your boyfriend!"* She immediately groans out: *"You know what this'll mean? This'll mean I'll be lying on my back with my legs spread wide open for the next two weeks!"* To which her friend says, *"Don't you have a vase?"*
***
A Winking Salesman!
A man with a winking problem applies for a position as a traveling salesman and goes in for an interview.

 "Looking at your resume, I can see that you're more than qualified", says the interviewer. "Unfortunately, we can't have our sales reps constantly winking at customers, so we can't hire you", adds the interviewer.

 "But wait", says the man. "If I take two aspirin, I stop winking".

 "Then show me", replies the interviewer.

 So the guy reaches into his pants pocket and pulls out a pile of condoms in all different shapes, sizes, and colours before finally finding a packet of aspirin. He pops the pills and immediately stops winking.

 "It's great. You stopped winking", says the interviewer, "but we can't have our salesmen womanizing all over the country".

 "What do you mean?", asks the man. "I'm happily married".

 "How do you explain all the condoms?" asks the interviewer.

 "Oh, that", sighs the man. "Have you ever walked into a pharmacy, winking, and asked for aspirin?" 
***
An Australian bin man knocks at the door of a Chinese guy
And asks 'where's ya bin mate' 
The guy answers 'I bin watching TV!' 
The Ozzie asks 'na mate where's ya wheelie bin' 
The guy hangs his head and says 'I wheelie been wanking'
***
A billionaire throws a party for the whole town....
 A billionaire throws a party for the whole town. He has everything a billionaire could possibly have including: tennis courts, go cart track, mini-golf, private airplane, and a huge mansion.  The main attraction however is the biggest swimming pool you've ever seen, and inside that pool, the worlds biggest alligator. 


At the end of the party he makes a announcement, 'Before everyone leaves Id like to make a challenge, Whoever can swim across my swimming pool without getting eaten by the alligator can have one of three things. (1. A billion dollars) (2. Half my estate) (or 3. My daughters hand in marriage). No one however has the guts to do so and the party ends and everyone goes home.


 The very next year he throws another party's just like the first and at the very end he challenges someone to the same challenge as before. However no one has the guts the 2nd year either and everyone leaves.


 The third year comes and he decides to throw one more party, and at the end of the party he gives his challenge one more time. Just as he is finishing saying what he will give the lucky guy who can swim across, He hears a splash of someone jumping in. He looks over to see this guy swimming as fast as he possibly can across the pool with the alligator chasing after him. Everyone in town is cheering him on as the alligator is snapping it's jaw at his feet. The man reaches the end of the pool and 3 men pull him up as the alligator snaps his shoe off.


 The billionaire rushes over and he exclaims, 'THAT WAS THE BRAVESET THING I HAVE EVER SEEN IN MY LIFE!!! Which choice do you want out of the three?!?! The man is breathing so heavily he can't speak. The bilionare asks, 'Do you want a billion dollars?' The man replies with heavy breathing 'No no No'. The billionaire responds with 'You're a smart man you must want half my estate'. The man replies with heavy breathing still 'No No gasp No'. The billionaire goes 'Ok you are even smarter than I thought. You may have my daughters hand in marriage.' The man replies still breathing heavily 'No No I don't want your daughter'. The billionaire now confused asks 'Than what do you possibly want?!?!?!' The man replies back with, 'I, I just want the na, name of the gu, guy who pushed me in.
***
Baseball in Heaven
Moe and Sam, who were both 90 years old, loved baseball, and they had their entire life. One day, they were sitting together on a bench in their neighborhood when Moe turns to Sam and says:

 "Will you promise me something? Promise me that if you die first and go to heaven, you'll come back and tell if there's baseball there."

 Sam agreed, and made Moe promise the same. 3 months later, Sam died, and the next week Moe woke up in his sleep with someone calling his name.

 "Who's there?" he called out. 

"Moe! It's me Sam!"

"Sam! It's so good to hear you! How's heaven?" Moe asked. 

"It's great, but I've some news, some good and some bad" Sam told him. 

"Well tell me the good news first" Moe replied. 

"Ok, the good news is that, there is baseball in heaven."

"That's great." Moe exclaimed, "What's the bad news?"

"Well, the bad news is that I was reading the lineup, and you're pitching on Friday."
***
The Queen and the Metal Panties
One day the king had to go for a year long expedition, and knew his queen was going to have sex with everyone through the county, so he turned to his court magistrate for help.

The court magistrate showed the king a pair of metal panties, with a hole in the middle.

"Why, doesn't that just defeat the whole purpose?" asked the King, and the magistrate promptly picked a pencil off his desk and inserted it into the hole.

"SNAP!", the pencil had cleanly sliced into two! "Anything that enters the hole will be sliced off, sire", said the magistrate.

Thoroughly impressed, the King instructed the Queen to wear it for the entire year and left for his expedition. Upon his return, the King called for a meeting of all his country folk.

They were all instructed to drop their pants, and the King made his rounds noticing that many were missing fingers as well as their most vital part. Then, he saw the quiet knight Sir Xavier, fingers and all still intact.

"Xavier, the one and only true knight! Only you among all the nobles have been true to me. What is it in my power to grant you? Name it and it is yours!"

But alas, Sir Xavier was speechless.

**EDIT:** obligiTory edit, thAnks for the front paGe, guys! I aPpreciate it. It's so cRazy hOw I could make the front page. thanks again!
***
A blonde teenager, wanting to earn some extra money for the summer, decided to hire herself out as a "handy-woman"


She started  canvassing a nearby well-to-do neighborhood. She went to the front door of the  first house, and asked the owner if he had any odd jobs for her to  do.

"Well, I guess I  could use somebody to paint my porch," he said, "How much will you charge  me?"

Delighted, the  girl quickly responded, "How about $50?"

The man agreed and told her that the paint brushes and everything she would need was in the garage.

The man's wife, hearing the conversation said to her husband, "Does she realize that our porch  goes ALL the way around the house?"

He responded, "That's a bit cynical, isn't it?"

The wife replied, "You're right. I guess I'm starting to believe all those dumb blonde jokes we've been getting by email lately."

Later that day, the blonde teenager came to the door to collect her money.
"You're finished  already?" the startled husband asked.

"Yes, she replied, and I even had paint left over, so I gave it two coats." 

Impressed, the man reached into his pocket for the $50.00 and handed it to her along with a $10.00 tip.

“And, by the way," the teenager added, "it's not a Porch, it's a Lexus."
***
Three men, a philosopher, a mathematician and an idiot.
Three men, a philosopher, a mathematician and an idiot, were out riding in the car when it crashed into a tree. Before anyone knows it, the three men found themselves standing before the pearly gates of Heaven, where St. Peter and the Devil were standing nearby. "Gentlemen," the Devil started, "Due to the fact that Heaven is now overcrowded, St. Peter has agreed to limit the number of people entering Heaven. If anyone of you can ask me a question which I don't know or cannot answer, then you're worthy enough to go to Heaven; if not, then you'll come with me to Hell." 

 The philosopher then stepped up, "OK, give me the most comprehensive report on Socrates' teachings." With a snap of his finger, a stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. The philosopher read it and concluded it was correct. "Then, go to Hell!" With another snap of his finger, the philosopher disappeared.

 The mathematician then asked, "Give me the most complicated formula ever theorized!" With a snap of his finger, another stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. The mathematician read it and reluctantly agreed it was correct. "Then, go to Hell!" With another snap of his finger, the mathematician disappeared too. 

 The idiot then stepped forward and said, "Bring me a chair!" The Devil brought forward a chair. "Drill 7 holes on the seat." The Devil did just that. The idiot then sat on the chair and let out a very loud fart. Standing up, he asked, "Which hole did my fart come out from?" The Devil inspected the seat and said, "The third hole from the right." "Wrong," said the idiot, "it's from my asshole." And the idiot went to heaven. 
***
Tech Joke: Changing a light bulb
A window user, a Linux user and an apple user all need to change a lightbulb in their respective homes. They split up and the windows and apple user meet back up 5 minutes later

Windows User: Did you get it fixed?

Apple user: No, it can't be cganged so I need to find a new house; how about you?

Windows User: Yeah I changed it, but now the toilet won't flush.

After some time the two become worried because the Linux user hasn't come back yet. They go to his apartment and find him sitting in the middle of the floor with a set of instructions and a box of parts. The Windows user asks what he's doing to which he replies "what does it look like? This lightbulb isn't going to build itself"

***
A man goes into a restaurant with an ostrich
They sit down and order:

'I'd like a hamburger, fries and a Coke,' says the man, then turns towards the ostrich. 'And you?'

'The same', says the ostrich.

A few minutes later, the waitress brings the food and the bill.

'$6.40,' she says.

The man takes out the exact amount from his pocket without even counting the money and hands it to the waitress.

The next day, the man and the ostrich come again, ask for the same food and the man pays with the exact amount. And the same routine takes place for the next couple of days. On a Friday night, the man and the ostrich turn up again.

'The usual?' asks the waitress.

'No, today's Friday, I'd like a steak and some crushed potatoes,' says the man, then he turns towards the ostrich. 'And you?'

'The same,' replies the bird.

After a few minutes, the waitress comes back with the order and the bill.

'$32.50'

The man, yet again, takes out the exact amount of money without counting it. The waitress can't help herself at this point and asks:

'Excuse me sir, but please tell me... how come you always have the exact amount?'

'Years ago, I cleaned up my attic and found an old lamp. I rubbed it and a genie appeared. He promised me two wishes. My first wish was to have the exact amount of money in my pockets whenever I had to pay for something.'

'That's brilliant!' says the waitress. 'Others would've asked for a million dollars, but you'll stay rich till the end of your life.'

'Indeed,' nods the man. 'It doesn't matter whether I want to buy a bottle of beer or a Rolls Royce, the money will always be there when I need it.'

'Can I also ask why this ostrich is always with you?'

'Well, my second wish was to get a very tall chick with nice strong legs who agrees with everything I say...'
***
A lawyer and the pope die at the same time and go to heaven...
The pope is first and meets St. Peter at the gates to heaven. St. Peter says welcome to heaven and gives him a nice little plot of land with a decent sized house. The lawyer is next and St. Peter directs him to this huge mansion on the shore of a beautiful lake with anything the lawyer could want. The lawyer asks St. Peter "Why do I get this mansion with anything I could ask for and the holiest man on earth gets a small house?"
St. Peter replies by saying "We've got hundreds of popes up here, but you're the only lawyer!"
***
There were 3 men...
There were 3 men and they all died in a car crash and went to hell. When they got there the devil asked them all in turn a question.To he first he said “what was your biggest sin on earth?” and the man replied “Oh man I just love alcohol and being drunk man” so the devil showed the man to a room full of alcohol of every type and description and he put the man inside and said “see you in 100 years” and locked the door.To the second man he asked the same question and the man replied “oh man I just love to have sex with the ladies, I was really unfaithful to my wife man”. So the devil took the man and showed him to a room full of hundreds upon thousands of gorgeous and beautiful naked women. The man ran inside and the devil said “see you in 100 years” and locked the door.The third man’s answer to the question was “oh man I just LOVE weed! I’m high all the time man and I can’t live without it!”. The devil showed the man to a room packed with the most amazing grade-A bud you’ve ever seen, stacked to the roof! The man went inside and the devil locked the door after saying “see you in 100 years”.100 years later the devil came by to let the three men out. He opened the door to the first man’s room and found the man collapsed on the ground, passed out with empty bottles laying around him and puke all over him. He was a mess.The devil opened the 2nd man’s door and the man came running out of the room and cried “IM GAY! IM GAY!”. Finally the devil came to the third man’s room and opened the door. Sitting in the middle of all the bud, in the exact same position the devil had left him in was the man. He looked up at the devil and with a single tear rolling down his cheek he asked ; “hey man, got a light?”
***
Bill Gates in an airport lounge
I was in the VIP lounge last week en route to Seattle. Whilst in the lounge, I noticed Bill Gates sitting on the chesterfield enjoying a cognac. 

I was meeting a very important client who was also flying to Seattle with me but she was running a bit late. Being a forward type of guy, I approached Mr. Gates and introduced myself. I explained to him that I was conducting some very important business and how I would appreciate it if he could throw a quick "Hello Chris" at me when I was with my client. 

He agreed. Ten minutes later while I was conversing with my client, I felt a tap on my shoulder. It was Bill Gates. I turned around and looked up at him. He said, "Hi Chris, what's happening?" To which I replied:

"Fuck off Gates, I'm in a meeting." 
***
A couple goes to a sex therapist..
A couple, both age 78, went to a sex therapist's office. The doctor asked, "What can I do for you?"

The man said, "Will you watch us have sex?"

The doctor looked puzzled, but agreed.

When the couple finished, the doctor said, "There's nothing wrong with the way you have sex," and charged them $50.

This happened several weeks in a row. The couple would make an appointment, have sex with no problems, pay the doctor, then leave.

Finally, the doctor asked, "Just exactly what are you trying to find out?"

"We're not trying to find out anything," the husband replied.
"She's married and we can't go to her house. I'm married and we can't go to my house. The Holiday Inn charges $90. The Hilton charges $108. We do it here for $50...and I get $43 back from Medicare
***
A guy is walking by a gym, when he notices a sign out front that reads "Lose 5 Pounds in 10 Minutes Guaranteed!"
Curious, he enters the gym.  He asks about the sign and the clerk tells him it's legit, but it costs $100.  The clerk also tells him that if he doesn't lose 5 pounds, he gets his money back.

The guy shrugs and lays $100 on the counter.  He is led to a large, empty room covered in floor mats.  A beautiful 20-year-old woman enters the room on the other side, wearing a shirt that says "If you catch me, you can fuck me."  She smiles, waves, and winks at him.

He begins chasing her around the large room, but she is in great shape and he doesn't come close.  After ten minutes, he is a panting, sweating mess, and she yells "Better luck next time!" before disappearing out the door.  Pissed off, he walks over to a scale and sees that, sure enough, he lost five pounds.  He figures the money was worth it, since he lost five pounds.

The next day, he's walking by the gym when he notices a new sign: "Lose 10 pounds in 10 Minutes Guaranteed!"  Even more curious, he enters the gym and plops down another $100 on the counter.

He is led to an even larger, empty room covered in mats.  The door on the other side of the room opens, and a large, athletic man walks in.  His shirt reads "If I catch you, *I* fuck *you*!"
***
A Brazilian friend told me this joke yesterday
The United Nations decided to conduct a world-wide survey. So they sent a letter to the representatives of each country with the following question: "Please, with all honesty, give your opinion on the scarcity of food in the rest of the world".


The survey was a huge failure. Why? None of the European countries knew the meaning of "scarcity". The African nations did not know what "food" was. The Cubans were puzzled and asked for elaboration on the meaning of "opinion".


The Argentinians were not familiar with the word "please". The North Americans had no idea what was the so called "rest of the world". And the Brazilian congress is, to this day, debating what exactly is "honesty".
***
10 Husbands, Still a Virgin.
A lawyer married a woman who had previously divorced ten husbands. 

On their wedding night, she told her new husband, "Please be gentle, I'm still a virgin." 

"What?" said the puzzled groom. 

"How can that be if you've been married ten times?" 

"Well, Husband #1 was a sales representative: he kept telling me how great it was going to be. 

Husband #2 was in software services: he was never really sure how it was supposed to function, but he said he'd look into it and get back to me. 

Husband #3 was from field services: he said everything checked out diagnostically but he just couldn't get the system up. 

Husband #4 was in telemarketing: even though he knew he had the order, he didn't know when he would be able to deliver. 

Husband #5 was an engineer: he understood the basic process but wanted three years to research, implement, and design a new state-of-the-art method. 

Husband #6 was from finance and administration: he thought he knew how, but he wasn't sure whether it was his job or not. 

Husband #7 was in marketing: although he had a nice product, he was never sure how to position it. 

Husband #8 was a psychologist: all he ever did was talk about it. 

Husband #9 was a gynecologist: all he did was look at it. 

Husband #10 was a stamp collector: all he ever did was... God! I miss him! But now that I've married you, I'm really excited!" 

"Good," said the new husband, "but, why?" 

"You're a lawyer. This time I know I'm gonna get screwed!"
***
Carol, a blonde city girl, marries a Cornish dairy farmer.
One morning, on his way out to check on the cows, farmer John says to Carol, 'The insemination man is coming over to impregnate one of our cows today. I drove a nail into the rail above the cow's stall in the barn.
You show him where the cow is when he gets here, OK?'
So then the farmer leaves for the fields.
After a while, the insemination man arrives and knocks on the front door.
Carol takes him down to the barn. They walk along the row of cows and when she sees the nail, she tells him,
'This is the one...right here.'
Terribly impressed by what he seemed to think just might be another ditzy blonde, the man asks,
'Tell me lady, how did you know this is the cow to be bred?'
'That's simple; by the nail over its stall', Carol explains very confidently.
Then the man asks, 'What's the nail for?'
She turns and starts to walk away and with complete confidence, says over her shoulder, ......'I assume it's to hang your trousers on.'
***
A Sensitive Guy
A woman meets a man in a bar.
 
They talk; they connect; they end up leaving together.
 
They get back to his place, and as he shows her around his apartment, she notices that one wall of his bedroom is completely filled with soft, sweet, cuddly teddy bears.
 
There are three shelves in the bedroom, with hundreds and hundreds of cute, cuddly teddy bears carefully placed in rows, covering the entire wall!
 
It was obvious that he had taken quite some time to lovingly arrange them and she was immediately touched by the amount of thought he had put into organizing the display.
 
There were small bears all along the bottom shelf, medium-sized bears covering the length of the middle shelf, and huge, enormous bears running all the way along the top shelf.
 
She found it strange for an obviously masculine guy to have such a large collection of teddy bears.  She is quite impressed by his sensitive side, but doesn't mention this to him. 
 
They share a bottle of wine and
continue talking and,
 
After awhile, she finds herself
thinking, 
 
'Oh my God! Maybe, this guy
could be the one!
 
'Maybe he could be the future
father of my children?' 
 
She turns to him and kisses him
lightly on the lips.
 
He responds warmly.
 
They continue to kiss, the passion builds.
 
And he romantically lifts her in
his arms and carries her into his bedroom,
 where they rip off each other's
clothes and make hot, steamy love.

She is so overwhelmed that she
responds with more passion,
more creativity, more heat than she has ever known. 
After an intense, explosive night
of raw passion with this sensitive guy,  they are lying there together in the afterglow.
The woman rolls over, gently
strokes his chest and asks coyly, 

'Well, how was it?' 

The guy gently smiles at her, 
strokes her cheek, 
looks deeply into her eyes, 
 
 
 
and says:  
 
'Help yourself to any prize from the middle shelf.'

***
A man sees a dog mauling a small girl...
...and runs over to help. After the girl gets away, a nearby journalist comes to the man and says "That was incredible! Tomorrow, the headlines will read 'Brave New Yorker Saves Girl'", to which the man replies "But I am not a New Yorker." The journalist then says "Then they will read 'Brave American Saves Girs'", and again the man replies "But I am not an American!" The journalist then asks, "Then where are you from?" The man smiles and says "I am an Afghan!"

The next day, the headlines read "Islamic Extremist Murders Innocent American Dog"
***
CHEESEBURGER: $1.50 CHICKEN SANDWICH: $2.50 HAND JOB: $10.00
A guy walks into a pub and sees a sign hanging over the bar that reads: CHEESEBURGER: $1.50 CHICKEN SANDWICH: $2.50 HAND JOB: $10.00 He walks up to the bar and beckons one of the three exceptionally attractive blondes serving drinks.  "Can I help you?" she asks.  "I was wondering," whispers the man. "Are you the one who gives the hand jobs?" "Yes," she purrs. "I am." The man replies, "Well, wash your hands. I want a cheeseburger."
***
A man went to the doctor complaining about erectile dysfunction...
A man went to the doctor and told him that he was having trouble maintaining an erection. After a complete exam the doctor told the man that the muscles around the base of his penis were damaged from a prior viral infection and there was nothing he could do for him.

However, he knew of an experimental treatment that might work, if he were willing to take the risk. The treatment consisted of implanting muscle tissue from an elephant's trunk in the man's penis.

The man thought about it for a while. The thought of going through life without ever experiencing sex again was just too much for him to bear. So, with the assurance that there would be no cruelty or adverse effect on the elephant, the man decided to go for it. A few weeks after the operation, he was given the green light to use his newly renovated equipment.

As a result, he planned a romantic evening with his girlfriend and took her to one of the nicest restaurants in the city. She was leaning over the table in a low cut shirt, and sure enough he began to feel very uncomfortable. To release the pressure, he unzipped his fly. Suddenly his penis emerged from his pants, went to the top of the table, grabbed a roll, and retreated into his pants.

His girlfriend was stunned at first, but then with a sly smile on her face said: "That was incredible. Can you do that again?"

With his eyes watering, he replied: "I think I can, but I'm not sure if I can take another dinner roll in the ass."
***
A pregnant woman hobbles into the hospital with one hand on her back...
A nurse asks her what's wrong, and the pregnant woman screams, "Shouldn't! Wouldn't! Didn't!"

The nurse shakes her head and says, "I'm sorry…I don't understand."

The pregnant woman's face contorts in pain as she shouts, "Can't! Won't! Don't!"

The nurse, bewildered, turns to a doctor.

"Admit her," the doctor said. "She's having contractions."


***
A pastor bikes to his friends house every monday...
One Monday, the Pastor shows up 3 hours later than usual. His friend asks, "Why were you so late today?"
The Pastor replies, "My bike was stolen so I had to walk here."

His friend thinks for a minute and says "I know how you can get your bike back. Next Sunday, preach on the 10 Commandments and when you get to 'Thou Shall Not Steal', look at the congregation for anyone who looks guilty. That's the person who stole your bike"

The following Monday the Pastor shows up at his friends house on his bike. "Good news! I followed your advice and preached on the 10 Commandments," said the Pastor. "But when I got to 'Thou Shall Not Commit Adultery,' I remembered where I left my bike"

***
Chinese Sick Day
Ho Chow calls in to work and say,

"Hey boss, I no come work today, I very sick. Got headache, stomach ache, and legs hurt. I no come work today"

The boss says, "You know something Ho Chow, I really need you today. When I get sick like you do, I go to my wife and ask for sex. That make everything better and I go to work. You try that."

Two hours later ho Chow calls again and says,

"I try what you say and I feel great! I be at work soon. You have really nice house by the way!"
***
Redneck Divorce

A hillbilly walked into an attorney's office wanting to file for divorce.

Attorney: "May I help you?"

Hillbilly: "Yea, I want to get one of those dayvorces".

Attorney: "Well do you have any grounds?"

Hillbilly: "Yea, I got about a hundred acres."

Attorney: "No, you don't understand, do you have a case?"

Hillbilly: "No, I don't have a Case, but I have a John Deere."

Attorney: "I mean, do you have a grudge?"

Hillbilly: "Yea, I got a grudge. That's where I park my John Deere."

Attorney: "No sir, I mean do you have a suit?"

Hillbilly: "Yes sir, I got a suit, I wear it to church on Sundays."

Attorney: "Well sir, does your wife beat you up or anything?"

Hillbilly: "No sir, we both get up about 4:30 in the morning."

Attorney: "Well, is she a nagger or anything?"

Hillbilly: "No she's a little white gal, but our last child was a nagger. That's why I want this dayvorce."
***
An American and a Russian freeze themselves for a 100 years
....taking a bet whose country will be doing better in the future. So they enter the cryo chamber and go to sleep. When they wake up, they buy a newspaper. The Russian takes it and as he reads the headline, he starts smiling. 
"The communist party wins the U.S. Elections for the fifth time in a row" 

Furious, the American grabs the paper and skims through. Suddenly he starts laughing, so the Russian asks "what  could you find? I obviously won!"

The American hands him the paper and points to an article which reads 

"Repeated conflicts on the Chinese-Polish border"
***
A woman is going with her boyfriend to his parents' house...
...to meet and have dinner with them. This is a very important night, and she wants to make a good impression – she even made some bean pies for the occasion, the parents' favorite. 

They get to the house, and are having dinner – so far everything is going just fine. Then…disaster strikes. She knew she should not have had a slice of that bean pie before dinner! Before she can get up to excuse herself, *poot*. She turns white. She is so embarrassed she wants to die. 

Just then, her boyfriend’s father looks down at the dog under the table, which just so happens to be conveniently situated under her feet, and says, “Rosie, get out of here.” Whew! What relief she feels! The dog took the rap. She smiles to herself, and goes back to enjoying her dinner. 

Sometime later, it happens again. *poot* She begins to become embarrassed all over and is relieved to see the dog is still there. The man once again looks down disgustingly at the dog and says, “Rosie, beat it!” This time the woman is absolutely thrilled. She thinks to herself, “If I have to do it again, I will not hesitate.” 

Sure enough, it happens again. Same result. “Rosie, get out from under there!” As the dinner passes, this happens about 4 or 5 more times, and each time the man gets disgusted, and tells the dog to move. 

As the meal comes to an end, and they are all having their bean pie, she gets the biggest urge yet. This one is going to be a monster, she thought. But, seeing as how the dog was still at her feet, and the man had not ceased to blame the dog before, she decides to let it go. *TPPHHTTTOOOOHHHH* She smiles to herself in sweet relief. 

Just then, the man throws down his fork, stands up, again looks at the dog with disgust in his eyes, and says “For God’s sake Rosie, get out from under there before she shits on you!”
***
The efficient restaurant
A man decides to try a newly opened Italian Restaurant. The waiter brings him to a table, gives him a menu and leaves to get him his drink.

The patron notices as the waiter walks away that he has a spoon in his apron. In fact, all the waiters and waitresses have a spoon in their apron pockets. After a few minutes, the waiter returns with his drink and is about to take his order when the man interrupts,

"What's with the spoons you guys carry around in your aprons?"

The waiter replies, 

"Well you see, our restaurant is one of the most efficient restaurants in the state. Statistically, you are ten times more likely to drop your spoon than any other utensil. By carrying one in our apron, we save over 4 hours a week of going to the back for a replacement."

The man, satisfied with the answer, orders a soup and a salad. The waiter returns in no time at all with his soup and salad. As the waiter reaches over to place the food, the man notices something very peculiar. The waiter has a string coming out of his fly. Distracted by this, the man reaches for his spoon only to push it off the table. Statistics prove to be true.

Like a gunslinger, the waiter draws the spare spoon from his hip and gives it to the man. Before he knows it, the waiter is gone.

Halfway through his soup the man gets the waiter's attention after several failed attempts. Discreetly, the man beckons the waiter to come in closer.  The man discreetly alerts the waiter that there is a string stuck in his fly. The waiter then explains,

"Well you see, I have it there intentionally. Us guys, we attach the strings to our... You know... So that when we use the bathroom we can just simply give it a pull and avoid getting our hands dirty. We have saved over 10 hours a week of unnecessary hand washing!"

The man at first satisfied with the answer, puzzlingly asks,

"Okay so I understand how you get it out, but how do you get it back in?"

"I don't know about the other waiters. I use a spoon"
***
Martial arts
The Israelis developed Krav Maga - the art of disabling an opponent as quickly as possible.

The Japanese developed Jujitsu - the art of defeating an armed and armored opponent.

The Brazilians developed Capoeira - the art of defeating an opponent using dance and acrobatics.

The French developed parkour - the art of running away as quickly and efficiently as possible.
***
"So José, how was America?"
"Oh it was wonderful, amigo, those Americans are so kind.  I went to go watch a real American baseball game but the tickets were all sold out.  Feeling bummed out I walked around the side of the stadium when I saw a flag pole right next to the field!  I climbed right up it and could see the whole baseball diamond with the players getting ready for the game."   
   
"You had to watch from a flag pole?  I thought you said the Americans were nice."   

"Oh they are amigo!  Before the game began every American stood up, looked right at me, and hollered, "José, can you see?" 
***
A guy is doing 90 in a 75 and sees lights from a patrol car in the mirror...
He thinks furiously for a moment and then floors it, 95... 100.. 110... Finally, with the officer still hot on his tail he slows to a crawl and pulls over to the roadside.

The officer, obviously on edge, cautiously approaches the car as the man rolls down the window and places hands out where they can easily be seen.

"You were going a little fast there," the officer says "but it is the end of my shift and tonight the boys are coming over for beers and cards, so you have exactly one chance to explain yourself."

The man, with all the sincerity he could muster, replied "Sir, round about a year ago my wife left me for a state trooper. I tell ya, that nag leaving was the best thing that ever happened to me and I knew it was too good to be true because when I saw your lights in the rearview, I could have sworn you were bringing her back."

The officer paused for a moment and said "Have a nice day and drive safe."

Edit: This is my (still married) grandad's favorite joke 

Edit 2: Wow, made it to front page of Reddit, much thanks to all!

Edit 3: RIP inbox
***
One of the funniest vampire jokes
3 vampires are having a competition to prove who's the most vicious vampire amongst them.

The strongest one started 1st,

"watch this," He said as he flies so fast, about 100 miles/hour.
After only 10 minutes, he comes back with blood all over his mouth.
"what happened?" they asked.
"did you see that house over there?"
"yes?"
"well.. I killed the entire family and sucked the blood dry!"
"wow!? fascinating, as expected from the strongest vampire"

Then the eldest one takes the next turn
"watch and learn," he said as he flies even faster, about 120 miles/hour.
After only 5 minutes, he comes back with blood all over his mouth and his neck.
"what happened??" they asked.
"did you see that village over there?"
"ye..yes?"
"well.. I killed every last person on that village and sucked the blood dry!"
"wow!? magnificent! truly amazing, we can expect no less from the eldest one!"

Finally the last turn belongs to the fastest one,
"don't blink or you'll miss it" he said as he flies really fast, even faster than the other two, about 140 miles/hour.
After only a mere 30 seconds, he comes back with blood all over his mouth, his neck, and his nose.
"wh..what happened???" they asked.
"did you see that big ass tree over there?"
"ye..yes?!"
"well.. I didn't"
***
Kid with Chicken Wire
This kid is walking down the street with a spool of chicken wire. He passes an old black man sitting on his porch. The man looks at him and says "Where you goin' with that there chicken wire, boy."
The kid says "I'm going to get some chickens."
The old man says "You can't catch no chickens with no chicken wire."
Later on the kid comes back dragging about a dozen chickens by the chicken wire. The old man looks at him and says "I'll be damned."

The next day the boy is walking down the street with a roll of duct tape. The old man says "Say boy, where you goin' with that roll of duct tape?"
The boy says "I'm going to get some ducks."
The man says "You can't catch no ducks with no duct tape."
Later on the kid comes walking down the road with about a dozen ducks stuck to the tape."
The old man is astonished. 

The next day the boy comes walking down the road, with a basket of pussy willows. 
The old man sees him and says "You wait right there boy, Imma go get my hat."
***
Mahatma Gandhi walked barefoot most of the time, which produced an impressive set of calluses on his feet. He also ate very little, which made him rather frail and, with his odd diet, he suffered from bad breath. This made him a . . .
super calloused fragile mystic hexed by halitosis.
***
Paddy McCoy, an elderly Irish farmer...
Paddy McCoy, an elderly Irish farmer, recently received a letter from the Department for Work & Pensions stating that they suspected he was not paying his employees the statutory minimum wage and they would send an inspector to interview them.  

On the appointed day, the inspector turned up. "Tell me about your staff," he asked Paddy.  

"Well," said Paddy, "there's the farm hand, I pay him £240 a week, and he has a free cottage.  

Then there's the housekeeper. She gets £190 a week, along with free board and lodging.  

There's also the half-wit. He works a 16 hour day, does 90% of the work, earns about £25 a week along with a bottle of whisky and, as a special treat, occasionally gets to sleep with my wife."  

"That's disgraceful" said the inspector, "I need to interview the half-wit."  

"That'll be me then," said Paddy.
***
An engineer dies and reaches hell.
It's way too hot there. The engineer finds out the A.C is not rightly installed and fixes it. There are televisions but none are working. The engineer soon finds out what's wrong with the cable receiver and fixes it too. He fixes the electricity circuit and it's no longer dark. He also gets wifi configured on everyone's phone. Very next day, the word reaches Heaven that the inhabitants of Hell are having a much pleasant life than them. God calls Satan and Satan tells what the engineer did to their place.

God was furious and said, "Well, an engineer was supposed to arrive here yesterday but he hasn't. It seems that he was sent there by mistake. I want you to send him over."

Satan replied,"No way, I'm not going to send someone that valuable."

God: "Well, then I'm going to sue you"

Satan laughs hysterically and says, "Do you really think I'm gonna believe that you have a lawyer out there ?"
***
An extremely close landing on an extremely short runway..
A plane is nearing its destination. The pilot turns to his co-pilot and remarks: "That looks like a really short runway." The co-pilot looks at it and says: "Yes, captain, its really short." 100 meters from the runway, the pilot communicates to the passengers and crew: "Fasten your seatbelts, this is going to be an extremely close landing!" The plane touches down on the ground, engages maximum breaks, and with schreaching tires comes to a stop two meters from the end of the runway. "Phew, " says the pilot relieved. "That was the shortest landing I've ever made." The co-pilot looks out of the windows and answers: "And certainly on the widest runway I've every seen.."
***
Two Beggars
Two beggars are sitting side by side on a street in Rome.
One has a cross in front of him; the other one the Star of David. Many people go by and look at both beggars, but only put money into the hat of the beggar sitting behind the cross.  

A priest comes by, stops and watches throngs of people giving money to the beggar behind the cross, but none give to the beggar behind the Star of David.  

Finally, the priest goes over to the beggar behind the Star of David and says, "My poor fellow, don't you understand? This is a Catholic country; this city is the seat of Catholicism. People aren't going to give you money if you sit there with a Star of David in front of you, especially when you're sitting beside a beggar who has a cross. In fact, they would probably give to him just out of spite."  

The beggar behind the Star of David listened to the priest, turned to the other beggar with the cross and said: "Moishe, look who's trying to teach the Goldstein brothers about marketing."
***
Three lunatics
Three lunatics approach their Asylum doctor with a request for a weekend pass to the local city.

"That's impossible says the doctor. 

You're all nuts. You'll get lost and never come back." 

But, the lunatics wouldn't relent until finally, exasperated, and the doctor says 

"OK! If you can answer a simple question I'll sign the pass." 

He turns to the first lunatic and says 

**"What's three times three?"**

The lunatic starts counting on his fingers "3, 7, 19, 38?. 
Is it 128?" 
The doctor shakes his head and turns to the next lunatic: 

**"What's three times three?"**

The lunatic immediately shouts "WEDNESDAY!" 

The doctor, beginning to get disgusted turns to the last lunatic: 

**"What's three times three?"**

The lunatic thinks for a moment and then asks for a pencil and a piece of paper. 

That provided, he writes for some time furiously, and finally looks up and says "Nine." 

The doctor is amazed, but true to his word he begins filling out the pass. 

As he's writing he says "This is incredible, you've always been thoroughly insane. How'd you do it?" 

The lunatic responds, "Oh, it was easy I divided 128 by Wednesday!"
***
Guy keeps calling off work on Mondays....
A guy works a new job on Thursday and Friday. On Monday he calls in and says, "I can't come in today. I'm sick."

He works the rest of the week, but the following Monday he calls in and says, "I can't come in today. I'm sick."

The boss asks the foreman about him, and the foreman says, "He's great. He does the work of two men. We need him."

So the boss calls the guy into his office, and says, "You seem to have a problem getting to work on Mondays. You're a good worker and I'd hate to fire you. What's the problem? Anything we can help you with? Drugs? Alcohol?"

The guy says, "No, I don't drink or do drugs. But my brother-in-law drinks every weekend, and then beats on my sister. So every Monday morning, I go over to make sure she's all right. She puts her head on my shoulder and cries, one thing leads to another, and the next thing you know, I'm f-----g her."

The boss says, "You f--k your sister?"

The guy says, "Hey, I told you I was sick."
***
Court Ruling from the UK
A seven year old boy was at the centre of a courtroom drama yesterday when he challenged a court ruling over who should have custody of him.
The boy has a history of being beaten by his parents and the judge initially awarded custody to his aunt, in keeping with the child custody law and regulations requiring that family unity be maintained to the degree possible.
The boy surprised the court when he proclaimed that his aunt beat him more than his parents and he adamantly refused to live with her. When the judge suggested that he live with his grandparents, the boy cried out that they also beat him.
After considering the remainder of the immediate family and learning that domestic violence was apparently a way of life among them, the judge took the unprecedented step of allowing the boy to propose who should have custody of him.
After two recesses to check legal references and confer with child welfare officials, the judge granted temporary custody to the England Football team, whom the boy firmly believes are not capable of beating anyone.
***
Two beggars are sitting side by side on the street in Rome
Two beggars are sitting side by side on the street in Rome. One has a cross in front of him, the other a Star of David. Many people go by, but only put money into the hat of the beggar sitting behind the cross. 

A priest comes by, stops and watches throngs of people giving money to the beggar sitting behind the cross, but none give to the beggar sitting behind the Star of David. Finally, the priest goes over to the beggar behind the Star of David and says: "Don't you understand? This is a Catholic country. People aren't going to give you money if you sit there with a Star of David in front of you, especially if you're sitting beside a beggar who has a cross. In fact, they would probably give to him just out of spite!"

The beggar behind the Star of David listened to the priest, turned to the other beggar with the cross and said: "Moshe, look who's trying to teach the Goldstein brothers about marketing!" 
***
An art thief broke into the Louvre.
Through careful studying of the building plans and months of meticulous planning, he was able to evade all the security and stole several priceless paintings.

He then loaded the paintings into his van parked nearby. Just as he was about to leave, he heard the alarm go off in the building.

Without a moment's hesitation, he kicked the van into high gear and sped away. However, his van ran out of gas less than 5 minutes later, and he was caught and arrested by the police.

"I don't understand", Said the police officer. "How could you plan all that so carefully, yet forget to fill up your gas tank?"

To which the thief replied: "But monsieur! Zat is exactly why I stole ze paintings! I had no Monet, to buy Degas, to make ze Van Gogh!"
***
Two medical students were
walking along the street when they saw an old man walking with his legs spread apart. He was stiff-legged and walking slowly. 
One student  said to his friend: "I'm sure that poor old man has Peltry Syndrome. Those people walk just like that." 
The other student says: "No, I don't think so. The old man surely has Zovitzki Syndrome. He walks slowly and his legs are apart, just as we learned in class." 
Since they couldn't agree they decided to ask the old man. They approached him and one of the students said to him, "We're medical students and couldn't help but notice the way you walk, but we couldn't agree on the syndrome you might have.  Could you tell us what it is?" 
The old man said, "I'll tell you, but first you tell me what you two fine medical students think." 
The first student said, "I think it's Peltry Syndrome." 
The old man said, "You thought - but you are wrong." 
The other student said, "I think you have Zovitzki Syndrome." 
The old man said, "You thought - but you are wrong." 
So they asked him, "Well, old timer, what do you have?" 
The old man said, "I thought it was GAS - but I was wrong, too!" 
***
Two men from Texas were sitting at a bar
Two men from Texas were sitting at a bar, when a young lady nearby began to choke on a hamburger. She gasped and gagged, and one Texan turned to the other and said, "That little gal is havin' a bad time. I'm a gonna go over there and help." He ran over to the young lady, held both sides of her head in his big, Texan hands, and asked, "Kin ya swaller?" Gasping, she shook her head no. He asked, "Kin ya breathe?" Still gasping, she again shook her head no. With that, he yanked up her skirt, pulled down her panties and licked her on the butt. The young woman was so shocked that she coughed up the piece of hamburger and began to breathe on her own. The Texan sat back down with his friend and said, "Ya know, it's sure amazin' how that hind-lick manoeuvre always works." 

***
The Australian government sends a civil servant to gather data about the habits of a remote Aboriginal tribe
The civil servant asks a tribesman a series of questions about his life and eventually the matter of personal hygiene comes up.

\- How often do you wash your penis?

\- "Penis"? What's a "penis"?


Thinking this is the quickest way to explain, the civil servant drops his pants and shows him his penis.

Later the tribesman talks with his friend,

\- Do you know what a "penis" is?

\- No, what is it?

\- It's like a dick, but smaller
***
An English professor told her students that there would be no excuse for not showing up for their final exam
An English professor told her students that there would be no excuse for not showing up for their final exam, except for serious injury, illness, or a death in the student's immediate family. A smartass jock in the back of the room asked:

What about extreme sexual exhaustion?

The entire class did its best to stifle their laughter. When silence was restored, the teacher smiled sympathetically at the student, shook her head, and sweetly said:

You can write with your other hand.

***
A priest goes golfing with his nuns....
A priest who typically goes golfing with his friends every Thursday afternoon gets a call saying his buddies won't be joining him one morning. Still wanting to go, he asks three of his nuns to go with him for company. They agree, somewhat hesitantly. 

On the first tee, the priest's shot lands straight in the closest water hazard. 

"Damn it, I missed!", the priest shouts in frustration. The nuns scold him for his bad language. The priest apologizes and walks up to the drop zone for his next shot. 

His second shot is no better than his first as it goes wayward into the forest. "Damn it, I missed!", he screams. 

The nuns, again, are mortified at his language. "Father, we must insist that you cease this language. We'll leave if we hear it again!"

The priest, apologizes again, "I'm sorry. Please don't leave. I promise I'll stop with the profanity. I'll tell you what, if I curse again, may lighting reign down from the heavens and strike me." 

The nuns, reluctantly, agree to stay with him as he lines up his next shot. The ball goes across the fairway and lands back into the water hazard. 

"Damn it, I missed!" the priest cries. 

Suddenly, dark clouds, seemingly out of nowhere, flood the sky. A bolt of lightning flashes down on the course and strikes the three nuns dead. 

A big booming voice from the sky then bellows angrily, "Damn it, I missed!" 


***
Jesus comes upon a crowd stoning a harlot...
He was shocked at the cruelty, and he opens his arms wide and yells "STOP!!!" in his booming, godly voice. Everybody pauses and turns, stones in their hands, and Jesus begins to preach.

He preaches about brotherly love, and turning the other cheek. His words are inspiring and the crowd grows ashamed as the stones drop from their hands. Finally he ends his sermon, with the words

"Let the one without sin cast the first stone!"

There is a solemn silence, as each person humbly considers Jesus' words in their hearts - until a little old lady in the back picks up a stone and hurls it at the harlot! Immediately, the entire crowd picks up their stones and resumes their earlier behavior.

Jesus, in anger, turns to the little old lady and says,

"Mom, sometimes you really piss Me off!"
***
A guy dies and goes to hell.
Satan welcomes him warmly and shakes his hand. He is given the keys to a gorgeous apartment, where he finds a brand new set of golf clubs, and a membership to the ritzy Hades Golf Club. He has servants to look after his every need.

In the garage is a brand new sports car and the fridge is stocked with beer, and wonderful food. A large screen television has all the sports channels he is used to and free movies.

One day, after weeks of enjoying all the amenities, he opens up the cellar door.

Down below, he sees thousands of souls being tormented in fire and brimstone, and being tortured in unthinkable ways.

He goes to see Satan immediately, and tells him what he saw.
Satan immediately apologizes, saying: "I am so sorry you had to see all that. You see, that is where the Catholics stay and they wouldn't have it any other way."
***
So three old men met on a Sunday morning...
"Sixty is the worst age to be," said the 60-year-old man. "You always feel like you have to pee and most of the time you stand there and nothing comes out."

"Ah, that's nothin," said the 70-year-old. "When you're seventy, you don't have a bowel movement any more. You take laxatives, eat bran, sit on the toilet all day and nothin' comes out!"

"Actually," said the 80-year -old, "Eighty is the worst age of all."

"Do you have trouble peeing, too?" asked the 60-year old.

"No, I pee every morning at 6:00. I pee like a racehorse on a flat rock: no problem at all."

"So, do you have a problem with your bowel movement?"

"No, I have one every morning at 6:30."

Exasperated, the 60-year-old said, "You pee every morning at 6:00 and crap every morning at 6:30. So what's so bad about being 80?"

"I don't wake up until 7:00."
***
Old people and Drs
I know most of us have experienced this, and I love the way this old guy handled it:

A 75-year-old man walked into a crowded waiting room and approached the desk. 

The Receptionist said, 'Yes sir, what are you seeing the Doctor for today?'

'There's something wrong with my dick', he replied.

The receptionist became irritated and said, 'You shouldn't come into a crowded waiting room and say things like that.'

'Why not, you asked me what was wrong and I told you,' he said.

The Receptionist replied; 'Now you've caused some embarrassment in this room full of people. You should have said there is something wrong with your ear or something, and discussed the problem further with the Doctor in private.'

The man replied, 'You shouldn't ask people questions in a roomful of strangers if the answer could embarrass anyone.

The man then decided to walk out, waited several minutes, and then re-entered.

The Receptionist smiled smugly and asked, 'Yes??'

'There's something wrong with my ear,' he stated.

The Receptionist nodded approvingly and smiled, knowing he had taken her advice. 'And what is wrong with your ear, Sir?'

'I can't piss out of it,' he replied.

The waiting room erupted in laughter.
***
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to prom..
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to the prom. First he goes to rent a tux, but there’s a long tux line at the shop and it takes forever.

Next, he has to get some flowers, so he heads over to the florist and there’s a huge flower line there. He waits forever but eventually gets the flowers.

Then he heads out to rent a limo. Unfortunately, there’s a large limo line at the rental office, but he’s patient and gets the job done.

Finally, the day of the prom comes. The two are dancing happily and his girlfriend is having a great time. When the song is over, she asks him to get her some punch, so he heads over to the punch table and there’s no punchline.

***
A mother baking in Somalia
One day a mother was baking bread in Somalia, when her son thought it would be awesome to play white. So he threw flour all over him and said "Mommy, look! I'm white".   

His mother slapped him instantly and said "Go to your father and show him what you've done."  
His father slapped him instantly and said "Go to your grandfather and show him what you've done."  
His grandfather slapped him as well and said "Go to your grandmother and show her what you've done."  
His grandmother also slapped him.  

He then came back to his mother who asked "So, what have you learned today?" and the child responded "I've been white for five minutes and I already hate black people."

Edit: Added a missing word.
***
A man escapes from a prison where he’s been locked up for 15 years...
He breaks into a house and inside, he finds a young couple in bed.

He ties him to a chair. While tying the wife to the bed, the convict gets on top of her, kisses her neck, then gets up and goes into the bathroom.

While he’s in there, the husband whispers over to his wife,
“Listen, this guy is an escaped convict. Look at his clothes! He’s probably spent a lot of time in jail and hasn’t seen a woman in years.

I saw how he kissed your neck. If he wants sex, don’t resist, don’t complain. Do whatever he tells you. Satisfy him no matter how much he nauseates you. This guy is obviously very dangerous. If he gets angry, he’ll kill us both. Be strong, honey. I love you!”

She responds: “He wasn’t kissing my neck. He was whispering in my ear. He told me that he’s gay, thinks you’re cute, and asked if we had any Vaseline. I told him it was in the bathroom. Be strong honey. I love you, too.”
***
A cowboy...
... walks into a bar in Texas and orders three beers. He sits at the bar, drinking a sip out of each glass in turn.

This goes on for a few weeks till the bartender says " You know beer goes flat after pouring - why don't you just buy them one at a time?"
 
The cowboy replies, "Well, you see, I have two brothers. One is in Arizona, the other is in Colorado . When they left our home we promised that we'd drink this way to remember the days when we drank together. So I'm drinking one beer for each of my brothers and one for myself." The bartender admits that this is a nice custom, and leaves it there.

The cowboy becomes a regular in the bar, and always drinks the same way.
 
One day, he comes in and only orders two beers. All the regulars take notice and fall silent. When he comes back to the bar for the second round, the bartender says, "I don't want to intrude on your grief, but I wanted to offer my condolences on your loss."

The cowboy looks quite puzzled for a moment, then a light dawns in his eyes and he laughs. "Oh, no, everybody's just fine," he explains, "It's just that my  wife made me quit drinking but it hasn't affected my brothers though."
***
Jesus is watching you.
=

Late one night, a burglar broke into a house he thought was empty. 

He tiptoed through the living room but suddenly he froze in his tracks when he heard a loud voice say, "Jesus is watching you!" Silence returned to the house, so the burglar crept forward again. 

"Jesus is watching you," the voice boomed again. The burglar stopped dead again. He was frightened.

Frantically, he looked all around. In a dark corner, he spotted a bird cage and in the cage was a parrot. 

He asked the parrot: "Was that you who said Jesus is watching me?"

"Yes," said the parrot.

The burglar breathed a sigh of relief and asked the parrot: "Whats your name?"

"Clarence," said the bird.

"Thats a dumb name for a parrot," sneered the burglar. "What idiot named you Clarence?"

The parrot said, "The same idiot who named the Rottweiler Jesus."
***
Timmy comes home early...
...and walks inside to see his mom on top of his dad and both are naked. Timmy just stares, confused what is happening or going on.

Mom: "Timmy, what's wrong? Go to your room, I'll be up in a bit"

So Timmy goes upstairs to his room. Later his mom comes up and sits down next to him. 

M: "Timmy, what did you see?"

T: "I saw you and dad naked and you were on top of him jumping up and down."

So, Timmy's Mom brainstorms what to tell him, since she doesn't want to admit and explain sex. Then, an idea came to mind.

M: "Is that all you saw, you did not know what we were doing?"

T: "That is all I saw and I have no idea."

M: "Well, Timmy, when you get older like your father and I you need to exercise. When your fathers belly gets too big and full of air, we get naked and I go on top of your father. Then I push my hands on his gut, jumping up and down to take all the air out to make him skinny again."

T: "Mom, you know that is pointless, right?"

M: "What do you mean?"

T: "When I am at the bus stop in the morning, waiting for the bus to come and after you leave for work, the next door neighbor Susan comes over and blows him back up!"
***
Kids these days
On Christmas morning a cop on horseback is sitting at a traffic light, and next to him is a kid on his brand new bike. The cop says to the kid, "Nice bike you got there. Did Santa bring that to you?" The kid says, "Yeah." The cop says, "Well, next year tell Santa to put a tail-light on that bike." The cop then proceeds to issue the kid a $20.00 bicycle safety violation ticket. The kid takes the ticket and before the cop rides off says, "By the way, that's a nice horse you got there. Did Santa bring that to you?" Humoring the kid, the cop says, "Yeah, he sure did." The kid says, "Well, next year tell Santa to put the dick underneath the horse, instead of on top."
***
The three men
Three men; a philosopher, a mathematician and an idiot, were out riding in the car when it crashed into a tree. Before anyone knows it, the three men found themselves standing before the pearly gates of Heaven, where St. Peter and the Devil were standing nearby. 

"Gentlemen," the Devil started, "Due to the fact that Heaven is now overcrowded, therefore St. Peter has agreed to limit the number of people entering Heaven. If anyone of you can ask me a question which I don't know or cannot answer, then you're worthy enough to go to Heaven; if not, then you'll come with me to Hell."

The philosopher then stepped up, "OK, give me the most comprehensive report on Socrates' teachings,"

With a snap of his finger, a stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. The philosopher read it and concluded it was correct.

"Then, go to Hell!" 

With another snap of his finger, the philsopher disappeared. 

The mathematician then asked, "Give me the most complicated formula you can ever think of!" 

With a snap of his finger, another stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. The mathematician read it and reluctantly agreed it was correct. 

"Then, go to Hell!" 

With another snap of his finger, the mathematician disappeared, too. 

The idiot then stepped forward and said, "Bring me a chair!" 

The Devil brought forward a chair. 

"Drill 7 holes on the seat." 

The Devil did just that. The idiot then sat on the chair and let out a very loud fart. Standing up, he asked, "Which hole did my fart come out from?" 

The Devil inspected the seat and said, "The third hole from the right." 

"Wrong," said the idiot, "it's from my asshole." And the idiot went to Heaven...
***
Forgiving Your Enemies
 Toward the end of the service, the Minister asked, "How many of you have forgiven your enemies?" 80% held up their hands. 
The Minister then repeated his question. All responded this time, except one small elderly lady. 
"Mrs. Jones? Are you not willing to forgive your enemies?"
"I don't have any," she replied, smiling sweetly. 
"Mrs. Jones, that is very unusual. How old are you?" 
"Ninety-eight," she replied. 
"Oh, Mrs. Jones, would you please come down in front and tell us all how a person can live ninety-eight years & not have an enemy in the world?" 
The little sweetheart of a lady tottered down the aisle, faced the congregation, and said: 
"I outlived the bitches." 

***
The Cowardly Lion, Aslan, and Cecil are having drinks at a bar ...
They all look worn out so the bartender asks them why they look so beat.

The Cowardly Lion goes first and says, "Man, you have no idea what I went through just to get courage."

Aslan then chimes in quickly after that and says, "Nonsense, you have no idea what I went through just to get Narnia united."

There's a pause so they all look at Cecil. He raises his eyes from his drink and quietly says, "Oh yeah? You have no idea what I went through just to get a cavity filled."
***
An elderly man in Texas calls his son in New York...
 and says, "I hate to ruin your day son, but I have to tell you that your mother and I are getting a divorce; 45 years of marriage... and that much misery is enough!" "Dad, what are you talking about?" the son yells. "We can't stand the sight of each other any longer," the old dad explained. "We're sick of each other, and I'm sick of talking about this, so you call your sister in Hong Kong and tell her!". 

Frantic, the son calls his sister, who explodes on the phone. "Like hell they're getting divorced!" she shouts, "I'll take care of this." She calls her elderly father immediately, and screams at him, "You are not getting divorced. Don't do a single thing until I get there. I'm calling my brother back, and we'll both be there tomorrow. Until then, don't do a thing, you hear me?" she  said as she hung up the phone. 

The old man hangs up his phone and then turns to his wife. "Okay", he says, "it's all set. They're both coming for Christmas and paying their own air-fare."
***
A man walks into a bar and sees Hitler and Stalin...
A man walks into a bar and sees Hitler and Stalin sitting at a table. He walks up to them and asks what they are doing. Hitler says were planning WW3. The man asks what's going to happen this time. Hitler says this time were going to kill 15 million Jews and a bicycle repair man. The man asks why a bicycle repair man. Hitler turns to Stalin and says see I told you know one would care about the 15 million Jews.
***
A man with two friends
A man goes to heaven with two friends. When they get there they see ducks everywhere. St. Peter informs them that they can do whatever they want but don't step on the ducks. A week goes by and one man steps on a duck. St. Peter comes out with this ugly woman and says " this is who you will spend eternity with". A month later the second man steps on a duck. St. Peter shows up with a hideous woman and says "this is who you will spend eternity with". After a year the third man hadn't stepped on a duck and St. peter shows up with a gorgeous woman. The man can't believe it and says " what could I have done to deserve such a beautiful woman". The woman says "I don't know all I did was step on a duck" 
***
Monica Lewinsky has released the following statement on Hillary Clinton's run for the American Presidency:
"I will not vote for Hillary Clinton. The last Clinton Presidency left a very bad taste in my mouth."
***
Tough to be Irish
"What's your name?", asked the teacher.

"Mohammad," he replied.

"You're in Ireland now," replied the teacher, "So from now on you will be known as Mike."

Mohammad returned home after school.

"How was your day, Mohammad?", his mother asked.

"My name is not Mohammad. I'm in Ireland and now my name is Mike”.

"Are you ashamed of your name? Are you trying to dishonor your parents, your heritage, your religion? Shame on you!"

And his mother beat the shit out of him.

Then she called his father, who beat the shit out of him again.

The next day Mohammad returned to school.

The teacher saw all of his fresh bruises.

"What happened to you, Mike?", she asked.

"Well shortly after becoming an Irishman, I was attacked by two fucking Arabs."
***
Sleepy Juror in a Rape Trial
The plaintiff's lawyer calls his client to the stand.  

Lawyer: "Would you please tell the jury what your attacker said to you, just before he raped you?"

Woman: "Oh, I couldn't. It was filthy."

Lawyer: "How about if you just write down, so you don't have to say it out loud, and we'll show it to the jury?"

The woman complies and writes down on a piece of paper what her attacker had said: "I'm going to fuck you like you've never been fucked before."

The bailiff hands the note to the foreman, and the note is passed from person to person among the jury. Juror #6, a woman in her mid twenties, starts to hand the note to the Juror #7, who has fallen asleep. She elbows him awake and give him the note. He reads the note and then sticks it in his shirt pocket.

The judge says, "Juror #7, would you please share that note with the rest of the jury?"

The man responds, "It's personal, your honor." 

***
Sharing...
An elderly couple stands at the counter at the local burger joint. The man orders a deluxe burger, large fries, and a cup of decaf. The counter clerk turns to the woman and asks her what she would like. 

“Oh, nothing for me, deary. My husband and I share everything.'” 

The clerk hits a key on the register and tells the couple that the cost of the meal is $4.98. 

The old man reaches into his pockets and pulls out a handful of coins. Slowly and carefully, without a penny to spare, he counts out the exact amount and hands it to the cashier.

A young man standing behind the couple watches this. As the clerk assembles the couple’s order, he leans forward and says, “I’d be honored to buy you another burger and fries.”

The old man turns to the young man and says, “Thank you, but my wife and I share everything.” 

The old man carries the tray of food to a table and they sit. Carefully, he cuts the burger in half, divides the fries into two equal portions, and passes half of the food to the woman. He sets the decaf in the center of the table so they can both reach it. Then he begins to eat.  

A few minutes later, the young man sits down at the table next to them. As he gobbles down his food, he notices that, while the elderly man eats, the woman is quietly sipping decaf. When he looks at her food, he sees that she hasn’t eaten a single bite. Again, he leans toward the couple and says, “I really would be honored to buy you another meal.'”

The old man says, “No, thank you. We share everything,” and calmly resumes eating.

“I just hate to see you go hungry,” the young man laments to the woman.

“Oh, I’m not going hungry,” the old woman says. “I’m waiting for the teeth.”

***
An 80 year old man goes into a brothel..
Picks out a young pretty woman, they go up to her room, strip down and climb into bed.  The old man performs like a teenager, the prostitute is amazed at how energetic and agile he is, she tells him if he can do it like that again, she'll give him one for free. He says "Yeah, I can, but I need to take a 20 minute nap, and while I'm asleep, I need you to hold my old pecker.".  She agrees, he wakes up 20 minutes later and goes at it again, just as vigorously as before.  The girl is amazed at the old man's stamina, and repeats her freebie offer, the old man tells her that once again, he'll need a 20 minute nap and she'll have to hold his cock while he's asleep;  she does as he asks,  he wakes up 20 minutes later and goes at it again, with even more enthusiasm than previously.

The hooker catches her breath, and needing to satisfy her curiosity, asks the old man "I can understand why you need the nap, but why do I have to hold your dick while you're sleeping?"  The old man replies "Oh, that's just so you don't steal my wallet."
***
There's a legless and armless girl sitting on the beach
It's her 20th birthday, and she had her parents situate her on the beach so she could meet a special guy. 
She sees a very attractive man run past and she start loudly crying. He stops and asks what's wrong. She says, "I'm 20 years old and I've never had a hug from a real man." The man sit down next to her and gives her a hug. She continues to cry and he asks what's wrong now. She says, "I'm 20 years old and I've never been kissed by a real man." The man plants a kiss on her lips. She cries even harder. He asks what's wrong a third time. She says, "I'm 20 years old and I've never been fucked." 
The man picks up the girl in his arm and walks towards the ocean. He throws her as far as he can into the water and says, "Now you're fucked."
***
From my Botswanan friend
A man dies and goes to hell.

He finds that there is a different hell for each country.

He decides he'll pick the least painful to spend his eternity.

He goes to Germany Hell and asks, 'What do they do here?'
... He is told 'first they put you in an electric chair for an hour.
Then they lay you on a bed of nails for another hour.
Then the German devil comes in and whips you for the rest of the day'.
The man does not like the sound of that at all so he moves on.

He checks out the USA Hell as well as the Russia Hell and many more.
He discovers that they are all similar to the German hell.

Then he comes to the BOTSWANA Hell and finds that there is a long line of people waiting to get in.
Amazed, he asks, 'What do they do here?'

He is told 'first they put you in an electric chair for an hour.
Then they lay you on a bed of nails for another hour.
The BOTSWANA devil comes in and whips you for the rest of the day.

'But, that is exactly the same as all the other hells why are there so many people waiting to get in?' asks the man.

Because there is never any electricity, so the electric chair does not work.
The nails were paid for but never supplied, so the bed is comfortable to sleep on.
And the BOTSWANA devil used to be a civil servant, so he comes in;
signs his time sheet and goes back home for private business.'
***
Sex Therapy (NSFW)
A doctor had a good reputation of helping couples increase the joy in their sex life, but always promised not to take a case if he felt he couldn't help.
The Browns came into see the successful doctor and he gave them thorough physical exams, psychological exams, and various tests. Finally, he concluded, "Yes, I am happy to say that I can help you." "On your way home from my office stop at the grocery store and buy some grapes and doughnuts. Go home, take off your clothes, and you, sir, roll the grapes across the floor until you make a bulls eye in your wife's love canal. Then on hands and knees you must crawl to her like a leopard and retrieve the grape using only your tongue. "Then next, ma'am, you must take the doughnuts and from across the room, toss them at your husband until you make a ringer around his love pole. Then like a lioness, you must crawl to him and consume the doughnut." The couple went home and their sex life became more and more wonderful.
They told their friends, Mr. & Mrs. Green that they should see the good doctor. The doctor greeted the Greens and said he would not take the case unless he felt that he could help them; so he conducted the physical exams and the same battery of tests. Then he told the Greens the bad news. "I cannot help you, so I will not take your money. I believe your sex life is as good as it will ever be, I cannot help."
The Greens pleaded with him, and said, "You helped our friends the Browns, now please, please, help us." "Well, all right", the doctor said. "On your way home from the office, stop at the grocery store and buy some apples and a box of cheerios... "

This was not my joke BTW I reposted this from an archived Reddit from a year ago, I just thought it was kind of funny. 
***
What was the seductive sound?
A man is driving down the road and his car breaks down near a monastery. He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, "My car broke down. Do you think I could stay the night?"

The monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car. As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a strange sound. A sound unlike anything he's ever heard before. The Sirens that nearly seduced Odysseus into crashing his ship comes to his mind. He doesn't sleep that night. He tosses and turns trying to figure out what could possibly be making such a seductive sound.

The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk." Distraught, the man is forced to leave.

Years later, after never being able to forget that sound, the man goes back to the monastery and pleads for the answer again.

The monks reply, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk."
The man says, "If the only way I can find out what is making that beautiful sound is to become a monk, then please, make me a monk."

The monks reply, "You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of grains of sand. When you find these answers, you will have become a monk."

The man sets about his task. 

After years of searching he returns as a gray-haired old man and knocks on the door of the monastery. A monk answers. He is taken before a gathering of all the monks.

"In my quest to find what makes that beautiful sound, I traveled the earth and have found what you asked for: By design, the world is in a state of perpetual change. Only God knows what you ask. All a man can know is himself, and only then if he is honest and reflective and willing to strip away self deception."

The monks reply, "Congratulations. You have become a monk. We shall now show you the way to the mystery of the sacred sound."

The monks lead the man to a wooden door, where the head monk says, "The sound is beyond that door."

The monks give him the key, and he opens the door. Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone. The man is given the key to the stone door and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby. And so it went that he needed keys to doors of emerald, pearl and diamond.

Finally, they come to a door made of solid gold. The sound has become very clear and definite. The monks say, "This is the last key to the last door."

The man is apprehensive to no end. His life's wish is behind that door!
With trembling hands, he unlocks the door, turns the knob, and slowly pushes the door open. Falling to his knees, he is utterly amazed to discover the source of that haunting and seductive sound......
But, of course, I can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk.
***
Paddy and Murphy
...are working on a building site. Paddy says to Murphy "I'm gonna have the day off. I'm gonna pretend I'm mad!" He climbs up the rafters, hangs upside down and shouts "I'M A LIGHT BULB! I'M A LIGHT BULB!" Murphy watches in amazement! The Foreman shouts "Paddy you're mad, go home". So he leaves the site. Murphy starts packing his kit up to leave as well. "Where the hell are you going?" asks the Foreman. "I can't work in the friggin' dark!" says Murphy. 
***
Man walks into a bar and orders three shots of whiskey.
Man walks into a bar and orders three separate shots of whiskey. He solemnly drinks each one. The bartender asks why he needs the three separate shots, and why all at once. 

"Well, this one's for me brother in Dublin. This one's for me brother in New York. And this one's for me. Seein' as how we can't be in the same bar, we figure if all three of us do this once a month, well--it's almost like we're drinkin' together." 

A month goes by, and the guy comes back in, orders three shots, drinks all three. And again each month, for years. When asked to explain, he always says the same thing: "Well, this one's for me brother in Dublin. This one's for me brother in New York. And this one's for me." 

Until one month when the guy comes in and orders only two shots. Drinks them solemn as you please. The concerned bartender asks: "Excuse me, but--did something happen to one of your brothers?" 

"No--this one's for me brother in Dublin. And this one's for me brother in New York. I quit drinkin'." 

***
A boy is at school
and he hears the older kids talking about pussy, and
their bitch. The boy confused by this goes to his mother.

"Mom", the boy asks, "What's a pussy?"

The mother being startled by this thinks quick and finds the closest
dictionary and opens it up to a picture of a cat and says "Son, that is a
pussy."

The son then asks "What's a bitch?"

The mother again thinking quickly opens to a picture of a dog and says,
"Son, this is a bitch."

The son walks away still confused, and sees his father watching
television. The son walks up to his father and says "Dad, what's a
pussy?"

The father doesn't want to miss the baseball game so he quickly whips out
his Penthouse magazine to the centerfold, grabs a marker and draws a
circle around
the vagina and says "Son, this is a pussy."
The son, now starting to understand what the older boys are talking about
asks "Then, what is a bitch?"

The dad replies, "That's everything outside the circle."
***
A math professor, John, is having problems with his sink .....
so he calls a plumber. The plumber comes over and quickly fixes the sink. The professor is happy until he gets the bill. He tells the plumber, "How can you charge this much? This is half of my paycheck." But he pays it anyways.

The plumber tells him, "Hey, we are looking for more plumbers. You could become a plumber and triple your salary. Just make sure you say you only made it to 6th grade, they don't like educated people."

The professor takes him up on the offer and becomes a plumber. His salary triples and he doesn't have to work nearly as hard. But the company makes an announcement that all of their plumbers must get a 7th grade education. So they all go to night school.

On the first day of night school they all attend math class. The teacher wants to gauge the class so he asks John, "What is the formula for the area of a circle?"
John walks up to the board and is about to write the formula when he realizes he has forgotten it. So he begins to attempt to derive the formula, filling the board with complicated mathematics. He ends up figuring out it is negative pi times radius squared. He thinks the minus doesn't belong so he starts over, but again he comes up with the same equation. After staring at the board for a minute he looks out at the other plumbers and sees that they are all whispering, "Switch the limits on the integral!"
***
What's red and dingle dangles from the ceiling?
This was my grandfathers all time favorite joke.

Pop Pop: What's red and dingle dangles from the ceiling?

Me: I don't know...

Pop Pop: A Red dingle dangle of course!


Pop Pop: What's green and dingle dangles from the ceiling?

Me: A green dingle dangle!

Pop Pop: No they only come in Red.

Me: :|




***
Adam felt sad and lonely in the Garden of Eden
"What is wrong, my child?" asked God.

"Lord, I am lonely," relplied Adam, "I wish I had a companion."

"Well, I've got just the one for you," said God. "She's perfect! She is lithe and youthful, and shall always remain so. She utters beauty when she speaks, and she listens with attention and compassion. She will desire you as much as you desire her. Adam, she's literally made for you."

"Wow, God, she sounds amazing! But what will this cost me?" Adam asked.

"An arm and a leg, Adam," replied God, "an arm and a leg."

Adam though for a moment and said, "Well, what can I get for just a rib?"
***
A man escapes from a prison where he’s been locked up for 15 years......
He breaks into a house and inside, he finds a young couple in bed.

He ties him to a chair. While tying the wife to the bed, the convict gets on top of her, kisses her neck, then gets up and goes into the bathroom.

While he’s in there, the husband whispers over to his wife,
“Listen, this guy is an escaped convict. Look at his clothes! He’s probably spent a lot of time in jail and hasn’t seen a woman in years. I saw how he kissed your neck. If he wants sex, don’t resist, don’t complain. Do whatever he tells you. Satisfy him no matter how much he nauseates you. This guy is obviously very dangerous. If he gets angry, he’ll kill us both. Be strong, honey. I love you!”

She responds: “He wasn’t kissing my neck. He was whispering in my ear. He told me that he’s gay, thinks you’re cute, and asked if we had any Vaseline. I told him it was in the bathroom. Be strong honey. I love you, too.”
***
Four Friends At A Party...
Four friends, who hadn't seen each other in 30 years, reunited at a party. After several drinks, one of the men had to use the rest room. Those who remained talked about their kids.

The first guy said, "My son is my pride and joy. He started working at a successful company at the bottom of the barrel. He studied Economics and Business Administration and soon began to climb the corporate ladder and now he's the president of the company. He became so rich that he gave his best friend a top of the line Mercedes for his birthday."

The second guy said, "Darn, that's terrific! My son is also my pride and joy. He started working for a big airline, and then went to flight school to become a pilot. Eventually he became a partner in the company, where he owns the majority of its assets. He's so rich that he gave his best friend a brand new jet for his birthday."

The third man said: "Well, that's terrific! My son studied in the best universities and became an engineer. Then he started his own construction company and is now a multimillionaire. He also gave away something very nice and expensive to his best friend for his birthday: A 30,000 square foot mansion."

The three friends congratulated each other just as the fourth returned from the restroom and asked: "What are all the congratulations for?"

One of the three said: "We were talking about the pride we feel for the successes of our sons. What about your son?"

The fourth man replied: "My son is gay and makes a living dancing as a stripper at a nightclub."

The three friends said: "What a shame...what a disappointment."

The fourth man replied: "No, I'm not ashamed. He's my son and I love him. And he hasn't done too bad either. His birthday was two weeks ago, and he received a beautiful 30,000 square foot mansion, a brand new jet and a top of the line Mercedes from his three boyfriends!"

***
Youth and speed will never beat age and treachery.
A young rooster walks out onto the barnyard for the first time, having just been bought by the farmer.  He sees lots of chickens, but only one other rooster, who is much older.  He walks up to the old rooster to tell him to get lost so he can have all the chickens for himself.

The old rooster says to him, "I know the farmer bought you to replace me, but give me one chance to prove my worth.  We'll race around the barn for ten laps.  If I win, you leave, but if you win, I'll leave.  To make it fair, I just want a 50 foot head start."

The young rooster knows he's in way better shape, and that even a 50 foot head start won't help the old rooster, so he agrees.  

The race begins and after one lap the young rooster has started closing in on the old rooster, he's only 30 feet behind.  After two laps he's 15 feet behind.  After three laps he's one foot behind when BLAM!!  

Suddenly there's nothing left of the young rooster but a big bloodstain on the barn wall.  Standing across the barnyard is the farmer, holding a smoking shotgun.  

"Damn," he says to himself, "that's the third gay rooster I've bought this month."
***
So Donald Trump wants to be president and move into the white house. Why not?
It wouldn't be the first time he pushed a black family out of their home.

&nbsp;

&nbsp;

*credits to Snoop Dogg @ Donald Trump roast*
***
A missionary gets sent into deepest darkest Africa
 and goes to live with a tribe therein. He spends years with the people, teaching them  to read, write and the good Christian ways of the white man. One thing  he particularly stresses is the evils of sexual sin. Thou must not
  commit adultery or fornication!!
  
 One day the wife of one of the Tribe's noblemen gives birth to a white child. The village is shocked and the chief is sent by his people to  talk with the missionary.
  
 "You have taught us of the evils of sexual sin, yet here a black woman gives birth to a white child. You are the only white man that has ever set foot in our village. It doesn't take a genius to work out what has been going on!"
  
 The missionary replies: "No, no, my good man. You are mistaken. What you have here is a natural occurrence - what is called an albino. Look to thy yonder field. See a field of white sheep, and yet amongst them is one black one. Nature does this on occasion."  
The chief pauses for a moment then says "Tell you what, you don't say anything about the sheep, I won't say anything about the white child"


***
A wealthy lawyer was riding in his limousine when he saw two men along the roadside eating grass.
A wealthy lawyer was riding in his limousine when he saw two men along the roadside eating grass. Disturbed, he ordered his driver to stop and he got out to investigate. He asked one man, "Why are you eating grass?" "We don't have any money for food," the poor man replied. "We have to eat grass." "Well then, you can come with me to my house and I'll feed you," the lawyer said. "But sir, I have a wife and two children with me. They are over there, under that tree." "Bring them along," the lawyer replied. Turning to the other poor man he stated, "You come with us also." The second man, in a pitiful voice then said, "But sir, I also have a wife and SIX children with me!" "Bring them all, as well," the lawyer answered. They all entered the car, which was no easy task, even for a car as large as the limousine. Once underway, one of the poor fellows turned to the lawyer and said, "Sir, you are too kind. Thank you for taking all of us with you." The lawyer replied, "Glad to do it. You'll really love my place; the grass is almost a foot high!"
***
Two best friends got married on the same date and...
meet every year after their anniversaries at their favorite bar. One was fortunate to be really successful and the other lives a sort of mediocre life. They start discussing what they got their wife's for their anniversaries. The rich guy begins by discussing his gift. 

" Yea, I got my wife a diamond jewelry set...and a new Mercedes Benz"

" Wow, 2 gifts this year!" the poorer friend responds.

"Yea, I got her the Benz just in case she doesn't like the jewelry set, she can use the Benz to drive to the jewelry store and exchange it". 

" sounds reasonable."

"What you get your wife?"

"I got her a set of slippers and a dildo"

" What's the deal with the dildo?"

" Oh, I got her the dildo that way if she doesn't like the slippers, she can go fuck herself"       
***
a hobo finds a woman on the ledge of a bridge crossing a deep valley
Hobo: "hey, are you going to jump?"  
Woman: "Yes I am going to jump. I can't go on with life"  
H: "well, before you do that, don't you want to have sex a last time? like, say, with me?"  
W: "ha, definitely not. You'll understand that if I'm about to commit suicide, I'm not really in the mood for sex. Plus, you're ugly and disgusting, so there's no way I will have sex with you"
  
The hobo sighs, then starts to walk away.  
  
W (shouting at the hobo):"hey! why are you leaving??? aren't you going to try and prevent me from doing this? Tell me that I shouldn't jump?? that suicide isn't a solution? that life is worth living or some shit like that? ANYTHING???"  

H: "well, normally I would, but now I gotta hurry so that you're still a bit warm when I reach the foot of the bridge"

***
At the end of a busy night in a bar a clearly drunk man approaches the bartender. "Hey man," he says, "I'll bet you $50 I can stand at one end of the bar and pee clear to the other end." He has to clean the bar anyway, so this sounds like an easy 50 to the bartender. He agrees.
"Great! I'll be right back." The man then approaches a group of wasted guys in expensive suits and after a little bit of chatting and back slapping, he returns. He climbs onto the bar, whips it out and proceeds to pee...no more than a foot or so distance. The bartender laughs to himself,  thinking he's just made fifty bucks. The drunken guy looks excited and hands him fifty. "Thanks, man," he says as he climbs off the bar. The bartender looks confused. "What are you thanking me for?" "I bet that group of bankers $500 bucks each that I could pee all over your bar and you wouldn't care!"
***
Suppositories
A woman hears her husband cussing up a storm From behind the bathroom door.
She knocks and asks, 'honey ,what is it?' Her husband emerges from the bathroom and says, 'The doctor prescribed suppositories for this stomach problem I've been having and no matter what I do, I just can't get the sucker up my ass. Even the doctor had to shove the first one in to show me how it was done, and I tell you it took him forever to get it up there, and it hurt!' 'Poor baby,' says the wife. 'You were probably nervous and tense and he probably wasn't very gentle with you. Here, let me give you the suppository, I don't mind.' Still grumbling, the husband bends over. His wife puts her left hand on his shoulder to brace him and with the right hand, quickly and easily slips the suppository up her husbands rear end. The husband lets out a bloodcurdling scream. 'My god' says the wife. 'What happened? Did I hurt you?' 'No!' Cries the man,'but I just remembered that when the doctor did it, he had BOTH his hand on my shoulders.
***
A fat man sees a sign on a door: lose 1 pound for $1...
He puts a dollar in the slot and enters. There is a jogging track with a beautiful naked woman wearing jogging shoes. "Better start running" she says, beckoning him. Excited, he chases her around the track for an hour. Finally he catches her, she... ahem... rewards him... then he steps on the scale. He lost 1 pound!

As he leaves he sees a new sign next door.
"Lose 2 pounds for $2". He pays, enters. This time there are two gorgeous naked women in running shoes. They say "Better start running." He does, chasing them around the track. Two hours later he catches them. He is doubly... rewarded. On his way out the scale shows he lost 2 pounds!

The man leaves. Sure enough, next door there is a final sign: "Lose 3 pounds for $3." 
By now the fat man is exhausted and can barely walk... but he cannot resist. He pays and enters.
The door slams shut behind him and locks. 

Alone on the running track is a  6'4" muscular male body builder, naked except for running shoes. The naked athlete points down at his enormous erection, smiles at the fat man and says... 

"Better start running."
***
The Quickie
Bob and Jen decided to have a little Sunday afternoon quickie but had to figure out what to do with  their 10-year-old son since they lived in a small apartment. They cleverly thought to send him out on the balcony and have him to report on all the neighborhood activities. 

The boy began his commentary as his parents put their plan into operation. "There's a car being towed from the parking lot," he said. "An ambulance just drove by." A few moments passed. 

"Looks like the Anderson's have company," he called out. "Matt`s riding a new bike and the Coopers are having sex." 

Mom and dad shot up in bed. "How do you know that?" the startled father asked. 

"Their kid is standing out on the balcony too," his son replied.
***
I recently met a Chinese man and his name was Kannaswami.
I asked him: "How did you ever get a name like that being a Chinese?"

He said: "Many, many years ago when I first went to USA, I was standing in line at the Political Asylums Immigration Counter. The man in front of me was a Sri Lankan Tamil refugee. 
The white lady at the counter looked at him and asked "What is your name?" He replied "Kannaswami". 
 
Then she looked at me and asked "What's your name?"

I said, "Sem Ting".
***
Read this in a playboy magazine years ago.
A married couple was invited to a masked Halloween ball. On the night of the party, the wife had a headache and told her husband to go to the event alone. Reluctantly, he agreed. He put on his bear costume, grabbed the head piece and left. The wife fell asleep and woke up an hour later feeling great so she decided to go to the party after all. It occurred to her that, since her husband didn't know what costume she was wearing, she'd be able to see how he behaved when she wasn't around. 

As soon as she arrived, she spotted her husband in his bear costume flirting with every woman in sight. She approached him, wanting to see just how far he would go, and after a few drinks he propositioned her. They went into the bathroom and had sex. Just before unmasking at midnight, the wife slipped away and went home. She was sitting up in bed fuming when her husband returned. She asked about his night. He said, "Oh, it was the same old thing. You know I never have a good time when you're not there." 

"Really?" she said, getting angry. "You didn't meet anyone interesting?" 

He replied, "I didn't talk to anyone new. It was pretty boring. The guys and I went into the spare room and played poker all night." 

She said, "You must have been uncomfortable wearing your bear costume playing poker." 

Her husband replied, "Actually, I gave my costume to my dad."
***
Two Irish nuns were sitting at a traffic light
...in their car in Dublin when a bunch of rowdy drunks pull up alongside of them.

"Hey, show us your chest, ye bloody penguins!" shouts one of the drunks.

The Mother Superior turns to Sister Margaret, "I don't think they know who we are. Show them your cross."

So Sister Mary Margaret rolls down her window and shouts, "Screw off ye little fookin' wankers, before I come over there and rip yer nuts off!"

Sister Mary Margaret looks back at the Mother Superior and asks, "Was that cross enough?!"
***
What do you want to be when you grow up? I wanna be a billionaire...
Found it while browsing comments on Facebook. Haven't seen it on /r/jokes:

A teacher asks her class, "What do you want to be when you grow up?"

Little Johnny says "I wanna be a billionaire, going to the most expensive clubs, take the best bitch with me, give her a Ferrari worth over a million bucks, an apartment in Hawaii, a mansion in Paris, a jet to travel through Europe, an Infinite Visa Card and to make love to her three times a day".

The teacher, shocked, and not knowing what to do with the bad behavior of the child, decides not to give importance to what he said and then continues the lesson.
"And you, Susie? " the teacher asks.

Susie says "I wanna be Johnny's bitch."
***
A man and his monkey
A guy walks into a bar with his pet monkey. He orders a drink and while he's drinking it the monkey jumps around all over the place. The monkey grabs some olives off the bar and eats them, then grabs some sliced limes and eats them, then jumps up on the pool table, grabs the cue ball, sticks it in his mouth and swallows it whole. 

The bartender screams at the guy, "Did you see what your monkey just did?" 

The guy says, "No, what?" 

"He just ate the cue ball off my pool table, whole!", says the bartender. 

"Yeah, that doesn't surprise me," replied the patron. "He eats everything in sight, the little bastard. I'll pay for the cue ball and stuff." He finishes his drink, pays his bill, and leaves. 

Two weeks later he's in the bar again, and he has his monkey with him. He orders a drink and the monkey starts running around the bar again. While the man is drinking his drink, the monkey finds a maraschino cherry on the bar. He grabs it, sticks it up his butt, pulls it out, and eats it. 

The bartender is disgusted. "Did you see what your monkey did now?", he asks. 

"Now what?", responds the patron. 

"Well, he stuck a maraschino cherry up his butt, then pulled it out and ate it!" says the barkeeper. 

"Yeah, that doesn't surprise me," replied the patron. "He still eats everything in sight, but ever since he ate that damn cue ball he measures everything first.
***
This was my grandma's favourite joke
Jenny walks into the doctor's office for a checkup, and the doctor needs to check her heartbeat.

"Pull your sweater up real quick, and I'll use the stethoscope. 

There we go, thank you. Big breaths, Jenny."


"Yeth, I know, and I'm only thixthteen!"
***
A married man goes into a confessional...
A married man goes into a confessional and says to his priest, "I had an affair with a woman... almost."

The priest says, "What do you mean, almost?"

The man says, "Well, we got undressed and rubbed together, but then I stopped."

The priest says, "Rubbing together is the same as putting it in. You're not to see that woman again. For your penance, say 5 Hail Marys and put $50 in the poor box."

The man leaves the confessional, says his prayers, then walks over to the poor box.

He pauses for a moment and then starts to leave.

The priest, who was watching, quickly runs over to him saying, "I saw that, you didn't put any money in the poor box!"

The man replies, "Yeah, but I rubbed the $50 on the box, and apparently that's the same as putting it in."
***
Deer Camp
Seven guys have been going to the same deer camp for many years. Two days before the group is to leave, Kevin's wife puts her foot down and tells him he isn't going.

Kevin's friends are very upset that he can't go, but what can they do?

Two days later the six get to the camping site only to find Kevin sitting there with his gear set up, firewood gathered, and dinner cooking on the stove.

"Dang man, how long you been here, and how did you talk Melissa into letting you go?"

"Well, I've been here since yesterday. Yesterday evening, I was sitting in my chair at home and Melissa came up behind me and put her hands over my eyes and said, 'guess who?' I pulled her hands off, and she was wearing a brand new nightie.

She took my hand and pulled me to our bedroom. The room had candles and rose petals all over. On the bed she had handcuffs, and ropes! She told me to tie and cuff her to the bed, and I did. And then she said, "Do whatever you want."

So, here I am.
***
Johnny was sitting in class...
...and the teacher told them they would be dismissed after they matched the quote to the president. She starts with "The only thing we have to fear is fear itself." Johnny raises his hand, but Sally calls out "FDR"

"Correct!" says the teacher, and lets her leave.

She asks the next quote:

"If slavery is not wrong, nothing is wrong."

Johnny raises his hand again, but Sarah calls out "Abe Lincoln"

The teacher lets Sarah leave.

At this point, Johnny is getting pretty pissed off and says "I wish all these bitches would shut up."

The teacher asks "Who said that?"

Johnny yells "Bill Clinton" and runs out of the room.
***
A rich man and poor man are at a bar.
A rich man and poor man are at a bar, the rich man turns to the poor man, 'it's my 10 year wedding anniversary on Tuesday.'  

The poor man looks astonished, 'it's my 20 year wedding anniversary on Thursday!  What are you planning on getting her?'  

The rich man goes, 'I'm getting her a diamond necklace and a Mercedes Benz.'  

The poor man, looking confused, asks, 'why both?  Isn't one or the other surely enough?'  

The rich man responds, 'well, I figure if she doesn't like the necklace, she still has a nice car.  What are you getting your wife?'  

The poor man looks down, 'I'm getting her a pair of slippers and a dildo.'  

The rich man is taken aback, 'slippers and a dildo, that's an odd combination?'  

The poor man looks up, 'well, if she doesn't like the slippers she can go fuck herself.'
***
A Private is standing outside smoking
A Private is standing outside in the smoking area, joking around with one of his buddies. 

A young Lieutenant walks up to them, and asks "Private, have you got change for a dollar?"

The private looks over at him, and replies " Yea sure buddy, no problem".

The Lieutenant stares at him, mouth agape, then begins tearing into him. "What directly in the fuck did you call me Private? I am not your buddy, I am an Officer, and you will afford me all the respect deserving of my rank! Put your heels together and stand at attention when you address me!"

The Lieutenant takes a deep breath, and looks the Private who is now standing ramrod straight, over. 

"Let me ask you again, Private, and chose your words carefully this time. Do you have change for a dollar?"

"I do not, sir!".  
***
My "go-to" joke in middle school. Mildly NSFW
Superman was flying around the city and was super horny. He spotted Wonder Woman lying on top of a building naked, with her legs spread. He figured he could fly down there, fuck her super fast, and be outta there before she even knew what happened. So Superman flew down at incredible speed, hit it hard and fast, and flew back out again.

"What was that?" Wonder Woman said.

"I don't know," said the Invisible Man. "But my ass sure hurts!"

Edit: User 1893Chicago has officially innovated my joke. Thank you sir/miss.
***
Mahatma Gandhi
Mahatma Gandhi, as you know, walked barefoot most of the time, which produced an impressive set of calluses on his feet. He also ate very little, which made him rather frail and with his odd diet, he suffered from bad breath. This made him ...(Oh, man, this is so bad, it's good)... A super calloused fragile mystic hexed by halitosis.
***
A man saw a lady with big breasts. He asked, "Excuse me, can I bite your breasts for $1000?" She agrees, so they go to a secluded corner. She opens her blouse.
A man saw a lady with big breasts. He asked, "Excuse me, can I bite your breasts for $1000?" She agrees, so they go to a secluded corner. She opens her blouse and the man puts his face in her breasts for 10 minutes." Eventually the lady asks, "Aren't you gonna bite them?" He replies, "No, it's too expensive."
***
80,000 blondes meet in a football stadium for a "Blondes Are Not Stupid" Convention.
The leader says, "We are all here today to prove to the world that blondes are not stupid. Can I have a volunteer?"  
  
A blonde gingerly works her way through the crowd and steps up to the stage.  
  
The leader asks her, "What is 15 plus 15?"  
  
After 15 or 20 seconds she says, "Eighteen!"  
  
Obviously everyone is a little disappointed. Then 80,000 blondes start cheering, "Give her another chance! Give her another chance!"  
  
The leader says, "Well since we've gone to the trouble of getting 80,000 of you in one place and we have the world- wide press and global broadcast media here, gee, uh, I guess we can give her another chance."  
  
So he asks, "What is 5 plus 5?"  
  
After nearly 30 seconds she eventually says, "Ninety?"  
  
The leader is quite perplexed, looks down and just lets out a dejected sigh -- everyone is disheartened - the blonde starts crying and the 80,000 girls begin to yell and wave their hands shouting, "GIVE HER ANOTHER CHANCE! GIVE HER ANOTHER CHANCE!"  
  
The leader, unsure whether or not he is doing more harm than good, eventually says, "Ok! Ok! Just one more chance -- What is 2 plus 2?"  
  
The girl closes her eyes, and after a whole minute eventually says, "Four?"  
  
Throughout the stadium pandemonium breaks out as all 80,000 girls jump to their feet, wave their arms, stomp their feet and scream... "Give her another chance! Give her another chance!"  
***
My favorite clean joke
A young turtle is seen in the forest climbing up the trunk of a tree. It reaches the first sturdy branch of the tree and climbs out to the very end of it. At the end of the branch it hesitates for a minute before jumping off flailing its legs wildly tumbling end over end before smashing head first into the ground.

Slightly dazed the turtle gets up and starts climbing the tree again. This time the turtle passes the first branch, and starts crawling along a higher, less sturdy branch. Once again he reaches the end, hesitates, and then jumps off flailing wildly and end over end until he smashes head first into the ground.

This time the turtle seems clearly shaken up, but resolutely starts climbing the tree again. He bypasses both the first and second branch and climbs out the highest, most shaky branch. This time when he reaches the end of the branch he looks over and waves at two birds watching him.

The birds look at one another when the male bird says: I think it's time we tell him he is adopted.
***
An American, a German, an Irishman and an Englishman are on a plane...
The plane has four engines, and one of them fails unexpectedly. The pilot says the plane cannot support their weight, so one of them is going to have to jump. The American steps forward, says "I'm doing this for my country", and jumps. A while later, another engine fails. This time, the German steps forward, says "I'm doing this for my country", and jumps. A while after that, another engine fails. This time the Irishman steps forward, says "I'm doing this for my country", grabs the Englishman and throws him out.
***
A man walks into a bar with a dog...
A man walks into a bar with a dog, and says he'll bets $50 his dog can talk. The bartender, thinking that's ridiculous, takes up his offer. The man asks the dog  
"What do you find on top of a house?"  
"Roof!" the dog replies.  
"Hey, that's not fair, ask it a real question!" says the bartender. The man asks again  
"What do you find on a tree?"  
"Bark!" answers the dog again.  
"Are you kidding me? Ask it something a human could answer or I'm kicking you out." The man asks the dog  
'Who's the best baseball player?" The dog replies  
"Ruth!" and the bartender angrily kicks them out. Outside, the dog looks at it's owner, and says "DiMaggio?"

(Sorry it's kinda lame, but it's one of my favorite)  
edit: Thanks for getting me on the front page! I posted it for my cakeday, didn't get the icon until now! Didn't expect it to get so many upvotes!
***
A physicist, mathematician and a priest are trapped in a burning Skyscraper...
On the ground is a huge swimmingpool. Their only chance to survive is to jump into it. The Priest looks at it, prays for 20 min. says "God will help me" jumps, misses and dies. 

The physician looks down, approximates some values, writes down some constants and makes a small experiment, calculates 5 min. says "I hope I remembered the constants well enough",  jumps and lands safely in the pool. 

The mathematician takes out his notebook and in an attempt to come up with a general solution and its proof, spends 2h writing furiously. "This has to work", he says, jumps and flies upwards in a steep curve. He made a sign error.

(Joke from our Physics professor, the room was dying laughing. I hope I didnt screw up too badly translating this from german, have mercy)
***
A black kid and his father are on an airplane
The plane suddenly starts to lose altitude and the captain made an announcement.

"Attention passengers. Due to an engine failure we are forced to dump all your baggage to lighten the plane. Unfortunately the plane is still too heavy so we have no chocie but to start throwing out passengers by alphabetical order until the plane is light enough. We will start with the A's. Will all African Americans please jump out of the plane."

The little boy starts getting up but his dad stopps him.
"We are not African Americans."

Shortly after another announcement is made.
"Ladies and gentlemen we are still to heavy. We must move to the B's. Will all blacks please jump out of the plane."

The boy starts getting up but his dad stops him again.
"No son we are not black."

Shortly after another announcement is made.
"Ladies and gentlemen we are still to heavy, we must now move to the C's. Will all colored people please jump out the plane."

Again the boy starts getting up but his dad stops him.
"No son were not colored."
"But dad, if we're not African American, black, or colored, what are we?"
"Son, today we're niggers and we sure as hell aint jumping before the Mexicans!"
***
A Mexican man sneaks across the border to watch his favorite football team play...
...and makes it all the way to the stadium. He doesn't have tickets so he finds a large pole to climb up on and jumps down into the top of the bleachers to get a bird-eye view of the game.

After the game was over and his buddies ask him how the game was back in Mexico he replies:

"I don't know why you all don't think Americans are nice. As soon as I sat down everyone turned around, looked at me, and started singing 'Jose, can you see?'"
***
Paddy has a broken leg and his buddy Mick comes over to see him.
Mick says, "How you doin'?"

Paddy says, "Okay, but do me a favour mate, run upstairs and get me slippers, me feet are freezing."

Mick goes upstairs and sees Paddy's gorgeous 19-year old twin daughters lying on the bed.

He says, "Your dad's sent me up here to have sex with both of you."

They say, "Get away with ya... Prove it."

Mick shouts downstairs, "Paddy, both of 'em?"

Paddy shouts back, "Of course both of 'em, what's the point of fuckin' one?"

***
A blind man is sitting in a restaurant.
When the waiter comes to the table the blind man asks may he please have the dirty fork of the last diner. The waiter is a bit puzzled but says ok. The blind man puts the fork in his mouth and says, "mmm...meatloaf, that's delicious, I'll have the meatloaf please."

The next night the blind man returns and again makes the same request, the waiter obliges and this time the blind man says, "mmm...pot roast, that's delicious, I'll have the pot roast please."

For the third consecutive evening the blind man returns and again requests the dirty fork. This time the waiter decides to fuck with him a bit and asks his girlfriend Jane who also works at the restaurant to rub the fork on her pussy. So Jane gives it a good rub and the waiter presents it to the blind man who puts it in his mouth and exclaims, "Jane works here???"
***
A lady goes to her priest one day and confesses,...

 "Father, I have a problem. 
I have two female parrots, but they only know how to say one thing."
What do they say?" the priest inquires curiously.
The woman blushes as she explains that the two female birds repeat the same phrase over and over:
 "Hi, we're prostitutes. Do you want to have some fun?"
That's obscene!" the priest exclaims. After a few moments of deliberation, however, he offers a solution. 
"You know," he says, "I have two male parrots, very devout birds, whom I have taught to pray and read the Bible. 
Bring your female parrots to my house, and we'll put them in the cage with Francis and Job. 
My parrots can teach your parrots to praise and worship and speak in a more appropriate manner."
"Thank you," the woman responds, "this may very well be the solution."
The next day, she brings her two female parrots to the priest's house. 
As he ushers her in, she sees his two male parrots inside their cage, holding Rosary beads and praying. 
Impressed, she walks over and places her parrots in with them. 
After a few minutes, the female birds cry out in unison: "Hi, we're prostitutes. Do you want to have some fun?"
There is a stunned silence. Finally, one male parrot looks over at the other male parrot and exclaims, 
"Put the beads away, Francis, our prayers have been answered!"

***
A 90 year old man wins the Powerball for 400 million dollars..
He arrives at the press conference, accepts his giant check and teary eyed with joy proceeds to take questions from the media storm.  First reporter asks "What is your full name?"  He replies his name is Ira Mandelbaum.  Second reporter asks "What are you going to do now?"  Ira replies "First, I am going to buy all of my children their own homes.  Next, I am going to buy myself a nice car.  Then I am going to set-up college funds for my grandchildren.  After all the I am going to build a huge statue of Hitler in my front yard."  The reporters all get quiet until someone finally says "Sir, you just said you wanted to build a tribute to Hitler, why on earth after all he had done to our people would you do this?"  Ira pauses, looks him in the eye, rolls up his sleeve and says "Simple, he gave me the numbers."
***
Tickle Me Elmo
A new employee is hired at the Tickle Me Elmo factory. The personnel manager explains her duties, and tells her to report to work promptly at 8:00 AM.

The next day at 8:45 AM, there's a knock at the personnel manager's door. The assembly line foreman comes in and starts ranting about this new employee. He says she's incredibly slow, and the whole line is backing up.

The foreman takes the personnel manager down to the factory floor to show him the problem. Sure enough, Elmos are backed up all over the place.

At the end of the line is the new employee. She has a roll of the material used for the Elmos and a big bag of marbles. They both watch as she cuts a little piece of fabric, wraps it around two marbles, and starts sewing the little package between Elmo's legs.

The personnel manager starts laughing hysterically. After several minutes, he pulls himself together, walks over to the woman, and says, "I'm sorry, I guess you misunderstood me yesterday. Your job is to give Elmo two test tickles."
***
Four men got together to play golf one sunny morning.
As they were heading out to the course, one of them was detained by a phone call.

The other three were discussing their children while walking to the first tee.

"My son," said one proudly, "has made quite a name for himself in the home building industry.  He began as a carpenter, but now owns his own design and construction firm.  He's so successful, in fact in the last year he was able to give a good friend a brand new home as a gift."

The second man, not to be outdone, boasts how his son began his career as a car salesman, but now owns a multi-line dealership.  "He's so sucessful, in fact, in the last six months he gave a friend two brand new cars as a gift."

The third man brags that his son has worked his way up through a stock brokerage firm, and has become so successful that in the last few weeks has given a good friend a large stock portfolio as a gift.

As the fourth man arrives at the tee box, the three smugly tell him that they have been discussing how successful their progeny are, and ask what line of work his son is in.

"To tell the truth, I'm not very pleased how my son has turned out," he replies.  "For fifteen years, he's been a hairdresser, and I've just recently discovered he's gay."

As the other three recoil in horror, he continues, "but on the bright side, he must be good at what he does, because his last three boyfriends have given him a brand new house, two new cars, and a big stock portolio."
***
A guy dies and wakes up on a beach.
Nice weather, hot girls playing beach volleyball, barbecues everywhere, laughter and joy.                                                   All of a sudden, Satan comes up to him. "Welcome to hell. Enjoy yourself, have a drink, have a hamburger and check out the area. If you need anything or have a question, feel free to ask me." he says.                                                                                      The guy walks along the beach, has a few drinks with a nice girl. He walks over a hill, when he sees a hole in the ground, full with tormented people, flames rising up from the hole.                      The guy runs towards the beach until he finds Satan.                       "Hey, I found this hole and all these people are being tormented... What´s that about?"                                                                        "Oh," Satan says, "that´s for the Christians, they want it that way."
***
A Job For a Woman
The CIA has three candidates, two men and a woman, for one assassin position. On the final day of testing, the CIA proctor leads the first male candidate to a large steel door and hands him a gun.  

"We must know that you will follow our instructions, regardless of the circumstances," he explains.  

"Inside this room, you will find your wife sitting in a chair. Take this gun and kill her." The man is horrified, "You can't be serious! I could never shoot my wife!" "Well," says the proctor, "you're definitely not the right man for this job then." 

The CIA proctor leads the second male candidate to another large steel door and hands him a gun.  "We must know that you will follow instructions, no matter what the circumstances," the proctor explains.  "Inside this room, you will find your wife sitting in a chair. Take this gun and kill her." The second man steadies himself, takes the gun and enters the room.  After three quiet minutes, the man exits the room with tears in his eyes.  "I wanted to do it I just couldn't pull the trigger and shoot my wife. I guess I'm not the right man for the job." 

Finally, the CIA proctor leads the female candidate to yet another large steel door and hands her a gun.  "We must be sure that you will follow instructions, no matter what the circumstances. Inside this room, you will find your husband sitting in a chair. Take this gun and kill him." 

The woman takes the gun, enters the room, and before the door even closes completely behind her, she's fired off six shots. Then all hell breaks loose behind the door cursing, screaming, crashing.  

Suddenly, all goes quiet. The door opens slowly, the woman exits, and wiping the sweat from her brow, she says, *"Did you guys know the gun was loaded with blanks? I had to beat the son of a bitch to death with the chair!"*
***
The Man and the Nun.
A man gets on a bus, and ends up sitting next to a very attractive nun. 

Enamored with her, he asks if he can have sex with her. 

Naturally, she says no, and gets off the bus. 

The man goes to the bus driver and asks him if he knows of a way for him to have sex with the nun.

 "Well," says the bus driver, "every night at 8 o'clock, she goes to the cemetery to pray.

 If you dress up as God, I'm sure you could convince her to have sex with you." 

The man decides to try it, and dresses up in his best God costume.

 At eight, he sees the nun and appears before her.

 "Oh, God!" she exclaims. "Take me with you!" 

The man tells the nun that she must first have sex with him to prove her loyalty. 

The nun says yes, but tells him she prefers anal sex. 

Before you know it, they're getting down to it, having nasty, grunty, loud sex. 

After it's over, the man pulls off his God disguise. "Ha, ha! I'm the man from the bus!" 

"Ha, ha!" says the nun, removing her costume. "I'm the bus driver!"
***
Hot girl at prom
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to the prom. First he goes to rent a tux, but there’s a long tux line at the shop and it takes forever.
Next, he has to get some flowers, so he heads over to the florist and there’s a huge flower line there. He waits forever but eventually gets the flowers.
Then he heads out to rent a limo. Unfortunately, there’s a large limo line at the rental office, but he’s patient and gets the job done.
Finally, the day of the prom comes. The two are dancing happily and his girlfriend is having a great time. When the song is over, she asks him to get her some punch, so he heads over to the punch table and there’s no punchline.

***
There are two sisters...
... one is blonde and the other is brunette and they inherit the family farm. 

Unfortunately, after just a few years, they are in financial trouble. 

In order to keep the bank from repossessing the farm, they need to purchase a bull from the stockyard in a far town so that they can breed their own stock. 

They only have $600 left. 

Upon leaving, the brunette tells her sister, "When I get there, if I decide to buy the bull, I'll contact you to drive out after me and haul it home." 

The brunette arrives at the stockyard, inspects the bull, and decides she wants to buy it. 

The man tells her that he will sell it for $599, no less. 

After paying him, she drives to the nearest town to send her sister a telegram to tell her the news. 

She walks into the telegraph office, and says, "I want to send a telegram to my sister telling her that I've bought a bull for our farm. 

I need her to hitch the trailer to our 4x4 and drive out here so we can haul it home." 

The telegraph operator explains that he'll be glad to help her, and then adds, "It's just 99 cents a word." 

Well, after paying for the bull, the brunette only has $1 left. 

She realizes that she'll only be able to send her sister one word. 

After a few minutes of thinking, she nods and says, "I want you to send her the word comfortable." 

The operator shakes his head. "How is she ever going to know that you want her to hitch the trailer to your 4x4 and drive out here to haul that bull back to your farm if you send her just the word "comfortable?" 

The brunette explains, "My sister's blonde. It's a big word. She'll read it very slowly..... 
***
NASA have found out about an intelligent feline creature living on Mars.
Unfortunately, Curiosity killed the cat.

Credit from /u/OneTap from https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/3mkami/what_would_be_the_most_underwhelming_announcement/cvftmc3
***
A man is getting married, and decides to get a tattoo to honor his bride to be
He wants to get her name, Wendy, tattooed on his penis. When he goes to get it done, he finds out that it has to be hard. 

As a result, his flaccid penis just says WY. 

On their honey moon in jamaica, this man finds himself in the bathroom at a bar next to the local bartender. Rather drunk, he accidentally looks over and sees that thr bartender has a tattoo on his penis that also says WY.

He says, "hey, is your wife named Wendy too?"

The bartender say, "Nah mon, it says welcome to Jamaica, enjoy your stay"
***
Chinese takeout: $11.77. Price of gas to get there: $1.90. Making it all the way home and realizing that they forgot one of the containers:
Riceless

Edit: Just got back from incubating eggs to find out my brother now knows my username.Thank you. 
***
Woman takes a lover home during the day while her husband is at work.
Her 9 year old son comes home unexpectedly, sees them, and hides in the bedroom closet to watch. Just after getting into bed, the woman's husband also comes home unexpectedly, she tells her lover to hide in the closet, not realizing that the little boy is in there. 

After a little while the little boy says, 'Dark in here. 

The man, who obviously got a real fright not expecting to hear anything, let alone from a little boy says, 'Yes, it is.'

Boy - 'I have a football.' 

Man - 'That's nice.' 

Boy - 'Want to buy it?' 

Man - 'No, thanks.' 

Boy - 'My dad's outside.' 

Man - 'OK, how much?' 

Boy - '$ 250' 

In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the lover are in the closet together. 

Boy - 'Dark in here.' 

Man - 'Yes, it is' 

Boy - 'I have football shoes.' 

The lover, remembering the last time, asks the boy, 'OK, How much this time?' 

Boy - '$ 750' 

Man - 'Sold.' 

A few days later, the boys' father says to the boy, 'Grab your shoes and football, let's go outside and throw it around.' 

The boy says, 'I can't, I sold my ball and shoes.'
The father asks, 'How much did you sell them for and to whom?' 

The boy says, 'To a friend of mine for a $1,000.' 

The father says, 'That's a terrible thing to do, overcharging your friend like that'. 'That's four times what they cost when they were new, I'm going to take you to church and make you confess your terrible sins.' 

They go to the church and the father makes the little boy sit in the confession booth, and he closes the door. 

The boy says, 'Dark in here'.. 

The priest says, 'Don't you start that shit again, you little prick, you're in my closet now'!!

***
I'm just back from Walt Disney world so....
Micky Mouse wants a divorce.

Judge: Look here Mr. Mouse, I cannot grant you a divorce from Minnie.

Mickey (stunned): Why not?

Judge: I have reviewed all the information you gave the court, but i can't find any evidence at all to support the grounds that she is crazy.

Mickey (exasperated): Your honor! I didn't say she was crazy... 

I said she was fucking Goofy!
***
Johnny wanted to have sex....
Johnny wanted to have sex with a girl in his office, but she belonged to someone else…

One day, Johnny got so frustrated that he went up to her and said, "I’ll give you a $100 if you let me screw you,But the girl said NO.

Johnny said, "I’ll be fast. I’ll throw the money on the floor, you bend down, and I’ll be finished by the time you pick it up." 

She thought for a moment and said that she would have to consult her boyfriend… So she called her boyfriend and told him the story. Her boyfriend says, "Ask him for $200, pick up the money very fast, he won’t even be able to get his pants down." 

So she agrees and accepts the proposal. Half an hour goes by, and the boyfriend is waiting for his girlfriend to call. Finally, after 45 minutes, the boyfriend calls and asks what happened.

She responded, "The bastard used coins!"

***
Sea captain joke
A young sailor is walking the
 docks and spots a sea captain, examining his deck. The sea captain has a peg leg, a hook and an eyepatch. The young sailor, curious, asks the captain "How did you get your peg leg?" The captain replies "Arrr it was a stormy night, and a gust of wind blew me of me boat. In the water a shark bit off me leg." The sailor then asks "How did you get the hook?" To which the captain replies "I was in a fierce sword fight with another bucanneer and the bastard cut off me hand." "Wow you are brave sea aged captain, but how did you get the eyepatch?" "Arrrgh a damned seagull pooped in me eye." "Why didn't you wipe it out?" "Twas me first day with the hook."
***
Ranji is a 9yr old boy living in Namibia.
Can you spare just $2.00? Ranji is a 9yr old boy living in Namibia. He has only 1 leg, 1 arm and 1 eye. Each day he has to ride 7 miles to school along a narrow road on a rusty bike with bent wheels, no brakes and only 1 pedal. If you send us just $2, we will send you the video - its  hilarious.   

***
My fav Aussie joke: An Aussie Virgin
A 40-year-old woman wants to get married, but she is only willing to marry a man if he is still a virgin.

 After several unsuccessful years of searching, she decides to take out a personal ad. She ends up corresponding with a man who has lived his entire life in the Australian Outback.

They end up getting married. On their wedding night, she goes into the bathroom to prepare for the festivities. 

When she returns to the bedroom, she finds her new husband standing in the middle of the room naked and all the furniture from the room piled in one corner.

"What happened?" she asks.

"I've never been with a woman," he says, "but if it's anything like a kangaroo, I'm going to need all the room 1 can get."
***
A man escapes from a prison where he’s been locked up for 15 years.
He breaks into a house and inside, he finds a young couple in bed.
He ties him to a chair. While tying the wife to the bed, the convict gets on top of her, kisses her neck, then gets up and goes into the bathroom.

While he’s in there, the husband whispers over to his wife,
“Listen, this guy is an escaped convict. Look at his clothes! He’s probably spent a lot of time in jail and hasn’t seen a woman in years.
I saw how he kissed your neck. If he wants sex, don’t resist, don’t complain. Do whatever he tells you. Satisfy him no matter how much he nauseates you. This guy is obviously very dangerous. If he gets angry, he’ll kill us both. Be strong, honey. I love you!”

She responds: “He wasn’t kissing my neck. He was whispering in my ear. He told me that he’s gay, thinks you’re cute, and asked if we had any Vaseline. I told him it was in the bathroom. Be strong honey. I love you, too.”
***
A bear goes into a bar
he sits down and immediately mauls to death and devours the woman on the stool next to him. he then calmly orders a beer
bartender: "sorry, we don't serve drug users in here" bear: "but I don't do drugs" bartender: "what about that barbitchyouate"
***
Bench Bros...
Two guys are in the gym working on their bench pressing when a busty coed comes up to the rack next to them and begins to do her workout. One guy turns to his spotter and says "hey you think that's a push up bra?" And his spotter says "nah brah, that's a squat" 
***
The rose...
There was once an Irish actor who did Shakespearean plays, but had aged and could no longer remember his lines.

After many years, he finds himself in the St. John's Theatre in Newfoundland, where they are prepared to give him a chance to shine again.

The director says, “This is the most important part, and it has only one line. You walk on to the stage carrying a rose. You hold the rose to your nose with just one finger and thumb, sniff the rose deeply and then say the line, “Ah, the sweet aroma of my mistress.”

The Irish actor is thrilled. All day long before the play he was practising his line over and over again.

Finally, the time came. 
 
The curtain went up, the actor walked onto the stage, and using just his thumb and one finger he delivered the line, “Ah, the sweet aroma of my mistress.”

The theatre erupted, the audience was screaming with laughter and the director was steaming! 

“You bloody fool!” he cried! “You have ruined me!”

The Irish actor was bewildered! “What happened, did I forget my line?"

"No!” screamed the director. “You forgot the rose!"
***
Do You Drink Beer?
Lady: Do you drink beer?

 Man: Yes.

 Lady: How many beers a day?

 Man: Usually about 3.

 Lady: How much do you pay per beer?

 Man: $5 with a tip.

 Lady: And how long have you been drinking?

 Man: 20 years, I suppose.

 Lady: So a beer costs $5 and you have 3 beers a day which puts your spending each month at $450. In one year, it would be $5400 correct?

 Man: Correct.

 Lady: If in 1 year you spend $5400, not accounting for inflation, the past 20 years puts your spending at $108,000, correct?

 Man: Correct.

 Lady: Do you know that if you didn't drink so much beer, that money could have been put in a step-up interest savings account and after accounting for compound interest for the past 20 years, you could have now bought a Ferrari?
 Man: Do you drink beer?

 Lady: No... Why?

 Man: Where's your Ferrari?
***
Little Tony
Little Tony was sitting at a park bench eating candy bars. Sitting across from him on anither bench is a man. He walks over to Little Tony and says

"Don't you know you're gonna get fat eating that many candy bars?"

Little Tony says "Well my grandpa lived to be one hundred and four."

The man said "really,  by eating six candy bars at a time?

Little Tony shakes his head and says

"No, he minded his own fucking business!"
***
A man makes a bet with his boss
He bets $500 that he can lick his eyeball.

Laughing the boss agrees.

The man takes off a fake eyeball and licks it.

The boss angrily gives him the $500.

The man then bets $500 he can bite his own ears.

The boss pulls his ears to check if the man is wearing any fake ones, then agrees.

The man takes out a set of fake teeth from his mouth and bites his ear with them.

Angry, the boss gives him $500 and tells him to go away.

The next day, the man comes back.

Boss: What now? Didn't you take enough money from me?

Man: Trust me. This one should be easy. I bet you all your money back that you are wearing purple underwear.

Boss: Haha! My underwear is black! 

Man: May I see some proof? 

The boss goes to the washroom and brings back his underwear in his hands.

The man cheerfully hands $1000 to the boss.

Boss: Why are you so happy?

Man: Look around you. All around the office's glass walls your 43 employees are watching.

Boss: And..? 

Man: I bet each of them $500 that I can make you take off your underwear. 
***
THE BOSS
One day a man goes to a pet shop to buy a parrot. The assistant takes the man to the parrot section and asks the man to choose one. The man asks, ''How much is the yellow one?''
The assistant says, ''$2000.'' The man is shocked and asks the assistant why it's so expensive. The assistant explains, ''This parrot is a very special one. He knows typewriting and can type really fast.''
''What about the green one?'' the man asks.
The assistant says, ''He costs $5000 because he knows typewriting and can answer incoming telephone calls and takes notes.''
''What about the red one?'' the man asks.
The assistant says, ''That one's $10,000.''
The man says, ''What does HE do?''
The assistant says, ''I don't know, but the other two call him boss.''
***
Accounting Joke (from my professor)
A priest, a lawyer, and an accountant were all at the bedside of a very ill man. The man said to them, 

"Gentlemen, I'm dying. Before I go, however, I want to ask you one final favor: My family is rotten and I don't want to give any of them an inheritance. I would like to be buried with the remainder of my money." He then hands the priest, the lawyer, and the accountant three envelopes that contain $100,000 each. 

"While my coffin is being lowered into the earth, please throw each of the envelopes in. Don't tell anyone what's inside the envelopes."

So the three men leave. Sure enough, one week later, the man dies. During the funeral, the three men toss the envelopes into the grave whilst the coffin was being lowered. After the funeral, the three men go to a cafe to discuss the life of the old man. The priest says,

"I have a confession: I took $10,000 from my envelope. But I used it to fix up the children's home. The old man was always very generous and loved the children. I'm sure he wouldn't mind seeing where his money went."

The lawyer pipes in,

"Well, I also have a confession: I took $30,000 as payment of a personal loan he borrowed from me years ago."

The accountant, looking rather shocked, says,

"I cannot believe you two! I wrote a personal check that covered the whole thing!"

***
A Muslim boy moves to Ireland...
... On his first day of school his teacher asks, "What is your name?"

"My name is Mohammed" the boy replies.

"You live in Ireland now, Your new name is Mike" says the teacher.

The boy smiles and has a good time in his classes.

After school the boy returns home and is greeted by his mother.

"How was your first day at school, Mohammed?" his mother asks.

"I live in Ireland now, my new name is Mike!" The boy replies.

His mother becomes infuriated, "Have you forgotten where you came from? Your heritage? You have disgraced your ancestors!"

and his mother beat him and when his father comes home from work he does the same.

The next day the boy returns to school and his teacher sees his fresh bruises.

"Mike! What happened?" asked the teacher.

The boy replies with a grimace "Well, shortly after becoming an Irishman I was jumped by two fucking Arabs!"
***
Dear Diary
Wife's Diary:
 
Tonight, I thought my husband was acting weird. We had made plans to meet at a nice restaurant for dinner. 
I was shopping with my friends all day long, so I thought he was upset at the fact that I was a bit late, but he made no comment on it. Conversation wasn't flowing, so I suggested that we go somewhere quiet so we could talk. He agreed, but he didn't say much.

 
I asked him what was wrong; He said, 'Nothing.' I asked him if it was my fault that he was upset. He said he wasn't upset, that it had nothing to do with me, and not to worry about it.
On the way home, I told him that I loved him. He smiled slightly, and kept driving. I can't explain his behavior. I don't know why he didn't say, 'I love you, too.'

 
When we got home, I felt as if I had lost him completely, as if he wanted nothing to do with me anymore. He just sat there quietly, and watched TV. He continued to seem distant and absent. Finally, with silence all around us, I decided to go to bed. About 15 minutes later, he came to bed. But I still felt that he was distracted, and his thoughts were somewhere else. He fell asleep; I cried. I don't know what to do. I'm almost sure that his thoughts are with someone else. My life is a disaster.
 

Husband's Diary:

 
A two-foot putt .. who the hell misses a two-foot putt? 

***
Asian Keanu
Asian Keanu arrives at party.

Asian Keanu gets bored.

Asian Keanu Reeves.
***
What's the difference between Dubai and Abu Dhabi?
People in Dubai don't like the Flintstones but people in Abu Dhabi doooooo.
***
While teaching a class,
A teacher trying to teach good manners asked her students the following question:


"Michael, if you were on a date having dinner with a nice young lady, how would you tell her that you have to go to the bathroom?"


Michael said: "Just a minute I have to go pee."


The teacher responded by saying: "That would be rude and impolite. What about you Sherman, how would you say it?"


Sherman said: "I am sorry, but I really need to go to the bathroom. I’ll be right back."


"That’s better, but it’s still not very nice to say the word bathroom at the dinner table. And you, little Johnny, can you use your brain for once and show us your good manners?"


Johnny said: "I would say: Darling, may I please be excused for a moment? I have to shake hands with a very dear friend of mine, who I hope to introduce you to after dinner."
***
Three wives
Three women are chatting, a French, an American and a Russian.

The French says: "After we got married, I told my husband right away that I was not going to cook, do dishes and laundry or clean the house. He disappeared, I didn't see him for a day, two, three, then he came back with a housemaid. Now she does all that, and I just sit and relax all day long."

The American says: "Well, after we got married, I told my husband the same. Didn't see him for a day, two, three, then he came back with some big appliance. Now it does all that automatically,  and I just sit and relax all day long."

The Russian says: "After we got married, I told my husband that I wouldn't do all that either. I didn't see him for a day, two, three. On the fourth day I was finally able to see something with my right eye."
***
A driver is pulled over by a policeman....
The policeman approaches the drivers door.

"Is there a problem, Officer?"

The policeman says, "Sir, you were speeding. Can I see your license please?"

The driver responds, "I'd give it to you but I don't have one."

"You don't have one?"

The man responds, "I lost it four times for drink driving."

The policeman is shocked. "I see. Can I see your vehicle registration papers please?"

"I'm sorry, I can't do that."

The policeman says, "Why not?"

"I stole this car."

The officer says, "Stole it?"

The man says, "Yes, and I killed the owner."

At this point the officer is getting irate. "You what?"

"She's in the boot if you want to see."

The Officer looks at the man and slowly backs away to his car and calls for back up. Within minutes, five police cars show up, surrounding the car. A senior officer slowly approaches the car, clasping his half-drawn gun.

The senior officer says, "Sir, could you step out of your vehicle please!"

The man steps out of his vehicle. "Is there a problem, sir?"

"One of my officers told me that you have stolen this car and murdered the owner."

"Murdered the owner?"

The officer responds, "Yes, could you please open the boot of your car please?"

The man opens the boot, revealing nothing but an empty boot.

The officer says, "Is this your car sir?"

The man says, "Yes" and hands over the registration papers.

The officer, understandably, is quite stunned. "One of my officers claims that you do not have a driving licence."

The man digs in his pocket revealing a wallet and hands it to the officer. The officer opens the wallet and examines the licence. He looks quite puzzled. "Thank you, sir. One of my officers told me you didn't have a licence, stole this car, and murdered the owner."

The man replies, "I bet you the lying bastard told you I was speeding, too!"

Edit: Whoa - front page! 
***
A Native American asked his chief about the coming winter
"How bad will this winter be?" He asked.

"It is good to be prepared. Get some firewood ready" replied the chief.

The chief then called his friend in the national weather service to ask him. " How bad will this winter be?"

The meteorologist said "this will be a pretty cold winter"

The chief then told his people what the meteorologist said. A few weeks later the chief called to ask again, just to be sure.

"Well," said the meteorologist, "its gonna be worse than we thought this year." 

Again the chief relayed this to his people and told them to put out more firewood.

Right before the winter came, the chief called the meteorologist once more to ask, "how bad will this winter be?" 

The meteorologist said "it's gonna be worse than we thought"

The chief thanked the meteorologist and asked him "how do you get such accurate information?"

"Well, we have teams of scientists that study patterns to predict what the weather will be like. But we found that the most reliable method is to just look at how much firewood the native Americans put out"
***
The bartender Say's "Free"
A guy walks into the bar of a restaurant and goes to the bartender and asks "how much for a beer?" The bartender replies "free". The customer completely amazed, orders a beer then asks the bartender "Well then how much for a NY sirloin, with side of mashed potatoes and salad, and an entire cheesecake for desert?" The Bartender reply's "free". The guy still amazed then orders everything and after he is done eating his meal then says "Wow, this place is amazing, I really wish I could meet the owner of this place". The bartender then says "Oh well, he's upstairs in his office with my wife". The guy looks all confused then asks "What is he doing upstairs in his office with your wife?" The bartender then says "The same thing I'm doing to his business".

***
A rancher dies and leaves everything to his wife.
She was a very good-looking woman and determined to keep the ranch, but knew very little about ranching, so she decided to place an ad in the newspaper for a ranch hand.

Two cowboys applied for the job. One was gay and the other a drunk.
She thought long and hard about it, and when no one else applied she decided to hire the gay guy, figuring it would be safer to have him around the house than the drunk.

He proved to be a hard worker who put in long hours every day and knew a lot about ranching.

For weeks, the two of them worked, and the ranch was doing very well.
Then one day, the rancher's widow said to the hired hand, "You have done a really good job, and the ranch looks great. You should go into town and kick up your heels." The hired hand readily agreed and went into town one Saturday night.

One o'clock came, however, and he didn't return.

Two o'clock and no hired hand.

Finally he returned a round two-thirty, and upon entering the room, he found the rancher's widow sitting by the fireplace with a glass of wine, waiting for him.

She quietly called him over to her..

"Unbutton my blouse and take it off," she said.

Trembling, he did as she directed. "Now take off my boots."

He did as she asked, ever so slowly.. "Now take off my socks."

He removed each gently and placed them neatly by her boots.

"Now take off my skirt."

He slowly unbuttoned it, constantly watching her eyes in the fire light.
"Now take off my bra.." Again, with trembling hands, he did as he was told and dropped it to the floor.

Then she looked at him and said, "If you ever wear my clothes into town again, you're fired."
***
Three couples marry and stay at the same hotel for their honeymoons
where they are taken care of by Dave the bellboy. The first man married a nurse.  Dave thinks to himself, "Nurses are known to be hot to trot." The second man married a telephone operator.  Dave thinks to himself, "Telephone operators have sexy voices." The third man married a school teacher.  Dave thinks to himself, "Poor guy, teachers are frigid." The next morning, Dave reports to work and gets a room service call from the nurse's husband.  He sourly says, "Don't ever marry a nurse. All I heard last night was 'You're not sanitary, you're not sanitary.'" Then, the telephone operator's husband calls and sourly says, "Don't ever marry a telephone operator. All I heard last night was 'Your three minutes are up, your three minutes are up.'" Later that afternoon, the teacher's husband calls and happily says, "When you marry, be sure to marry a school teacher. All I heard last night was 'We are going to do this over and over until we get right.'"
***
A boy goes into confession...
The boy tells the priest, "Father I'm afraid I've been with a loose girl."

"Hmm, ok son, what was the girls name?"

"Oh I can't say."

"Was it Mary Jane?"

"No Father."

"Adalina Mozarelli?" 

"My lips are sealed."

"How about Cindy King"

"I can never say."

"Oh come on boy, I'll find out soon enough. It was Tina King wasn't it!?"

"No."

"It has to be Tracy Cummings though!"

"Father I will never tell you."

"Ok fine, but for your sin you can't be alter boy for four months."

"Ok, Father"

The boy leaves and his friend asks, "So what'd you get?"

The boy responds, "Five good leads, and a four month vacation!"

***
Johnny wanted to have sex with a girl in his office, but she was dating someone else…
Johnny wanted to have sex with a girl in his office, but she was dating someone else. One day, Johnny got so frustrated that he went up to her and said, “I’ll give you a $100 if you let me screw you. But the girl said NO. Johnny said, “I’ll be fast. I’ll throw the money on the floor, you bend down, and I’ll be finished by the time you pick it up. ” She thought for a moment and said that she would have to consult her boyfriend… So she called her boyfriend and told him the story. Her boyfriend says, “Ask him for $200, pick up the money very fast, he won’t even be able to get his pants down.” So she agrees and accepts the proposal. Half an hour goes by, and the boyfriend is waiting for his girlfriend to call. Finally, after 45 minutes, the boyfriend calls and asks what happened.
She replied ''I've only just finished picking it up, the bastard used change''
***
Geography class
-Whats the capital of Germany?

-Berlin teacher

-Whats the capital of France?

-Berlin again teacher

-Whats the capital of Poland?

-Still Berlin teacher

-Adolf! If you keep this up you'll fail geography!

-We'll see about that
***
An English man, Welsh man and a Indian man walk are in a maternity hospital.
The doctor tells them theres been a mix up and doesn't know who's baby is who's. The English man runs in and grabs the only brown baby and starts to walk out. The Indian man looks relly confused and says "I'm pretty sure that's not your baby it looks Indian so it's mine". The English man says "I know, but there's not a chance in hell I'm leaving here with a baby that could be Welsh."
***
Hillary Clinton has a seizure during the debate...
"Mrs. Clinton," the Moderator asks, "What is your plan to lower the national debt?"

Suddenly, Hillary flails her arms around, rolls her eyes wildly, foams at the mouth, and gibbers incoherently for several awkward minutes. Finally, she collapses in a heap and soils herself.

"Hey!" Trump interrupts, "Is she allowed to just steal my answer like that??"
***
The taxman . . .
At the end of the tax year, The Taxation Office sent an inspector to audit the books of a local hospital. While the agent was checking the books, he turned to the executive of the hospital and said, “I notice you buy a lot of bandages.  What do you do with the end of the roll when there's too little left to be of any use?"


"Good question," noted the executive.  "We save them up and send them back to the bandage company and every once in a while, they send us a free roll."


"Oh," replied the auditor, somewhat disappointed that his unusual question had a practical answer.


But on he went, in his obnoxious way.  ”What about all these plaster purchases?  What do you do with what's left over after setting a cast on a patient?"


"Ah, yes," replied the executive, realizing that the inspector was trying to trap him with an unanswerable question.  "We save it and send it back to the manufacturer and every so often they send us a free bag of plaster."


"I see," replied the auditor, thinking hard about how he could fluster the know-it-all executive.  "Well, What do you do with all the remains from the circumcision surgeries?"


"Here, too, we do not waste," answered the executive.  "What we do is save all the little foreskins and send them to the tax office, and about once a year they send us a complete prick."
***
Memory trick
Two very elderly couples bump into each other in the street, Jack says " hi there George, how are you?" George says " Great! we've just been to that new memory clinic, they teach you how to remember things using word association, it's really good" Jack asks " really? what's the name of the clinic?" George thinks for a moment and then says " let me see, eh, what do you call that flower with a thorny stem?"
Jack says "A rose"?
"Ah yes that's it" George turns to his wife...."Rose, what's the name of that clinic"?
***
Why hasn't the towns most successful lawyer ever made a donation? ...
A local United Way office realized that the organization had never received a donation from the town's most successful lawyer. The person in charge of contributions called him to persuade him to contribute. "Our research shows that out of a yearly income of at least $500,000, you did not give a penny to charity. Wouldn't you like to give back to the community in some way?" The lawyer mulled this over for a moment and replied, "First, did your research also show that my mother is dying after a long illness, and has medical bills that are several times her annual income?" Embarrassed, the United Way rep mumbled, "Um, no." The lawyer interrupts, "Or that my brother, a disabled veteran, is blind and confined to a wheelchair?" The stricken United Way rep began to stammer out an apology, but was interrupted again. "Or that my sister's husband died in a traffic accident," the lawyer's voice rising in indignation, "leaving her penniless with three children?!" The humiliated United Way rep, completely beaten,  said simply, "I had no idea." On a roll, the lawyer cut him off once again, "So if I don't give any money to them, why should I give any to you?" 
***
A man and a woman meet . . .
A woman meets a man in a bar.  They talk; they connect.  They end up leaving together.   They get back to his place, and he shows her around his apartment.  She notices that one wall of his bedroom is completely filled with soft, sweet, cuddly teddy bears.


There are three shelves in the bedroom, with hundreds and hundreds of cute, cuddly Teddy Bears carefully placed in rows, covering the entire wall.  It was obvious that he had taken quite some time to lovingly arrange them and she was immediately touched by the amount of thought he had put into organizing the display.


There were small bears all along the bottom shelf, medium-sized bears covering the length of the middle shelf, and huge, enormous bears running all the way along the top shelf.  She found it strange for an obviously masculine guy to have such a large collection of Teddy Bears.  She is quite impressed by his sensitive side.


But, she doesn't mention this to him. 


They share a bottle of wine and continue talking and, after awhile, she finds herself thinking, Oh my God!  Maybe, this guy could be the one! Just maybe, this could be the future father of my children.  She turns to him and kisses him lightly on the lips. He responds warmly and they continue to kiss, the passion builds, and he romantically lifts her in his arms and carries her into his bedroom where they rip off each other's clothes and make hot, steamy love.


She is so overwhelmed that she responds with more passion, more creativity, more heat than she has ever known.  After an intense, explosive night of raw passion with this sensitive guy, they are lying there together in the afterglow.


The woman rolls over, gently strokes his chest and asks coyly, 'Well, how was it?' 


The guy gently smiles at her, strokes her cheek, looks deeply into her eyes, and says --  


'Help yourself to any prize from the middle shelf.'
***
So I was at my bank today.
 There was a short line. There was just one lady in front of me, an Asian lady who was trying to exchange yuan for dollars. It was obvious she was a little irritated. 

She asked the teller, "Why it change? Yesterday, I get two hundred dollar for yuan. Today I only get hundred eighty? Why it change?"

The teller shrugged his shoulders and said, "Fluctuations. 

The Asian lady says, "Fluck you white people too!"

***
A large woman, wearing a sleeveless sundress walked into a bar in Dublin.
She raised her right arm, revealing a huge, hairy armpit and, as she pointed to all the people sitting at the bar she asked, "What man here will buy a lady a drink?"

The bar went silent as patrons tried to ignore her. But down at the end of the bar, an owly-eyed drunk slammed his hand down on the counter and bellowed, "Give the ballerina a drink!"

The bartender poured the drink and the woman chugged it down.

She turned to the patrons and again pointed around at all of them, revealing the same hairy armpit, and asked, "What man here will buy a lady a drink?"

Once again, the same little drunk slapped his money down on the bar and said, "Give the ballerina another drink!"

The bartender approached the little drunk and said, "Tell me, Paddy, it's your business if you want to buy the lady a drink, but why do you keep calling her the ballerina?"

The drunk replied, "Any woman who can lift her leg that high has got to be a ballerina!"
***
A State Trooper was patrolling late at night off the main highway.
At nearly midnight, he sees a couple in a car, in lovers' lane, with the interior light brightly glowing. 

He carefully approaches the car to get a closer look and he sees a young man behind the wheel, reading a computer magazine.

He immediately notices a young woman in the rear seat, filing her fingernails.

Puzzled by this surprising situation, the trooper walks to the car and gently raps on the driver's window.
The young man lowers his window. 'Uh, yes, Officer'?

The trooper asks: 'What are you doing?'

The young man says: 'Well, Officer, I'm reading a magazine.'

Pointing towards the young woman in the back seat the trooper says: 'And, her, what is she doing?'

The young man shrugs: 'Sir , I believe she's filing her fingernails.'

Now, the trooper is totally confused. A young couple, alone, in a car, at night in a lover's lane and nothing obscene is happening!

The trooper asks: 'What's your age, young man?'

The young man says: 'I'm 22, sir.'

The trooper asks: 'And her, what's her age?'

The young man looks at his watch and replies:'She'll be 18 in 11 minutes.
***
There was a boy standing on a corner selling fish.
He was saying, "Dam fish for sale, dam fish for sale."

A preacher walked up and asked why he was calling them dam fish.
The kid said, "I caught them at the dam, so they're dam fish."
The preacher bought some, took them home and asked his wife to cook the dam fish.

His wife looked at him in bewilderment and said, "Preachers aren't supposed to talk like that."

The preacher explained why they were dam fish, and she agreed to cook them. When dinner was ready and everyone was sitting down, the preacher asked his son to pass him the dam fish.
His son replied, "That's the spirit dad. Pass the fucking potatoes!"
***
So the Pope has gotten bored staying in the vatican for years on end
So the Pope has gotten bored staying in the vatican for years on end, so he decided to travel the world doing services and meeting cardinals and bishops around the globe. Despite all this travel, he, of course, never drives. He always has a different chauffeur to take him wherever he is going who always meet him at the airport and take him wherever he wants to go. The Pope misses driving, so one day he asks his driver, "Do you mind if I drive, just this once? I haven't driven ever since becoming pope."

Now, the chauffeur was a very pious man and didn't want to offend the Pope, but doesn't want to get in trouble with his boss. Eventually he decides that that it was a quick drive and that no one would know, so he agrees. 

They both get in the car with the Pope in the driver's seat, but as soon as the car got out of the parking lot, the Pope started speeding, cutting people off, running red lights and stop signs, just driving terribly in general. The chauffeur is panicking. He would lose his job, surely. And yet, he doesn't say a thing, being too afraid to offend the Pope. 

Sure enough, they get pulled over. As the cop walks up to the car, the chauffeur nearly faints. However, he takes one look in the window and turns right around and phones base. 

"Sir, I've got a problem here. I've just pulled someone ever that is very important. I don't think I can book him."

The chief responds, "Too important? Impossible. Who is it, some celebrity?"

"More important sir."

"The mayor, then."

"Even more important."

"Governor?"

"More important, sir."

"The president?"

"Even more important."

The chief was stumped. "Well, who could it be?"

"Sir, I think it's god."

"What? Why could you possibly think that?"

"Well, sir, his chauffeur is the Pope."


***
So two whales are swimming along...
... when they spot a whaling ship. The first whale, in shock, says, "Hey! That's that ship that attacked our pod last year. We should sink it. We'll dive deep under the boat and blow bubbles up. The bubbles will capsize the boat and they'll sink!"

The second whale agrees and they begin their attack on the unsuspecting boat. The two whales take enormous breaths and dive deep under the boat. They blow all the air  out their blowholes and the bubbles race toward the surface. When the two whales come up they see the boat is capsized and sinking and several sailors are in the water.

"Oh man!" says the first whale. "We got 'em. Look, they're all swimming in the water. Now we can eat them!"

The second whale, taken aback, then says, "Sorry man, I'll help with the blow job, but I won't swallow seamen."
***
Denise and WHAT?!
A woman falls into a coma as she is giving birth. When she wakes up a few weeks later, the doctor greets her with some news.

"Congratulations! You had twins; a boy and a girl. Since you were in a coma, we gave your brother the liberty of naming your children."

"What did he name them?" she worriedly asked, "he isn't very bright!"

"Your daughter is Denise," replied the doctor.

Slightly relieved she says, "That's not so bad! And the boy?"

"Danephew."


***
Hitler and Stalin walk together in the afterlife
... they stop next two people and Hitler tells Stalin: "Let me tell you of my plan: I am going to kill six million Jews and a mechanic.

one of the two people hear this and asks Hitler "Why kill the mechanic?"

Hitler turns to Stalin and says: "see? I told you nobody cares about the Jews"
***
Ready for hell?
A girl is standing at The Gates of Heaven when she hears horrible screams of pain and torture coming from inside.

 She says to St. Peter, "What's going on?"

 He says, "That's the sound of new angels getting big holes drilled into their backs for their wings, and small holes drilled into their heads for their halos."

 She says, "Heaven sounds terrible. I think maybe I'd rather go to Hell."

 St. Peter says, "In Hell, you'll be constantly raped and sodomized."

 She says, "That's okay. I've already got holes for that."
***
Bartering Australian style
This morning I was in luck and was able to buy two boxes of VB beer cheap at the local supermarket.

I placed the boxes on the front seat and headed back home.
I stopped at a service station where a drop-dead gorgeous blonde in a short skirt was filling up her car at the next pump.

She glanced at the two boxes of bevvy, bent over and leaned in my passenger window, her bra-less tits nigh on falling out her skimpy top, and said in a sexy voice,
"I'm a big believer in barter, old fella. Would you be interested in trading sex for beer?" ...

I thought for a few seconds and asked,
"What kind of beer 'ya got?"

***
Aussie Helpline
"G'day mate, Aussie Helpline...What's the problem cobber?"

"I'm in Darwin with my sheila and she's been stung on the minge by a wasp,
and now her pussy has completely closed up."

"Bummer mate!"

"Thanks mate, I hadn't thought of that, Bye."
***
Two Little Boys
Two little boys, ages 5 and 7, are excessively mischievous. 
They are always getting into trouble and their parents know if any mischief occurs in their town, the two boys are probably involved.   

The boys' mother heard that a preacher in town had been successful in disciplining children, so she asked if he would speak with her boys. 

The preacher agreed, but he asked to see them individually. 

The mother sent the 5 year old in the morning, with the older boy to see the preacher in the afternoon. 
The preacher, a huge man with a deep booming voice, sat the younger boy down and asked him sternly,   "Do you know where God is, son?" 

The boy's mouth dropped open, but he made no response, sitting there wide-eyed with his mouth hanging open.   

So the preacher repeated the question in an even sterner tone,   "Where is God?!   

Again, the boy made no attempt to answer. 

The preacher raised his voice even more and shook his finger in the boy's face and bellowed, "WHERE IS GOD?!"   

The boy screamed & bolted from the room, ran directly home & dove into his closet, slamming the door behind him.   

When his older brother found him in the closet, he asked, 
"What happened?" 

The younger brother, gasping for breath, replied,   

"We are in BIG trouble this time!"      "GOD is missing, and they think WE did it!"
***
I made up a joke about North Korea...
Kim Jong-Un awakes to a beautiful sunrise above his North Korean palace. He calls out to the morning sun. "Good morning, sun!" he shouts. 

Incredibly, the sun responds to him. "Good morning, my dear leader!" the sun shouts back. 

Later that day, Kim Jong-Un addresses the sun once again. "Good afternoon, sun!" 

"Good afternoon, oh great and glorious leader!" the sun replies faithfully once more. 

Later that night, Kim Jong-Un bids farewell to the setting sun. "Good night, sun!" 

The sun is silent. 

"I said good night, sun!" 

No response. 

"Sun, can't you hear me! I'm speaking to you!" 

"I'm in the West now. Go fuck yourself." 

***
Talking Dog For Sale
A guy is driving around the back woods and he sees a sign in front of a broken down, shanty-style house: "Talking Dog For Sale." He rings the bell and the owner appears and tells him the dog is in the backyard.

The guy goes into the backyard and sees a nice looking Labrador retriever sitting there.

"You talk?" he asks. 

"Yep," the Lab replies. 

After the guy recovers from the shock of hearing a dog talk, he says "So, what's your story?"

The Lab looks up and says, "Well, I discovered that I could talk when I was pretty young. I wanted to help the government, so I told the CIA. In no time at all they had me jetting from country to country, sitting in rooms with spies and world leaders, because no one figured a dog would be 
eavesdropping.

"I was one of their most valuable spies for eight years running. But the jetting around really tired me out, and I knew I wasn't getting any younger so I decided to settle down. I signed up for a job at the airport to do some 
undercover security, wandering near suspicious characters and listening in. I uncovered some incredible dealings and was awarded a batch of medals.

"I got married, had a mess of puppies, and now I'm just retired."

The guy is amazed. He goes back 
in and asks the owner what he wants for the dog. 

"Ten dollars," the guy says.

"Ten dollars? This dog is amazing! Why on earth are you selling him so cheap??"

"Because the dog's a damn liar. He never did any of that shit."
***
Hitler dies and God calls him
After Hitler dies, God calls him in His office. When he gets there, God asks "if I gave you the possibility to live another life, what would you do?"

Hitler answers "I'd kill all the Jews and twelve Eskimos".

God promptly asks "Why the Eskimos?".

"See, not even you care about Jews!"
***
CIA assessment center
After the standard round of interviews, a good dozen of applicants sit before the director of the CIA office.

"Trust is central to our business, ladies and gentlemen. Still, intelligence, precision and punctuality are nearly as essential. So, to the test: You have an envelope with a coded address on it. It contains important top secret data for someone in this office building. Get this sensitive information to him."

The applicants scurry away with their red labeled envelopes, each trying to crack the code and simultaneously making their way through the labyrinthine vastness of the CIA office building.

Only one applicant rounds the corner and, after looking left and right, breaks the "TOP SECRET" seal and rips open the envelope. Inside, he finds a sheet of paper, that says: "Misuse of trust is central to our business. Come back to my office to sign your contract."

***
After 35 years of marriage, a husband and wife came for counseling.
When asked what the problem was, the wife went into a tirade listing every problem they had ever had in the years they had been married. On and on and on: neglect, lack of intimacy, emptiness, loneliness, feeling unloved and unlovable – an entire laundry list of unmet needs she had endured.

Finally, after allowing this for a sufficient length of time, the therapist got up, walked around the desk and after asking the wife to stand, he embraced and kissed her long and passionately as her husband watched – with a raised eyebrow.

The woman shut up and quietly sat down in a daze. The therapist turned to the husband and said, "This is what your wife needs at least 3 times a week. Can you do this?"

"Well, I can drop her off here on Mondays and Wednesdays, but on Fridays I fish."
***
Golden Urinals
So a man is always cheating on his wife.  She finally gets fed up with him and says the next time he gives her a lame excuse, she is going to leave him.  A few days later he comes home extremely late.
"So what's the excuse this time," she said.
"Hey, I was drinking all night with my buddies. I swear," he slurred.
"Where?" she asked.
"Uhhh...I can't remember exactly, but wherever it is, they have golden urinals."  He then proceed to pass out.
Now, he had given some weird excuses before, but this one was just bizarre, so she decided to give him the benefit of the doubt and call around town to find the golden urinal bar.   After being hung up on many times, she calls the last bar in town.
"Hello?  I know this is going to sound weird, but do you guys have golden urinals?"
The bartender then pulls the phone from his face and shouts, "Hey, Jerry!  We found the guy that pissed in your saxophone."
***
After days of driving, a trucker walks into a empty small-town diner and sees three signs above the counter.
The first reads "Hamburger: $5," the second reads "Cheeseburger: $6," and the third reads "Handjob: $10." As the man approached, a beautiful young woman dressed in an apron came out from the kitchen and asked coyly, "What can I do for you, hon?"

"Are you the one who gives the handjobs?" asked the trucker.

"Why yes," answered the woman with a knowing smile. "Yes I am."

"Well then go wash your fucking hands, because I want a cheeseburger."
***
The Forgotten Pick-Up Line
A man walks up to an attractive woman at a bar and begins to tell her a story. 

"The other day, I was walking through the park, when something unexpected bumped against my shoe," he says.

The girl is intrigued. "Well, what was it?" she asks.

"It was a magic lamp," the man says. "I rubbed it, and a genie came out. He said, 'I'll grant you one wish, but this isn't like Aladdin. You don't get to choose your wish. I'll give you two options, and you have to pick one.'"

"What were the choices?"

"The genie said I could have either a flawless memory, or a giant dick."

The girl thinks for a moment. "Wow. Which did you pick?"

"I don't remember."
***
So a woman makes an appointment to see her doctor...
She goes to the doctor's office and during the examination she says, 

"Doctor, I've got a problem that i am deeply concerned about.  I keep farting all the time, they don't smell or make a sound but I am constantly farting all the time, in fact I've farted 15 times since you've stepped in the room to exam me, I'm very worried that there is something wrong with me."

the doctor writes her a prescription and says,

"take 2 of these a day and see me in a week"

The woman comes back in a week and says,

"these pills aren't helping, in fact I'm even worse, I'm still farting all the time, they still don't make any noise, but now they smell horrible"

the doctor says "good, we've cleared up your sinuses, now let's work on your hearing"
***
A white guy, black guy, and Mexican
A white man, black man, and a Mexican are stranded on an island. A Tribe finds them and the chief of the tribe says "alright, if you want to survive, go into the jungle and grab 10 fruit on one kind each." So the men go into the jungle and bring back fruit. The Mexican comes back and has 10 apples. The chief then told him "alright, if you want to live, shove these up your ass and don't show any emotion, if you show emotion I'll kill you" the Mexican gets to the 2nd apple and cries in pain, so the tribe kills him. The white man brought back blackberries, and he did the same. When he got to the 9th black berry he saw the black man coming back with watermelons, but he didn't react, and shoves them all up his ass. The chief exclaimed "NO ONE HAS EVER PASSED, can you tell me, how did you pass?" Then the white man says "well, you see, I'm subscribed to /r/jokes, and I see this joke EVERY FUCKING DAY"
***
Honeymoon in Australia
My wife and I went on our honyemoon to Australia. Unfortunately, I had to dial the help line. "G'day this is Tim, you've reached the Aussie help line. How can we help ya?" I told him, "We were in the ocean and my wife was stung by a jellyfish on her lady parts. Her vagina is completely swollen shut. It's our honeymoon, and well....ya know." The guy on the help line replies, "Ah, bummer mate!" I say, "I hadn't thought of that! Thanks for the advice. You've saved my honeymoon!"
***
World Peace
My wife asked me what I wanted for Christmas. 


"World peace" I said. 

"Something more realistic!" she laughed 

"Ok how about a blowjob once a week?" 

She reached for the phone. 

"Who are you calling?" I asked. 

"The United Nations" she replied.
***
A women is out golfing and finds a frog trapped in the woods...
A Woman was out golfing one day when she hit the ball into the woods.  
  
She went into the woods to look for it and found a frog in a trap.  
  
The frog said to her, "If you release me from this trap, I will grant you three wishes."  
  
The woman freed the frog, and the frog said, "Thank you, but I failed to mention that there was a condition to your wishes.  
  
Whatever you wish for, your husband will get times ten!"  
  
The woman said, "That's okay."  
  
For her first wish, she wanted to be the most beautiful woman in the world.  
  
The frog warned ☝her, "You do realize that this wish will also make your husband the most handsome man in the world, an Adonis whom women will flock to".  
  
The woman replied, "That's okay, because I will be the most beautiful woman and he will have eyes only for me."  
  
So, KAZAM-she's the most beautiful woman in the world!  
  
For her second wish, she wanted to be the richest woman in the world.  
  
The frog said, "That will make your husband the richest man in the world. And he will be ten times richer than you."  
  
The woman said, "That's okay, because what's mine is his and what's his is mine."  
  
So, KAZAM-she's the richest woman in the world!  
  
The frog then inquired about her third wish, and she answered, "I'd like a mild heart attack."  
  
Moral of the story: Women are clever. Don't mess with them.  
  
Attention female readers : This is the end of the joke for you. Stop here and continue feeling good.  
  
Male readers: Please scroll down.  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
The man had a heart attack ten times milder than his wife.  
  
Moral of the story: Women think they're really smart.  
  
Let them continue to think that way and just enjoy the show.  
  
Note: If you are a woman and are still reading this; it only goes to show that women never listen.
***
Husband Wanted
A lonely widow, age 70, decided that it was time to get married again.
 

She put an ad in the local paper that read:

 

HUSBAND WANTED:

MUST BE IN MY AGE GROUP (70s),

MUST NOT BEAT ME,

MUST NOT RUN AROUND ON ME,

MUST STILL BE GOOD IN BED!!!!!

ALL APPLICANTS PLEASE APPLY IN PERSON.

 

On the second day, she heard the doorbell.

Much to her dismay, she opened the door to see a grey-haired gentleman sitting in a wheelchair.

He had no arms or legs.

The old woman said, 'You're not really asking me to consider you, are you?  Just look at you ... you have no legs!

The old man smiled, 'Therefore, I cannot run around on you!'

She snorted. 'You don't have any arms either!'

Again, the old man smiled, 'Therefore, I can never beat you!'

She raised an eyebrow and asked intently, 'Are you still good in bed???'

The old man leaned back, beamed a big smile and said,

‘Rang the doorbell, didn't I?'
***
A Girl I Knew in Class was a total Attention Whore
A girl I knew in class was a total attention whore.

Never arrived to class on time and always made sure to make a huge fuss about it.

Didn't talk to her all that much, but I had a few conversations with her.

Her wrists had cuts and burns all over them. She wore t-shirts so she never hid them.

I asked her why she would hurt herself like that.

She said "No one loves me and my life is painful" etc., etc.

"No one loves you? What about your parents or your boyfriend?"

Answer she gave me was something like "They actually don't love me," or some shit like that.

Made a point to not interact with her too much after that, because she's too much of an attention whore.

End of the school year, she came up to me and asked if I wanted to go somewhere with her that Sunday.

I'm not good with these situations, so I couldn't say no, even though I didn't like her.

Sunday came, and we went to one of those tower car parks.

Just as we got to the top, she told me that she wanted me to be here as a witness for her suicide.

"Oh shit," I thought. She was going to jump and was forcing me to watch!

Had I known that she was going to do this, I wouldn't have gone with her.

"Not watching unless you do a flip." I said that to try and shock her into realizing this was stupid.

Complete shock was written all over her face. She thought I'd try and stop her.

"E-eh? You're not going to stop me?"

"No, go on ahead. If you really wanted to live, you'd stop yourself."
After a while, she got off the ledge.

And then she walked up to me and tried to hug me with tears in her eyes, but I told her I loved someone else. She asked me who, and I told her to read the first letter of every line.
***
A philosopher, a mathematician, and an idiot die and go to heaven..
A philosopher, a mathematician, and an idiot die and go to heaven. 

They arrive at the pearly gates and St. Peter greets them with a smile, but the devil is standing beside them. The three men stand there looking very confused. Saint Peter tells them that heaven is getting very crowded, and only those who can trick the devil gain entrance to heaven. The three men agree and the devil approaches each of them separately.

The devil comes up to the mathematician first and says "Give me any complex mathematical equation, and I'll solve it."

So the mathematician thinks for a while and give the devil a problem. The devil solves it and hands it right back to him. The mathematician says "Alright, I'll go to hell." And off he went.

The devil then approaches the philosopher and says for him to give him any sophisticated philosophical idea, and he'll explain it. So the philosopher does this and gives it to the devil. The devil, again, explains it and the philosopher agrees to go to hell. 

Finally, the devil goes up to the idiot and says in an annoyed tone "Alright, wattaya got?"

The idiot thinks for a second and then declares "Get me a chair." The devil complies and gets the idiot a chair. "Alright, now drill seven holes in it." Again the devil complies and drills seven holes. Then, the idiot sits down in the chair and he farts. "Alright," the idiot declared with a grin. "Which hole did my fart come out of?" 

The devil was taken aback, and stood confused at the idiot. "Uhh, that one!" The devil said as he pointed to a random hole. 

"No stupid. My asshole!"
***
An American, an Englishman, and an Irishman walk into a bar. Each one orders a pint. Three flies land, one on each glass.
The American gags and pushes his drink away.  The Englishman shrugs, flicks the fly away, and drinks the beer.  The Irishman picks up the fly, shakes it up and down, and shouts, "Spit it out, fucker!"
***
"A man goes to prison" joke with two opposite punchlines.
My grandpa used to tell this joke, one day I heard someone else tell it with almost an exact opposite punchline. I've never tried to type it out before, so sorry if this sucks, but here's how I first heard it:

---

A man goes to prison and the first night while he's laying in bed contemplating his situation, he hears someone yell out, "44!" Followed by laughter from the other prisoners.

He thought that was pretty odd, then he heard someone else yell out, "72!" Followed by even more laughter. 

"What's going on?" he asked his cellmate. 

"Well, we've all heard every joke so many times, we've given them each a number to make it easier."

"Oh," he says, "can I try?"

"Sure, go ahead."

So, he yells out "102!" and the place goes *nuts*. People are whooping and laughing in a hysteria. He looks at his cellmate rolling on the ground with tears in his eyes from laughing so hard. 

"Wow, good joke huh?"

"Yeah! We ain't never heard that one before!"

---

And here's the other punchline that threw me for a loop after years of hearing this joke:

---

So, he yells out "102!" and the place is dead quiet save for a few groans. Confused, he looks at his cellmate who is just shaking his head.

"Hey, what happened?"

"Well, some people can tell a joke, some people can't."

---

Thanks for reading! I'm much better at telling this out loud, I promise.
***
21st birthday
A little boy is born with a terrible birth defect - he has only a head, no  torso, no limbs.

On his 21st birthday, his friends take him to the bar to celebrate.  One of them pours his first beer down his throat - and poof!  All of a sudden, a neck and torso pop out of his head.

His friends are stunned.  "Quick, get him another one!"  So one of them helps him drink another beer - and poof!  Two arms pop out of the torso.

Amazed, they order another beer, which the boy (now having arms) proudly drinks all by himself.  Poof!  Two legs pop out of the torso.  All his friends cheer as the guy gets up to take a few steps.  But he's unsteady on his new legs - not helped by three beers in rapid succession - and after a few steps he stumbles through the front door and into the street, and gets flattened by a bus.

"Bummer," says one of the guys in the bar.  "He should have quit while he was ahead."
***
A guy finally gets a date with an easy blonde...
To prepare for the date he sunbathes in the nude on his roof,
falls asleep and burns his manhood. He doesn't want to cancel
so he slathers it with lotion and wraps it in gauze. 
The blonde shows up at his house and he treats her to 
a home-cooked dinner. Afterwards they go to the living room 
to watch a movie. His manhood starts to bother him again so 
he excuses himself, goes into the kitchen, pours a glass of milk 
and immerses himself for immediate relief. 
The blonde, however, wanted to know what he was doing 
and walks in on him with his Johnson in the milk and exclaims,

"So that's how you guys load those things!"
***
Satan appeared before a small town congregation.
Everyone started screaming and running for the front church door, trampling each other in a frantic effort to get away.

Soon everyone was gone except for an elderly gentleman who sat calmly.

Satan walked up to him and said, "Don't you know who I am?"

The man replied, "Yep, sure do."

Satan asked, "Aren't you going to run?"

"Nope, sure ain't," said the man.

Satan asked, "Why aren't you afraid of me?"

The man replied, "Been married to your sister for over 48 years." 
***
Wife walks up to husband, takes off her pants and says, "Make me feel like a woman"
Husband takes off his pants, tosses it to his wife and says, "That needs a wash."

~~Edit: I had a feeling butthurt people will be coming in shortly. Bring on the downvotes!~~

Edit #2: I didn't realize that my joke would garner such a decent amount of upvotes. I was honestly confident that it will have more downvotes than upvotes... Err thanks, I guess? 
***
From my Botswanan friend
A man dies and goes to hell.
He finds that there is a different hell for each country.
He decides he'll pick the least painful to spend his eternity.
He goes to Germany Hell and asks, 'What do they do here?' ... He is told 'first they put you in an electric chair for an hour. Then they lay you on a bed of nails for another hour. Then the German devil comes in and whips you for the rest of the day'. The man does not like the sound of that at all so he moves on.
He checks out the USA Hell as well as the Russia Hell and many more. He discovers that they are all similar to the German hell.
Then he comes to the BOTSWANA Hell and finds that there is a long line of people waiting to get in. Amazed, he asks, 'What do they do here?'
He is told 'first they put you in an electric chair for an hour. Then they lay you on a bed of nails for another hour. The BOTSWANA devil comes in and whips you for the rest of the day.
'But, that is exactly the same as all the other hells why are there so many people waiting to get in?' asks the man.
Because there is never any electricity, so the electric chair does not work. The nails were paid for but never supplied, so the bed is comfortable to sleep on. And the BOTSWANA devil used to be a civil servant, so he comes in; signs his time sheet and goes back home for private business.'
***
A man walked into a bar and sat down
A man walked into a bar and sat down, and ordered a beer. As he sipped the beer, he heard a soothing voice say “nice tie!” Looking around, he noticed that the bar was empty except for himself and the bartender at the end of the bar. A few sips later the voice said “beautiful shirt“.
At this, the man called the bartender over. “Hey…I must be losing my mind,” he told the bartender. “I keep hearing these voices saying nice things, and there’s not a soul in here but us.”
“It’s the peanuts,” answered the bartender.
“Say what?”
“You heard me,” said the barkeep. “It’s the peanuts … they’re complimentary.“
***
A madame is managing a whorehouse . . .
. . . when she sees a new john come in. She sends over her newest girl. The madame sees her sit on his lap and flirt a bit. Then he wispers something in her ear. She looks horrified and yells, "Oh God no!" and runs away.

The madame thinks, O.K., this guy is a little kinky. So she sends over one of her more experienced gals. She sits on his lap, he whispers in her ear, and she shouts "Are you kidding me!" and storms off.

At this point, the madame thinks alright, this guy is a freak. She sends in her skankiest gal who has seen and done every sex act known to man. She sits on his lap, he whispers in his ear, and she stands up and slaps him in the face and hurries away.

The madame can't stand it anymore. She goes up to the john and demands, "What have you been whispering in my girls' ears?!"

He replies sheepishly, "Sorry, eh? I just wanted to know if I could pay in Canadian dollars."
***
My "classic" joke.
A Catholic Priest, a Rabbi, and an Atheist walk into a bar.
The bartender says, "Oh Goddammit, no! We don't like jokes in here and if you guys are a part of one, you're gonna have to leave right now!"
So the catholic priest, rabbi, and atheist leave the bar and a chicken walks in.
The bartender says, "OH COME ON! We don't serve CHICKENS in here!"
The chicken says, "Do you know somewhere that does?"
The bartender says, "Yeah.."
The chicken asks, "Well, where is it?"
The bartender says, "It's across the road." 
***
A man goes to visit a frog in the woods
The man knows the frog loves reading, so he brings him a variety of literature.  He finds the frog hanging out by a pond and presents him with classics, comedy, and nonfiction, but the frog shakes his head at each book one by one.  

Finally the man, exasperated, says, "I don't understand! You used to love reading.  Why don't you have an interest in books anymore?"

The frog holds up a smartphone and replies,

"Reddit. 

Reddit. 

Reddit."
***
Two old aged guys, one 70 and one 75, were sitting on a park bench one morning.
The 75-year-old had just finished his morning jog and wasn't even short of breath.

The 70-year-old was amazed at the guy's stamina and asked him what he did to have so much energy.

The 75-year-old said, "well, I eat rye bread every day. It keeps your energy level high and you'll have great stamina with the ladies."

So, on the way home the 70-year-old stopped at the bakery. As he was looking around, the saleslady asked if he needed any help.

He said, "do you have any rye bread?"

She said, "yes, there's a whole shelf of it. Would you like some?"

He said, "I want five loaves."

She said, "my goodness, five loaves! By the time you get to the 3rd loaf, it'll be hard."

He replied, "I can't believe everybody knows about this shit except me!?"
***
More than a bit racist
An Arab man comes home one day to his  wife and child and says, "My sweet flower, I'm sick of all the dirty looks and prejudice. It's time we convert to Christianity, life will be easier."

The family goes to a priest and the father asks if the priest can convert the family to Christianity. 

The priest says, "it is possible, however I need to see a symbol of your dedication to Jesus Christ."

The priest then takes the family to an Alligator infested river and stands on the opposite banks. Across the river, the priest yells, "whoever can cross this river in one piece has my blessing and may convert to Christianity!"

The father, looking at his family, decides this is the only way for them to have a brighter future. He dives into the river, swimming as fast he can to the opposite bank. After some close calls he reaches the opposite bank and the priest says, "you have been baptized, you are now a Christian."

The wife, seeing her husband on the other bank and thinking of her child's future decides to follow. She jumps into the river and struggles to sneak past the alligators. After just escaping the jaws of death, she scrapes herself onto the opposite shore. The priest approaches her and says "you have been baptized, you are now a Christian."

The son, watching his parents on the opposite bank reluctantly dips his toe into the river. An Alligator immediately grabs his legs with its powerful jaws and begins tearing him limb from limb.

The mother, horrified, immediately breaks down weeping and tearing at her clothes. The father distastefully approaches the mother and asks, "Honey, why are you crying over some Arab boy?"
***
A woman is packing up and leaving her husband...
and tells him she's moving to Las Vegas.  The husband asks, "Why Las Vegas?" 

She says from what she understands, she can get $100 for every blowjob she gives.  Upon telling her husband this he starts packing as well.  The wife asks, "Where are you going?" 

 The husband says, "I'm going to Las Vegas too! I want to see how you can live off $200 a year!"
***
Jane found Tarzan attractive
When Jane met Tarzan in the jungle, she had never seen such a fit man, and she was greatly attracted to him.  As they got to know each other, she asked him what he though of sex.

"Sex? What is sex?" Tarzan asked.

She explained the concept, and he responded, "Oh, Tarzan use a hole in the trunk of tree for that."

Jane was horrified and said, "Oh no, you have it all wrong! I'll show you how to do it properly."  She took off her clothes, laid on the ground, and spread her legs wide.  "Here, Tarzan," she said. "You must put it in here."

Tarzan stepped closer, removed his loincloth, and then gave her a powerful kick in the crotch!  Jane rolled around in agony.

Eventually she managed to gasp, "What the hell did you do that for?"

He replied,"Tarzan check for bees first!"
***
A guy gets horny during his first week on a pirate ship...
So he goes up to the captain and asks "What do you guys use when you get horny?"

&nbsp;

The captain says: "There's a barrel over there with a hole in it; we use that".

&nbsp;
Guy: "Great when can I use it?"

&nbsp;
Captain: "You can use it any day of the week, except Tuesday".

&nbsp;
Guy: "Why not Tuesday?"

&nbsp;
The captain grinned and said: "Cause that's your day in the barrel."
***
What causes arthritis?
A drunk man who smelled like beer sat down on a subway seat next to a priest. The man's tie was stained, his face was plastered with red lipstick, and a half empty bottle of gin was sticking out of his torn coat pocket. He opened his newspaper and began reading. After a few minutes the man turned to the priest and asked, "Say, Father, what causes arthritis?"

"My Son, it's caused by loose living, being with cheap, wicked women, too much alcohol and a contempt for your fellow man."

"Well, I'll be damned," the drunk muttered, returning to his paper.

The priest, thinking about what he had said, nudged the man and apologized.

"I'm very sorry. I didn't mean to come on so strong. How long have you had arthritis?"

"I don't have it, Father. I was just reading here that the Pope does." 
***
Engineers and Lawyers
Three lawyers are buying tickets for a train to Chicago. Ahead of them in line, three engineers purchase a single ticket.

One of the lawyers asks, "How are you going to travel with just a ticket between the three of you?"

"Watch and you'll see," winks one of the engineers.

The train arrives, and the six of them climb on. The three lawyers take their seats while the three engineers pile into a bathroom. The train gets underway.

A conductor starts making his rounds. Noticing the bathroom is occupied, he knocks on the door and asks, "Ticket, please."

The door cracks open a hair, and a single ticket is offered. The conductor punches it, and continues on.

The three lawyers admit that this is a good trick, and that they should try it on their next journey. As luck would have it, after spending a few days in Chicago, they see that the three engineers will be on board their train. The lawyers purchase a single ticket for the three of them, while the engineers don't buy a ticket at all.

One of the lawyers asks, "How are you going to ride, if you don't have a ticket?"

"Watch and you'll see," came the reply.

The lawyers get on the train, and scramble into a bathroom. The engineers cram themselves into an adjacent bathroom. The train leaves, and picks up speed. One of the engineers gets out of the bathroom, walks over to the lawyers' bathroom, and knocks.

"Ticket, please."
***
Five old ladies in a car . . .
Sitting on the side of the highway waiting to catch speeding drivers, a State Police Officer sees a car puttering along at 22 MPH. He thinks to himself, this driver is just as dangerous as a speeder!" So he turns on his lights and pulls the driver over.

Approaching the car, he notices that there are five old ladies -- two in the front seat and three in the back -- wide eyed and white as ghosts.

The driver, obviously confused, says to him, "Officer, I don't understand, I was doing exactly the speed limit! What seems to be the problem?"

"Ma'am," the officer replies, "you weren't speeding, but you should know that driving slower than the speed limit can also be a danger to other drivers."

"Slower than the speed limit? No sir, I was doing the speed limit exactly... Twenty-two miles an hour! "The old woman says a bit proudly.

The State Police officer, trying to contain a chuckle explains to her that 22" was the route number, not the speed limit. A bit embarrassed, the woman grinned and thanked the officer for pointing out her error. But before I let you go, Ma'am, I have to ask... Is everyone in this car OK? These women seem awfully shaken and they haven't muttered a single peep this whole time," the officer asks.

"Oh, they'll be all right in a minute officer. We just got off Route 119."
***
A man is at the zoo...
... and comes to a silver back gorilla exhibit and he notices a sign. The sign states " Please do not tap the gorilla". He looks around and says fuck it and taps the gorilla.

The gorilla breaks out the cage violently and starts chasing the man. He realizes the bad choice that he made. He starts running away but realizes that the gorilla will catch up to him and maul him.

He finds a car and starts driving and thinks he's the clear. Looking in the rear view mirror, he connected eyes with gorilla who was right on his tail. The gorilla starts to attack the back of the car and the man makes it to the pier and hopping out and starts running to a speedboat. On the speedboat he revs it up to 100 MPH and thinks he's in the clear, only to see the gorilla swimming closely behind him. He docks the boat across the lake and and continues running.

Looking back he sees that the gorilla hasn't given up chase at all. He finds himself backed up against a tree, so he puts a bandana over his eyes and starts to smoke a cigarette; waiting for his demise. The gorilla comes up, taps him and says " TAG YOU'RE IT".
***
One dark night outside a small town, a fire started inside the local chemical plant
One dark night outside a small town, a fire started inside the local chemical plant and before you could snap your fingers it exploded into flames and the alarm went out to the volunteer fire departments from miles around.

When the volunteer firefighters appeared on the scene, the chemical company president rushed to the fire chief and said, "All of our secret formulas are in the vault in the center of the plant. They must be saved. I will give $50,000 to the engine company that brings them out intact."

The fire chief ordered his men to strengthen their attack on the blaze. After two hours of fighting the fire another fire department was called in and the president of the chemical company offered $100,000 to the firefighters who could bring out the company's secret files.

From the distance, a long siren was heard as another fire truck came into sight. It was the local volunteer fire company composed entirely of men over the age of 65. To everyone's amazement, the little fire engine raced passed everyone and drove straight into the middle of the inferno. Outside the other firemen watched as the old timers jumped off their rig and began to fight the fire with a performance and effort never seen before. Within a short time, the old timers had extinguished the fire and saved the secret formulas.

The grateful chemical company president joyfully announced that for such a superhuman feat he was upping the reward to $200,000, and walked over to personally thank each of the brave, though elderly, fire fighters.

The local TV news reporters rushed in after capturing the event on film asking, "What are you going to do with all that money?"

"Well," said the 70-year-old fire chief, "the first thing we are going to do is fix the brakes on the truck."
***
A boy paid a girl $10 to climb a flagpole...
She agrees and climbs the flagpole. When she gets home she tells her mother what happened. Her mother said "honey, he just wanted to see your underwear." The next day the same boy was standing by the flagpole and said "I will give you $20 to climb the flagpole." Again she agrees and climbs. She goes home and tells her mother "mom the boy paid me to climb the flagpole again, but I outsmarted him this time. I didn't wear any underwear."

Edit: I'm fairly new to reddit. This joke exploded. Thanks for the welcome party lol
***
Roosevelt, Churchill and Stalin are taking a coffee break in Yalta...
Churchill takes out a small black notebook and starts writing something down.

"Taking notes?", Roosevelt asks.

"No," Churchill says, "I heard a new political joke about myself this morning. I collect all jokes about myself. I already have over 100 in this notebook."

"How funny," Stalin says. "I collect all jokes about myself too."

"Oh, really?" Churchill says. "So how many have you got?"

"Three prison camps so far."
***
A husband went to the sheriff’s department to report that his wife was missing
Husband: My wife is missing. She went shopping yesterday and has not come home.

Sergeant: What is her height?

Husband: Gee, I’m not sure. A little over five-feet tall.

Sergeant: Weight?

Husband: Don’t know. Not slim, not really fat.

Sergeant: Color of eyes?

Husband: Never noticed.

Sergeant: Color of hair?

Husband: Changes a couple times a year. Maybe dark brown.

Sergeant: What was she wearing?

Husband: Could have been a skirt or shorts. I don’t remember exactly.

Sergeant: What kind of car did she go in?

Husband: She went in my truck.

Sergeant: What kind of truck was it?

Husband: Brand new 2015 Ford F150 King Ranch 4X4 with eco-boost 5.0L V8 engine special ordered with manual transmission. It has a custom matching white cover for the bed. Custom leather seats and “Bubba” floor mats. Trailering package with gold hitch. DVD with navigation, 21-channel CB radio, six cup holders, and four power outlets. Added special alloy wheels and off-road Michelins. Wife put a small scratch on the drivers door. At this point the husband started choking up.

Sergeant: Don’t worry buddy. We’ll find your truck.

***
Not since 1955
A  crusty old Regimental Sergeant Major found himself at a gala event hosted by a local college.

There  was no shortage of extremely young idealistic ladies in attendance, one of whom approached the Sergeant Major for conversation.

"Excuse me, Sergeant Major, but you seem to be a very serious man. Is something bothering you?"

"Negative, ma'am. Just serious by nature."

The young lady looked at his awards and decorations and said, "It looks like you have seen a lot of action."

"Yes, ma'am, a lot of action."

The  young lady, tiring of trying to start up a conversation, said, "You know, you  should lighten up. Relax and enjoy yourself."

The  Sergeant Major just stared at her in his serious manner.

Finally  the young lady said, "You know, I hope you don't take this the wrong way, but when is the last time you had sex?"

"1955, ma'am."

"Well, there you are. No wonder you're so serious. You really need to chill out! I mean, no sex since 1955! She took his hand and led him to a private room where she proceeded to "relax" him.

Afterwards, panting for breath, she leaned against his bare chest and said, "Wow, you sure  didn't forget much since 1955."

The  Sergeant Major said, after glancing at his watch, "I hope not; it's only 2130 now."

***
Blonde schoolgirl
Jenny, a blonde girl came skipping home from school one day.

"Mommy, Mommy," she yelled, "we were counting today, and all the other kids could only count to four, but I counted to 10. See? 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10!"

"Very good," said her mother.

"Is it because I'm blonde?" Jenny asked.

"Yes, it's because you're blonde," said the mommy.

The next day the girl came skipping home from school.
"Mommy, Mommy," she yelled, "We were saying the alphabet today, and all the other kids could only say it to D, but I said it to G. See? A, B, C, D, E, F, G!"

"Very good, Jenny," said her mother.

"Is it because I'm blonde, Mommy?"

"Yes, it's because you're blonde."

The next day Jenny came skipping home from school.
"Mommy, Mommy," she yelled, "we were in gym class today, and when we showered, all the other girls had flat chests, but I have these!"

And she lifted her tank top to reveal a pair of 36Cs

"Very good," said her embarrassed mother.

"Is it because I'm blonde, mommy?"

"No Honey, it's because you're 24 
***
Jesus had long hair
A teenager was entering his senior year of high school.  His father, a Baptist preacher, made a deal with him.

"Son, if you get straight A's for the entire year, AND if you cut off that long hippy hair, I will buy you the car of your choice when you graduate."

The son accepted the challenge and worked very hard all year.  He got the best grades of his life and graduated top of his class.

"Well, Dad.  I held up my end of the bargain.  Top of my class.  I'll take a Ford Mustang, red."

The dad smiled and said "Well done, son.  Your grades are impressive.  Now all you need to do is cut your hair and the car is yours."

"But dad," the son protested "what's wrong with my hair being long?  You're a preacher... JESUS had long hair."

"Yep," said the dad "and he walked every god damn place he went too."
***
Little Johnny saw his Daddy's car

 passing the playground and going into the woods. Curious, he followed the car and sees Daddy and Aunt Jane kissing.

Johnny finds this so exciting and can barely contain himself as he runs home and starts to tell his mother excitedly. "Mommy, Mommy, I was at the playground and Daddy and...." Mommy tells him to slow down, but that she wants to hear the story.

So Johnny tells her. "I was at the playground and I saw Daddy's car go into the woods with Aunt Jane. I went to look and Daddy was giving Aunt Jane a big kiss, then he helped her take off her shirt, then Aunt Jane helped Daddy take his pants off, then Aunt Jane laid down on the seat, then Daddy...."


At this point, Mommy cut him off and said, "Johnny, this is such an interesting story, suppose you save the rest of it for supper time. I want to see the look on Daddy's face when you tell it tonight." At the dinner table, Mommy asks Johnny to tell his story.

He describes the car into the woods, the undressing, laying down on the seat, and, "then Daddy and Aunt Jane did that same thing Mommy and Uncle Jack used to do when Daddy was in the Army."
***
Marines
Two Marines boarded a quick shuttle flight out of Dallas, headed for Houston. One sat in the window seat, the other sat in the middle seat. Just before take-off, an Army soldier got on and took the aisle seat next to the two Marines. The Soldier kicked off his shoes, wiggled his toes and was settling in when the Marine in the window seat said, “I think I’ll get up and get a coke.” “No problem,” said the Soldier, “I’ll get it for you.” While he was gone, the Marine picked up the Soldier’s shoe and spit in it. When the Soldier returned with the coke, the Marine in the middle seat said, “That looks good, I think I’ll have one too.” Again, the Soldier obligingly went to fetch it and while he was gone, the Marine picked up the soldier’s other shoe and spit in it. The Soldier returned and they all sat back and enjoyed the rest of the short flight to Houston. As the plane was landing, the Soldier slipped his feet into his shoes and knew immediately what had happened. “How long must this go on?” the Soldier asked. “This fighting between our services? This hatred? This animosity? This spitting in shoes and peeing in cokes?”
***
Three wise men arrived to visit the child lying in the manger...
One of the wise men was exceptionally tall and bumped his head on the low doorway as he entered the stable. "Jesus Christ" he exclaimed.         
Joseph said: "Write that down, Mary. It's better than Wayne."
***
Jack decided to go skiing with his buddy, Bob.

 They loaded up in Jack's minivan and headed north. 

 After driving for a few hours, they got caught in a terrible blizzard. 

 They pulled into a nearby farm and asked the attractive lady who answered the door if they could spend the night. 

 "I realize it's terrible weather out there and I have this huge house all to myself, but I'm recently widowed," she explained. "I'm afraid neighbors will talk if I let you stay in my house." 

 "Don't worry," Jack said. "We'll be happy to sleep in the barn. And if the weather breaks, we'll be gone at first light." 

 The lady agreed, and the two men found their way to the barn and settled in for the night. Come morning, the weather had cleared, and they got on their way. They enjoyed a great weekend of skiing. 



 About nine months later, Jack got an unexpected letter from an attorney. 

 It took him a few minutes to figure it out, but he finally determined that it was from the attorney of that attractive widow he had met on the ski weekend. 

 He dropped in on his friend Bob and asked, "Bob, do you remember that good-looking widow from....." "Yes, I do." 

 "Did you happen to get up in the middle of the night, go up to the house and pay her a visit?" 

 "Yes," Bob said, a little embarrassed about being found out. "I have to admit that I did." 

 "And did you happen to use my name instead of telling her your name?" 

 Bob's face turned red and he said, "Yeah, sorry, buddy. I'm afraid I did. Why do you ask?" 

 "She just died and left me everything." 


***
Tie Salesman
A fleeing criminal, desperate to escape the police, runs into the desert with hardly any water. Very soon, he runs out of drinking water, and hours later, he is already plodding under the merciless desert sun.
He is close to desperation when suddenly sees something far off in the distance. Hoping against hope that it is water, he starts running towards what he thinks is an oasis, only to find a little old man with a little stand, full of ties. 
'Hey you, do you have water?' Pants the criminal.

The old man replied, 'I have already finished my water, but would you like to buy a tie? They are only $5.' 

The criminal, frustrated shouted, 'you moron! Do I look like I need a tie? I should kill you right here, but I have to find some water first!" 

'There's no call for threats,' said the old tie seller indignantly, 'but even though you don't want to buy one of my ties and you treat me like this, I'll help you. If you continue over that hill for about 3 miles, you'll find a restaurant with great food and all the ice cold water you can drink. Good luck!"


Muttering in disgust, the criminal staggered away over the hill. Several hours later the other man sees him crawling on the dune back towards him. When he finally arrives, he lays on his back, panting. 

"Everything ok?" Asked the tie salesman as he bends over to hear the raspy whisper of the other man.

"They won't let me in without a tie..."
***
You must be in F**king management!
A woman in a hot air balloon realized she was lost. She reduced altitude and spotted a man below. She descended a bit more and shouted: "'Excuse me, can you help me? I promised a friend I would meet him an hour ago but I don't know where I am". The man below replied "You're in a hot air balloon hovering approximately 30 feet above the ground. You're between 40 and 41 degrees north latitude and between 59 and 60 degrees west longitude". 

"You must be a technician." said the balloonist. "I am" replied the man "how did you know?" "Well," answered the balloonist, "everything you have told me is probably technically correct, but I've no idea what to make of your information and the fact is, I'm still lost. Frankly, you've not been much help at all. If anything, you've delayed my trip with your talk." 

The man below responded, "You must be in management". "I am" replied the balloonist, "but how did you know?" "Well," said the man "you don't know where you are or where you're going. You have risen to where you are, due to a large quantity of hot air. You made a promise, which you've no idea how to keep, and you expect people beneath you to solve your problems. The fact is you are in exactly the same position you were in before we met, but now, somehow, it's my fucking fault!!!

***
My best Catholic joke (as told by my priest)
A town decided to form a clergy group to have Catholics, Jews, Protestants and Muslims gather to talk about various issues facing their places of worship. The Rabbi went first and said they were having a terrible issue with squirrels. He said they were hanging around outside of church and aggressively begging for food. He said they were scaring their kids. The preacher said they were having the same issue, in fact, a few of the squirrels had actually gotten inside of the church and had done some damage to the roof. The Imam agreed saying that in fact one of the squirrels had bitten a few people at the mosque. The Priest then spoke up and said they used to have the same issue but had solved it. He said they took all of their squirrels, Baptized them, confirmed them, and now they only come around on Christmas and Easter. 
***
A train conductor was conducting his train...
when he derailed it and the train suffered a terrible crash. Only those in the front of the train survived. He was put on trial for the murder of nearly a hundred people. He was found guilty and sentenced to death by the electric chair.

When asked what he'd like for his last meal, he replied simply with "A banana, if you will." The prison guard shrugged, got a banana, and gave it to the poor man. The conductor ate the banana in regular fashion and braced himself for death. He was seated on the chair, fastened in, and was ready for what was about to happen.

However, after the electricity was activated, nothing happened to the conductor. The prison guard was shocked and, not knowing what to do, simply let him go unscathed. 

In a few days, the conductor was back to work. A few days after his return to the train business, he managed to derail yet another train, again killing nearly a hundred people but surviving the crash. As before, he was trialed and found guilty of mass murder. Again, he was sentenced to death by electric chair.

It was the same prison guard as before. He was surprised to see the conductor again but held his tongue, for the man was about to die and it would be rude to question him.
"What would you like for your last meal, sir?" The conductor respond as he did last time: "A banana, if you will." The prison guard shrugged, got a banana, and gave it to the poor man. The conductor ate the banana in regular fashion and braced himself for death. He was seated on the chair, fastened in, and was ready for what was about to happen.

The electricity was activated and the conductor was prepared. But, as before, the conductor was unhurt. The prison guard checked for any malfunctions but found nothing, not believing the entire situation was possible. In shock as before and not knowing what to do, the guard let the conductor go.

The conductor was, against all odds, alive and was still allowed to continue his job as a train conductor even though he was responsible for the death of almost two hundred people.

He was thankful to be allowed to continue his job but also scared. He would try not carefully from now on. However, this idea didn't help much as on the first train he was conducting after the chair, he managed to somehow crash yet another train. He was the only survivor of the train, which contained over a hundred people. He was trialed and, again, found guilty of the murder of over a hundred people. He was sentenced to death by electric chair.

The prison guard was the same, the surprise was the same, the procedure was the same. After giving the banana to the conductor, the guard was silent. He couldn't bring himself to say anything, all he could do was prepare the chair.

The man sat in the chair, expecting death. The guard activated it and, again, the conductor was unscathed. The prison guard couldn't contain himself. He simply had to ask, "Sir, how did you manage to crash a train 3 times? And how did you survive the chair 3 times? Did the banana have something to do with it?" The conductor responds with: "No, I suppose I'm just not a good conductor."
***
Royal Wedding
On the day of the Royal wedding, Sophie was getting dressed, surrounded by all
of her family. She suddenly realised she had forgotten to get any shoes.
Panic!

Then her sister remembered that she had a pair of white shoes from her wedding so she lent them to Sophie for the day. Unfortunately they were a bit too small and by the time the festivities were over Sophie's feet was hurting real bad.

When she and Edward withdrew to their room the only thing she could think of was getting her shoes off.

The rest of the Family crowded around the door to the bedroom and they heard roughly what they expected, grunts, straining noises and the occasional muffled scream. Eventually they heard Edward say 'God, that was tight.'

'There,' whispered the Queen. 'I told you she was a virgin.'

Then, to their surprise, they heard Edward say. 'Right. Now for the
other one.' Followed by more grunting and straining and at last Edward said.
'My God. That was even tighter.'

'That's my boy,' said the Duke. 'Once a sailor, always a sailor.'
***
A cowboy appears before St. Peter...
A cowboy appeared before St. Peter at the Pearly Gates.
"Have you ever done anything of particular merit?" St. Peter asked.
"Well, I can think of one thing," the cowboy offered.

"On a trip to the Big Horn Mountains out in Wyoming, I came upon a gang of bikers who were threatening a young woman.  I directed them to leave her alone, but they wouldn't listen.  So, I approached the largest and most tattooed biker and smacked him in the face,  kicked his bike over, ripped out his nose ring, and threw it on the ground."  I yelled, "Now, back off or I'll kick the shit out of all of you"
Saint Peter was impressed, "When did this happen?"

"Couple of minutes ago."
***
Three priests and their wives die in a plane crash...
So three priests and their wives are flying back from an interdenominational conference when the plane crashes and they all die. 

They all arrive at the pearly gates at the same time.

St. Peter says to the first priest, "I am sorry, but I cannot let you in. You adored sugar and sweets. You had the biggest sweet tooth, and was so involved with sugar and sweets that you married a woman named Candy." Off they go to hell. 

St. Peter then addresses the second priest, "I am sorry but I cannot let you in. You truly did not love the Lord, you only loved money. In fact, you loved it so much that you married a woman named Penny." Off they go to hell. 

The third priest says to his wife, "Fanny, we don't have a chance."
***
Paddy has a broken leg
Paddy has broken his leg and his buddy Mick comes over to see him. 
 Mick says, "How you doin?"

 Paddy says, "Okay, but do me a favour mate, run upstairs and get me slippers, me feet are freezing."

 Mick goes upstairs and sees Paddy's gorgeous 19 year-old twin daughters lying on the bed.

 He says, "Your dad sent me up here to have sex with both of you."

 They say, "Get away with ya... prove it."

 Mick shouts downstairs, "Paddy, both of em?" Paddy shouts back, "Of course both of em, what's the point of fuckin one?"
***
The United Nations world-wide survey
The United Nations sent out a survey to all the nations in the different continents of the world.

The survey went like this:

"We want your honest opinion on how to find a solution to the food shortage in the rest of the world"

The survey of course, turned out to be a total and abject failure:

The People in western Europe didn't know what the word 'shortage' meant. The people in eastern Europe had no idea what the expression 'honest' was supposed to mean. In china no one knew what 'opinion' was. In Africa they didn't know what 'food' was. In the middle east no one could figure out what 'solution' was; and in america they had no idea what 'the rest of the world' meant. 
***
The art of joke writing
A thief in Paris planned to steal some paintings from the Louvre.

After careful planning, he got past security, stole the paintings, and made it safely to his van.

However, he was captured only two blocks away when his van ran out of gas. When asked how he could mastermind such a crime and then make such an obvious error, he replied, 'Monsieur, that is the reason I stole the paintings.'

I had no Monet

To buy Degas

To make the Van Gogh.

I had De Gaulle to post this because I figured I had nothing Toulouse .
***
New CEO
The board of directors at one company decided to hire new executive staff in order to increase the company's profits. The new CEO was a very tough guy who made it his mission to rid the company of slackers. One time he notices a guy in the hallway leaning against the wall picking his nose. As there were other employees in the hallway, he decides to make a public firing. He walks up to the guy and asks,

"How much do you make in a week?"

"$400. Why?" says the guy, stunned by such a question.

The CEO then goes into his office and a few minutes later comes out with a large stack of bills. He hands $1600 to the guy and says,

"Here's your pay for four weeks. You're fired. Now get the fuck out of here and never come back"

The CEO, clearly pleased what he had just done turns to the witnessing employees and asks,

"Does anybody know what the hell this slacker was doing?"

One of the employees says,

"He was a pizza delivery guy waiting for someone to pay for the pizza he'd just delivered."
***
A man loses his manhood...
A man was in a terrible accident, and his "manhood" was mangled and torn from his body. His doctor assured him that modern medicine could give him back his manhood, but that his insurance wouldn't cover the surgery, since it was considered cosmetic.
The doctor said that the cost would be $3500 for small, $6500 for medium, and $14,000 for large. The man was sure he wanted a large, but the doctor urged him to talk it over with his wife before he made any decision.
The man called his wife on the phone and explained their options.
The doctor came back into the room, and found the man looking quite dejected.
"Well, what have the two of you decided?" asked the doctor.
The man answered, "She'd rather remodel the kitchen."

***
Once, in an African village....
Once, in an African village, a native man walked up to a missionary with a look of fury on his face. "My wife gave birth today," the native growled, "and the baby is white! And you're the only white person within 100 miles of here! "

The missionary glanced around guiltily for a moment but quickly regained his composure. "Look at those goats over there," the missionary said, pointing at the village's livestock. "All of them are white, except for that black one over there. Sometimes nature works in mysterious ways. "

The native's eyes widened, and he nodded at the missionary. "I understand, sir. I'll stop talking about the white baby..." and here his voice dropped to a whisper. "... And you stop talking about the black goat. " 
***
The Ultimate Computer
The Ultimate Computer stood at the end of the Ultimate Computer Company's production line. One day, a guided school tour arrived.
The salesman stepped forward to give his prepared demo. "This," he said, "is the Ultimate Computer. It will give an intelligent answer to any question you may care to ask it. Would anyone like to try?"
Little Johnny quickly stepped forward and asked, "Where is my father?"
There was the soft hum of powerful electronic gear going to the task. Panel lights lit and blinked, and within a couple of seconds the answer appeared on the screen: "Fishing in Florida."
Little Johnny laughed, "Actually, my father is dead! It was a trick question."
The salesman, quickly thinking on his feet, replied that he was sorry the answer was unsatisfactory, but as the Ultimate Computer was precise, perhaps a rewording of the question might work better.
Little Johnny thought and said to the Ultimate Computer, "Where is my mother's husband?" Again, the hum of the powerful electronic brain filled the room.
After a moment, the screen lit up with an answer: "Dead. But your father is still fishing in Florida."
***
Oh johnny..
Little Johnny is taking a shower with his mother and says, “Mom, what are those things on your chest?”
Unsure of how to reply, she tells Johnny to ask his dad at breakfast tomorrow, quite certain the matter would be forgotten. Johnny didn’t forget. The following morning he asked his father the same question. His father, always quick with the answers, says, “Why Johnny, those are balloons. When your mommy dies, we can blow them up and she’ll float to heaven.”

Johnny thinks that’s neat and asks no more questions. A few weeks later, Johnny’s dad comes home from work a few hours early. Johnny runs out of the house crying hysterically, “Daddy! Daddy! Mommy’s dying!”

His father says, “Calm down, son! Why do you think Mommy’s dying?”

“Uncle Harry is blowing up Mommy’s balloons and she’s screaming, ‘Oh God, I’m coming!’”
***
A very experienced man...


A man visits a house of ill-repute. He tells the woman, "I've seen everything and done it all. I need an experience I've never had before."
The madam summons a rather plain looking young woman and says, "This is Susan. She's for you."
The man seems unimpressed but resigns himself to the choice.
She takes him to her room, sits him down on the bed, and begins to fondle his manly bits.
After his interest is fully aroused, she pops out a glass eye, and uses her empty eye socket to gratify him.
As he's leaving, he says to the madam, "That was the most amazing experience! Can I come back tomorrow?"
The madams says, "Absolutely--I'll tell Susan to keep an eye out for you."
***
Little Johnny.
The teacher asked the class to use the word “fascinate” in a sentence. 
 
 Molly put up her hand and said, “My family went to my granddad's farm,  and we all saw his pet sheep. It was fascinating." 
 
The teacher said, “That was good, but I wanted you to use the word ‘fascinate,’ not 'fascinating'.” 
 
Sally raised her hand. She said, “My family went to see Rock City and  I was fascinated.” 
 
The teacher said, “Well, that was good Sally, but I wanted you to use the word ‘fascinate’.” 
 
Little Johnny raised his hand, but the teacher hesitated because she had been burned by Little Johnny before. She finally decided there was no way he could damage the word “fascinate,” so she called on him. 
 
Johnny said, “My aunt Carolyn has a sweater with ten buttons, but her tits are so big she can only fasten eight!” 
 
The teacher sat down and cried.
***
Two straight guys and a gay guy went on a cruise.....
.......with their significant others. A tidal wave came up and swamped the ship; they all drowned, and next thing you know, they're standing before St. Peter.

First came one of the straight guys and his wife. St. Peter shook his head sadly. "I can't let you in. You loved money too much. You loved it so much, you even married a woman name Penny."

Then came the second straight guy."Sorry, can't let you in either. You loved food too much. You loved to eat so much, you even married a woman named Candy!"

The gay guy turned to his boyfriend and whispered nervously, "It doesn't look good, Dick."
***
Jim decided to tie the knot with his longtime girlfriend
Jim decided to tie the knot with his longtime girlfriend.

One evening, after the honeymoon, he was cleaning his golf shoes.
His wife was standing there watching him.

After a long period of silence she finally speaks.
"Honey, I've been thinking, now that we
are married I think it's time you quit golfing. 
Maybe you should sell your golf clubs."

Jim gets this horrified look on his face.

She says, "Darling, what's wrong ?"

”There for a minute you were sounding like my ex-wife.”

"Ex-wife !" she screams, 
"I didn't know you were married before !"

"I wasn't !"
***
The Washington Redskins are changing the team name because of all the negativity, shame, humiliation, dissent, polarity, adversity, defiance, animosity, contempt, discrimination, division, counter-productivity and hostility associated with their name.
....from now on they will be known simply as the Redskins.
***
policeman VS little girl
A policeman sees a little girl riding her bike and says, “Did Santa get you that?" “Yes,” replies the little girl. “Well," says the policeman, "tell Santa to put a reflector light on it next year,” and fines her five dollars. The little girl looks up at the policeman and says, "Nice horse you’ve got there, did Santa bring you that?” The policeman chuckles and replies, “He sure did!" “Well,” says the little girl, “next year, tell Santa the d*ck goes under the horse and not on it."
***
A musician walks into a bar and orders a drink.
The bartender asks "Why the long face?"

"I play flute in a travelling orchestra" he said. "Last month, we played for the Ottoman sultan. He liked our performance and ordered to fill our instruments with sapphires. The cello got 1000 sapphires in, the drum got 2000 sapphires in, this piece of trash didn't get even one in. 

Last week, we played for the German kaiser, and he also liked our performance and ordered to fill our instruments with gold. Cello got 2000 coins in, drum got 4000 coins in, this piece of trash didn't get even one in.

Yesterday, we played for the Russian czar, he said we are playing out of tune and ordered to shove our instruments up our asses. The drum didn't get in, the cello didn't get in, this piece of trash went in all the way to B flat!"
***
Girlfriend didn't want to give me any.
Last week, my girlfriend and I were getting into bed. As our passion began to heat up she said, "I don't feel like it. I just want you to hold me." I said, "WHAT?! What was that?!" She said, "You're just not in touch with my emotional needs as a woman enough for me to satisfy your physical needs as a man." She responded to my puzzled look by saying, "Can't you just love me for who I am and not what I do for you in the bedroom?"

 Realizing that nothing was going to happen that night, I went to sleep. The next day I took off of work to spend time with her. We went out to a nice lunch and then went shopping at a big department store. I walked around with her as she tried on several very expensive outfits. She couldn't decide which one to take, so I told her we'd just buy them all. She wanted new shoes to go with her new clothes, so I said, "Lets get a pair for each outfit." We went on to the jewelry counter where she picked out a pair of diamond earrings. She was so excited. I started to think she was testing me because she asked for a tennis bracelet.

 I threw her for a loop when I said, "That's fine, honey." She was nearing sexual satisfaction from all of the excitement. Smiling with excited anticipation, she finally said, "I think this is all dear, let's go to the cashier." 

I could hardly contain myself when I blurted out, "No baby, I don't feel like it." Her face went completely blank as her jaw dropped with a baffled, "WHAT?" I said, "Honey! I just want you to HOLD this stuff for a while. You're just not in touch with my financial needs as a man enough for me to satisfy your shopping needs as a woman." Just when she had this look like she was going to kill me, I added, "Why can't you just love me for who I am and not for the things I buy you?" 

Apparently I'm not having sex tonight either... but at least she knows I'm smarter than her.
***
SENIOR SEX
The husband leans over and asks his wife, "Do you remember the first time we had sex together over fifty years ago? We went behind the village tavern where you leaned against the back fence and I made love to you."
Yes, she says, "I remember it well."

OK, he says, "How about taking a stroll around there again and we can do it for old time's sake?"

"Oh Jim, you old devil, that sounds like a crazy, but good idea!"
A police officer sitting in the next booth heard their conversation and, having a chuckle to himself, he thinks to himself, I've got to see these two old-timers having sex against a fence. I'll just keep an eye on them so there's no trouble. So he follows them.

The elderly couple walks haltingly along, leaning on each other for support aided by walking sticks. Finally, they get to the back of the tavern and make their way to the fence The old lady lifts her skirt and the old man drops his trousers. As she leans against the fence, the old man moves in.. Then suddenly they erupt into the most furious sex that the policeman has ever seen. This goes on for about ten minutes while both are making loud noises and moaning and screaming. Finally, they both collapse, panting on the ground.

The policeman is amazed. He thinks he has learned something about life and old age that he didn't know.

After about half an hour of lying on the ground recovering, the old couple struggle to their feet and put their clothes back on. The policeman, is still watching and thinks to himself, this is truly amazing, I've got to ask them what their secret is.

So, as the couple passes, he says to them, "Excuse me, but that was something else. You must've had a fantastic sex life together. Is there some sort of secret to this?"

Shaking, the old man is barely able to reply,"Fifty years ago that wasn't an electric fence." 
***
The man with a baby-sized penis.
A man and woman were on a first date. Things were going well so he felt obligated to tell her. 

"I just want to let you know, before we go further that you're okay with something..." he says. 

"What is it?" She curiously inquires. 

"I have a baby-sized penis." He hesitantly admits. 

"Oh don't worry about that, I'm sure we'll figure something out after a few drinks." She says as she winks and smiles.

Later that night they are in his apartment. Things start to get heavy and clothes come off. As he takes off his underwear, she let's out a gasp.

"I didn't know a penis could be that size?! She says.

"I told you it's the size of a baby. Eight pounds 6 ounces."


Edit: Thank you for making this my most popular post. Nothing like people enjoying sex with babies...sized penises. 
***
Bullshittin
A young man with his pants hanging half off his ass, two gold front teeth and a half inch thick gold chain around his next walked into the local welfare office to pick up his check.  He marched up to the counter and said  "Hi. You know I just HATE drawing welfare. I'd really rather have a job. I don't like taking advantage of the system, getting something for nothing."  The social worker behind the counter replies  "You're timing is excellent. We just got a job opening from a very wealthy old man who wants a chauffeur and bodyguard for his gorgeous daughter. You'll have to drive around in his 2012 Mercedes Benz CL and he will supply all your clothes."  "Because of long hours, meals will be provided. You'll also be expected to escort her overseas holiday trips. This is rather awkward but you will also have to satisfy her sexual urges as the daughter is in her 20's and has a strong sex drive."  The guy, wide-eyed said, "You're bullshittin me!!!!"  The social worker said, "Yeah, well you started it."
***
Civil War spoilers
Lee surrenders at Appomatox Courthouse, Abe Lincoln is shot by John Wilkes Booth.
***
Welfare Check
"A young man with his pants hanging half off his rear, two gold front teeth, and a half inch thick gold chain around his neck, walked into the local welfare office to pick up his check.

He marched up to the counter and said, "Hi. You know, I just HATE drawing welfare. I'd really rather have a job. I don't like taking advantage of the system, getting something for nothing."

The social worker behind the counter said "Your timing is excellent. We just got a job opening from a very wealthy old man who wants a chauffeur and bodyguard for his beautiful daughter. You'll have to drive around in his 2014 Mercedes-Benz CL, and he will supply all of your clothes."

"Because of the long hours, meals will be provided. You'll also be expected to escort the daughter on her overseas holiday trips. This is rather awkward to say, but you will also have, as part of your job, the assignment to satisfy her sexual urges as the daughter is in her mid-20's and has a rather strong sex drive."

The guy, just plain wide-eyed, said, "You're bull-shittin' me!"
The social worker said, "Yeah, well . . . You started it . . . . “
***
Too Shy!!!
During her annual checkup, the well-constructed miss was asked to disrobe and climb onto the examining table.

 "Doctor," she replied shyly, "I just can't undress in front of you."

 "All right," said the physician, "I'll flick off the lights. You undress and tell me when you're through."

 In a few moments, her voice rang out in the darkness: "Doctor, I've undressed. What shall I do with my clothes?"

 "Put them on the chair, on top of mine.
***
The new store...
Two Australian businessmen in Brisbane were sitting down for a break in their soon-to-be opened new store. 

As yet, the store wasn't ready, with no stock and only a few shelves set up. 

One said to the other, 'I bet any minute now some idiot tourist is going to walk by, put his face to the window, and ask what we're selling.' 

No sooner were the words out of his mouth when sure enough, a curious Japanese tourist walked to the window, had a peek, and in a thick Japanese accent asked, 'What you sell?' 

One of the men replied sarcastically, 'We're selling arseholes.' 

Without skipping a beat, the Japanese man said, 'You doing velly well. Only two left!’


***
jerry has a 69
After a excitingly hot 69 position with his girlfriend , Jerry remembered he had a dentist Appointment

He was afraid the dentist would smell Pussy on his breath! So he brushed his teeth several times
Gargled ½ a litre of Listerine used dental floss as well 

As he arrived at the dentist he sucked on two strong mints, His turn came up and the dentist said take a seat , 
Feeling Confident & relaxed Jerry opened his mouth wide The dentist got close enough & said”
“ Man did you have a 69 before you came here “
Jerry said “Does my breath smell like pussy”? the dentist replied “No your Forehead smells like shit"
***
A professor at the University was giving a lecture on the supernatural.
To get a feel for his audience, he asks, "How many people here believe in ghosts?"

About 90 students raise their hands.

"Well, that's a good start. Out of those of you who believe in ghosts, do any of you think you've seen a ghost?"

About 40 students raise their hands.

"That's really good. I'm really glad you take this seriously. Has anyone here ever talked to a ghost?"

About 15 students raise their hands.

"Has anyone here ever touched a ghost?"

3 students raise their hands.

"That's fantastic. Now let me ask you one question further... Have any of you ever made love to a ghost?"

Way in the back, Billy raises his hand.

The professor takes off his glasses, and says, "Son, all the years I've been giving this lecture; no one has ever claimed to have made love to a ghost. You've got to come up here and tell us about your experience."

The big redneck student replied with a nod and a grin, and began to make his way up to the podium. When he reached the front of the room, the professor asks, "So, Billy, tell us what it's like to have sex with a ghost?"

Billy replied, "Shit! From way back there I thought you said, "Goats!"
***
Once, in an African village,
a native man walked up to a missionary with a look of fury on his face. "My wife gave birth today," the native growled, "and the baby is white! And you're the only white person within 100 miles of here! "
The missionary glanced around guiltily for a moment but quickly regained his composure. "Look at those goats over there," the missionary said, pointing at the village's livestock. "All of them are white, except for that black one over there. Sometimes nature works in mysterious ways. "
The native's eyes widened, and he nodded at the missionary. "I understand, sir. I'll stop talking about the white baby..." and here his voice dropped to a whisper. "... And you stop talking about the black goat. "
***
a guy thing..
 My three year old son had a lot of problems with potty training; and I
was
 on him constantly. One day we stopped at Taco Bell for a quick lunch
in
 between errands.
 It was very busy, with a full dining room. While enjoying my taco, I 
 smelled something funny, so of course, I checked my seven month old 
 daughter, and she was clean. The I realized that Matt had not asked to
go
 potty in a while, so I asked him and he said, "No." I kept thinking,
"Oh
 Lord, that child has had an accident and I didn't have any clothes
with
me."
 Then I said, "Matt, are you sure you did not have an accident?
 "No," he replied. I just knew that he must have, because the smell was 
 getting worse. Sooooo....I asked one more time, "Matt, did you have an 
 accident?"

 Matt jumped up, yanked down his pants, bent over and spread his cheeks
and
 yelled.... "SEE, MOM, IT'S JUST FARTS!!!" While 100 people nearly
choked
to
 death on their tacos, he calmly pulled up his pants and sat down to 
 eat his food as if nothing happened. I was mortified!

 Some kind elderly people made me feel a lot better, when they came
over
and
 thanked me for the best laugh they had ever had!!!
 Another old gentleman stopped us in the parking lot as we were
leaving,
bent
 over to my son and said, "Don't worry son, my wife accuses me of the
same
 thing all the time...I just never had the nerve to make the point like
you
 did.
Edit: I did not expect this thing to blow up. This is a joke hence in /jokes. Thanks for the all the up votes .
***
Divorce versus Murder
A nice, calm and respectable lady went into the Pharmacy, walked up to the
Pharmacist, looked straight into his eyes, and said, "I'd like to buy some cyanide."
The Pharmacist asked, "Why in the world do you need cyanide?"
The lady replied, "I need it to poison my husband."
The Pharmacist's eyes grew big and he explained, "Lord have mercy! I can't give
you cyanide to kill your husband, that's against the law! I'll lose my license! They'll
throw both of us in jail! All kinds of bad things will happen.
 
Absolutely not! You CANNOT have any cyanide!"
The lady reached into her purse and pulled out a picture of her husband in bed with
the Pharmacist's wife.
The Pharmacist looked at the picture and said, "You didn't tell me you had a prescription."
***
EINSTEINIUM
Albert Einstein used to go to dinners where he was invited to give a speech. One day, on his way to one of those dinners, he told his chauffeur (who looked exactly like him) that he was dead tired of giving the same speech, dinner after dinner.
"Well," said the chaffeur, "I've got a good idea. Why don't I give the speech since I've heard it so many times?'' So Albert's chauffeur gave the speech perfectly and even answered a few questions. Then, a professor stood up and asked him a really tough question about anti-matter which the chauffeur couldn't answer
"Sir, the answer to your question is so easy that I'll let my chauffeur answer it!"
***
Every hotel room was taken.
By the time John pulled into the little town, every hotel room was taken. "You've got to have a room somewhere." he pleaded. "Or just a bed--I don't care where."

"Well, I do have a double room with one occupant," admitted the manager, "and he might be glad to split the cost. But to tell you the truth, he snores so loudly that people in adjoining rooms have complained in the past. I'm not sure it'd be worth it to you."

"No problem," the tired traveler assured him. "I'll take it."

The next morning John came down to breakfast bright-eyed and bushy-tailed.

The manager was impressed. "No problem with the other guy snoring, then?"

"Nope. I shut him up in no time?"

"How'd you manage that?"

"He was already in bed, snoring away. when I came in the room," John said. "I went over, gave him a kiss on the cheek, said, 'Goodnight, beautiful,' and he sat up all night watching me."
***
A husband and wife find a bottle on the beach...
...the wife picks it up and a genie pops out.

"Madam, I will grant you three wishes," speaks the genie.

The wife is jumping with joy."Okay, I wish we were billionaires...and I wish we lived in the biggest mansion in Beverly Hills."

Poof.

They are transported to a beautiful mansion that is filled with diamonds and gold.

"Madam, for your final wish?" Asks the genie.

The woman looks at her husband and smiles, "I wish my husband would give me the best foot massage in the world, every time I asked him too.

Poof.

She asks her husband for a foot massage and he instantly begins to massage his wife's feet. When he is finished, the man picks up the bottle, rubs it, and the genie again appears.

"Sir, I will grant you three wishes," speaks the genie.

"I wish that all the cotton candy in the world were gone, forever," the man says. 

Poof.

The genie assures him it is done and the mans wife begins to scream at him for wasting a wish.

"Second," says the husband, "I wish my wife craved cotton candy every minute of everyday."

Poof.

The wife is still screaming but then she starts demanding cotton candy.

"Sir, your final wish?" Asks the genie.

The husband looks at his wife and smiles, "I wish my dick tasted like cotton candy."


***
A Mormon was seated next to an Irishman on a flight from London.
 After the plane was airborne, drink orders were taken.
The Irishman asked for a whiskey, which was promptly brought and placed before him.

The flight attendant then asked the Mormon if he would like a drink.

He replied in disgust, "I'd rather be savagely raped by a dozen whores than let liquor touch my lips."

The Irishman then handed his drink back to the attendant and said, "Me, too, I didn't know we had a choice."
***
A woman was shopping for her daughters birthday.
She asked the salss girl the price of some Barbie dolls. "This Barbie is $16.99," the girl said. "If you want something a little nicer, Malibu Barbie is $24.99. Or you can get Divorce Barbie for $169.99." "Why is Divorce Barbie so expensive" the mother asked. "Well," the sales girl said "Divorce Barbie comes with Ken's house and car."
***
A man on a train is sitting across a gorgeous young lady, with tight short skirt on (NSFW)
She uncrosses her legs and he notices that she isn't wearing any panties. She saw him look, and says "Are you looking at my pussy?"
The man shamefully apologizes, and promises that it will not happen again.
"It's ok," she says, "I can make it do tricks. Look, I'll blow you a kiss"
The man watches her vagina make a kiss movement and is severely impressed.
"Look, I can make it wink" she says, and the man is surprised and even more impressed.
"Come sit next to me" and so the man does.
"Do you want to stick a few fingers in there?"
Stunned, the man replies "My God, that thing can whistle too?"
***
A U. S. Navy destroyer stops four Mexicans in a row boat rowing towards California...
The captain gets on the loud-hailer and shouts, "Ahoy, small craft. Where are you headed?"
 
One of the Mexicans puts down his oar, stands up, and replies,  "We are invading the United States of America to reclaim the territory taken by the USA during the 1800s."

The entire crew of the destroyer doubled-over in laughter.  When the captain was finally able to catch his breath, he gets back on the loud-hailer and asks, "Just the four of you?"
 
The same Mexican stands up again and shouts, "No, we're the last four. The rest are already there!"
***
The Crow Mystery
Researchers for the Massachusetts Turnpike Authority found over 200 dead crows near greater Boston recently, and there was concern that they may have died from Avian Flu. A Bird Pathologist examined the remains of all the crows, and, to everyone's relief, confirmed the problem was definitely NOT Avian Flu. The cause of death appeared to be vehicular impacts.

However, during the detailed analysis it was noted that varying colors of paints appeared on the bird's beaks and claws. By analyzing these paint residues it was determined that 98% of the crows had been killed by impact with trucks, while only 2% were killed by an impact with a car. 

MTA then hired an Ornithological Behaviorist to determine if there was a cause for the disproportionate percentages of truck kills versus car kills.

The Ornithological Behaviorist very quickly concluded the cause: when crows eat road kill, they always have a look-out crow in a nearby tree to warn of impending danger.

The scientific conclusion was that while all the lookout crows could say "Cah", none could say "Truck."
***
There was a guy who was having chronic trouble getting an erection.
After weeks of frustration, he finally decides he is going to go see a doctor. The doctor gives him a thorough examination and eventually makes the diagnosis. 

"Well, there's good news and there's bad news," she says.

"The bad news is that the muscles around your penis are deteriorating, and there is no cure."

The guy, on the verge of panic, finally regains his composure. "So what's the good news?" he asks.

The doctor says, "There is an experimental treatment available, but there are no guarantees. It involves transplanting the muscles from a  baby elephant's trunk into your penis. Would you like to try it?"

The guy thinks about it and finally says, "Well, the thought of going through life without being able to have sex is just too much for me. What have I got to lose? Let's do it." So the doctor performs the operation.

A few weeks later, the guy takes his girlfriend out to a nice restaurant to celebrate his new equipment. While sitting at the table, he feels a stirring between his legs; it gets progressively worse until it reaches a point of being painful.

Seeking relief, he reaches down and unzips his fly to relieve some of the pressure.  

Suddenly, his penis leaps free from his pants, slides over the tabletop and grabs a dinner roll, then returns to his pants again.

"Wow!" says his girlfriend stunned, "That was impressive! Can you do it again?"

Eyes watering and face flushed, he says, "Probably... but I don't know if I can fit another dinner roll up my ass!"
***
An old lady was walking down the street dragging two large plastic garbage bags behind her...
..One of the bags was ripped and every once in a
while a $20 bill fell out onto the sidewalk. Noticing this, a policeman stopped
her, and said, "Ma'am, there are $20 bills falling out of that bag."

"Oh, really? Darn it!" said the little old lady. "I'd better go back and
see if I can find them. Thanks for telling me, officer.

"Well, now, not so fast," said the cop.“Where did you get all that money?
You didn't steal it, did you?"

"Oh, no, no", said the old lady. "You see, my backyard is next to a Golf
course. A lot of Golfers come and pee through a knothole in my fence, right
into my flower garden. It used to really tick me off. Kills the flowers,
you know. Then I thought, 'why not make the best of it?‘

So, now, I stand behind the fence by the knothole, real quiet, with my
hedge clippers. Every time some guy sticks his thing through my fence, I
surprise him, grab hold of it, and say, 'OK, buddy! Give me $20, or off it
comes.'

"That seems only fair," said the cop, laughing. "OK. Good luck! Oh, by the
way, what's in the other bag?"

"Not everybody pays." 
***
A hippie sits down at a bar...
So a hippie sits down at a bar and tries to order a beer on a tab, but the bartender wants money up front which the hippie doesn't have. So the guy next to him offers to buy him a beer. They start talking and drinking and drinking and talking. After a while the guy says to the hippie, "come with me to the bathroom and I'll give you a blow job". 

Suddenly the hippie jumps off his stool, pushes the guy down, and starts kicking the guy repeatedly. 

A couple of patrons pull the hippie back. They ask him what the guy said to piss him off so much. 

"Something about a job. "
***
A teacher asks her class, "What do you want to be when you grow up?"
A teacher asks her class, "What do you want to be when you grow up?"
Little Johnny says "I wanna be a billionaire, going to the most expensive clubs, take the best bitch with me, give her a Ferrari worth over a million bucks, an apartment in Hawaii, a mansion in Paris, a jet to travel through Europe, an Infinite Visa Card and to make love to her three times a day".
The teacher, shocked, and not knowing what to do with the bad behavior of the child, decides not to give importance to what he said and then continues the lesson.
"And you, Susie? " the teacher asks.
Susie says "I wanna be Johnny's bitch."
***
After being elected President, Bernie Sanders confronted...
...General Keith B. Alexander (the head of the NSA) and asked him on what grounds he wanted to continue observing the American people's cell phone/internet communications. 

The General sighed and shook his head. "Some men just want to watch the world, Bern."
***
The janitor and the priest.
A janitor is cleaning  a church near the confessional when the priest pokes his head out and motions for him to come over and says to him, "Listen.  I really have to go to the bathroom.  I need you to hear confessions for me while am away.  I won't be long."  
  
The janitor says, "But father, I would have no idea what penance to give out."  
  
The priest replies, "Don't worry, there's a list on the wall that spells out what to give for each sin."  
  
The janitor reluctantly agrees and takes over in the confessional.  
  
The first person comes in and says, "Forgive me father for I have sinned, it has been 2 months since my last confession and I lied."  
  
The janitor scans the list, "lied, lied, lied...aha! Go say 5 Hail Mary's and 5 Our Fathers."  
  
After thanking him the person leaves and the janitor thinks, "boy this is pretty easy."  
  
The next person comes in and says, "Forgive me father for I have sinned, it has been 8 months since my last confession and I committed an act of adultery."  
  
"Adultery, adultery, adultery, aha!  Go say 20 Hail Mary's and 10 Our Fathers."  
  
Again the person thanks him and leaves.  The next person comes in.  
  
"Forgive me father for I have sinned and it has been 1 year since my last confession and I committed multiple acts of oral sex."  
  
Scanning the list, "oral sex, oral sex, oral sex, oral sex...shit.  It isn't on there."  
  
In a panic he peaks out of the confessional and sees a couple of altar boys coming by and stops them.  "Quick, boys, tell me, what does the father give out for oral sex?"  
  
The altar boys reply, "Ahh, usually a bag of chips and a bottle of pop!"
***
My dad just won the nonexistent Grammy joke competition.
We're watching the Grammys as a family when the Sam Hunt and Carrie Underwood performance came up. We watched it in silence and then talked about the performance once it finished. My mother thought Sam Hunt looked similar to someone and thus the joke begins:

Mom: "Hmm. That guy looks like someone else. Does he have any family?"

Dad: (gives a thoughtful look before replying) "Yeah he looks really familiar... Oh! His brother is Mike!"

Mom: "Mike Hunt?..."

(My dad breaks out into the biggest grin on record and we both start laughing our asses off)

Mom: "Oh **dammit.**"
***
General Custer’s Last Stand
An eccentric billionaire wanted a mural painted on his library wall, so he called an artist.  
  
Describing what he wanted, the billionaire said, "I am a history buff, and I would like your interpretation of the last thing that went through Custer's mind before he died. I am going out of town on business for a week, and when I return, I expect to see it completed."  
  
Upon his return, the billionaire went to the library to examine the finished work. To his surprise, he found a painting of a cow with a halo. Surrounding this were hundreds of Indians in various sexual positions.   
  
Furious, he called the artist in. "What the hell is this?" screamed the billionaire.   
  
"Why, that's exactly what you asked for," said the artist smugly.  
  
"No! I didn't ask for a mural of pornographic filth. I asked for an interpretation of Custer's last thoughts!"  
  
"And there you have it," said the artist. "I call it, 'Holy cow, look at all those fucking Indians.'"
***
Running for president
It's the end of the 2016 Presidential race and the United States hated all the candidates so much that nobody voted. The government is in a panic trying to figure out what to do to decide who the next president will be. Finally, Obama comes up with an idea: A Literal Presidential Race.  
  
The three candidates would run a lap around the White House and the person with the best time would become president.  
  
Sanders goes first, but being as old as he is, he takes about 24 minutes.  
  
Trump goes next and arrives with a time of 14:26.  
  
Clinton goes last, running as fast as she can, trampling the flowers and shrubs in her way in an effort to beat Trump's time. She finally crosses the finish line at just under ten minutes.  
"Aha!" She exclaims, "That must be some kind of record!" 
   
"I don't think so," says Obama, "Bush did 9:11"
***
A woman and a man are involved in a car accident..
It's a bad one. Both of their cars are totally demolished but amazingly neither of them is hurt. 

After they crawl out of their cars, the woman says, *'Wow, just look at our cars! There's nothing left, but fortunately we are unhurt. This must be a sign from God that we should meet and be friends and live together in peace for the rest of our days.'*

The man replies, *'I agree with you completely. This must be a sign from God!'*

The woman continues, *'And look at this, here's another miracle. My car is completely demolished but this bottle of wine didn't break. Surely God wants us to drink this wine and celebrate our good fortune.'*

Then she hands the bottle to the man. The man nods his head in agreement, opens it, drinks half the bottle, and extends it back to the woman. Politely, the woman refuses to accept the bottle.

The man asks, *'Aren't you having any?'*

The woman replies, *'No. I think I'll just wait for the police...'*
***
A man and his wife go golfing
A man and his wife go golfing, and on the 8th hole he shanks the ball into a nearby barn. "Darn it," he says, "I'll have to take a penalty on that ball."

"No you don't," his wife says. "If I stand here and hold the barn door open, you should be able to get to the green in two."

So she holds the door open, and he takes his swing. The ball hits his wife in the head, killing her instantly.

A year to the day passes and it finds the golfer back on the same course, this time playing with a co-worker. As luck would have it, he shanks it again and ends up in the same barn.

"Don't worry," says the co-worker, "I can hold the door open and you'll be back on the fairway like that."

"Oh no," the golfer says, "I did the exact same thing a year ago with terrible results."

"What was that?" the co-worker asks.

"I got a 4 over," the golfer says.

EDIT -- corrected punch line.
***
Teacher asks Johnny, "What's Wrong?"
Johnny :- Our house is very small.  Me, my mum and my dad sleep on the same bed. Every night my dad asks, 'Johnny, are you asleep?'

I say No & he slaps my face & gives me a Black eye

Teacher:- Tonight, when your dad asks again, keep dead quiet & don't answer.

The following morning Johnny comes back with a severe black eye again.

Teacher:- My goodness why the black eye again?
Johnny:- Dad asked me if I was asleep.  I shut up & kept dead still.
Then my mum and dad started moving at the same time.
Mum was breathing erratically, kicking her legs up frantically &
squealing like a hyena on the bed.
Then my dad asked my mum, "Are you coming?"
Mum said, "Yes I'm coming, are you coming too?"
Dad answered:- Yes.

Well, they don't usually go anywhere without me so I said, "wait for me, I'm coming too".
***
A man walks into a bar with an octopus...
...he sets the octopus on the bar and says to the bartender, "I'll bet you $50 this octopus can play any instrument you have."
The bartender agrees and directs him to a piano in the corner. After the octopus sits down and plays a few bars the man asks the bartended to pay up. 
"Hold on" says the bartender and hands over a guitar.
The octopus takes the guitar, gives it a quick tune and plays a little song. The man again asks the bartender to pay up.
"Just a minute, I think I've got something else here."
The bartender disappears into the back room for a couple of minutes, comes back out and puts a set of bagpipes down on the bar.
The octopus moves around it, looking confused, picking up the pipes one at a time and putting them back down until the man says, "what's wrong? Can't you play it?"
The octopus says, "play it? If I can figure out how to get its pajamas off, I'm gonna fuck it!"

Edit:typo
***
Doctor, I have a sexual problem.
"Doctor," the embarrassed man said, "I have a sexual problem. I can't get it up for my wife anymore.

"Mr. Garrett, bring her back with you tomorrow and let me see what I can do."

The next day, the worried fellow returned with his wife. "Take off your clothes, Mrs. Garrett," the medic said. "Now turn all the way around. Lie down please. Uh-huh, I see. Okay, you may put your clothes back on."

The doctor took the husband aside. "You're in perfect health," he said. "Your wife didn't give me an erection either."
***
American tourists visit Russia
... and decide they want to take a hike in a genuine Russian forest. While hiking, they suddenly encounter a huge bear. The bear starts chasing the tourists, who are running for their lives. 

Not far from there, there is a campsite where a group of Russian campers is chilling out and drinking vodka. Suddenly they see screaming crazy Americans running over the campsite, tipping over the picknick tables, breaking bottles, and then disappearing into the thick woods. 

The campers are pissed, so they catch up on the tourists and start beating them up until the last one hits the ground. Then they return to the campsite.  

Back at the campsite one camper to another "You know Vassily, that American - he put up a pretty good fight". "Which one?". "Well you know, the one in the fur coat". 
***
Hillary Clinton was being driven in a private limo to a rally...
... when suddenly, the car hit a large and old-looking cow. 

The driver got out and checked to see if it was dead. After confirming the death, he saw the tag on it that said it belonged to a nearby farm. He told Hillary Clinton that he would be going over to the farm to tell the farmers what happened.

About an hour later, he returned. His clothes were messed up, he was covered in lipstick, he had an expensive cigar in his mouth, and in both hands were two full bottles of the most expensive champagne ever.

"What happened?", Hillary asked.

"When I went to the farm, they eagerly invited me in. Then, the husband gave me this cigar, the wife gave me the wine, and their two daughters gave me the best sex of my life!", the driver said with a huge smile on his face.

"What did you say to them?", Hillary asked.

"I said, 'I'm Hillary Clinton's driver and I just killed the old cow', and the rest happened so quickly I couldn't do anything!"
***
Second chances.
A priest whos sin is lust, A thief whos sin is greed, and a fat kid whos sin is gluttony, are all standing at the pearly gates. St. Peter tells them that there has been a mix up in schedules and only 2 of them should have died.  Because of their sins they are all bound for hell. but St peter offers them a second chance. He will send them back to earth and they will live as long as they don't indulge is their favorite sin. Before they go back to earth they are told the last person who does not indulge in his deadly vice will get to remain on earth until they die of old age.

Within five minutes of being on earth the thief spots a women not paying attention to her purse. He snatched the purse and starts running. *poof* he is sent to hell leaving behind the spilled content of the purse.

The fat kid sees the spilled contents of the purse and there lying on the ground is a king size candy bar. Unable to resist he bends over to pick up the candy bar and *poof* the priest is sent to hell.
***
A man and his wife built a boat...
They called it the *Alfred1*, after a friend of theirs. However, it was poorly constructed and sank immediately.

They continued to try to build seaworthy vessels, but the same thing happened over and over. With the *Brian2*, the *Chris3*, and the *Daniel4*.

"We're really not very good at this," the man said in disgust. "How do boats even work?"

"I don't know, but we'll figure it out," replied his wife. "We need an *ELI5*."
***
A young cowboy walks into the saloon.
He sits at the counter and notices an old cowboy with his arms folded, staring blankly at a full bowl of chicken congee.

After fifteen minutes of just sitting there staring at it, the young cowboy bravely asked the old cowboy, "If you ain't gonna eat that, mind if I do?"

The older cowboy slowly turns his head toward the young wrangler and in his best cowboy manner says, "Nah, go ahead."

Eagerly, the young cowboy reaches over and slides the bowl over to his place and starts spooning in it with delight. He gets nearly down to the bottom and notices a dead mouse. The sight was shocking and he immediately barfs up the congee back into the bowl.

The old cowboy quietly says, "Yep, that's as far as I got, too."
***
NSFW A boy is playing with his train set...
A few days after Christmas, a mother was working in the kitchen listening to her young son playing with his new electric train in the living room.  She heard the train stop and her son said, "All of you sons of b*tches who want off, get the hell off now, cause this is the last stop! And all of you sons of b*tches who are getting on, get your asses in the train, cause we're going down the tracks."  The mother went nuts and told her son, "We don't use that kind of language in this house. Now I want you to go to your room and you are to stay there for TWO HOURS. When you come out, you may play with your train, but I want you to use nice language."  Two hours later, the son comes out of the bedroom and resumes playing with his train. Soon the train stopped and the mother heard her son say, "All passengers who are disembarking from the train, please remember to take all of your belongings with you. We thank you for riding with us today and hope your trip was a pleasant one. We hope you will ride with us again soon."  She hears the little boy continue, "For those of you just boarding, we ask you to stow all of your hand luggage under your seat. Remember, there is no smoking on the train. We hope you will have a pleasant and relaxing journey with us today."  As the mother began to smile, the child added, "For those of you who are pissed off about the TWO HOUR delay, please see the b*tch in the kitchen."
***
I recall my first time with a condom, I must have been 16.
I recall my first time with a condom, I must have been 16.

I went in to buy a packet of condoms at the pharmacy. There was this beautiful assistant behind the counter, and she could see that I was new at it.

She handed me the package and asked if I knew how to wear one. I honestly answered, "No, this is my first time."

So she unwrapped the package, took one out and slipped it over her thumb. She cautioned me to make sure it was on tight and secure. I apparently still looked confused. So she looked all around the store to see if it was empty. It was empty.

"Just a minute." she said, and walked to the door, and locked it.

Taking my hand, she led me into the back room, unbuttoned her blouse and removed it. She unhooked her bra and laid it aside.
"Do these excite you?" she asked.

Well, I was so dumb-struck that all I could do was shake my head. She then said it was time to slip the condom on.

As I was slipping it on, she dropped her skirt, removed her knickers and sat down at a desk.
"Well, come on," she said, "we don't have much time."

So I climbed on her. It was so wonderful, that unfortunately, I could no longer hold back and KAPOW. I was done within a few minutes.

She looked at me with a bit of a frown, "Did you put that condom on?" she asked.

I said, "I sure did." and held up my thumb to show her.
***
An Irishman goes into a bar...
After downing several pints, he heads to the loo to take a huge piss.

At the urinal next to him, there's a really short guy, wearing all green, with a top hat and a pipe. He takes a quick peek and sees the short guy has a huge dick. 

Irish guy is drunk and decides to say, "I'd do anything to have a dick that big."

Short guy says, "I'm a leprechaun. I'll grant you one wish, if you suck my dick." 

The guy thinks about it for a minute, and being sauced, he agrees. He's kneeling down, sucking the smaller guy's dick for a few minutes, and then stops and says, "I can't believe I'm sucking a leprechaun's dick!"

The short guy replies, "I can't believe that you think I'm a leprechaun!"

***
An American woman is hiking through Germany...
She's enjoying taking in the sights and immersing herself in the culture. But one day, while hiking through a wooded area, she comes across an elderly German man taking a leak on the side of the path. He's hardly subtle about it; letting his sausage hang out for the world to see. Immediately the woman averts her eyes! "Oh, gross!" she exclaims. The Old German man, just finishing up, winks suggestively at the woman before zipping up his fly and walking away. "Danke schön"
***
Three CEO's from different beer companies are sitting at a bar...
And the one from Bud light says, "Alright barkeep, give me a tall glass of bud light!" And then the second one, from Miller light says, "ok barkeep, serve me a nice bottle of cold miller light!"And then the CEO of Guinness says, well, "I suppose I'll have a glass of Coca-Cola."The other two turn to him like he's crazy and say, "what, you aren't going to order Guinness?"To which he replies, "well if you two aren't going to order beer, neither am I!"
***
Chuck the Mailman was retiring.
Chuck the mailman, after 30 years on the same route, was retiring. On his last day, several customers on his route gave him gifts to celebrate his career. The Jones gave him a set of golf clubs, the Millers gave him a gift card for a nice restaurant.
Finally he walked up to his last house. He was about to walk away when the door opened and he was greeted by a beautiful blonde in very revealing lingerie.

Without a word she took his hand and led him up to her bedroom, and they proceeded to make passionate love unlike anything he had ever dreamed. She then left the room and returned with a large tray filled with a gourmet breakfast.  Chuck was famished from their exertions and dug in. After a while he was satisfied like he had never been before, when he noticed a dollar bill tucked under the coffee cup.  Finally his curiosity got the better of him and he addressed the girl.

"Listen, this has all been so great. Beyond my wildest dreams in every way, but I have to ask: after all this, what's with the dollar?"

"Well," said the blonde,"last night I told my husband that Chuck the Mailman was retiring, and asked what we should give you.  He said, 'Fuck him, give him a dollar'. The breakfast was my idea."
***
Joke about dead Austrian composer
When Mozart passed away, he was buried in a churchyard. A couple

days later, the town drunk was walking through the cemetery and heard

some strange noises coming from the area where Mozart was buried.

Terrified, the drunk ran and got the priest to come and listen to it.

The priest bent close to the grave and heard some faint, unrecognizable music coming from the grave. Frightened, the priest ran and got the town magistrate.

When the magistrate arrived, he bent his ear to the grave,

listened for a moment, and said, "Ah, yes, that's Mozart's Ninth Symphony,

being played backwards."



He listened a while longer, and said, "There's the Eighth Symphony,

And it's backwards, too. Most puzzling."

So the magistrate kept listening; "There's the Seventh... the

Sixth...the Fifth..." Suddenly the realization of what was happening dawned

on the magistrate; he stood up and announced to the crowd that had gathered in the

cemetery. "My fellow citizens, there's nothing to worry about. It's just Mozart decomposing."

***
Oldie but a goodie
An old farmer was busy plowing his field when he heard a terrible noise and looked up. A busload of politicians was careening wildly down the road, then spun out of control, flipped several times, and crashed into tree.

 The old farmer hurried to the site of the accident. Seeing the wreckage and carnage, he sadly went about digging a large hole to bury the dead. 

 A few hours later, the sheriff came by, searching for the missing politicians. When he saw the crashed bus, he stopped and asked the old farmer where all the politicians had gone.

 The old farmer gravely shook his head and said he had buried them.

 The sheriff asked the old farmer, "Were they ALL dead?"

 The old farmer replied grimly, "Well, some of them said they weren't, but you know how them politicians lie."
***
A girl introduces her new boyfriend to her family
Her parents invite him for dinner at their home. They all sit down at the table, while the dog lies down under it, and they start eating. 

At some point, the dude feels like he really needs to fart. He tries to suppress the awkward feeling, but he can't and farts a big one.

'Rufus!' yells the father at the dog.

The new boyfriend is relieved: the whole family thinks the dog farted! They continue eating, but after a while the dude needs to do it again. 'It worked once, it can work again,' he thinks to himself, hoping the dog would take the blame once more. So he farts.

'Rufus!' yells his girlfriend's dad, quite loudly this time.

They continue eating. After a little while, the dude needs to do it again. At this point, he doesn't even try to avoid it and farts a huge one without a care in the world, with a little smile on his face. The dad exclaims:

'Rufus, I'm not kidding anymore, get the fuck out from under that table, cause this fucker might shit all over you, buddy!'
***
A drunk staggers out of a bar and runs right into two priests.
He says "I'm Jesus Christ." The first priest says "no son you're not." The drunk turns to the other priest, "I'm jesus Christ" to which the second priest replies "no son you're not." So the drunk says "Look I'll show you." So he walks back into the bar with the two priests. The bartender takes one look at the drunk and says "Jesus Christ you're here again?" 

EDIT: Thanks!
***
A lady and her butler
A rich couple was going out for the evening. The lady of the house decided to give the butler, Throckmorton, the night off. 

She said they would be home very late and he should just enjoy his evening.

As it turned out, the wife didn't have a good time at the party, so she came home early. She walked into the house and eyed Throckmorton sitting alone in the dining room. She called for him to follow her. She led him to the master bedroom. She closed and locked the door. She looked at him and smiled.

"Throckmorton. Take off my dress." He did so, carefully.

"Throckmorton. Take off my stockings and garter." He silently obeyed her.

"Throckmorton. Remove my bra and panties." The tension mounted as he complied.

Finally she looked at him and said, "Throckmorton. If I ever catch you wearing my clothes again, you're fired."
***
I played for a homeless mans funeral
As a guitarist, I play many gigs. Recently I was asked by a funeral director to play at a graveside service for a homeless man. He had no family or friends, so the service was to be at a pauper’s cemetery in the back country. As I was not familiar with the backwoods, I got lost.

I finally arrived an hour late and saw the funeral guy had evidently gone and the hearse was nowhere in sight. There were only the diggers and crew left and they were eating lunch.

I felt badly and apologized to the men for being late. I went to the side of the grave and looked down and the vault lid was already in place. I didn’t know what else to do, so I started to play.

The workers put down their lunches and began to gather around. I played out my heart and soul for this man with no family and friends. I played like I’ve never played before for this homeless man.

And as I played ‘Amazing Grace,’ the workers began to weep. They wept, I wept, we all wept together. When I finished I packed up my guitar and started for my car. Though my head hung low, my heart was full.

As I opened the door to my car, I heard one of the workers say, “I never seen nothin’ like that before and I’ve been putting in septic tanks for twenty years.”
***
An old farmer is sitting on his front porch watching the sunrise...
An old farmer is sitting on his front porch watching the sunrise when he sees the neighbor's kid walk by carrying a spool of something metallic under his arm.

"Hey boy, whatcha got there?"

"Chicken wire."

"What you gonna do with that?"

"Gonna catch some chickens."

"You damn fool! You can't catch chickens with chicken wire!" says the old man.

The boy just laughs and keeps walking.

That evening at sunset, the boy walks by, dragging behind him 30 chickens caught in the chicken wire.

The next morning, the old man sees the boy walk by carrying a shiny roll of something.

"Hey boy, whatcha got there?"

"Duct tape."

"What you gonna do with that?"

"Gonna catch me some ducks."

"You damn fool! You can't catch ducks with duct tape!"

The boy just laughs and keeps walking.

That evening at sunset, the boy walks by, trailing behind him 30 ducks caught in a long trail of duct tape.

The next morning, the old man sees the boy walking by carrying a branch behind him. 

"Hey boy, whatcha got there?"

"It's a pussy willow."

"Wait up," says the old man. "I'll get my hat!"
***
This lady had a sick duck she took in to the vet.
This lady had a sick duck she took in to the vet  to have it checked out. The vet looked at the duck and said, " Lady, your duck is dead."

"Oh no, this cannot be. Please isn't there something you can do. My duck cannot be dead," said the lady. 

So the vet brought in a Labrador Retriever who sniffed at the duck and then looked up at the vet. "Yep, your duck is dead."

"No, isn't there some other way to check on my duck?" the lady exclaimed. 

So the vet brought in a cat who circled around the duck with the most curious expression on his face and finally looked up at the vet. 

The vet said, "Lady it's confirmed. Your duck is dead. "

The lady asked, "Well, how much do I owe you?"

Looking apologetic, the vet said,"Well, it was going to be $150, but with the lab work and the cat scan it comes to $5000.
***
Father, what causes arthritis?
A drunk that smelled like a brewery got on a bus one day. He sat down next to a priest. The drunk's shirt was stained, his face was full of bright red lipstick and he had a half-empty bottle of wine sticking out of his pocket. He opened his newspaper and started reading. A couple minutes later, he asked the priest, ''Father, what causes arthritis?''
''Mister, it's caused by loose living, being with cheap, wicked women, too much alcohol, and contempt for your fellow man,'' the priest replied. ''Imagine that,'' the drunk muttered. He returned to reading his paper.

The priest, thinking about what he had said, turned to the man and apologized: ''I'm sorry, I didn't mean to come on so strong. How long have you had arthritis?'' ''I don't have arthritis, Father,'' the drunk said, ''but I just read in the paper that the Pope does.''
***
A man walks into a pet store
A guy goes to a pet store to buy an unusual pet and walks out with a centipede in a white box. Once he gets it home, the guy decides to take the centipede to his local bar and show it to his drinking buddies. He taps on the box and says, ‘Would you like to go to McGuire’s with me and have a beer?’ There’s no answer from the centipede. He waits a few moments then says, ‘How about you and me going to a bar?’ Again, there’s no answer. Thinking the centipede can’t hear him, the man goes right up to the box and yells, ‘Hey! Would you like to go to McGuire’s bar and have a drink?!’ A little voice comes out of the box, ‘I fucking heard you the first time! I’m putting on my shoes.’
***
After having their 11th child, a redneck couple decided that was enough,...
...as they could not afford a larger bed. So the husband went to his veterinarian and told him that he and his cousin didn't want to have any more children.

The doctor told him that there was a procedure called a vasectomy that could fix the problem but that it was expensive. A less costly alternative, said the doctor, was to go home, get a cherry bomb (fireworks are legal in Alabama), light it, put it in a beer can, then hold the can up to his ear and count to 10.

The redneck said to the doctor, "I may not be the smartest man in the world, but I don't see how putting a cherry bomb in a beer can next to my ear is going to help me".

"Trust me," said the doctor.

So the man went home, lit a cherry bomb and put it in a beer can. He held the can up to his ear and began to count:

"1"

"2"

"3"

"4"

"5"

At which point he paused, placed the beer can between his legs, and resumed counting on his other hand.
***
"My first appointment with a new dentist!!"
Have you ever been guilty of looking at others your own age and thinking, surely I can't look that old. Well, you'll love this one....

My name is Alice Smith and I was sitting in the waiting room for my first appointment with a new dentist. I noticed his diploma, which had his full name.

Suddenly, I remembered a tall, handsome, dark-haired boy with the same name had been in my high school class some 30-odd years ago. Could he be the same guy that i had a secret crush on, way back then?

Upon seeing him, however, I quickly discarded any such thought. This balding, gray-haired man with the deeply lined face was way too old to have been my classmate.

After he examined my teeth, I asked him if he had attended Morgan Park High school.

'Yes. Yes, I did.' he gleamed with pride.

'When did you graduate?' I asked.

He answered, 'In 1967. Why do you ask?'

'You were in my class!' I exclaimed.

He looked at me closely. Then, that ugly, old, bald, wrinkled, fat, gray-haired man asked, 'What did you teach?'

***
Two construction workers
Two workers were busy in a construction work of a multi-storeyed building. One of them (Worker A) was standing on a plank outside the 5th floor, while the other (Worker B) was watching him from the ground. Suddenly Worker A realised that he didn't have the hammer. So he shouts to worker B.

Worker A: "I need a hammer."

No response from Worker B. Realising that Worker B couldn't hear him, Worker A started making hand gesture. 

Worker A's gesture: Points finger at himself (I), then taps his 'knee' with his hand (need) and then shook his hand to represent a hammer.

After watching him, Worker B unzipped his pant, took out his prick and starts masturbating. Worker A got furious, he gets inside the building and goes downstair to yell at Worker B.

Worker A:  "Wtf are you doing? All I was saying that I need a hammer."

Worker B: "I know what you mean. And I was saying that I am coming."
***
The new CEO
On a tour of the facilities, the new CEO noticed a guy leaning against a wall. The room was full of workers and he wanted to let them know that he meant business. He asked the guy, 'How much money money do you make a week?'

A little surprised, the young man looked at him and said, 'I make $400 a week. Why?'

The CEO said, 'Wait right here.' He walked back to his office, came back in two minutes, and handed the guy $1,600 in cash and said, 'Here's four weeks' pay. Now GET OUT and don't come back.'

Feeling pretty good about himself the CEO looked around the room and asked, 'Does anyone want to tell me what that goof-ball did here?'
From across the room a voice said, 'That was the pizza delivery guy.'
***
Excuse me sir, how much have you had to drink tonight?
A cop waited outside a popular pub hoping to nab a drunk-driver.

At closing time, as everyone came out, he spotted his potential quarry.

The man was so obviously inebriated that he could barely walk.

He stumbled around the parking lot for a few minutes looking for his car.

After trying his keys on five others, he finally found his own vehicle.

He sat in the car a good 10 minutes as the other pub patrons left.

He turned his lights on, then off.

He started to pull forward into the grass, then stopped.

Finally, when his was the last car, he pulled out onto the road and started to drive away.

The cop, waiting for this, turned on his lights and pulled the man over.

He administered the breathalyzer test and, to his great surprise, the man easily passed.

The cop was dumbfounded.

'This equipment must be broken,' exclaimed the policeman.

'I doubt it,' said the man. 'Tonight I'm the DD...Designated Decoy.'

__________________________________


Edit: Those who think he can still get arrested.. I know it guys. Don't take it literally. Its a JOKE.

Sometimes it might actually happen, right? Just enjoy possibility. :)
***
I don't see what's so offensive about calling someone from Pakistan a Paki...
It's like calling someone from Scotland a Scot, an Australian an Aussie or someone from France a cunt
***
How do you find a velociraptor?
By taking the integral of the acceleraptor!

Me: http://imgur.com/H8rLjub

Everyone else: http://imgur.com/J3hC4Ci
***
No balls.
A bloke goes to the  council to apply for a job in the office.
The interviewer asks him,"Are you allergic to anything"?
He replies, "Yes caffeine."
"Have you ever worked for the public service before."
"Yes I was in the army"he says,I was in Iraq for two tours."
The interviewer says, "That will give you 5 extra points toward employment.
Then he asks,"Are you disabled in any way?"
The guy says "Yes,a mine exploded next to me when I was there and I lost both my testicles." The interviewer grimaces and then says,"O.K.
You've got enough points for me to take you on right away.
Our normal hours are from 8.00am to 4.00pm.......but you can start tomorrow at 10.00am-and carry on starting at 10.00am everyday."
The bloke is puzzled and asks."If the work hours are from 8.00am to 4.00pm ,why don't you want me here until 10.00am?
I'm not looking for any special treatment y'know."
"What you have to understand is that this is a council job,"the 
interviewer says, "For the first two hours,we just stand around drinking coffee and scratching our balls. There's no point coming in for that."
***
Confession...
A woman takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work.

Unbeknownst to her, her 9 year old son was hiding in the closet.  Her husband comes home unexpectedly, so she puts the lover in the closet with the little boy.

The little boy says, "Dark in here."

The man says, "Yes it is."

Boy - "I have a baseball."

Man - "That's nice."

Boy - "Want to buy it?"

Man - "No, thanks."

Boy - "My dad's outside."

Man - "OK, how much?"

Boy - "$250."


In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom's lover are in the closet together.


Boy - "Dark in here."

Man - "Yes, it is."

Boy - "I have a baseball glove."


The lover, remembering the last time, asks the boy, "How much?"

Boy - "$750."

Man - "Fine."


A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your glove. Let's go outside and toss the baseball back and
forth."

The boy says, "I can't. I sold them."

The father asks, "How much did you sell them for?"

The son says "$1,000."

The father says, "That's terrible to overcharge your friends like that. That is way more than those two things cost. I'm going to take you to church and make you confess."

They go to the church and the father makes the little boy sit in the confession booth and he closes the door.


The boy says, "Dark in here."

The priest says, "Don't start that shit again."
***
There was a man in Bulgaria who drove a train for a living...
There was a man in Bulgaria who drove a train for a living.

He loved his job, driving a train had been his dream ever since he was a child. 

He loved to make the train go as fast as possible. 

Unfortunately, one day he was a little too reckless and caused a crash. 

He made it out, but a single person died. 

Well, needless to say, he went to court over this incident. 

He was found guilty, and was sentenced to death by electrocution. 

When the day of the execution came, he requested a single banana as his last meal. 

After eating the banana, he was strapped into the electric chair. 

The switch was flown, sparks flew and smoke filled the air- but nothing happened.

The man was perfectly fine.

Well, at the time, there was an old Bulgarian law that said a failed execution was a sign of divine intervention, so the man was allowed to go free. 

And somehow, he managed to get his old job back driving the train. 

Having not learned his lesson at all, he went right back to driving the train with reckless abandon. 

Once again, he caused a train to crash, this time killing two people. 

The trial went much the same as the first, resulting in a sentence of execution. 

For his final meal, the man requested two bananas. 

After eating the bananas, he was strapped into the electric chair.

The switch was thrown, sparks flew, smoke filled the room- and the man was once again unharmed.

Well, this of course meant that he was free to go. 

And once again, he somehow manages to get his old job back. 

To what should have been the surprise of no one, he crashed yet another train and killed three people. 

And so he once again found himself being sentenced to death. 

On the day of his execution, he requested his final meal- three bananas.

"You know what? No," said the executioner. "I've had it with you and your stupid bananas and walking out of here unharmed. I'm not giving you a thing to eat, we're strapping you in and doing this now." 

Well, it was against protocol, but the man was strapped in to the electric chair without a last meal. 

The switch was pulled, sparks flew, smoke filled the room- and the man was still unharmed. 

The executioner was speechless.

The man looked at the executioner and said "Oh, the bananas had nothing to do with it. I'm just a bad conductor."
***
A cabbie picks up a nun...
A cabbie picks up a Nun.  

She gets into the cab, and notices that the VERY handsome cab driver won't stop staring at her.  

She asks him why he is staring.  

He replies: *'I have a question to ask you but I don't want to offend you.'*  

She answers, *'My son, you cannot offend me. When you're as old as I am and have been a nun as long as I have, you get a chance to see and hear just about everything. I'm sure that there's nothing you could say or ask that I would find offensive'*  

*'Well, I've always had a fantasy to have a nun kiss me.'*  

She responds, *'Well, let's see what we can do about that.'*    

1. *'You have to be Single.*    

2. *You must be Catholic.'*  

The cab driver is very excited and says,  *'Yes, I'm single and Catholic!'*  

*'OK'* the nun says. *'Pull into the next alley.'*  

The nun fulfils his fantasy, with a kiss that would make a hooker blush.  

But when they get back on the road, the cab driver starts crying. *'My dear child,'* says the nun, *'why are you crying?'*  

*'Forgive me but I've sinned. I lied and I must confess, I'm married and I'm Jewish.'*  

The nun says, *'That's OK. My name is Kevin and I'm going to a fancy dress party.'*
***
A little old lady wanted to join a biker club...
A little old lady wanted to join a biker club.

She knocked on the door of a local biker club and a big, hairy, bearded biker with tattoos all over his arms answered the door.

She proclaimed, "I want to join your biker club." 

The guy was amused and told her that she needed to meet certain biker requirements before she was allowed to join. 

So the biker asked her, "You have a bike?"

The little old lady said, "Yea, that's my Harley over there," and points to a Harley parked in the driveway. 

The biker asked her, "Do you smoke?" 

The little old lady said "Yea, I smoke. I smoke 4 packs of cigarettes a day and a couple of cigars while I'm shooting pool."

The biker is impressed and asked, "Well, have you ever been picked up by the fuzz?"

The little old lady said, "No, I've never been picked up by the fuzz, but I've been swung around by my nipples a few times." 

***
Raunchiest joke I told when I was younger (NSFW)
A beautiful woman approaches a man at a bar and offers him a proposition "For $200 I bet I can suck your dick and sing the national anthem at the same time." The man figures he can get some head and actually get paid for it, so he obliges. The woman takes him into the closet, starts sucking, and sure enough starts singing the national anthem at the same time. The man pays his $200 and walks away slightly confused, but very relaxed. 

The next night, the same woman comes into the bar and propositions another man. "For $200 I bet I can suck your dick and sing the national anthem at the same time." She brings him to the closet, performs her amazing feat, and collects her money from the flabbergasted stranger.

The next night, the same woman comes into the bar and propositions the same man from the 1st night (having forgotten she had already "conned" this particular gentleman.) "For $200 I bet I can suck your dick and sing the national anthem at the same time." Being somewhat wiser, the man agrees, but asks to go to his car briefly before she starts. He grabs the small flashlight out of his glovebox, so that THIS time, he can see what the promiscuous woman is doing to accomplish this amazing trick.

She takes him into the closet, and begins to suck his dick and sing the national anthem.  Just as she started the part about ramparts, the man clicks on the flashlight and there he sees a glass eye-ball rolling around on the table.
***
The LAPD, The FBI and The CIA
The LAPD, The FBI, and the CIA are all trying to prove that they are the best at apprehending criminals. The President decides to give them a test. He releases a rabbit into a forest and each of them has to catch it.

The CIA goes in. They place animal informants throughout the forest. They question all plant and mineral witnesses. After three months of extensive investigations they conclude that rabbits do not exist.

The FBI goes in. After two weeks with no leads they burn the forest, killing everything in it, including the rabbit, and they make no apologies. The rabbit had it coming.

The LAPD goes in. They come out two hours later with a badly beaten bear. The bear is yelling: "Okay! Okay! I'm a rabbit! I'm a rabbit!'
***
A joke my grandmother, of all people, told me when I was a kid.
I don't know how many of y'all have heard this joke, but here it goes.Two guys were at a University of Georgia football game when one of them looks down at the Georgia Bulldog sidelines and sees Uga, the school mascot, licking himself like dogs like to do. The guy smiles, leans over to his buddy while pointing at Uga and says, "Man, I wish I could do that". His friend looks back at him in surprise and says, "Man, that dog would bite you!"
***
A lawyer runs a stop sign and gets pulled over by a sheriff.
He thinks he's smarter being a big shot lawyer from New York and has a better education than an sheriff from West Virginia. The sheriff asks for license and registration. 

The lawyer asks, "What for?" 

The sheriff responds, "You didn't come to a complete stop at the stop sign." 

The lawyer says, "I slowed down and no one was coming." 

"You still didn't come to a complete stop. License and registration please," says the sheriff impatiently. 

The lawyer says, "If you can show me the legal difference between slow down and stop, I'll give you my license and registration and you can give me the ticket. If not, you let me go and don't give me the ticket." 

The sheriff says, "That sounds fair, please exit your vehicle." 

The lawyer steps out and the sheriff takes out his nightstick and starts beating the lawyer with it. 

The sheriff says, "Do you want me to stop or just slow down?"
***
Going to the prom
A boy asks the crush of his dreams out to prom, and she said yes! So he plans out a list of to-do before the big dance.

First he goes to rent a tux, but there is a long tux line at the shop, he waits for 20 minutes.

Next, he has to get some flowers, so he heads over to the florist and there’s a huge flower line there. He waits even longer but eventually gets the flowers. Next he heads out to rent a limo. 
Unfortunately, there’s a large limo line at the rental office, but he’s patient and gets a very nice limo.

Lastly he goes to the barber and once again there is a long line but as he sits and waits he is just dreaming how his date will look, and within no time he gets his hair cut.

Finally, the day of the prom comes. The two are dancing happily and his girlfriend is having a great time. When the song is over, she asks him to get her some punch, so he heads over to the punch table and there’s no punchline.
***
An old lady went to the Bank of America with a large bag full of money
She insisted on speaking to the president of the Bank in order to open a savings account because, she said, she had a lot of money. 

After much discussion an employee took her to the office of the president.

The president of the Bank asked her how much she wanted to deposit.

She said $165,000.

Curious, he asked her how she had saved such a large sum of money.

The old lady said she made bets. 

The president, quite surprised, asked: “What kind of bets?”

The old lady said: “For example, I bet you $25,000 that your testicles are square”.

The president started to laugh and pointed out that this kind of bet was impossible to win.

The old lady replied: “Would you like to make a bet?”

“Certainly”, answered the president, “I can guarantee you that my testicles are not square”.

The old lady then said to him:

“Given the size of the bet, I’ll come back tomorrow at 10am with my lawyer as a witness, if that’s ok with you”.

“No problem” said the president.

That evening, the president became very nervous about the bet and spent a long time in front of his mirror examining his testicles, turning them in all directions, again and again, in order to make sure that his testicles could not be seen as square and therefore be sure to win this bet.

On the next day, 10am sharp, the old lady arrived with her lawyer at the president's office. 

The president then dropped his trousers so that she and her lawyer could see everything.

The old lady came closer and said that given the amount money involved, she needed to touch them to be completely certain. The president agreed and the old lady, smiling, started examining his testicles.

At that point the president looked up to see the lawyer banging his head against the wall.

“What's his problem?”, he asked the old lady.

To which she answered: “I bet him $100,000 that at around 10am today I would be holding the testicles of the president of the Bank of America in my hand.”
***
5 people are in a plane that is about to crash.
The five people are:
-Trump
-Morgan Freeman 
-Larry Page
-The Pope
-A schoolboy

There are only 4 parachutes.

Morgan freeman says that he is an entertainer of millions, and jumps out of the plane with a parachute.

Larry Page says that he founded Google, and jumps out of the plane with a parachute.

Trump says that he is the smartest man in America, and jumps out of the plane with a parachute.

There are only two people left, and one parachute. The Pope says "I have lived a long and happy life, you can take the parachute" to the schoolboy.

The schoolboy replies "no, it's OK, we can both go, the smartest man in America took my backpack!"
***
Three cowboys (nsfw)
Three cowboys are sitting around a fire boasting about how tough they are. 

The cowboy from Oklahoma says, "I was driving cattle last year, and was bit on the ass by a rattler. Finished the cattle drive. Took three days before I got the doc to look at me. Didn't shed a tear."

The cowboy from New Mexico says, "Yeah? Well I broke up two bulls that were fighting. One popped out my right eye. I picked it up, took it to the doc, and he got me fixed up right. Didn't shed a tear."

The cowboy from Texas sat silently stirring the fire with his dick.
***
A couple is walking in St. Petersburg Square on Christmas Eve
They feel a slight precipitation.


"I think it’s raining," says the man.



"No, it’s snowing," replies the woman. 


"How about we ask this Communist officer here? He is always right!" exclaims the man. "Officer Rudolph, is it raining or snowing?"


"Definitely raining," Officer Rudolph replies before walking off.


The man turns to his wife with a smile. “See? Rudolph the Red knows rain, dear.”


***
A Jets fan walks into a bar with his dog.
The bartender says, "Hey bud, no pets allowed in here."

The man says, "But wait! This is a special dog, you have to turn on the game to see. When the Jets score, my dog does flips!"

Sure enough, when the bartender turns on the game, the Jets make a few field goals and the dog starts flipping and jumping after each kick.

"Wow," said the bartender, amazed, "that's great! What does he do when they score a touchdown?"

"I don't know, I've only had him for two years." 
***
Not fucked yet.
Once upon a time there was a young man hiking through the woods. As he was gaily skipping through a path he suddenly started to hear footsteps approaching. The footsteps came closer until the trees finally disclosed a group of twenty natives with spears carrying a fat man and his fat kid on a throne. The man was eating a human leg while his son was eating some human ribs.THEY WHERE CANNIBALS. 

"I'm fucked" the young hiker hopelessly thought. However, at that same moment the clouds opened up and the hand of god appeared and said "No son, you are still not fucked. Steal the spear from one of the guards and put it through the fat kid's forehead". The man was aware that this plan did not sound effective, but he wanted to live and knew that god had to know what he was doing so he trusted him. He ran towards the closest guard, stole his spear, and shot it towards the fatkid's forehead, killing him instantly. The sky opened up again, "NOW you are fucked son".
***
Bill Clinton likes to go for a walk every Saturday evening...
One evening, he passed by an alley, and a prostitute yelled at him, 
"Fifty dollars will buy you a good time!" 

He responded by saying "How's about 5 dollars?", jokingly, and kept walking.

This same thing kept happening every Saturday for a couple weeks; every time Bill passed the prostitute, she would offer him her services for fifty dollars, and he would decline and say he'd only pay five. One evening, however, Hillary asked if she could come along on the walk with him, and Bill reluctantly agreed, nervous about what Hillary would say if the prostitute yelled at him again. They went on the walk, and when they passed the alley, to Bill's surprise, the prostitute was silent, and they continued on their walk. As they were about to round the corner, however, they heard the prostitute's voice from behind them,

"So that's what five dollars gets you, huh?"
***
Tennis Elbow
One day Bill complained to his friend, "My elbow really hurts, I guess I should see a doctor." 

His friend said, "Don't do that. There's a computer at the drug store that can diagnose anything quicker and cheaper than a doctor. Just put in a sample of your urine and the computer will diagnose your problem and tell you what you can do about it. It only costs ten dollars." 

Bill figured he had nothing to lose, so he filled a jar with a urine sample and went to the drug store. Finding the computer, he poured in the sample and deposited the $10. 

The computer started making some noise and various lights started flashing. After a brief pause out popped a small slip of paper on which was printed: 

You have tennis elbow. Soak your arm in warm water. Avoid heavy lifting. It will be better in two weeks. 

Late that evening while thinking how amazing this new technology was and how it would change medical science forever, he began to wonder if this machine could be fooled. 

He decided to give it a try. He mixed together some tap water, a stool sample from his dog, and urine samples from his wife and daughter. To top it off, he masturbated into the concoction. 

He went back to the drug store, located the machine, poured in the sample, and deposited the $10. 

The computer made the usual noise and printed out the following message: 

Your tap water is too hard. Get a water softener. 

Your dog has worms. Get him vitamins. 

Your daughter is using cocaine. Put her in a rehabilitation clinic. 

Your wife is pregnant with twin girls. They aren't yours. Get a lawyer. 

And if you don't stop jerking off, your tennis elbow will never get better
***
A university student wanted to sit next to one of his teachers at lunch
However, the teacher looked at the student with an arrogant face and said:

'A swan shan't be friends with a pig.'

'Then I shall fly on,' answered the student with a smile.

The teacher was clearly vexed by the cheeky reply and decided to make sure to do everything in his power to fail the student at the exams.

At the oral exam, he gave the student the hardest questions, but the student had amazing answers for everything. Therefore, hoping he could still fail his victim, the teacher asked him a trickier question:

'You're walking on a road and you find two bags. One contains gold, the other cleverness. Which bag do you choose?'

'The gold.'

'Unfortunately, I don't agree. I'd choose cleverness, because that's more important than money.'

'Everyone would choose what they don't have,' says the student.

The teacher turns red, and he's so angry he writes "ass" on the student's paper. The student leaves without looking at the paper. However, he returns shortly, gives back his paper and says:

'Excuse me sir, you did sign my paper, but you forgot to give my grade!'
***
Granny's boyfriend
A 5 yr old boy went to visit his grandmother one day.

 While playing with his toys in her bedroom while Grandma was dusting, he looked up and said, "Grandma, how come you dont have a boyfriend?"

 Grandma replied, "Honey, my TV is my boyfriend. I can sit in my bedroom and watch it all day long. The TV evangelists keep me company and make me feel so good. The comedies make me laugh. I'm really happy with the TV as my boyfriend."

 Grandma turned on the TV and the reception was terrible. She started adjusting the knobs, trying to get the picture in focus. Frustrated, she finally started hitting the backside of the TV, hoping to fix the problem. The little boy heard the doorbell ring, so he hurried to open the door, and there stood a man.

 The man said, "Hello, son, is your grandma home?"

 The little boy replied, "Yeah, but she's in the bedroom banging her boyfriend."
***
One day, Einstein has to give a conference to all the top scientists in the world...
One day, Einstein has to give a conference to all the top scientists  in the world.

On the way there, he tells his driver, that looks a bit like him, "I'm sick of all these conferences, I always say the same things over and over!"

The drivers agrees, "You're right, as your driver, I attended all of them, and even though I don't know anything about science, I could give the conference in your place."

"That's a great idea!" says Einstein "Lets switch places then!"

So they switch clothes and as soon as they arrive, the driver dressed as Einstein, goes on stage and starts giving the usual speech, while the real Einstein, dressed as the car driver, attends it.

But in the crowd, there was one scientist who wanted to impress everyone and thought of a very difficult question to ask Einstein, hoping he wouldn't be able to respond. 

So this guy stands up and interrupts the conference by posing his very difficult question. 

The whole room goes silent, holding their breath, waiting for the response.

The driver looks at him, dead in the eyes and says : "Sir, your question is so easy to answer that I'm going to let my driver reply to it for me."
***
A teenager had just passed his drivers test, and he asked his dad to buy him a car
"Dad, will you be able to get me a car?" Asked the boy

"I suppose a car would be in order *if*  you can raise your grades from C's to B's, you study your Bible, and cut your hair." Replied the father.

After contemplating for many hours, the boy decided it was a good and fair compromise. Six weeks later, the father is astonished. His son was excelling in school, he studied his Bible every day, but his hair was still long and shaggy.
"I am very impressed with you" said the father "you are passing all of your classes, and you read the Bible every day. But why wont you cut your hair?"  

"After reading the Bible, I have noticed something." Said the boy "Moses, Samson, and Absalom all had long hair. There is even evidence that *Jesus* may have had long hair!"

The father replied back "Did you also notice how they had to walk everywhere too?"
***
A priest, a minister, and a rabbi...
...decide to have a friendly competition to see who is the best at their job.  To make things interesting, they agree to see who is best at converting the bears in the local woods.  A week passes, and they get together to compare notes.

The priest says, "I was walking through the woods and came upon a patch of berries where there was a bear, gathering berries.  I walked up to the bear and I gave him the Holy Communion, and thus converted the bear".  

The minister goes, "I too was walking through the woods, and came across a stream. There was a bear in the stream, catching fish.  So I waded out to him, and baptized the bear right there, and so converting him."

The priest and minster look over to the rabbi, and this guy is in rough shape. He is in total traction, with a full body cast, cuts and scrapes on his face and hands.  

"Oy," the rabbi says, "In retrospect, I shouldn't have led with the circumcision."  
***
A young boy says to his father "Dad, our math teacher is asking to see you."


"What happened?" The father asks.

"Well, she asks me, 'how much is 7 * 9?' I answer '63' , then she asks, 'and 9 * 7?' so I asked 'what's the fucking difference?' "

"Indeed, what is the difference?" asks the father. ''Sure, I'll go.''

The next day, the boy comes home from school "Dad, have you gone by the school?" He asks.

"Not yet."

"Well when you do, come and see the gym teacher also."

"Why?" asks the father.

The boy explains, "Well we had a gym class today, and he asked me to raise my left arm, I did. Then my right arm, I also raised it. Then he asked me to lift my right leg, so I did. 'Now,' he says, 'lift your left leg,' so I asked 'What, am I suppose to stand on my cock!?'"

"Exactly," says the father. "Alright, I'll come."

The next day, the boy asks his father "Did you go to the school?"

"No, not yet."

"Don't bother, I got expelled."

Surprised, the father asks "Why did you get expelled?"

"Well, they summoned me to the principal's office, and sitting there were the math teacher, the gym teacher, and the art teacher."

"The fuck was the art teacher doing there!?" asks the father.

"That's what I said" replied the boy.
  

a repost, but I liked it
***
Newspaper ad - RICH WIDOW LOOKING FOR MAN TO SHARE LIFE AND FORTUNE WITH THE FOLLOWING QUALIFICATIONS:
1. WON'T BEAT ME UP
2. WON'T RUN AWAY
3. HAS TO BE GREAT IN BED

For several months, her phone rang off the hook, her doorbell was ringing constantly, she received tons of mail...all to no avail. None of the men seemed to meet her qualifications.

Then one day the doorbell rang yet again. She opened the door to find a man, with no arms and no legs, lying on the welcome mat. Perplexed, she asked, "Who are you and what do you want?"

"Hi," said the man "Your search is over, for I am the man of your dreams. I've got no arms, so I can't beat you up and I've got no legs, so I can't run away."

The old woman asked, "What makes you think you're so great in bed?"

To which he replied, "I rang the doorbell, didn't I?"
 
***
The 105 year old man
A man who just turned 105 is getting interviewed by the paper. 

Journalist: "So John, congratulations on turning 105, we are writing a story about your everyday life. What is the first thing you do in the morning?"  



John: "I take a piss.....oooh I piss so much!"

Journalist: "Okay John, but I can't write that in the paper, what's the second thing you do in the morning?"

John: "I shit, oh boy do I shit!"

Journalist: "John, come on, I can't write that in the paper either, what's the third thing you do in the morning?"

John: "I get out of bed..!"

Journalist: "Thank you"
***
Two doctors were having sex when suddenly...
Two doctors were having sex when suddenly... the male doctor, in the moment, says to the female doctor,

**"Wow, you must be a Gynecologist, you *really* know how to use that thing..."**

The female doctor responds,

**"Thanks! You must be an anesthesiologist."**

The male doctor replies,

**"Really? What makes you say that?"**

She retorts,

**"Because I can't seem to feel a thing!"**

_______________________________
I hadn't heard this before, and it came from an EMT/Paramedic training my staff for CPR. I got a good chuckle out of it, thought I would share.

***
Bigger Boobs
A woman goes to the doctor and asks about options to augment her breasts. 

She doesn't want surgery, so that rules out implants. The doctor suggests a new technology for her bra that uses the inflatable pump mechanism that was made popular with basketball sneakers. If she helps trial the product, she'll get them for free. She tries them out and gets fitted properly. It has little sacs in her bra that are inflated when she flaps her arms like a chicken, giving her a larger bust. She decides to go out to the bar to see if men will notice. She sees a handsome man across the room and starts walking up to him, seductively smiling, flapping her arms and says "Haven't I seen you here before?". "No, but I think we go to the same doctor" he answers, furiously opening and closing his legs.
***
Obama went on a run
and fell in a river.

-

three young boys pulled him out of the river. Obama said my god, you saved the president of your country. name any one thing you want and you'll have it.

-

The first boy said he wanted a house for his mother, they'd never had a house. Obama bought it.

-

The second boy wanted to go to Disney world. Obama made it so.

-

The third boy asked for a wheelchair. Perplexed, Obama said "Why do you need a wheel chair, you seem to walk fine".

-

The young boy replied "well now, sure. but wait until my dad finds out i saved your life." 
***
A farmer walked into an attorneys office...


A farmer walked into an attorney’s office wanting to file for a divorce. The attorney asked, “May I help you?”

The farmer said, “Yeah. I want to get one of those dee-vorces.”

The attorney asked, “Well, do you have any grounds?”

The farmer replied, “Yeah. I got about 140 acres.”

The attorney said, “No, you don’t understand. Do you have a case?”

The farmer said, “No, I don’t have a Case, but I have a John Deere.”

The attorney said, “No you don’t understand, I mean do you have a grudge?”

The farmer said, “Yeah, I got a grudge. That’s where I park my John Deere.”

The attorney said, “No, sir, I mean do you have a suit?”

The farmer said, “Yessir, I got a suit. I wear it to church on Sundays.”

The exasperated attorney said, “Well, sir, does your wife beat you up or anything?”

The farmer said, “No, sir, we both get up about 4:30.”

Finally, the attorney asked, “Okay, let me put it this way. WHY DO YOU WANT A DIVORCE?”

And the farmer replied, “Well, I can never have a meaningful conversation with her!”

***
Fishing Priest
A priest hooks a huge fish. Helping him reel it in, a sailor says, "Whoa, look at the size of that fucker!"

"Hey, mind your language!" says the priest.

Embarrassed, the sailor thinks quickly and blurts out, "Sorry father, but that's what this fish is called - it's a Fucker fish." Accepting the explanation, the priest forgives the sailor and takes the fish back to church.

"Look at this huge fucker," says the priest, spotting the bishop.

"Language, please! This is God's house," replies the bishop.

"No, no - that's what this fish is called," says the priest.

"Oh," says the bishop, scratching his chin. "I could clean that fucker and we could have it for dinner".

So the bishop takes the fish, cleans it, and brings it to the mother superior. "Could you cook this fucker for dinner tonight?" he asks her.

"My, what language!" she exclaims, clearly shocked.

"No, sister that's what the fish is called - a fucker," says the bishop.

Satisfied with the explanation, the mother superior says, "Wonderful, I'll cook that fucker tonight - the Pope is coming for dinner!"

The fish tastes just great and the Pope asks where they got it.

"Well, I caught the fucker!" says the priest.

"And I cleaned the fucker!" says the bishop.

"And I cooked the fucker!" says the mother superior.

The Pope stares at them for a minute with a steely gaze, leans back on his chair, takes off his cap, puts his feet up on the table, pours himself a whiskey and says, "You know what? You cunts are alright".



**Edit:** Changed it to Graphiite's formatting, thank you! And yes, I've got this joke off 4chan... :D
***
Patrick wants a bike...
For his birthday, little Patrick asked for a 10-speed bicycle. His father said, "Son, we'd give you one, but the mortgage on this house is $80,000 & your mother just lost her job. There's no way we can afford it."

The next day the father saw little Patrick heading out the front door with a suitcase. So he asked, "Son, where are you going?"

Little Patrick told him, "I was walking past your room last night and heard you telling mom you were pulling out. Then I heard her tell you to wait because she was coming too. And I'll be damned if I'm staying here by myself with an $80,000 mortgage and no bike!"
***
So a guy and his new girlfriend are messing around...
when she stops him in his tracks and says, "I don't think I'm ready for sex with you yet. We've only been going out for a couple of weeks."

Disappointed, the guy asks, "well, is there anything I can do to show you that I'm serious and want to take our relationship to the next level?"

She thinks for a moment and replies, "if you are willing to come over for dinner and meet my parents, I'll be willing to take things to the next level." The guy agrees almost immediately. 

The day of the dinner, the young man goes to his local pharmacy to buy protection. The problem is that he's a virgin and has no idea what he's doing. Embarrassed yet determined to get laid, he describes his situation to the pharmacist currently working the counter. The pharmacist shows him the condoms, lube, and other intimacy products and describes how to use them in significant detail. The lad thanks him, pays, and leaves. 

Later that evening, the guy gets to his girlfriend's house right as dinner is ready. The eager beaver and his lady sit down at the table as the mom and dad join them. The father sits down, bows his head, and asks the rest of the table to join him in a prayer. They say grace before beginning the meal, however, our young protagonist remains praying for several minutes after everyone else begins their meal. 

The girlfriend, confused, eventually whispers to him "I didn't know you were THIS religious..." 

Still bowing his head, he whispers back, "I didn't know your father was a pharmacist." 
***
A horse walks into a bar.
A Horse walks into a bar.
The Bartender sees such a vivid depth
of despair and ennui in the Horse's eyes,
like the Horse has stared into the abyss
and found the infinite void of nothingness so deep
that the Horse could no longer believe
that he himself nor anyone nor anything else existed.
To say something exists requires knowledge of self,
which requires knowledge of existence of the self, 
an obviously impossible leap of logic,
absurd to even attempt to conceive or contemplate.
The Bartender,
in that single instant within the Horse's mind,
became the nothingness the Horse perceived, 
and thus was rendered speechless.
If neither the Horse,
nor the Bartender,
nor the bar itself can be said to exist,
then why should he ask,
how could he ask,
"why the long face?"
The question can have no meaning,
and that which has no meaning cannot be stated.
The Bartender, dumbstruck, not by realization of mortality
but by fundamental doubt that he was ever alive,
gazes into the endless depth of the Horse's eyes,
and asks him, "Sir, I beg you say, do I exist?"
The Horse replies,
"Neighhhh..."
***
My 4 year old son just got me with a dad joke I hadn't heard before.
My son was playing with his teenage mutant ninja turtle action figures, and was making them fight each other. 

Me: "Where are their weapons? Are they just fighting with their bare hands?"

Son: "No, they are fighting with their turtle hands."

Doesn't have a clue why I was laughing so hard.

Edit: mutant added**

Edit 2: to those who are telling me it's not a joke, because my son doesn't understand the English language. WOW, you're right! I hadn't thought of that. I really thought he got me, but you have changed everything! My 4 year old son doesn't know the word "bare", or sarcasm yet. Please stop PMing me that now. Thank you.

***
One eared Admiral
A young Naval Officer was in a terrible car accident, but due to the heroics of the hospital staff the only permanent injury was the loss of one ear. Since he wasn't physically impaired he remained in the Navy and eventually became an Admiral. During his career he was always sensitive about his appearance.

One day the Admiral was interviewing two Navy Master Chiefs and a Marine Sergeant Major for his personal staff. The first Master Chief was a Surface Navy type and it was a great interview.

At the end of the interview the Admiral asked him, "Do you notice anything different about me?"

The Master Chief answered, "I couldn't help but notice you are missing your starboard ear, so I don't know whether this impacts your hearing on that side."

The Admiral got very angry at this lack of tact and threw him out of his office.

The next candidate, an Aviation Master Chief, when asked this same question, answered, "Well yes, you seem to be short one ear."

The Admiral threw him out also.

The third interview was with the Marine Sergeant Major. He was articulate, extremely sharp, and seemed to know more than the two Master Chiefs put together. The Admiral went ahead with the same question.

"Do you notice anything different about me?"

To his surprise the Sergeant Major said, "Yes sir you wear contact lenses."

The Admiral, impressed thought to himself, what an incredibly tactful Marine. "And how do you know that?" the Admiral asked.

The Sergeant Major replied, "Well sir, it's pretty hard to wear glasses with only one fuckin ear."
***
How old do you think I am?
 A woman decides to have a facelift for her birthday.

She spends $5000 and feels pretty good about the results.

On her way home, she stops at a newsstand to buy a newspaper. Before leaving she says to the clerk, "I hope you don't mind my asking, but how old do you think I am?" "About 32," is the reply. "I'm exactly 47," the woman says happily.

A little while later she goes into McDonald's and asks the counter girl the very same question.
She replies, "I guess about 29." " Nope, I'm 47."

Now, she's feeling really good about herself. She stops in a drug store on her way down the street. She goes up to the counter to get some mints and asks the clerk this burning question.
The clerk responds, "Oh, I'd say 30." Again she proudly responds, "I am 47, but, thank you."

While waiting for the bus to go home, she asks a senior gentleman the same question.
He replies, "Lady, I'm 78 and my eye sight is going. Although, when I was young, there was a sure way to tell how old a woman was. It sounds very forward, but it requires you to let me put my hands under your bra. Then I can tell you exactly how old you are."

They wait in silence on the empty street until curiosity gets the best of her. She finally blurts out, "What the heck, go ahead."

He slips both of his hands under her blouse and under her bra and begins to feel around very slowly and carefully. After a couple of minutes of this, she says, "Okay, okay, how old am I?"
He completes one last squeeze of her breasts, removes his hands, and says, "Madam, you are 47."

Stunned and amazed, the woman says, "That was incredible, how could you tell?"

The old man replies, "Promise you won't get mad?" "Promise," she says.

He replies, "I was behind you in line at McDonald's."
***
A female gorilla is alone in a cage at a zoo...
... She has become very cranky due to her isolation and has become increasingly aggressive. Her problematic behavior has become a concern of the zookeeper who decides to try to fix it. While trying to come up with a solution he notices the janitor, a very sleazy redneck type and gets an idea. He walks over to him and asks:

"Would you be willing to.. perhaps have sex with a gorilla for 500 dollars?"

The janitor thinks about it for a while and agrees but on 3 conditions.

"First!" He says, "I don't want to have to kiss her. Understood?"

"Yes." Says the zookeeper.

"Second!" The janitor says, "I don't want anyone to know about this!"

"Alright" says the zookeeper, "And what's the third condition?"

"I'm going to need a little bit more time to come up with the 500 dollars."
***
I installed a new home alarm system I've never felt safer
I've disconnected my home alarm system and de-registered from the Neighborhood Watch.


I've got two Pakistani flags raised in the front yard, one at each corner, and the black flag of ISIS in the center.


The local police, sheriff, FBI, CIA, NSA, Homeland Security, Secret Service and other agencies are all watching the house 24/7. I've never felt safer and I am saving $49.95 a month.
***
It worked for the bull
An old farmer is having trouble getting his bull to breed with the cows and was lamenting the fact to a few of his friends down at the local beer hall. 


One of them says, "Ya know, Ben, I used to have the same trouble with my bull, but I got it fixed really quick."


"How did you get it fixed?"


"Well, I just dipped my finger in the cow's vagina and rubbed it all over the bull's nose and he got right after her." 


Ben goes home to the farm and decides to try it. He grabs a cow, dips his fingers in the cow's vagina and rubs it all around the bull's nose. 


The bull gets a rip roaring boner and jumps on the cow immediately. Ben was impressed. 


That night, Ben gets into bed with his wife and can't get the effect on the bull out of his mind. 


As she lays sleeping, Ben dips his fingers into his wife's vagina and feeling that it's nice and wet, he rubs it all around his nose and gets a rip roaring hard on. 

He quickly shakes his wife awake and cries out, "Honey, look!" 


She rolls over, turns on the light and says, "You mean you woke me up in the middle of the night just to show me that you have a nosebleed?"

***
the heads of Coors, Budweiser and Guinness go to lunch.
So, the heads of Coors, Budweiser and Guinness are all sitting in a restaurant. When the waitress comes over she takes their drinks order first

- 'Ill have a silver bullet' says the Coors guy
- 'Ill have the king of beers' says the Budweiser guy
- 'Lemonade please' says the head of Guinness

The other two look at him ... 'Lemonade?'

'Well if you're not drinking beer neither am I'
***
A Televangelist, a Rabbi and a Hindu were traveling together
They came across a farm and asked to spend the night there. The farmer said, “I only have room for two, someone will have to sleep in the barn.” 

The Hindu volunteered. Moments later, there was a knock on the door. The Hindu said, “There is a cow in the barn. I can’t sleep on holy ground.” 

“I will go” said the Rabbi. Moments later there was a knock on the door. “I can’t sleep with a pig, pigs are unkosher.” 

So the Televangelist is sent out to the barn. Moments later, there was a knock on the door. 

It was the pig and the cow. 
***
A Russian, a Japanese dude and a guy from Boston were caught by a group of cannibals...
The leader said to them "we are going to eat you and use your skin to make a canoe, but we will give you the choice of killing yourselves in which ever way you want". 
The Russian made a grunting sound then snapped his neck clean off. The Japanese guy took out his samurai sword and honorably killed himself through 'hara-kiri'. 
All of a sudden the guy from Boston took a sharp rock and started stabbing himself all over his face and body. 
The tribe leader gasped and said "what are you doing! That's the longest and most painful way of killing yourself!" "Yeah well fuck you and your canoe!"
***
Severance Packages
The department of defense, in an effort to cut some costs decides to offer severance packages to some superfluous higher ranking officers. The offer is an honorable discharge and $1,000 for every inch between two points of their body of their choosing.

A Navy admiral takes this opportunity and heads into the medical office to have his two locations measured. He picks the tip of his big toe and the top of his forehead. The doctor measures 77 inches and off he goes to enjoy civilian life.

Next up is an Air Force general. He plans ahead a little better and raises his arm all the way up and stands of his toes and the doctor measures 99 inches. Out the door he goes nearly $100,000 richer and a civilian.

The last one to take the buy out is an Army General. The doctor asks him which two points he'd like measured and he replies;

"The tip of my penis to the base of my left testicle." 

The doctor is a little taken aback at this and reminds the man that no matter how well hung he is, he's probably short changing himself. The general assures the doctor that he knows what he's doing and would like to proceed.

"Ok, suit yourself sir. Drop your pants.", says the doctor who kneels down with his measuring tape. 

"Wait a minute! Where the hell is your left testicle?!", exclaims the shocked doctor.

"Heh, Vietnam."
***
It's late fall and the Indians on a remote reservation in South Dakota asked their new chief if the coming winter was going to be cold or mild.
Since he was a chief in a modern society, he had never been taught the old secrets. When he looked at the sky, he couldn't tell what the winter was going to be like.
 
Nevertheless, to be on the safe side, he told his tribe that the winter
was indeed going to be cold and that the members of the village should
collect firewood to be prepared..
 
But, being a practical leader, after several days, he got an idea, He went to the phone booth, called the National Weather Service and asked, 'Is the coming winter going to be cold?'
'It looks like this winter is going to be quite cold,' the meteorologist
at the weather service responded.
 
So the chief went back to his people and told them to collect even more
firewood in order to be prepared.
 
A week later, he called the National Weather Service again. 'Does it still
look like it is going to be a very cold winter?'
 
'Yes,' the man at National Weather Service again replied, 'it's going to
be a very cold winter.'
 
The chief again went back to his people and ordered them to collect every scrap of firewood they could find.
 
Two weeks later, the chief called the National Weather Service again. 'Are you absolutely sure that the winter is going to be very cold?'
 
'Absolutely,' the man replied. 'It's looking more and more like it is
going to be one of the coldest winters we've ever seen.'
 
'How can you be so sure?' the chief asked.
 
The weatherman replied, 'The Indians are collecting firewood like crazy.'
***
What body part grows 10 times its size when stimulated?
The 6th grade science teacher, Mrs. Parks, asked her class, "Which human body part increases to ten times its size when stimulated?"

No one answered until little Mary stood up and said, "You should not be asking sixth graders a question like that! I'm going to tell my parents, and they will go and tell the principal, who will then fire you!"

Mrs. Parks ignored her and asked the question again, "Which body part increases to 10 times its size when stimulated?"

Little Mary's mouth fell open. Then she said to those around her, "Boy, is she going to get in big trouble!"

The teacher continued to ignore her and said to the class, "Anybody?"

Finally, Billy stood up, looked around nervously, and said, "The body part that increases 10 times its size when stimulated is the pupil of the eye."

Mrs. Parks said, "Very good, Billy," then turned to Mary and continued. "As for you, young lady, I have three things to say:
One, you have a dirty mind. Two, you didn't read your homework And three, one day you are going to be very, very disappointed.
***
A message to the moon
About 1966 or so, a NASA team doing work for the Apollo moon mission took the astronauts near Tuba City where the terrain of the Navajo Reservation looks very much like the Lunar surface.  Along with all the trucks and large vehicles, there were two large figures dressed in full Lunar spacesuits.

Nearby a Navajo sheep herder and his son were watching the strange creatures walk about, occasionally being tended by personnel.  The two Navajo people were noticed and approached by the NASA personnel.  Since the man did not know English, his son asked for him what the strange creatures were and the NASA people told them that they are just men that are getting ready to go to the moon.  

The man became very excited and asked if he could send a message to the moon with the astronauts. The NASA personnel thought this was a great idea so they rustled up a tape recorder.  After the man gave them his message, they asked his son to translate.  His son would not.

Later, they tried a few more people on the reservation to translate and every person they asked would chuckle and then refuse to translate. 

Finally, with cash in hand, someone translated the message, "Watch out for these guys, they come to take your land."
***
Trophy Wife
Bob, a 70-year-old, extremely wealthy widower shows up at the Country Club with a breathtakingly beautiful 25 year-old blonde who knocks everyone's socks off with her youthful looks and charm.

She hangs onto Bob's arm and listens intently to his every word.

His buddies at the club are all aghast. At the very first chance, they corner him and ask, "Bob, how did you get the trophy girlfriend?"

Bob replies, "Girlfriend? She's my wife!"

They're amazed, but continue to ask. "So, how did you persuade her to marry you?"

"I lied about my age", Bob replies.

"What, did you tell her you were only 50?"

Bob smiles and says, "No, I told her I was 90."
***
Hitler walks into a bar.
The owner, surprised to see the German leader at his bar, asks if he’d like his top-notch bourbon on the house. “No thanks,” Hitler replies. “I’ll just take a screwdriver.” One screwdriver turned into 10 before Adolf called it quits and headed home. 

The next night, Hitler returned to the bar, but this time takes up the owner’s offer on the bourbon. “Even the best vodka can make a man sick if he’s had too many,” says the owner. “It wasn’t the vodka,” Hitler replies. “I blame the juice.”
***
The Bottle of Wine
Mike was driving home from a long business trip in Northern Arizona, when he saw an elderly Navajo man walking on the side of the road. As the trip was a long and quiet one, he stopped the car and asked the Navajo man if he would like a ride. With a silent nod of thanks, the old man got into the car. Resuming the journey, Mike tried - in vain - to make a bit of small talk with the Navajo man. The old man just sat silently, looking intently at everything he saw, studying every little detail, until he noticed a brown bag on the seat next to Mike.

"What in bag?" asked the old man.

Mike looked down at the brown bag and said, "Oh, it's a bottle of wine. I got it for my wife."

The Navajo man was silent for another moment or two.  Then, speaking with the quiet wisdom of an elder, he said, "Good trade!”
***
WALKS INTO A BAR... MERMAID SEX
An old man walks into a bar and orders a beer. The bartender notices the guy's head is the size of a cue ball.

"I got to ask, sir," says the bartender. "What happened?"

The old guy sighs and tells him, "My ship was torpedoed by the Germans in WWII. A mermaid rescued me and promised to grant me three wishes. For my first wish, I asked to return to the States. My second wish was to have all the money I would ever need. Finally, my third wish was to have sex with the mermaid."

"That doesn't sound too bad," says the bartender. "Then what happened?"

"Well," sighs the man, "mermaids can't have sex, so I asked her if I could just have a little head... ."
***
The Frog
I was playing golf, and even though I am usually a pretty good player, I was playing horribly that day. As I was about to tee off at the fourth hole I heard a voice say, three wood. I looked around and no one was behind me so I took my stance. Then once again I heard ..three wood. I looked down and there was a frog at the corner of the tee box, and he was telling me to use my three
wood. I thought it was stupid but I was playing so badly that I thought nothing could hurt me so I took out my three wood. It was a long par four, and I hit the ball straight 250 yards with that three wood. Since the frog seemed to be lucky I picked him up and took him along with me. At the next hole he told me to use my five iron. It was a par three and I got my first hole in one ever. I made a least a birdie on all the rest of the holes, and all I had to do was listen to that frog.

That night I took the frog to the casino in my hotel. We played Roulette. I put my money where the frog said and won on every spin of the wheel. After that I was tired so I went up to bed. I took the frog out of my pocket and put it on the dresser. Suddenly it looked at me and said, kiss me. Now I wasn't about to kiss a frog, but he said it again. So I kissed the frog and he turned into the most beautiful fourteen year old girl you have ever seen in your entire life. And that your honor is how that fourteen year old girl ended up in my hotel room.

Edit 1: It's ok, I fixed my spelling error! Threat neutralized!
***
A Nazi goes to a bar...
A Nazi goes to a bar, looks around, and sees an Orthodox Jew sitting at a nearby table.

"Barkeep!", he says, "A round on me for everyone but that gentleman right there." 

Everyone in the bar receives a cocktail, he looks over at the Jew and notices him smiling back. The Nazi is not amused, goes back to the bar

"Barkeep! I want to order a second round for everyone but him, and this time make it all top shelf".

Nazi looks again at the Jew, sees him STILL smiling back.

"Is that Jew an idiot or what?"

Bartender responds: "Oh no my friend, that's the owner."
***
A 13 year old boy tells his mom he had sex with his teacher
The boy's father comes home to find his wife standing at the door waiting for him and he knows something's wrong. His wife says, "Timmy said he had sex with his teacher." 

The dad goes up to Timmy's room to find him laying on his stomach looking sad. He asks, "is this true, Timmy? Did you really have sex with your teacher?" 

Timmy nods yes. 

The dad screams, "I can't believe it! I'm so proud of you! I didn't have sex until I was in college! You know what, I was waiting until your birthday to get you a new bike but I'm taking you today."

They drive to the bike store and the dad is bragging to everyone there that his son had sex. 

He comes home the next day to see the bike in the garage, stickers and tags still on it. He goes up to Timmy's room and asks, "how come you didn't ride the new bike? I thought you wanted one." 

Timmy says, "I do, dad. It's just ... my butt still hurts."
***
Never thought I would hear an actual funny joke in church
Heard this joke from my priest at church (I live in Kansas City).

A man who lived a lifetime of trouble died and was sentenced to smash rocks in hell to suffer for his sins. One day the devil walked up to the man who was breaking the rocks with ease and asked him how he was doing it so effortlessly. The man responded, "I grew up on a farm in Missouri, I am used to physical labor like this." 

In an effort to amplify the mans suffering, the devil made it extremely hot and walked up to the man who was still easily smashing the rocks. When asked how he was doing it, the man responded, "I grew up on a farm in Missouri, I am used to extreme heat like this."

Not enjoying his apparent failure of distributing pain and suffering to this man, the devil made it downpour with rain and gale force winds. Thinking this surely will do it, the devil walked up to the man who was working with even more grace than before.. Shocked at this sight, the devil asked how he was doing it and the man responded, "I grew up on a farm in Missouri, I am used to tornados and extreme storms like these."

In a final attempt to make this man suffer, the devil made it extremely cold. He walked toward the man thinking this surely will get him and he saw the man was actually dancing around and celebrating! Shocked beyond belief, the devil asked him what the hell he was celebrating about. The man joyfully responded "Well, hell froze over! The Chiefs must have won the Super Bowl!"

EDIT: Grammar and stuff and stuff
***
A Trip to the Brothel
One day a man comes home to find his wife having an affair with the neighbour, obviously Infuriated by this he storms out of the house and goes on a ride to the towns brothel. Upon entering he is greeted by a beautiful lady in skimpy lingerie, seething with anger he walks up to her and says "I want to have sex with the most gorgeous woman in this place I don't care how much it'll cost me" the woman looks at him with curiosity but shrugs it off and tells him that the best looking girl here is quite expensive and terribly busy around this time but she points to the line of horny men and tells him if he would like he can join the line up. Hours go by and it seems like the line is hardly moving but determined he waits. Two hours later and he was halfway up the line frustrated having nothing but time to think about his wife he sits there seething until he noticed that a man had walked up and cut to the front of the line. Already in a testy state this causes the man to snap and go into a rage swinging and wildly fighting everyone in the line. The loud noise quickly drew the owner of the establish out from the back who takes action throwing everyone out. The angry horny men ask him what the big deal is and the owner turned around and said "let that be a lesson to you all, no one gets away with punching up the fuckline" 
***
"Hello?", "Hi honey. This is Daddy. Is Mommy near the phone?"

"Hello?", "Hi honey. This is Daddy. Is Mommy near the phone?"

"No Daddy. She's upstairs in the bedroom with Uncle Paul."

After a brief pause, Daddy says, "But honey, you haven't got an Uncle Paul."

"Oh yes I do, and he's upstairs in the room with Mommy, right now."

Brief Pause. "Uh, okay then, this is what I want you to do. Put the phone down on the table, run upstairs and knock on the bedroom door and shout to Mommy that Daddy's car just pulled into the driveway."

"Okay Daddy, just a minute."

A few minutes later the little girl comes back to the phone. "I did it Daddy." "And what happened honey?" he asked.

"Well, Mommy got all scared, jumped out of bed with no clothes on and ran around screaming. Then she tripped over the rug, hit her head on the dresser and now she isn't moving at all!"

"Oh my God!!! What about your Uncle Paul?"

"He jumped out of the bed with no clothes on, too. He was all scared and he jumped out of the back window and into the swimming pool. But I guess he didn't know that you took out the water last week to clean it. He hit the bottom of the pool and I think he's dead."

***Long Pause***

Then Daddy says,

"Swimming pool? .... Is this 486-5731?"
***
So these two ladies walk into a mortician's office.
The first woman says to the mortician, "I've got my husband here in his very best blue suit, but what I'd really appreciate is if you could have him in a black suit for the funeral.  Here's a blank check, use whatever you need, I just want him in a black suit."

The mortician agrees and thanks the woman and the first woman leaves.  Now the second woman comes in and says, "I know I've brought my husband wearing a black suit, but I've always really loved him in blue.  Is there any way you can have him in a blue suit for his funeral?"

The mortician assures her that it's not a problem and the second woman thanks her and leaves.  A few days later the mortician shows up at the first man's funeral and his widow walks up and says,
"Thank you so much for doing this.  My husband looks wonderful in the black suit you found him."

The mortician replies, "Of course, I was happy to do it. And here's your check back."

"No, I really appreciate it and I want to pay you, just take whatever you need."

"Oh no really, it didn't cost me anything.  You see, right after you came in a woman showed up with her husband in a black suit and she wanted him wearing blue.  So in the end all I had to do was switch the heads."
***
A boy is in a CVS with his dad...
A boy is in a CVS with his dad. While in line at the pharmacy, the boy notices something in a box that resembles balloons. Curious, the boy asks his dad about these balloons in the box. "Well, those are condoms, son," the boy's dad replies. "What are condoms used for, dad?" replied the little boy. "They are used so men can practice safe sex," said the father. The boy asks his dad who would use the box of three. The boy's dad replies, "Those are for high school kids. One for Friday, one for Saturday, and one for Sunday." The boy then spots a box of six and asks his dad about those. "Those are for college kids son. They use two on Friday, two on Saturday and two on Sunday." The boy then asks, "Well what about the box of twelve?" To which the boy's dad replied, "Those are for married men like myself, son. One for January, one for February, one for March....."

***
Lunch
At the National Art Gallery in Dublin , a husband and wife were staring at a portrait that had them completely confused.

 

The painting depicted three black men totally naked, sitting on a bench. Two of the figures had black penises, but the one in the middle had a pink penis.

 

The curator of the gallery realized that they were having trouble interpreting the painting and offered his personal assessment.

 

He went on for over half an hour explaining how it depicted the sexual emasculation of African Americans in a predominately white, patriarchal society.

 

'In fact', he pointed out, 'some serious critics believe that the pink penis also reflects the cultural and sociological oppression experienced by gay men in contemporary  society'.

 

After the curator left, an Irishman approached the couple and said, 'Would you like to know what the painting is really about?'

 

'Now why would you claim to be more of an expert than the curator of the gallery, asked the couple?

 

'Because I am the artist, who painted the picture,' he replied. 'In fact, there are no African Americans depicted at all. They're just three Irish coal miners. The guy in the middle went home for lunch.
***
A Juggler, and the Police...
A juggler, driving to his next performance, is stopped by the police.

"What are these matches and lighter fluid doing in your car?" asks the cop. 

"I'm a juggler and I juggle flaming torches in my act."

"Oh yeah?" says the doubtful cop. "Lets see you do it." 

The juggler gets out and starts juggling the blazing torches masterfully.

A couple driving by slows down to watch. "Wow," says the driver to his wife. "I'm glad I quit drinking. Look at the test they're giving now!
***
THE WEDDING TEST
I was a very happy man.

My wonderful girlfriend and I had been dating for over a year so we decided to get married.
There was only one little thing bothering me. 

It was her beautiful younger sister, Sofia.

My prospective sister-in-law was twenty-two, wore very tight mini-skirts, and generally was Bra-less.

She would regularly bend down when she was near me. 
I always got more than a nice view.

It had to be deliberate she never did it around anyone else.

One day she called me and asked me to come over.
'To check my Sister's wedding- invitations' she said.

She was alone when I arrived, she whispered to me that she had feelings and desires for me and she couldn't overcome them anymore.
She told me that she wanted me just once before I got married.

She said "Before you commit your life to my sister".
Well, I was in total shock, and I couldn't say a word.
She said, "I'm going upstairs to my bedroom" she said. 
"If you want one last wild fling, just come up and have me".

I was stunned and frozen in shock as I watched her go up the stairs.
I stood there for a moment, then turned and made a bee-line straight to the front door. I opened the door, and headed straight towards my car.

Lo and behold, my entire future family was standing outside, all clapping!

With tears in his eyes, my father-in-law hugged me.
He said, 'My Son, we are very happy that you have passed our little test. We couldn't ask for a better man for our daughter.

Welcome to the family my son.'

And the moral of this story is:

Always keep your condoms in your car.

***
A man takes his wife to play her first game of golf...
Unfortunately she hacked the first shot the window of the biggest house next to the course. The man cringed "Now we'll have to go up and apologise and see how much you've cost us".
So the couple walk up to the house and knock. A warm voice said, "Come on in". When they opened the door, they saw a broken antique bottle on the floor beside the broken window. A man reclining on the sofa and asked "Did you break my window?"
"Yes we're really sorry about that" the husband replied.
"Oh no apology is necessary. Actually I want to thank you. You see I'm a genie and I've been trapped in that bottle for a thousand years. I'll grant you three wishes, but if you don't mind I'll keep the last for myself?"
"wow that's great!" the husband said. "I'd like a million pounds per year for the rest of my life"
"No problem" said the genie.
"I'd like a mansion in every country in the world!" said the wife.
"Of course!" said the genie. "Consider it done"
"And now" the couple asked in unison, "What's your wish?"
"Well I've been in that bottle without a woman for a thousand years, so my wish is to make love to your wife"
The husband looked at his wife. "What do you think?"
She thought for a few moments then said "Well the genie has granted our wishes so the last I could do is grant his. But what about you darling?"
"You know I love you" He said.
So the genie and the wife spent the afternoon making love upstairs and enjoying each other. The genie was insatiable. After about 3 hours, the genie rolled over and said "How old are you and your husband?"
"we're both 35" she replied breathlessly.
"Really?!" he said "Thirty-five years old and you still believe in genies?"
***
Countryside Perspective
A farmer drove to a neighbor's farmhouse and knocked at the door.

A boy, about 9, opened the door.

"Is your dad or mom home?" said the farmer.

"No, they went to town," said the boy.

"How about your brother, Howard? Is he here?" asked the farmer.

"No, he went with Mom and Dad," the boy answered.

The farmer stood there for a few minutes, shifting from one foot to the other, and mumbling to himself.

"I know where all the tools are, if you want to borrow one, or I can give Dad a message," said the boy.

"Well," said the farmer uncomfortably, "I really wanted to talk to your Dad. It's about your brother Howard getting my daughter Suzy pregnant.".

The boy thought for a moment, then said, "You would have to talk to Dad about that. I know he charges $500 for the bull and $50 for the boar, but I don't know how much he charges for Howard."
***
A duck walks into a bar...
A duck walks into a pub and orders a pint of beer and a ham sandwich.

The barman looks at him and says, “hang on! You’re a duck.”

“I see your eyes are working,” replies the duck.

“And you can talk!” exclaims the barman.

“I see your ears are working, too,” says the Duck.  “Now if you don’t mind, can I have my beer and my sandwich please?”

“Certainly, sorry about that” says the barman as he pulls the duck’s pint.  “It ‘s just we don’t get many ducks in this pub.. What are you doing round this way?”

“I’m working on the building site across the road,” explains the duck.  “I’m a plasterer.”

The flabbergasted barman cannot believe the duck and wants to learn more, but takes the hint when the duck pulls out a newspaper from his bag and proceeds to read it.

So, the duck reads his paper, drinks his beer, eats his sandwich, bids the barman good day and leaves.

The same thing happens for two weeks.

Then one day the circus comes to town.

The ringmaster comes into the pub for a pint and the barman says to him “you’re with the circus, aren’t you? Well, I know this duck that could be just brilliant in your circus. He talks, drinks beer, eats sandwiches, reads the newspaper and everything!”

“Sounds marvelous,” says the ringmaster, handing over his business card. “Get him to give me a call.”

So the next day when the Duck comes into the pub the barman says, “hey Mr. Duck, I reckon I can line you up with a top job, paying really good money.”

“I’m always looking for the next job,” says the duck.  “Where is it?”

“At the circus,” says the barman.

“The circus?” repeats the duck.

“That’s right,” replies the barman.

“The circus?” the duck asks again. “With the big TENT?”

“Yeah,” the barman replies.

“With all the animals who live in CAGES, and performers who live in CARAVANS?” says the duck.

“Of course,” the barman replies.

“And the tent has CANVAS sides and a big canvas roof with a hole in the middle?” persists the duck.

“That’s right!” says the barman.

The duck shakes his head in amazement, and says ..

“What the fuck would they want with a plasterer??
***
My first hooker...
A few years ago when I first got divorced, I decided to go to Vegas, and wanted to have some fun. I went to a casino, went to the bar, and bought a drink before I did anything when I am approached by a beautiful woman. She asked me if I liked to have fun and I said yes, she then told me she would give me a hand job for 500 dollars and I laughed and said "500 Dollars!? Why that much?" She then whipped out her cell phone and showed me a picture of a Lamborghini "You see this car? I paid for it by selling hand jobs." So I shrugged and said "What the hell, I need to live a little, I'll do it" so we go back to my hotel and she gives me the best hand job I ever had.

She leaves and I pass out. The next night I go back to the same casino bar, and sure enough she's there again and I decide I wanted some more. I walk up to her and say "You were amazing last night, how much would it cost for a blow job?" She then smiles and says "1 grand." Again I'm a little bit set back by the price and I said "A grand? Is it that good?" She then whips out her phone and shows me a picture of a HUGE, luxurious house. She then says "See this house? I paid for it with blowjobs" so I said "Alright let's do it" so this time we go into her car and she decides to blow me in the parking lot, and its the best blowjob I ever had.

We sit there and I'm blown away by this woman, so I ask her, "how much would it cost for some pussy?" She then laughs and points to the casino. "You see that casino?" I said "...yeah?" She says "If I had a pussy, I would own that casino."

Update: Holy shit thanks for the gold. The comments have been awesome and the unexpected tranny attack its been a good day. 
***
New research on dead crows!
Researchers for the  Massachusetts Turnpike Authority found over 200 dead crows near greater Boston  recently, and there was concern that  they may have died from Avian Flu.

A Bird Pathologist examined the remains of all the crows, and, to everyone's relief,  confirmed the problem was definitely NOT Avian Flu. The cause of death appeared to be vehicular impacts.

However, during the detailed analysis it was noted that varying colors of paints appeared  on the bird's beaks and claws. By analyzing these paint residues it was determined that 98% of the crows had been killed by impact with trucks, while  only 2% 
were killed by an impact with a car.

MTA then hired an Ornithological Behaviorist to determine if there was a cause for the disproportionate percentages of truck kills versus car  kills. He very quickly concluded the cause:  When crows eat road kill, they always have a look-out crow in a nearby tree to warn of impending danger.

They discovered that while all the lookout crows could shout "Cah", not a single crow could shout "Truck."
***
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a Spaniard and a German...
...are all watching a street performer do some excellent juggling.

The performer notices that the four gentlemen have a poor view, so he stands on a large wooden crate and calls out, "Can you all see me now?"

"Yes"

"Oui"

"Si"

"Ja"
***
Hillary Clinton and her driver were cruising along a country road one night
when all of a sudden they hit a pig, killing it instantly. 

Hillary told her driver to go up to the farmhouse and explain to the owners what had happened. 

About one hour later Hillary sees her driver staggering back to the car with a bottle of wine in one hand, a cigar in the other and his clothes all ripped and torn. 

”What happened to you?” asked Hillary. 

”Well, the Farmer gave me the wine, his wife gave me the cigar and his 19-year-old daughter made mad passionate love to me.”

”My God, what did you tell them?” asks Clinton. 

The driver replies, ”I’m Hillary Clinton’s driver, and I just killed the pig!”
***
So Jesus, Moses and an old man go golfing
The first to play is Jesus. After his swing, the ball land in the lake. He runs towards it, walks on the water and grabs the ball. Then it's Moses' turn. Bad luck, the same thing happens to him. He walks to the lake, spreads the water into two parts and grabs the ball on the dry ground. Finally, it's time for the old man to play. His ball lands on the top of a tree. Instead of getting the ball, he just waits. After a few minutes, a squirrel hiding in the tree takes the ball and goes down. Then a wolf attacks the squirrel, kills it and eats it. He goes further and ends up vomitting the ball, which is then taken by an eagle. The eagle goes even further, but a hunter shoots it down. The ball falls down and lands exactly in the golf hole. It's hole-in-one and the old man wins. Moses looks at Jesus and says: "I hate playing with your dad."


Sorry if it's a bit long, but I really like that one. Also sorry for my writing, I'm not a native English speaker.
***
A joke to tell your friends in-person
So, like the title says, this joke only works if you're telling it to your friend in real life! Make sure it's someone you're somewhat close with, though.

So a guy walks into a three-story building. That's very important to the story, so you gotta remember it. How many stories does it have?

*Wait until your friend replies it's three stories*

Now, this guy's a real asshole and thinks he can do everything right, and anyone who doesn't do it his way is wrong. So he goes into the first story, and he sees a guy walking on stilts. He says, "That's not how you walk on stilts!" The stilts guy gets down from his stilts, goes over, slaps him in the face and says, "Hey, who's walking on stilts here, you or me?" 

So the guy goes up to the second story and he sees a guy doing gymnastics. He says, "That's not how you do gymnastics!" So the gymnastics guy gets up, goes over, slaps him in the face and says "Hey! Who's doing gymnastics here, you or me?"

So the guy goes up to the third story, where he sees a guy flipping pancakes. He says, "That's not how you flip pancakes!" So the guy takes the frying pan, goes over, slaps him in the face with it and says, "Hey, who's flipping pancakes here, you or me?"

So the guy goes up to the fourth story...

*Stare meaningfully at your friend until they tell you there are only three stories*

Slap them in the face and say "Hey! Who's telling the joke here, you or me?"
***
Two men contracted to paint a small community church.
Being very frugal(cheap), they pinched and scraped to spend the absolute minimum on materials. Then, when they were only partway through the job, they determined that they did not, after all, have enough paint to complete the job. Not wishing to spend any more money if they didn't absolutely have to, they decided they would just dilute the water-based paint they were using so that it would last longer. They did this a couple more times before they finished, which caused striping on the church as the paint got lighter eachtime it was thinned. The painters had just about gotten to the top of thesteeple, when, all of a sudden, the sky darkened, and the rain started to pour down. 

As the paint streamed down the sides of the church, a voice boomed from the heavens: "Repaint, you thinners! Repaint, and thin no more!"
***
A rancher and his family have a milk cow...
A rancher and his family have a milk cow, and not much else to their name. The milk is the sweetest, toppest grade dairy around.

One day, the rancher wakes up and finds his milk cow dead. Unable to face life with his sole source of income gone, he sets up a noose in the barn and takes his life.

The rancher's wife wakes up that same day, and goes to find her husband. When she sees the cow dead, and her husband hanging beside it, she goes to the nearby river and drowns herself.

The rancher's eldest son wakes up, finds the cow, his dad, and his mother all dead. He is approached by a beautiful woman who says that if he can make love to her 10 times in a row, that she will revive his parents and the cow. If he failed, she would kill him.

The eldest son, of course eager, immediately agrees. He doesn't make it, and she kills him on the spot.

The second eldest son wakes up, finds his family dead along with the cow, and is approached by this same mysterious beautiful woman, who proposes the same arrangement. This son, also eager, quickly jumps at the opportunity.

Again, the son falls short and is killed.

The third and youngest son wakes up and finds his family and cow dead, and is approached by the woman.

"Rough day, huh?" She said, offering him the same deal as her brothers.

"So I make love to you 10 times without stopping... and you bring everyone back... What if I make love to you 15 times?"

"Well... I'll bring everyone back, even the cow, and put a mansion where your little ranch is."

"Ok... well what if I make love to you 20 times without stopping?"

Laughing, the mysterious woman says, "Well, I'll give you a great big bag of gold, jewels, and money. So much that you and your family will be set for life."

"Fine, fine... but last question. If I make love to you 20 times without stopping, what's to stop you from dying from it? The milk cow did."
***
Two Middle Eastern men move to the United States.
After receiving dirty looks, and rude comments day after day, they soon figure out that they needed to "Americanize" themselves in order to fit in. Both men part ways on their journey to become Americans. The men do not see each other for five years, until one day they happen to bump into each other in a store. 

"Hello old friend!" says the first man. "It's been so long! I have certainly become a true American since I last saw you. I have a wife, two kids, and a dog. I live in a nice neighborhood in the suburbs in a two story house, I drive a prius and I have a job working in an office and I watch football every Sunday with my buddies and we drink beer and have barbecues! How American have you become my friend?" 

The second man simply replied "Fucking towel head."
***
The Farmer's Daughters
Farmer Brown had 3 lovely daughters. The daughters announce to their father they are going out on dates that night. Farmer Brown agrees under the condition that he gets to talk to each of the young men first.
The first young man knocks on the door and Farmer Brown answers the door with his shotgun and says, "What is your business young man?" to which the young man replies, "My name is Eddie, I'm her for Betty, we're going to have spaghetti, is she ready?" The farmer decides Eddie is OK, gives his consent, and Betty and Eddie take off.
The next young man knocks on the door. Farmer Brown answers the door with his shotgun and says "What do you want?" and the young man says, "My name is Joe, I'm here for Flo, we're going to the show, is she set to go?"  The farmer looks him over carefully, decides he's OK and off run Joe and Flo. 
Finally the last young suitor knocks on the door. Farmer Brown growls, "What do you want?" to which he replies, "My name is Chuck..." and Farmer Brown shoots him
***
John Cena woke up from a coma
John Cena: Where am I?

Nurse: ICU

John Cena: No you don't.

Edit: double enter
***
Two statues in a park.....
.....one of a nude man and one of a nude woman. They had been facing each other across a pathway for a hundred years, when one day an angel comes down from the sky and, with a single gesture, brings the two to life.

The angel tells them, "As a reward for being so patient through a hundred blazing summers and dismal winters, you have been given life for thirty minutes to do what you've wished to do the most."

He looks at her, she looks at him, and they go running behind the shrubbery. The angel waits patiently as the bushes rustle and giggling ensues.

After fifteen minutes, the two return, out of breath and laughing. The angel tells them, "Um, you have fifteen minutes left, would you care to do it again?"

He asks her. "Shall we?" She eagerly replies, "Oh, yes, let's! But let's change positions. This time, I'll hold the pigeon down, and you shit on its head."
***
A mother-in-law stopped by unexpectedly to the recently married couple's house.
She knocks on the door, then immediately walks in. She is shocked to see her daughter-in-law lying on the couch, totally naked.

"What are you doing?" she asked.

"I'm waiting for Jeff to come home from work," the daughter-in-law answered.

"But you're naked!" the mother-in-law exclaimed.

"This is my love dress," the daughter-in-law explained.

"Love dress? But you're naked!"

"Jeff loves me to wear this dress! It makes him happy and it makes me happy."

The mother-in-law on the way home thought about the love dress. When she got home she got undressed, showered, put on her best perfume and expectantly waited for her husband, lying provocatively on the couch.

Finally her husband came home. He walked in and saw her naked on the couch.

"What are you doing?" he asked.

"This is my love dress," she replied.

"Needs ironing," he says" "What's for dinner?"
***
The deaf wife problem.

Fred feared his wife Rhonda wasn't hearing as well as she used to and he thought she might need a hearing aid.

Not quite sure how to approach her, he called the family Doctor to discuss the problem.

The Doctor told him there is a simple informal test the husband could perform to give the Doctor a better idea about her hearing loss.

'Here's what you do,' said the Doctor, 'stand about 40 feet away from her, and in a normal conversational speaking tone see if she hears you. If not, go to 30 feet, then 20 feet, and so on until you get a
response.'

That evening, the wife is in the kitchen cooking dinner, and he was In the den. He says to himself, 'I'm about 40 feet away, let's see what happens.' Then in a normal tone he asks, 'Honey, what's for dinner?'

No response.

So the husband moves closer to the kitchen, about 30 feet from his wife and repeats, 'Rhonda, what's for dinner?'
Still no response.

Next he moves into the dining room where he is about 20 feet from his Wife and asks, 'Honey, what's for dinner?'

A gain he gets no response.

So, he walks up to the kitchen door, about 10 feet away. 'Honey, what's for dinner?'

Again there is no response..

So he walks right up behind her. 'Rhonda, what's for dinner?'



'Damn it, Fred, for the FIFTH time, CHICKEN!' 
***
A Mexican man is found unresponsive...
A Mexican man is found unresponsive on the roadway outside Tijuana.
Local authorities call for an ambulance and he is rushed to the nearest hospital.
Unfortunately, the doctors determine that he has consumed a lethal amount of drugs and there is nothing they can do to save him. He dies within a few minutes and the attending physician marks the cause of death as "1/2".
Curious, the nurse asks him what this seemingly unrelated fraction has to do with this man's death.
The doctor responds "Juan over-dos".
***
It's the end of the 2016 Presidential race
The people of the US hated all the candidates so much that no one voted. The government is in a panic, trying to figure out what to do to decide who the next president will be. 
Finally, Barack Obama comes up with an idea:
A literal presidential race. The three candidates would run a lap around the white house, and the best time would become president. 
Bernie Sanders goes first, but being as old as he is, he takes 24 minutes. 
Trump goes next and posts a time of 14 minutes 24 seconds. 
Hillary Clinton goes last, running as fast as she can in an effort to beat Trumps time. She finally crosses the finish line in just under 10 minutes. 
"Aha, that must be some kind of record!" she exclaims. 

"I don't think so," says Obama, "Bush did 9:11"
***
A woman and a man are involved in a car accident;
it's a bad one. Both of their cars are totally demolished but amazingly neither of them is hurt. 

After they crawl out of their cars, the woman says, 'Wow, just look at our cars! There's nothing left, but fortunately we are unhurt. This must be a sign from God that we should meet and be friends and live together in peace for the rest of our days.'

The man replies, 'I agree with you completely. This must be a sign from God!'

The woman continues, 'And look at this, here's another miracle. My car is completely demolished but this bottle of wine didn't break. Surely God wants us to drink this wine and celebrate our good fortune.'

Then she hands the bottle to the man. The man nods his head in agreement, opens it, drinks half the bottle, and extends it back to the woman. Politely, the woman refuses to accept the bottle.

The man asks, 'Aren't you having any?'

The woman replies, 'No. I think I'll just wait for the police...'
***
Three surgeons are sitting in a bar...
discussing which people are their favorite to operate on. 

The first surgeon looks at the other two, and tells them that his favorite patients are librarians. The other two then ask him why.

"Well," he begins, "I like librarians, because their insides are always filed away in alphabetical order."

The other two slowly nod in agreement. 

"My favorite kind of patients are electricians," the second blurts out. 

"Why?" the others ask in tandem. 

"All of their innards are grouped together and color coded."

All three nod before all eyes fall on the third surgeon. 

The third muses for a moment before he says, "Lawyers."

"Lawyers?" the other two ask incredulously.

"Yup, they're heartless, gutless, spineless, and their heads and asses are interchangeable."
***
On his death bed, an old jew says to his wife:
Oh, Sarah, when the shop burned down you were right beside me, no?
- Sure I was, Moshe.

When the Nazis drove us out of our beloved Deutschland you were beside me again, no?
- I was, Moshe.

And now you're at my death bed, aren't you?
- I am, darling.

I'm starting to think you're bad luck, Sarah.
***
One night, two aliens descend from outer space...
...and land their little spaceship next to an old gas station in a small town. They get out and walk up to one of the old gas pumps. 
 The little alien says
"Take me to your leader."
 The gas pump doesn't say or do anything. Slightly annoyed, the little alien repeats
"Take me to your leader."
 The gas pump still says or does nothing. The little alien pulls his blaster from his space suit and points it at the pump
"Listen to me! If you don't take me to your leader NOW, I'll blow your damn brains out!"
 The big alien, wanting to calm the situation down pretty quick says
"Hang on a minute. I wouldn't fuck with this guy."
The little alien replies
"No! You watch me! If this asshole doesn't take me to his leader ima fuck his whole life up!"
 He turns back to the gas pump
"If you don't take me to your leader NOW I'm going to shoot!"
 The gas pump still doesn't say anything.
 The little alien fired his blaster. The explosion was so powerful that it blew the two aliens far out over the other side of town. They land in the hills and slowly get up, brushing the fire off of their space suits. 
The big alien says
"I told you not to fuck with that guy."
"How did you know he was so powerful?"
"Well, anyone that can take his own dick, wrap it around himself twice, and stick it in his ear is bound to be one bad mother fucker!"
***
A teacher asks her kids in class....
"What do you want to be when you grow up?"

Little Johnny says "I wanna be a billionaire, going to the most expensive clubs, take the best bitch with me, give her a Ferrari worth over a million bucks, an apartment in Copacabana, a mansion in Paris, a jet to travel through Europe, an Infinite Visa Card and to make love to her three times a day".

The teacher, shocked, and not knowing what to do with the bad behavior of the child, decides not to give importance to what he said and then continues the lesson. 
       
"And you, Susie? " the teacher asks.

Susie says "I wanna be Johnny's bitch."
***
A man walks into a bar ...
He goes straight to the bar and asks the barmaid for a beer which she begins to pour, while he's waiting he notices their small food menu to the side: 

Cheese Sandwich £5

Ham Sandwich £5

Handjob £5

In disbelief he looks up at the barmaid who is absolutely gorgeous and asks "Are you the one who gives the handjobs?", "Yep" she replies with a smile. He checks his wallet for the £5 and says, "Well wash your hands, I want a cheese sandwich."
***
Why Hello! Thanks for calling the Mental Health Hotline!
If you are obsessive-compulsive, press 1 repeatedly.

If you are co-dependent, please ask someone to press 2 for you.

If you have multiple personalities, press 3, 4, 5 and 6.

If you are paranoid, we know who you are and what you want. Stay on the line so we can trace your call.

If you are delusional, press 7 and your call will be transferred to the mother ship.

If you are schizophrenic, listen carefully and a small voice will tell you which number to press.

If you are manic-depressive, it doesn't matter which number you press - no one will answer.

If you are dyslexic, press 96969696969696.

If you have a nervous disorder, please fidget with the hash key until a representative comes on line.

If you have amnesia press 8 and state your name, address, phone number, date of birth, social security number and your mother's maiden name.

If you have post-traumatic stress disorder, slowly and carefully press 000.

If you have bi-polar disorder, please leave a message after the beep or before the beep. Or after the beep. Please wait for the beep.

If you have short-term memory loss, press 9. If you have short-term memory loss, press 9. If you have short-term memory loss, press 9. If you have short-term memory loss, press 9.

If you have low self esteem, please hang up. All our operators are too busy to talk to you
***
The British, the French, and the Irish
The British wanted to find out why the head of a mans penis was larger then the shaft. So, they spent about $150 million and a month to conduct their tests. They concluded that it was to give the male more pleasure during sex. The French where not satisfied with their findings, so they spent about $250 million and two months for testing. They concluded that it was to give woman more pleasure during sex. The Irish where not satisfied with these findings. So with a budget of about $75.86, two weeks, and a lot of beer, they concluded that it was to stop your hand from smacking yourself in the forehead.   Stolen from u/killerwarpig22
***
A couple wants to have sex but their son is in the house.
The only way to pull off a Sunday afternoon "quickie " with their 8-year-old son in the apartment was to send him out on the balcony with a Popsicle and tell him to report on all the neighborhood activities...

"There's a car being towed from the parking lot," he shouted.He began his commentary as his parents put their plan into operation.

"An ambulance just drove by!"

"Looks like the Andersons have company," he called out.

"Matt's riding a new bike!"

"Looks like the Sanders are moving!"

"Jason is on his skate board!"

After a few moments he announced... "The Coopers are having sex.
Startled, his mother and dad shot up in bed.

Dad cautiously called out..."How do you know they're having sex?"
"Jimmy Cooper is standing on his balcony with a Popsicle."
***
A man dies and goes to heaven but he sees there are a lot of clocks displayed at the Pearly Gates.
The man is stricken with curiosity and asks Saint Peter.

"Hey, what are those clocks for?" he asks.

"Oh, those are the clocks of lies," Saint Peter replies. "Every time one tells a lie, their clock moves one minute from 12 o'clock. Look, there's Honest Abe's," points Saint Peter at a clock set at 12:02. "Here are those of our saints," Saint Peter points to another bunch of clocks, some at 12:05, 12:03, times which are barely away from 12 o'clock.

"Hmm...where are the politicians' clocks?" the man asks Saint Peter again.

"Oh they're in our offices. We use them as electric fans."
***
Hopefully this isn't a repost, but I love this one.
A group of men are changing in locker room at a golf club. Suddenly a cell phone on the bench starts to ring, and a man puts it on speaker phone as he continues getting dressed. He says "Hello?", the woman on the other line says "Honey, it's me. Are you still at the golf club?"

"Yeah, what's going on?"

"I'm out shopping and found this great new leather coat, and it's only $500 dollars, can I get it?"

"Sure, if you like it"

"Thank you! I was also at the dealership earlier and saw the new Mercedes models, and there is one that's absolutely gorgeous, and I really want it!"

"How much is it?"

"About $80,000..."

"Alright, but for that price I want all the extra options included."

"Great! One other thing. The house we wanted last year is back on the market, but they're asking for 1,500,000."

"Well, go ahead and make them an offer, but don't go above 1,250,000."

"Really? Okay! I love you, see you later!"

"Love you too."

The rest of the men in the club stare at him wide eyed. As he hangs up the phone he looks at the men and asks "Anyone know whose phone this is?"
***
A housewife takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work
A housewife takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work.    
  
Not aware that 9 year old son was hiding in the closet.  
  
  Her husband came home unexpectedly, so she hid her lover in the closet. The boy now has company. 
  
 Boy: "Dark in here."  
  
 Man: "Yes it is." 
  
 Boy: "I have a baseball."   
  
 Man: "That's nice."   
  
 Boy: "Want to buy it?"   
  
 Man: "No, thanks."   
  
 Boy: "My dad's outside."  
  
  Man: "OK, how much?"   
  
 Boy: "£250."    
  
In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom's lover are in the closet together.  
  
 Boy: "Dark in here."    
  
Man: "Yes, it is."  
  
  Boy: "I have a baseball glove."   
  
 Man: "That's nice."    
  
Boy: "Want to buy it?"    
  
Man: "No, thanks."  
  
  Boy: "I'll tell."    
  
Man: "How much?"   
  
 Boy: "£750."    
  
Man: "Fine."   
  
 A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your glove. Let's go outside and toss the baseball!"  The boy says, "I can't. I sold them."  The father asks, "How much did you sell them for?"  The son says, "£1,000."   
  
The father says, "That's terrible to over-charge your friends like that. That is way more than those two things cost. I'm going to take you to church and make you confess."  They go to church and the father alerts the priest and makes the little boy sit in the confession booth and closes the door.   
  
The boy says, "Dark in here."  The priest says, "Don't start that sh*t again."
***
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to prom..
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to the prom. First he goes to rent a tux, but there’s a long tux line at the shop and it takes forever.

Next, he has to get some flowers, so he heads over to the florist and there’s a huge flower line there. He waits forever but eventually gets the flowers.

Then he heads out to rent a limo. Unfortunately, there’s a large limo line at the rental office, but he’s patient and gets the job done.

Finally, the day of the prom comes. The two are dancing happily and his girlfriend is having a great time. When the song is over, she asks him to get her some punch, so he heads over to the punch table and there’s no punchline.
***
Raising The Dead!
This elderly couple is watching one of those television preachers on TV one night.

 The preacher faces the camera, and announces, "My friends, I'd like to share my healing powers with everyone watching this program. Place one hand on top of your TV and the other hand on the part of your body which ails you and I will heal you."

 The old woman has been having terrible stomach problems, so she places one hand on the television, and her other hand on her stomach. Meanwhile, her husband approaches the television, placing one hand on top of the TV and his other hand on his groin.

 With a frown his wife says, "Ernest, he's talking about healing the sick, not raising the dead."
***
Guess my age?
A man decided to have a face lift for his birthday. He spends $5,000 and feels really good about the result. On his way home he stops at a newsstand and buys a paper. Before leaving he says to the sales clerk, "I hope you don't mind me asking, but how old do you think I am?"
 "About 35," was the reply.
 "I'm actually 47," the man says, feeling really happy. After that he goes into McDonalds for lunch, and asks the order taker the same question, to which the reply is, "Oh you look about 29".
 "I am actually 47" This makes him feel really good.
 While standing at the bus stop he asks an old woman the same question. She replies, "I am 85 years old and my eyesight is going. But when I was young there was a sure way of telling a mans age. If I put my hand down your pants and play with your balls for ten minutes I will be able to tell your exact age."
 As there was no one around, the man thought what the hell and let her slip her hand down his pants. Ten minutes later the old lady says, "OK, it`s done. You are 47."
 Stunned the man says, "That was brilliant. How did you do that?"
 The old lady replies, "I was behind you in McDonalds."
***
My wife's inappropriate Christmas dinner joke
Last night My wife and I were having Christmas dinner with her parents, grandparents, aunts/uncles, and a German neighbor who is a widow.  We were talking about messing up while cooking meals and I mentioned the first time I cooked a turkey I cooked it upside down.  The neighbor was incredulous that I could make such a mistake and asked how I could possibly do this when the breast would be round and make it difficult to get the turkey to not roll.

My lame joke:
>"Maybe I just like flat breasted turkeys."

Wife looks down at her chest:
>"Well now I feel self-conscious...  Wait, is that why you always turn me face down?"

Everybody starts roaring with laughter and her dad turned bright red.

Edit:  Woah this blew up.  I am coming to the realization that the wife is funnier than I.  No, on second thought, not possible.  Also, thanks for the gold whoever you are!  Now to google what to do with reddit gold.
***
The cheating wife...
A guy thought his wife was cheating on him.So he waited for her to leave that night and jumped in a cab to follow her. By following her he found out she was working in a whorehouse. The guy says to the cabbie, "Wanna make a $ 100?" The cabbie says, "Sure, what do I have to do?". The guy replied that all the cabbie has to do was go inside the whorehouse and grab his wife and put her in the back of the cab and take them home. So the cabbie goes in. A couple of minutes later the whore house gets kicked open, and the cabbie is dragging this woman out who is kicking, biting, punching, and fighting all the way to the cab. The cabbie opens the door to the cab, throws the girl inside, and tells the man, "Here, hold her!!" The man looks down at the girl and says to the cabbie, "THIS AIN'T MY WIFE". The cabbie replied, "I KNOW, IT'S MINE; I'M GOING BACK IN FOR YOURS!!".
***
A mailman is working his last day on a route he's been doing for 20 years
He gets to the first house and a man greets him at the door with a very expensive bottle of wine and thanks him for his service. He arrives at the next house and is greeted by the entire family with a box of Cuban cigars and everyone wishes him a happy retirement.

He arrives at the third house where he is greeted by a gorgeous blonde with see through lingerie on. She leads him upstairs where they make love for an hour. When they're done she takes him downstairs where she cooks him a breakfast of pancakes,eggs and squeezed orange juice. As he's eating she gives him a card with $20 in it.

He's overwhelmed by all this and asks why. The blonde tells him You've been an amazing mailman over the years and when I heard you were retiring I asked my husband what we should do for you. He replied"Fuck him. Give him $20" The Breakfast was my idea
***
Village Idiot
One of the best marksmen in the FBI was passing through a small town. Everywhere he saw evidences of the most amazing shooting. On trees, on walls, and on fences there were numerous bull's-eyes with the bullet hole in dead center. The FBI man asked one of the townsmen if he could meet the person responsible for this wonderful marksmanship. The man turned out to be the village idiot. "This is the best marksmanship I have ever seen," said the FBI man. "How in the world do you do it?" "Nothing to it," said the idiot. "I shoot first and draw the circles afterward."

***
Irish Nuns
Two Irish nuns, old and young, were sitting at a traffic light in their car when a bunch of rowdy drunks pulled up alongside of them.

"Hey, show us your tits, ye bloody penguins!" shouts one of the drunks.

The Mother Superior thought this would be a good test for the novice, and turns to Sister Immaculata, "I don't think they know who we are - show them your cross."

So, Sister Immaculata rolls down her window and shouts, "Screw off ye little fookin' wankers, before I come over there and rip yer balls off!"

Sister Immaculata looks back at the Mother Superior and asks, "Was that cross enough, Sister?" 
***
A Mom visits her son for dinner who lives with a girl roommate.....

During the course of the meal, his mother couldn't help but notice how pretty his roommate was.She had long been suspicious of a
relationship between the two, and this had only made her more curious....

Over the course of the evening, while watching the two interact, she started to wonder if there was more between him and
his roommate than met the eye.
Reading his mom's thoughts, his son volunteered,
“I know what you must be thinking, but I assure you,we are just
roommates."

About a week later, his roommate came to him saying,
“Ever since your mother came to dinner, I've been unable to find the silver plate. You don't suppose she took it, do you?"

He said ,"Well, I doubt it, but I'll email her, just
to be sure." He sat down and wrote :

Dear Mother:
I'm not saying that you ‘did' take the silver plate from my house, I'm not saying that you ‘did not' take the silver plate But the fact
remains that it has been missing ever since you were here for dinner.

Love,
your son.

Several days later, he received an email from
his Mother which read:

Dear Son:
I'm not saying that you ‘do' sleep with your roommate, and
I'm not saying that you ‘do not' sleep with her.
But the fact remains that if she was sleeping in her OWN bed, she
would have found the silver plate by now, under her pillow…
Love,
Mom.
***
The LAPD, the FBI, and the CIA . . .
The LAPD, The FBI, and the CIA are all trying to prove that they are the best at apprehending criminals. The President decides to give them a test. He releases a rabbit into a forest and each of them has to catch it.

The CIA goes in. They place animal informants throughout the forest. They question all plant and mineral witnesses. After three months of extensive investigations they conclude that rabbits do not exist.

The FBI goes in. After two weeks with no leads they burn the forest, killing everything in it, including the rabbit, and they make no apologies. The rabbit had it coming.

The LAPD goes in. They come out two hours later with a badly beaten bear. The bear is yelling: "Okay! Okay! I'm a rabbit! I'm a rabbit!'
***
It was early morning at the military base...
... and the first sergeant was calling out names for the daily work parties listed on a piece of paper:


"Ames"


"Here!"


"Jenson"


"Here!"


"Jones"


"Here!"


"Magersky"


"Here!"


"Seeback"

No answer.

"Seeback!"

No answer was heard again.

"SEEBACK!!!" The troops remained totally silent.


At that point, someone whispered into the first sergeant's ear. He looked again at what the last name really said, quickly turned over the list and continued calling the names printed on the other side. 
***
Tough to be Irish
"What's your name?", asked the teacher.


"Mohammad," he replied.


"You're in Ireland now," replied the teacher, "So from now on you will be known as Mike."
Mohammad returned home after school.


"How was your day, Mohammad?", his mother asked.


"My name is not Mohammad. I'm in Ireland and now my name is Mike”.


"Are you ashamed of your name? Are you trying to dishonor your parents, your heritage, your religion? Shame on you!"
And his mother beat the shit out of him.
Then she called his father, who beat the shit out of him again.


The next day Mohammad returned to school.
The teacher saw all of his fresh bruises.
"What happened to you, Mike?", she asked.


"Well shortly after becoming an Irishman, I was attacked by two fucking Arabs."
***
A man gets pulled over at a DUI checkpoint...
A man is driving home from a party with his wife and son. They get pulled over at a DUI checkpoint and the policeman gives the man the breathalizer test. The machine beeps and the policeman asks the man to step out of the car.

"Bullshit!", he exclaims in response. "I haven't had a single drop! The machine is obviously broken, test it on my wife!"

The policeman reluctantly agrees as the man does not seem intoxicated. As the wife is blowing into the breathalizer, it beeps again and shows that she is drunk as well. 

"See? It doesn't work! You can even test my 4-year-old son!"

So the 4-year-old kid takes the breathalizer test and whaddaya know, it says he's drunk as well. "As I said it's broken, you should get it checked." 

The policeman is left puzzled, he apologises and lets the man on his way.

As they start driving along again, the man turns to his wife and says: "You see that? I told you it won't hurt to give the kid a taste."
***
An engineer dies and is sent to hell
He's hot and miserable, so he decides to take action. The A/C has been busted for a long time, so he fixes it. Things cool down quickly. The moving walkway motor jammed, so he un-jams it. People can get from place to place more easily. The TV was grainy and unclear, so he fixes the connection to the Satellite dish and now they get hundreds of high def channels.

One day, God decides to look down on Hell to see how his grand design is working out and notices that everyone is happy and enjoying umbrella drinks. He asks the Devil what's up?

The Devil says, "Things are great down here since you sent us an engineer."

"What?" says God. "An engineer? I didn't send you one of those. That must have been a mistake. Send him upstairs immediately."

The Devil responds, "No way. We want to keep our engineer. We like him."

God demands, "If you don't send him to me immediately, I'll sue!"

The Devil laughs. "Where are YOU going to get a lawyer?"


***
Harry and his wife are having hard times, so they decide she'll become a hooker...
She's not sure what to do, so Harry says, "Stand in front of the bar and pick up a guy.  Tell him a hundred bucks. If you've got a question, I'll be parked around the corner."

She's not in front of the bar for 5 minutes when a guy pulls up in a car and says, "How much?"

She says, "A hundred dollars."

He says, "Shit.  All I've got is thirty."

She says, "Hold on."

She runs back to Harry and says, "What can he get for $30?"

Harry says, "A hand job."

She runs back and tells the guy all he gets for thirty dollars is a hand job. He says okay, she gets in the car, he unzips up his pants, and out pops a huge cock.

She stares at it for a minute and then says, "I'll be right back."

She runs back around the corner and says, "Harry, can you loan this guy seventy bucks?"
***
While we're on nun jokes: one night, two leprechauns knocked at the door of the convent.
The Mother Superior answered and was taken quite by surprise at the sight. One leprechaun was sullen and silent, while the other seemed quite friendly.  This latter asked, "please pardon our intrusion, Mother Superior, but I wish to ask you, is there a nun at your convent who is about two and a half foot tall?"  The Mother Superior recovered from her surprise to answer that no, there wasn't.

"In any of the other convents of the city, Mother Superior," the friendly leprechaun asked, "is there a nun who stands about two and a half foot tall?" Again, she answered no.

"In all of our nation, Mother Superior," the leprechaun continued, "in all of the convents of all the world, do you suppose there is a nun who is about two and a half foot tall?" Mother Superior said that no, it would be impossible.

Having gotten this last answer, the friendly leprechaun bowed graciously and thanked the helpful Mother Superior.  He took his sullen companion by the arm and led him away.  As the two walked off, Mother Superior heard the talkative one say, "I tell you, Mikey, you've been fucking a penguin."

***
Do cats stutter?
A teacher is explaining biology to her 4th grade students. 

"Human beings are the only animals that stutter", she says.

A little girl raises her hand "I had a kitty-cat who stuttered", she volunteered.

The teacher, knowing how precious some of these stories could become, asked the girl to describe the incident.

"Well", she began, "I was in the back yard with my kitty and the Rottweiler that lives next door got a running start and before we knew it, he jumped over the fence into our yard!"

"That must've been scary", said the teacher.

"It sure was", said the little girl. 

"My kitty raised his back, went 'Fffff, Fffff, Fffff'....And before he could say ‘fuck', the Rottweiler ate him!"
***
A man is meeting his girlfriend's parents for the first time.
A man is meeting his girlfriend's parents for the first time. He doesn't have a car, so he decides to get a bike so he doesn't look like a complete loser.

At the bike shop, the owner holds up some Vaseline and says, "if it ever rains, make sure you put this on the bike to protect it".

The man leaves with his bike and the Vaseline in his pocket. He arrives at the house for dinner. 

His girlfriend meets him at the door and says, "hey, so we have a rule here. The first person to talk during dinner has to do the dishes." 

The man shrugs it off and walks inside. Upon walking in, he's shocked to see hundreds of dishes stacked all over the house, going up the stairs and overflowing the closets. 

"I'm not doing these fucking dishes" he thinks to himself. 

He walks into the kitchen and sits down. The parents smile at him silently. 

Time passes, and they are halfway through dinner. The man is getting nervous, and he wants to make sure he isn't the first to talk.

He looks at his girlfriend and decides to fuck her right there on the table.

He finishes, but no one says a word. He sits down disappointed. 

Looking at his girlfriend's mother, he decides she's good looking enough to fuck too. He takes her on the table as well. He finishes again, and still, no one says a word. 

He sits at the table with a crying girlfriend, her shocked mother, and her livid father. 

Frustrated, the man starts eating his dinner again when he hears thunder off in the distance. 

Remembering the bike outside, he pulls out the Vaseline from his pocket.

The father stands up and says, "alright, I'll do the fucking dishes".
***
Dirty Sailor Joke
A beautiful young New York woman was so depressed that she decided to end her life by throwing herself into the ocean. But just before she could throw herself from the docks, a handsome young sailor stopped her.
"You have so much to live for," said the sailor. "Look, I'm off to Europe tomorrow and I can stow you away on my ship. I'll take care of you, bring you food every day, and keep you happy."

With nothing to lose, combined with the fact that she had always wanted to go to Europe, the woman accepted. That night the sailor brought her aboard and hid her in a lifeboat. From then on, every night he would bring her three sandwiches and make love to her until dawn.
Three weeks later she was discovered by the captain during a routine inspection.

"What are you doing here?" asked the captain.
"I have an arrangement with one of the sailors," she replied. "He brings me food and I get a free trip to Europe. Plus he's screwing me."
"He certainly is," replied the captain. "This is the Staten Island Ferry."
***
Four religious men of the cloth go on a fishing trip...
That night in the fish house they decide to confess their greatest sin to each other.  The Catholic priest says, "my greatest sin is lust.  I look at porn constantly online and when I can I have crazy sex with parishioners."   The Rabbi says "my sin is greed.  I never give to charities and sometimes steal from the Temple."   The Islamic imam says, "my sin is gluttony.  At least once a week I go to the liquor store for a six-pack and then head to McDonalds in the middle of the night and get a big bag of Big Macs, Bacon cheese burgers and fries and eat and drink it all while sitting in the parking lot."   The Baptist minister says, "My greatest sin is gossip and I can't wait to get back to town!"
***
A guy sees a sign in front of a house in Santa Barbara: "Talking Dog for Sale."
He rings the bell and the owner tells him the dog is in the backyard. The guy goes into the backyard and sees a black mutt just sitting there.

"You talk?" he asks.

"Sure do." the dog replies.

"So, what's your story?"

The dog looks up and says, "Well, I discovered my gift of talking pretty young and I wanted to help the government, so I told the CIA about my gift, and in no time they had me jetting from country to country, sitting in rooms with spies and world leaders, because no one figured a dog would be eavesdropping. I was one of their most valuable spies eight years running."

"The jetting around really tired me out, and I knew I wasn't getting any younger and I wanted to settle down. So I signed up for a job at the airport to do some undercover security work, mostly wandering near suspicious characters and listening in."

"I uncovered some incredible dealings there and was awarded a batch of medals. Had a wife, a mess of puppies, and now I'm just retired."

The guy is amazed. He goes back in and asks the owner what he wants for the dog.

The owner says, "Ten bucks."

The guy says, "This dog is amazing. Why on earth are you selling him so cheap?"

"Cause he's a fucking liar. He didn't do any of that shit."
***
During World war 2, there was a shortage of organs for transplantation...
... so one London hospital had started trying to use animal parts instead.

A man who had lost his eye, arm and his penis in the bombings was one of the first patients receiving this experimental treatment. 

Instead of his lost eye, they gave him the eye of an eagle. 

Instead of his lost arm, they gave him an arm from a gorilla.

Instead of his lost penis, they gave him an elephant trunk.

A month after surgery, he had a checkup to see if there was any rejection or whatnot. And since this was a medical science breakthough, there were a lot of interested doctors that had come to see what had happened.

The surgeon who performed the transplant asked the man how his eye had worked?

The man says "Oh, it's great! My vision has improved a lot. I can spot people miles away, and I find anything I'm looking for without any problems."

"How has the gorilla arm woked for you?"

"It's great! It really helps me at work lifting heavy things, and I am more popular; When the guys want to arm wrestle, I win every time, and it also seems to attract the ladies as well!"

"Alright, how has the elephant trunk worked out for you then?"

"Well, I don't want to complain or anything, but it keeps trying to stuff grass into my arse..."

*ed: speling*
***
Kinky sex
A man and a woman are sitting side by side at a bar getting really wasted. They both look really depressed.  
  
The man asks the woman why she's so down and she replies, "My husband left me because he said I was too kinky in bed."  

"What a conicidence" he said. "My wife just left me. She said I was too kinky in bed too."  

They start talking and after a few more drinks they decide to go to the woman's apartment for some kinky sex.  

When they arrive at her apartment she tells him she needs a few minutes so she can slip into something more uncomfortable. She comes out of the bathroom with a tight black leather outfit, holding a whip and handcuffs. Then she hurries into the kitchen and comes out with tabasco sauce, whipped cream and a rolling pin.  

She notices that the man is putting on his coat and is walking towards the door to leave.  

"What's going on?" she asks. "I thought you wanted to get kinky?"  

He turns around and says, "I just fucked your dog and shat in your purse. I'm all done."  
***
The Lawyer's Car
A lawyer had just bought a fancy new car, and was eager to show it off to his colleagues, when an eighteen wheeler came out of nowhere and took off the driver's side door with him standing right there. "NOOO!" he screamed, because he knew that no matter how good a mechanic tried to fix it, it would never be the same. Finally, a cop came by, and the lawyer ran up to him yelling, "MY BENTLEY DOOR WAS JUST RUINED BY SOME FOOLISH DRIVER!!!"

"You're a lawyer aren't you?" asked the policeman.

"Yes, I am, but what does that have to do with my car?!?!" the lawyer asked.

"HA! You lawyers are so materialistic. All you care about is your possessions. I bet you didn't even notice that your left arm is missing did you?" the cop said.

The lawyer looked down at his side and exclaimed, "MY ROLEX!"

***
Wanna hear about the time I got kicked out of school?
Everyone knows that kindergarteners are very curious. So back in the day I was peeing at a urinal, and Timmy comes up to me and says, "Whoa, your wiener is huge!"
I thought nothing of it at the time. But when we got back to class, Timmy started telling everyone. Within the hour they wanted to see it, so I went to the door to check if any adults were coming, then I whipped it out for everyone to see.
Eventually Susan ratted me out, and that's how I lost my teaching career.
***
A teacher asked her 6th Grade class how many of them were Trump fans...
A teacher asked her 6th grade class how many of them were Trump fans.


Not really knowing what a Trump fan is, but wanting to be liked by their teacher, all the kids raised their hands except for Little Johnny. 


The teacher asked Little Johnny why he has decided to be different... again.
Little Johnny said, "Because I'm not a Trump fan." 


The teacher asked, "Why aren't you a fan of Trump?"


Johnny said, "Because I'm a Democrat."


The teacher asked him why he's a Democrat.


Little Johnny answered, "Well, my Mom's a Democrat and my Dad's a Democrat, so I'm a Democrat." 


Annoyed by this answer, the teacher asked, "If your mom was a moron and your dad was an idiot, what would that make you?"


With a big smile, Little Johnny replied, "That would make me a Trump fan."
***
Guy selling apple seeds at street...
Police officer came and asked him what is he doing..                     
man: I am selling apple seeds which make you smarter if you eat them.                
PO: Really? do they really work?                                  
man: well buy some and try...                         
PO: okay, give me 5 seeds                           
man: That is 10$ sir                              
PO gave man the money and ate the seeds and 2 min after that he said:                                      
PO: wait a minute, I could have bought like 10 apples for that money and get like 20-30 seeds.....                               
man: see they already work :)                              
PO: Wow, give me 5 more!                    
                                       
Sry for bad english
***
A Scotsman moves to London
“How’s the flat you’re living in in London, Jock?” asks his mother when he calls home to Aberdeen.

“It’s okay,” he replies, “but the woman next door keeps screaming and crying all night and the guy on the other side keeps banging his head on the wall.”

“Never you mind,” says his mother, “don’t you let them get to you, just ignore them.”

“Aye, that I do,” he says, “I just keep playing my bagpipes.”
***
My Wife won't like it
One day I accidentally overturned my golf buggy.

Elizabeth, a very attractive and keen golfer, who lived in a villa on the golf course, heard the noise and called out, Are you okay, what's your name?"

"Its Jack , and I'm Okay thanks," I replied.

"Jack , forget your troubles. Come to my villa, rest a while, and I'll help you get the cart up later."

"That's mighty nice of you," I answered, but I don't think my wife would like it."

"Oh, come on," Elizabeth insisted.

She was very pretty, very sexy and persuasive... I was weak.

"Well okay," I finally agreed, and added, "but my wife won't like it."

After a restorative brandy, and some creative putting lessons, I thanked my host. "I feel a lot better now, but I know my wife is going to be really upset."

"Don't be silly! Elizabeth said with a smile, She won't know anything. By the way, where is she?"

"Under the cart!"
***
The miracle of alcohol
An Irishman promises his wife that he will quit drinking. All goes well for about three weeks. One night, his friends invite him to join them at the pub.

"Ya don't have to drink at all. Just trade some stories with the boys."

The Irishman agrees to stay for a little while. After an hour, his friends convince him to have a drink.

"One beer won't hurt ya. She'll never even know!"

So he agrees to drink one beer and stay with his friends in the pub. Each time he decides that it is time to leave, his friends again tell him that another drink won't hurt and that he should stay for another round. Sure enough, it is two in the morning and the bartender is telling the boys that they had best go home. 

So the Irishman stands up from the bar and falls right on his face. Laying there on the floor he says to himself;

"My tolerance must be a lot lower than I thought!"

So, he lifts himself up from the floor, takes another uneasy step, and falls to the floor again. At this point, the Irishman decides that he needs to get home somehow or his wife will kill him. So he starts dragging himself from the bar to his home. Luckily, he lives only a few blocks from the pub. 

AS he finally pulls himself up to his house, the Irishman uses the doorknob to lift himself up and steady himself as he pulls out his key. As the door opens, he falls right on his face again. AS he looks around the house, all of the lights are out and no one is moving around. So he closes the door and pulls himself over to his bedroom. He can see the shadow of his wife, sleeping in their bed. 

So he pulls himself over to the bed, hoists himself up and onto the bed. Looks over and he can see that his wife is still fast asleep. AS he closes his eyes to sleep, the last thought that goes through his head is;

"I made it."

The next morning he is woken up by his wife who is screaming at him.

"You were at the pub last night weren't ye!?"

In his haze, the only thing that the Irishman can respond with was;

"Well how the hell do you know? Ya were sleepin' when I got home!"

His wife responds with;

"The pub called this morning. Ya left your wheelchair there again!"
***
A guy gets on a bus and sees a really hot nun.
A guy gets on a bus and sees a really hot nun. He approaches her and dishes out a few pick up lines trying to score with her. The nun is shocked and appalled and gets off the bus immediatly. 

The bus driver saw the whole spectacle and calls the guy over to him. He says "I know that nun. I see her every night while driving my route. Every night she is at the graveyard, praying. If you really want to have sex with her, just dress up as jesus, go there at night and tell her she HAS TO have sex with you!"

"Sounds like a solid plan" thinks the guy and decides to go through with it.
He dresses up as jesus, goes to the graveyard and finds the nun there. He approaches her and says "Behold! It is I, Jesus Christ! I order you to have sex with me!". The nun looks suprised and flustered and says "Of course my lord! Whatever you say! But could we  please do it anally? I want to preserve my virginity."

"Even better!" thinks the guy, and they proceed to have sex like wild animals.

After they are finished the guy jumps up laughing, rips off his fake beard and says "Ha! Got you! I'm not jesus! I'm that guy from the bus!"
The nun replies "Ha! Got you! I'm not the nun! I'm the bus driver!"
***
A crusty old Marine Sergeant Major...
...found himself at a gala event hosted by a local liberal arts college. There was no shortage of extremely young idealistic ladies in attendance, one of whom approached the Sergeant Major for conversation. 

"Excuse me, Sergeant Major, but you seem to be a very serious man. Is something bothering you?" 

"Negative, ma'am. Just serious by nature." 

The young lady looked at his awards and decorations and said, "It looks like you have seen a lot of action."

"Yes, ma'am, a lot of action." 

The young lady, tiring of trying to start up a conversation, said, "You know, you should lighten up a little. Relax and enjoy yourself." 

The Sergeant Major just stared at her in his serious manner. Finally the young lady said, "You know, I hope you don't take this the wrong way, but when is the last time you had sex?" 

"1955, ma'am." 

"Well, there you are. No wonder you're so serious. You really need tochill out! I mean, no sex since 1955! She took his hand and led him toa private room where she proceeded to "relax" him several times. 

Afterwards, panting for breath, she leaned against his bare chest and said, "Wow, you sure didn't forget much since 1955."

The Sergeant Major said in his serious voice, after glancing at his watch, "I hope not; it's only 2130 now." 
***
The boss comes into work carrying a thermos...
His blonde secretary had never seen one before.

"What's that thing?" she asks.

"Oh, this?" he says, "It's just my thermos. It keeps my hot things hot and my cold things cold. Damn convenient."

"Oh wow, that DOES sound convenient!" she exclaims, "I might have to get myself one of those!"

"Yep, I definitely recommend it."

And they go about the rest of the day.

Sure enough, the next morning, when the boss comes in, he notices a brand new thermos on his secretary's desk.

"Ah, I see you got yourself a thermos!" he says.

"Oh, yes sir, I decided I could use something to keep my hot things hot and my cold things cold." She's beaming.

He grins back. "Neat-o. So, whatcha got in there?"

"Two popsicles and a cup of coffee."
***
A couple wants to have sex but their son is in the house.
The only way to pull off a Sunday afternoon "quickie " with their 8-year-old son in the apartment was to send him out on the balcony with a Popsicle and tell him to report on all the neighborhood activities...

"There's a car being towed from the parking lot," he shouted.He began his commentary as his parents put their plan into operation.

"An ambulance just drove by!"

"Looks like the Andersons have company," he called out.

"Matt's riding a new bike!"

"Looks like the Sanders are moving!"

"Jason is on his skate board!"

After a few moments he announced... "The Coopers are having sex. Startled, his mother and dad shot up in bed.

Dad cautiously called out..."How do you know they're having sex?" "Jimmy Cooper is standing on his balcony with a Popsicle."

***
A man is in bed with his wife when...
A man is in bed with his wife when there is a rat-a-tat-tat on the door. He rolls over and looks at his clock, and it's half past three in the morning. "I'm not getting out of bed at this time," he thinks, and rolls over. Then, a louder knock follows.

"Aren't you going to answer that?" says his wife. So he drags himself out of bed and goes downstairs. He opens the door and there is a man standing at the door. It didn't take the homeowner long to realize the man was drunk.

"Hi there," slurs the stranger. "Can you give me a push??" "No, get lost. It's half past three. I was in bed," says the man and slams the door. He goes back up to bed and tells his wife what happened and she says, "Dave, that wasn't very nice of you. Remember that night we broke down in the pouring rain on the way to pick the kids up from the baby sitter and you had to knock on that man's house to get us started again? What would have happened if he'd told us to get lost??"

"But the guy was drunk," says the husband.

"It doesn't matter," says the wife. "He needs our help and it would be the right thing to help him." So the husband gets out of bed again, gets dressed and goes downstairs. He opens the door, and not being able to see the stranger anywhere he shouts, "Hey, do you still want a push??" And he hears a voice cry out, "Yeah, please."

So, still being unable to see the stranger he shouts, "Where are you?" And the stranger replies, "I'm over here, on your swing."
***
My first joke on reddit. Hope it hasn't been told too often
A bank robber wanted to keep his identity secret, but didn't wear a balaclava. he told all in the bank not to look at him or he would shoot them.
one foolhardy customer sneaked a look, and the robber promtply shot him.
the robber asked if anyone else had seen his face.
one customer, gazing intently at the ground, said "I think my wife got a glimpse"
***
My Favorite Wild West Joke
A mean lookin' cowboy was sitting by himself in a Saloon. He was a pretty intimidating sight, so no one bothered him as he downed a few whiskey and beers. After chugging his last drink he slammed some coins on the tabletop and got up to leave. Right after he left though he came storming back in and said,

"Listen up you mangey bastards" and everyone, terrified, immediately fell silent.

"Someone done took my horse. Now here's what's gunna happen. I'm gunna order me another drink, finish it, and when I walk back outside this time my horse BETTER be there or else I'm gunna do what I did in Texas... and believe me, I don't want to do what I did in Texas!"

Like he said, after he finished his drink he walked outside and sure enough, someone had returned his horse. He was getting on it when one of the bar patrons ran up to him and sheepishly asked,

"Sir I don't mean to bother you but I just have to know, what did you do in Texas?"

The cowboy looked at him square in the eyes and replied,

"I walked home".
***
Three women: one engaged, one married and one a mistress, are chatting about their relationships and decided they needed to spice up their love lives.
All three agreed to wear black leather bras, stiletto heels and a mask over their eyes that evening with their respective lovers.

After a few days they meet up for lunch and compared notes.

The engaged woman: "The other night when my boyfriend came over he found me with a black leather bodice, tall stilettos and a mask. He saw me and said, 'You are the woman of my life. I love you.' Then we made love all night long."

The mistress: "Me too! The other night I met my lover at his office and I was wearing the leather bodice, heels, mask over my eyes and a raincoat. When I opened the raincoat he didn't say a word, but we had wild sex all night."

The married woman: "I sent the kids to stay at my mother's house for the night when my husband came home I was wearing the leather bodice, black stockings, stilettos and a mask over my eyes. 

As soon as he came in the door and saw me he said, 

'What's for dinner, Batman?'"
***
The husband leans over and asks his wife, 'Do you remember the first time we had sex together over fifty years ago?'
'We went behind the village tavern where you leaned against the back fence and I made love to you.'

'Yes', she says, 'I remember it well.'

'OK,' he says, 'How about taking a stroll around there again and we can do it for old time's sake?'

'Oh Jim, you old devil, that sounds like a crazy, but good idea!'

A police officer sitting in the next booth heard their conversation and, having a chuckle to himself, he thinks to himself, I've got to see these two old-timers having sex against a fence. I'll just keep an eye on them so there's no trouble. So he follows them.

The elderly couple walks haltingly along, leaning on each other for support aided by walking sticks.. Finally, they get to the back of the tavern and make their way to the fence. The old lady lifts her skirt and the old man drops his trousers. As she leans against the fence, the old man moves in.. Then suddenly they erupt into the most furious sex that the policeman has ever seen. This goes on for about ten minutes while both are making loud noises and moaning and screaming. Finally, they both collapse, panting on the ground.

The policeman is amazed. He thinks he has learned something about life and old age that he didn't know.

After about half an hour of lying on the ground recovering, the old couple struggle to their feet and put their clothes back on. The policeman, is still watching and thinks to himself, this is truly amazing, I've got to ask them what their secret is..

So, as the couple passes, he says to them, 'Excuse me, but that was something else. You must've had a fantastic sex life together. Is there some sort of secret to this?'

Shaking, the old man is barely able to reply, 'Fifty years ago that wasn't an electric fence.''
***
German couple rush to a Jewish Hospital
A German couple are rushed to a Jewish hospital after a huge hailstorm. The boyfriend's right hand was cut, and the girlfriend's head is in really bad shape, so the couple go to the emergency room. A rabbi - who is accompanying and praying for all the patients in the emergency room - is in shock of how the girlfriend managed to be in the condition she was in. The rabbi asks the boyfriend, "what hit her?" The boyfriend still panting after rushing to the hospital pointing with his bandaged hand and quickly mutters, "hail-hit-her!"
***
A man gets on a bus, and ends up sitting next to a very attractive nun.
Enamored with her, he asks if he can have sex with her. Naturally, she says no, and gets off the bus. 

The man goes to the bus driver and asks him if he knows of a way for him to have sex with the nun.

 "Well," says the bus driver, "every night at 8 o'clock, she goes to the cemetery to pray. If you dress up as God, I'm sure you could convince her to have sex with you." 

The man decides to try it, and dresses up in his best God costume. At eight, he sees the nun and appears before her. 

"Oh, God!" she exclaims. "Take me with you!" 

The man tells the nun that she must first have sex with him to prove her loyalty. The nun says yes, but tells him she prefers anal sex. 

Before you know it, they're getting down to it, having nasty, grunty, loud sex. After it's over, the man pulls off his God disguise. 

"Ha, ha! I'm the man from the bus!" 

"Ha, ha!" says the nun, removing her costume. "I'm the bus driver!"
***
Two soldiers are walking through the desert...
And a scorpion crawls up on one of the Tim's leg and stings him right in the dick. Johnny calls the base and asks to talk with the medic. He tells him what happened to Tim and asks what the best course of action would be. Since the base is far away, the medic tells Johnny that he has to suck the venom out of the wound before it spreads. Tim asks: "What did the medic say?"
Johnny says: "He says you're gonna fucking die"
***
First Condom
“I recall my first time with a condom, I was 16 or so. I went in to buy a packet of condoms at the pharmacy. There was this beautiful woman assistant behind the counter, and she could see that I was new at it. She handed me the package and asked if I knew how to wear one. I honestly answered, ‘No, this is my first time.’

So she unwrapped the package, took one out and slipped it over her thumb. She cautioned me to make sure it was on tight and secure. I apparently still looked confused. So, she looked all around the store to see if it was empty. It was empty.

‘Just a minute,’ she said, and walked to the door, and locked it. Taking my hand, she led me into the back room, unbuttoned her blouse and removed it. She unhooked her bra and laid it aside. ‘Do these excite you?’ She asked.

Well, I was so dumb-struck that all I could do was nod my head. She then said it was time to slip the condom on. As I was slipping it on, she dropped her skirt, removed her panties and lay down on a desk.

‘Well, come on’, she said, ‘We don’t have much time.’ So I climbed on her. It was so wonderful, that unfortunately, I could no longer hold back and KAPOWWWWWWWW, I was done within a few moments.

She looked at me with a bit of a frown. ‘Did you put that condom on?’ she asked.

I said, ‘I sure did,’ and held up my thumb to show her.
***
A teacher asks her class to come up with a sentence...
...that contains the word "contagious."

Amy stands up and says "Last week my mummy had the flu. It was contagious." "Very good," says the teacher. "Anyone else?"

Then Becky stands up and says "a long time ago the Bubonic Plague affected a lot of Europe and because it was very contagious a lot of people died." "Very good," says the teacher. "One more?"

Little Johnny then stands up and says "my next door neighbour recently started painting his house with a two-inch brush. My Daddy says it'll take the contagious."
***
A hillbilly walked into an attorney's office wanting to file for divorce...
Attorney: "May I help you?"

Hillbilly: "Yea, I want to get one of those dayvorces".

Attorney: "Well do you have any grounds?"

Hillbilly: "Yea, I got about a hundred acres."

Attorney: "No, you don't understand, do you have a case?"

Hillbilly: "No, I don't have a Case, but I have a John Deere."

Attorney: "I mean, do you have a grudge?"

Hillbilly: "Yea, I got a grudge. That's where I park my John Deere."

Attorney: "No sir, I mean do you have a suit?"

Hillbilly: "Yes sir, I got a suit, I wear it to church on Sundays."

Attorney: "Well sir, does your wife beat you up or anything?"

Hillbilly: "No sir, we both get up about 4:30 in the morning."

Attorney: "Well, is she a nagger or anything?"

Hillbilly: "No she's a little white gal, but our last child was a 
nagger. That's why I want this dayvorce."
***
Heaven is...
... where the police are British, 
the cooks are Italian, 
the mechanics are German, 
the lovers are French 
and it is all organised by the Swiss. 

Hell is where the police are German, 
the cooks are English, 
the mechanics are French, 
the lovers are Swiss, 
and it is all organised by the Italians.
***
Pink Panther's TODO list
1. TODO
2. TODO 
3. TODO TODO TODO TODO TODOOO

***
World's Funniest Joke
The "world's funniest joke" is a term used by Richard Wiseman of the University of Hertfordshire in 2002 to summarize one of the results of his research. For his experiment, named LaughLab, he created a website where people could rate and submit jokes. Purposes of the research included discovering the joke that had the widest appeal and understanding among different cultures, demographics and countries.

The History Channel eventually hosted a special on the subject.


The winning joke, which was later found to be based on a 1951 Goon Show sketch by Spike Milligan,was submitted by Gurpal Gosal of Manchester:


   *Two hunters are out in the woods when one of them collapses. He doesn't seem to be breathing and his eyes are glazed. The other guy whips out his phone and calls the emergency services. He gasps, "My friend is dead! What can I do?" The operator says "Calm down. I can help. First, let's make sure he's dead." There is a silence, then a gun shot is heard. Back on the phone, the guy says "OK, now what?"*
***
A man takes his seat at a FIFA World Cup Final
He looks to his left & notices that there is a spare seat betwen himself & the next guy.

MAN: "who would ever miss the FIFA world cup final?"

GUY: "that was my wife's seat. We have been to the last five world cup finals together, but sadly she passed away."

MAN: "oh... that's terrible, and very sweet of you to have her here symbolically by having a vacant seat .. ..but these are expensive tickets;  couldn't you have brought another family member, friend or someone else with you?"

GUY: "No...they are all currently at her funeral!"



⚽⚽⚽
FIFA FEVER
***
A cabbie picks up a nun
A cabbie picks up a Nun.
She gets into the cab, and notices that the VERY handsome cab driver won't stop staring at her.

She asks him why he is staring.
He replies: 'I have a question to ask you but I don't want to offend you.'
She answers, 'My son, you cannot offend me. When you're as old as I am and have been a nun as long as I have, you get a chance to see and hear just about everything. I'm sure that there's nothing you could say or ask that I would find offensive.'

'Well, I've always had a fantasy to have a nun kiss me.'
She responds, 'Well, let's see what we can do a about that: #1, you have to be single and #2, you must be Catholic.'
The cab driver is very excited and says, 'Yes, I'm single and Catholic!'
'OK' the nun says. 'Pull into the next alley.'

The nun fulfills his fantasy with a kiss that would make a hooker blush.
When they get back on the road, the cab driver starts crying.
'My dear child,' says the nun, 'why are you crying?'

'Forgive me but I've sinned. I lied and I must confess, I'm married and I'm Jewish.'
The nun says, 'That's OK...... My name is Gary and I'm going to a Halloween party.'
***
The President of the United States and the Prime minister of China are comparing their bodyguards.
The president orders his secret service agent to jump off a 40 foot platform. The agent heisitates and does so. 

The prime minister immediately orders his bodyguard to do the same. The guard jumps without batting an eye.

The president, feeling a little defeated, orders his bodyguard to jump off a hundred foot platform. The agent turns to the president and, with teary eyes, pleads:"Mister president, please don't do this, I have a family!"

The president hesitates and retracts his order. The chinese minister snorts and orders the same to his body guard.The chinese bodyguard starts climbing without a second thought. The president grabs his arm and says, "Wait man, this is too much! You don't have to do this!"

The chinese bodygaurd shakes off his arm and says:"Mister president, please don't, I have family."

Edit:words.


***
An engineer dies and goes to heaven.
When he arrives St. Peter looks at the book and scratches his head. He says 'You were involved in some great civil engineering projects so I ought to let you into heaven but you were also involved in weapons programs that resulted in great loss of life' 'I am sorry but you will have to go to hell'. 
Well, the engineer arrived in hell and found it very hot - so he installed air conditioning. He also found it dry - so he installed clean running water. He then thought it was a bit dark so he installed decent lighting. 
The devil was very pleased and rang St. Peter to gloat 'thanks for sending me that engineer, he has made hell a really nice place'. Oh dear' said St. Peter (that was the nearest he got to swearing) 'if he can tame hell I must have made a mistake. Send him back up here.' Naturally, the devil refused so St. Peter said 'if you don't I will sue you'. The devil just laughed and said 'Where are you going to find a lawyer?'

Edit: corrected mistyping

***
A doctor, a priest and an engineer go golfing...
After only a few rounds, they get caught behind the worst group of golfers they've ever seen. After growing impatient from waiting for them to finish their holes, they go into the clubhouse to complain.  
  
"Let me explain," says the manager. "You see, those men all used to be firefighters, some of the best our city has ever seen. There was a fire here at the clubhouse about five years ago. Those heroic men saved our clubhouse from the fire. However, most unfortunately, they all lost their sight in the terrible fire. Since then, they are welcome to use our facilities for life; it's the very least we could do."  
  
The priest, looks forlorn and says, "I'm so sorry to hear it! I will hold a prayer service this Sunday dedicated to these men."  
  
The doctor says, "what an awful thing! I know a highly-regarded optometrist who has done some research that might be able to help them, I'll arrange for them to meet as soon as I can!"  
  
The engineer thinks for a moment and says, "why can't they golf at night?"
***
The dog & the leopard
A man decided to go on a safari. He took his faithful dog along for company. One day the dog starts chasing butterflies and before long the dog discovers that he is lost. So, wandering about, he notices a leopard heading rapidly in his direction with the obvious intention of having lunch.

The dog thinks, "Oh boy, I'm in deep stuff now." Then he notices some bones lying nearby on the ground and immediately settles down to chew on the bones with his back to the approaching cat.

Just as the leopard is about to leap, the dog exclaims loudly, "That was one delicious leopard. I wonder if there are any more around here?"

Hearing this, the leopard halts his attack in mid-stride, and slinks away into the trees. "Whew", says the leopard. "That was close. That dog nearly had me." 

Meanwhile, a monkey who had been watching the whole scene from a nearby tree, figures he can put this knowledge to good use and trade it for protection from the leopard.

So off he goes. But the dog sees him heading off after the leopard and figures that something is amiss. The monkey soon catches up with the leopard, spills the beans about the dog's ruse and strikes a deal for himself with the leopard. The leopard is furious at being made a fool of and says, "Hop on my back, monkey, and see what's going to happen to that conniving canine. "Now the dog sees the leopard coming with the monkey on his back, and thinks, "Oh boy, it looks like I've really had it now."

But instead of running, the dog sits down with his back to the leopard and the monkey and pretends that he hasn't seen them. And just when they get close enough to hear him, the dog says...  "Where  is that monkey? .. I sent him off an hour ago to get me another leopard and he's still not back."
***
A chemistry student was asked to explain if heaven or hell exists on a test...
The question was: Is Hell exothermic (gives off heat) or endothermic (absorbs heat)?

Most of the students wrote proofs of their beliefs using Boyle's Law (gas cools when it expands and heats when it is compressed) or some variant.

One student, however, wrote the following:

First, we need to know how the mass of Hell is changing in time. So, we need to know the rate at which souls are moving into Hell and the rate at which they are leaving. I think we can safely assume that once a soul gets to Hell, it will not leave. Therefore, no souls are leaving. As for how many souls are entering Hell, let's look at the different religions that exist in the world today.

Most of these religions state that if you are not a member of their religion, you will go to Hell. Since there is more than one of these religions and people do not belong to more than one religion, we can project that all souls go to Hell.

With birth and death rates as they are, we can expect the number of souls in Hell to increase exponentially. Now, we look at the rate of change of the volume in Hell because Boyle's Law states that in order for the temperature and pressure in Hell to stay the same, the volume of Hell has to expand proportionately as souls are added. This gives two possibilities.

1. If Hell is expanding at a slower rate than the rate at which souls enter Hell, then the temperature and pressure in Hell will increase until all Hell breaks loose.

2. If Hell is expanding at a rate faster than the increase of souls in Hell, then the temperature and pressure will drop until Hell freezes over.

So which is it?

If we accept the postulate given to me by Theresa during my freshman year that "It will be a cold day in Hell before I sleep with you," and we take into account the fact that I slept with her last night, then number two must be true, and thus I am sure that Hell is exothermic and has already frozen over.

The corollary of this theory is that since Hell has frozen over, it follows that it is not accepting any more souls and is therefore leaving only Heaven, thereby proving the existence of a divine being which explains why, last night, Theresa kept shouting, "Oh my God."
***
Jesus, Moses & some old guy are playing golf...
Jesus, Moses & some old guy are playing golf.

Jesus hits his ball out into the lake, walks out on the water then chips the ball back on to the green.

Moses wasn't going to be outdone so he hits his ball way the hell out into the middle of the lake; then he parts the water, walks out and then chips his ball back on to the green.

The old guy hits his ball out towards the center of the lake; just as the ball is about to hit the water, a fish jumps up and grabs the ball in it's mouth, just as the fish is about to land back in the water, an eagle swoops down, picks up the fish, flys over to the hole; shakes the fish and the ball falls right in the hole.

Jesus says "Come on dad! stop fucking around and play golf!"
***
A guy walks into a bar with an octopus
A guy walks into a bar with an octopus. He sits the octopus down on a stool and tells everyone in the bar that this is a very talented octopus that can play any instrument in the world. Everyone laughs, so he says he'll bet $50. A guy walks up with a guitar and sits it beside the octopus. The octopus starts playing better than Jimi Hendrix, so the man pays his $50. Another guy walks up with a trumpet, and the octopus plays it better than Dizzy Gillespie. So the man pays his $50. A third guy walks up with bagpipes. He sits them down and the octopus fumbles with it for a minute and sets it down with a confused look. "Ha!" the man says, "Can't you play it?" The octopus looks up at the man and says, "Play it? I'm going to screw it as soon as I get its pajamas off."
***
After the Texan wedding ...
... the newlywed cowboy rides home with his bride. It's a long way back to his ranch, and the horse has to carry both him and his bride, so it stumbles, nearly throwing off the two riders. The cowboy calmly straightens up the reins, waits for the horse to gather and says nothing, except, very calmly:

"One."

Further down the way, a small pile of dirt let the horse stumble again, and again without being fazed in any way, the cowboy lets the horse get up without a word, except a calm:

"Two."

As the sun goes down over the prairie, they are near the ranch. The horse, overlooking a root, stumbles a third time. Calmly, the cowboy says:

"Three."

He gets off the horse, helps off his bride, takes his gun and shoots the horse. His bride is shocked! "How could you, you monster! This poor beast carried us all the way and you shoot it in cold blood! Had I known this, I'd never have married you!"

"One."
***
A guy is stranded on an island with only a Doberman and a pig for company.
There's plenty of food and water, and the weather is beautiful, so he's doing alright - but after a few months he gets lonely... 

The pig starts to look more and more attractive - soft, pink flesh, round buttocks, etc. But every time this poor guy makes an advance towards the pig, the Doberman snarls at him and once almost bit his leg. Very frustrating. 

One day the guy sees a speck on the horizon, so he swims out there and it turns out to be a dinghy, cast adrift, and in the bottom of the boat is a beautiful woman, unconscious. He drags her to shore and brings her into his hut and slowly nurses her back health. Finally she is well enough to walk and she says to him "Thank you, thank you for saving my life. I don't know how I can ever repay you. I'll do anything for you, anything, just name it." 

The guy thinks for a minute and says, "Would you mind taking my dog for a walk?"
***
Bill Gates: "Why don't you tell me why Bing failed"
Bill gates: So why don't you tell me why Bing failed. 

Board: We feel there was a public nescience towards Bing. 

Bill gates: Nescience? Let me Goog- Oh I see what you mean.
***
Cheap cow...
The only cow in a small town in Northern Italy stopped giving milk. Then the town folk found they could buy a cow in Sicily quite cheaply. So, they brought the cow over from Sicily. It was absolutely wonderful. it produced lots of milk every day and everyone was happy.

They bought a bull to mate with the cow to get more cows, so they’d never have to worry about their milk supply again. They put the bull in the pasture with the cow but whenever the bull tried to mount the cow, the cow would move away. No matter what approach the bull tried, the cow would move away from the bull, and he was never able to do the deed. The people were very upset and decided to go to the local veterinarian, Dr. Santucchi, who was very wise, tell him what was happening and ask his advice.

“Whenever the bull tries to mount our cow, she moves away. If he approaches from the back, she moves forward. When he approaches her from the front, she backs off. If he attempts it from the one side, she walks away to the other side.”

The veterinarian rubbed his chin thoughtfully and pondered this before asking, “Did you by chance, buy this cow in Sicily?”

The people were dumbfounded, since no one had ever mentioned that they had brought the cow over from Sicily. “You are truly a wise veterinarian,” they said. “How did you know we got the cow from Sicily?”

The Vet replied with a distant look in his eyes, “My wife is from Sicily.”
***
A small Muslim boy is lost in the supermarket...
so he runs to an employee and says, "I've lost my mother!"

The employee leans down and asks "What does your mother look like?"

The kid wipes his eyes and looks at the employee. "I have no fucking idea."

Edit: I'm sorry to those that are getting offended/angry/and are calling me an idiot and a bigot. Honestly I don't get why telling this joke makes me an idiot. I'm also not a bigot. If you don't like the joke, then instead of complaining about it, refer to the sidebar.

> Note: If you are offended by a joke, you have two options:
You can man up and understand this is a subreddit dedicated to jokes, OR
You can go to /r/shitredditsays and whine like the baby you are. Or the newly created /r/cleanjokes.
***
Clean Habits
Maybe an oldie but a goodie...

Two young nuns were fresh out of the convent when they've been assigned to a rectory that is being remodeled. 

"Your first assignment is to repaint the offices. But it's very important that you don't get any paint on your brand new habit." The nuns discuss it and decide that maybe they should just lock the door and paint in the nude, to ensure that they keep their habits paint-free. 

They were almost done painting when there was a knock on the door.  One panics, thinking she needs to get dressed quickly, while the other one calls out "Who is it?"  

"Blind man," replies a voice from the other side of the door. The two nuns look at each other, shrug, and, deciding that no harm can come from letting a blind man into the room, they open the door.

"Nice tits," says the man. "Now, where do you want these blinds?"
***
Freudian Slip
A man is waiting in line at the bus station. He finally makes his way to the attendant and notices she is well endowed and certainly showing it. He avoids looking at her breasts and promptly states "I'd like a picket to Titsburgh." Realizing his mistake he grows red with embarrassment. After purchasing a ticket to Pittsburgh he sits and waits for his bus. Shortly after sitting down a man walks up to him and says "Don't worry about that, it's called a 'Freudian Slip' and it happens all the time. Like the other day I was sitting with my wife at dinner and I meant to say 'pass me the salt please' but I accidentally said 'you've ruined my life you terrible fucking bitch."
***
I got pulled over by a cop
He came to the window and told me I was swerving. He then announced that I was drunk, and proceeded to give me a breathalyzer.
I told him: "I can't I have dyspnea" (Trouble Breathing)
He then told me to take a urine test.
I told him: "I cant, I have a failing liver"
He then continues to ask that I take a blood test.
I tell him: "I can't I'm a Hemophiliac" (Trouble clotting blood)
Lastly he says that I attempt to walk in a straight line.
I then tell him: "I cant, I'm fucking drunk"
***
A housewife takes a lover during.....
A housewife takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work. 
Not aware that 9 year old son was hiding in the closet. 
Her husband came home unexpectedly, so she hid her lover in the closet.
The boy now has company. 
Boy: "Dark in here." 
Man: "Yes it is." 
Boy: "I have a baseball." 
Man: "That's nice." 
Boy: "Want to buy it?" 
Man: "No, thanks." 
Boy: "My dad's outside." 
Man: "OK, how much?" 
Boy: "£250."

In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom's lover are in the closet together.
Boy: "Dark in here." 
Man: "Yes, it is." 
Boy: "I have a baseball glove." 
Man: "That's nice." 
Boy: "Want to buy it?" 
Man: "No, thanks." 
Boy: "I'll tell." 
Man: "How much?" 
Boy: "£750." 
Man: "Fine."

A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your glove. Let's go outside and toss the baseball!" 
The boy says, "I can't. I sold them." 
The father asks, "How much did you sell them for?" 
The son says, "£1,000." 
The father says, "That's terrible to over-charge your friends like that. That is way more than those two 
things cost. I'm going to take you to church and make you confess."

They go to church and the father alerts the priest and makes the little boy sit in the confession booth 
and closes the door.
The boy says, "Dark in here." 
The priest says, "Don't start that sh*t again."
***
A gorilla dies of old age in a zoo
Being the only gorilla in the zoo, the zoo officials couldn't afford to lose the only attraction keeping their failing zoo business afloat. 

So they immediately decided to hire one of the zookeepers for an extra $100/day to wear the gorilla costume they have in storage and pretend to be the gorilla until they can afford a new one. 

For weeks, the zookeeper did lots of tricks in his gorilla suit to the astonishment of thousands of spectators watching the "human-like" gorilla.

About a month in, the popularity started to wane. So to get the attention of the crowd once again, he climbed over his enclosure and swung himself from the net ceiling over the lions den beside his enclosure. A large crowd gathered as they watched in terror and suspense. Suddenly, the zookeeper lost his grip and fell straight down on the floor of the lions den. He started crying for help when suddenly a lion pounced him from behind and whispered in his ear, "Shut the fuck up! You're gonna get us both fired."
***
10 Husbands, Still a Virgin
A lawyer married a woman who had previously divorced ten husbands. 

On their wedding night, she told her new husband, "Please be gentle, I'm still a virgin." 

"What?" said the puzzled groom. 

"How can that be if you've been married ten times?" 

"Well, Husband #1 was a sales representative: he kept telling me how great it was going to be. 

Husband #2 was in software services: he was never really sure how it was supposed to function, but he said he'd look into it and get back to me. 

Husband #3 was from field services: he said everything checked out diagnostically but he just couldn't get the system up. 

Husband #4 was in telemarketing: even though he knew he had the order, he didn't know when he would be able to deliver. 

Husband #5 was an engineer: he understood the basic process but wanted three years to research, implement, and design a new state-of-the-art method.

Husband #6 was from finance and administration: he thought he knew how, but he wasn't sure whether it was his job or not. 

Husband #7 was in marketing: although he had a nice product, he was never sure how to position it. 

Husband #8 was a psychologist: all he ever did was talk about it. 

Husband #9 was a gynecologist: all he did was look at it. 

Husband #10 was a stamp collector: all he ever did was... God! I miss him! But now that I've married you, I'm really excited!" 

"Good," said the new husband, "but, why?" 

"You're a lawyer. This time I know I'm gonna get screwed!"
***
A man goes into a confession booth in Germany...
He says "Please forgive me father for I have sinned." 
The priest responded, "What is your sin my child?" 
The man replies "During WWII I took in a Jewish man and hid him in my attic." 
The priest then exclaims, "Good sir, that is not a sin at all. That was a righteous burden you took upon yourself. You should be proud of your actions."
The man hesitated for a moment and said "Well... I had him pay rent."
The priest simply stated "That isn't the most Christian thing to do, however it is not a sin."
The man then smiled feeling cleared of all wrongdoing. He got up to leave, but then paused once more and said 
"Father?"
"Yes my child?"
"Do I have to tell him that the war is over?"
***
A man is sitting at the bar, hammered drunk...
all of a sudden he throws up all down the front of his shirt.

"Ah shit my wife's going to kill me" the man yells.

The bar tender takes pity on the man and decides to help him out "don't worry mate, just tuck a $20 note in your top pocket and say a drunk at the bar threw up on you, then paid for you to clean your shirt."

The man thinks that's a great idea and heads off home. Sure enough his wife is waiting for him at the front door.

"Look at the state of you! You're fucking hammered and you've thrown up all over yourself..."

The man interrupts her "It wasn't me! It was some other guy next to me at the bar. Look he popped $20 in my pocket for the cleaning." 

"But you've got $40 in your pocket"

"Well yeah he shat in my pants as well"
***
Three American colonels are in the US about to retire and they are offered an economic compensation...
..which consists of multiplying 100,000 dollars by the distance in inches they have between two parts of their body that they choose. 

Colonel McDowell chooses this distance to be from his toe to the edge of his longest hair on his head and the result is 72 inches, so that means he gets $7,200,000.

Colonel Smith chooses the reach of his arms, that is from the tip of his right index finger to the tip of his left index finger, which results in a distance of 75 inches (so he gets $7.5M).

Finally Colonel McConaughey chooses the distance from the tip of his penis to his balls

-"*Colonel, choose two parts that are more separated, you'll win more money that way!*" - says the soldier in charge of the measurement.

-"*No, i'm sure these are the parts i want measured, please proceed!*" - answers the colonel.
The soldier then proceeds to take the measuring tape from the tip of colonel's dick and stretches the tape to reach the balls when suddenly he stops and asks "*Wait...where are your balls*?!"

-"*I lost them in Vietnam*"
***
The CIA, FBI, and the KGB are tasked with finding a rabbit in a forest...
The CIA show up after a few days and release a 6000 word article on the fact that rabbits don't exist.

The FBI show up with a dead rabbit and say in a press release "The rabbit had it coming."

The KGB show up with a bruised and beaten bear. The bear is forced to make a statement "I am a rabbit, my father was a rabbit, and my mother is a rabbit. My whole family are rabbits!" the bear disappears shortly after...
***
What is the difference between Dubai and Abu Dhabi?
The people in Dubai don't watch the Flintstones but the people in Abu Dhabidoooo!
***
Two Scottish nuns
Two Scottish nuns had just arrived to the US by boat when one said to the other, "I heard that the occupants of this country actually eat dogs."

"Odd," her companion replied, "But if we shall live in America, we might as well do as the Americans do."
 
Nodding emphatically, the mother superior pointed to a hot dog vendor and they both walked towards it. "Two dogs, please," said one.

The vendor was only too pleased to oblige and he wrapped both hot dogs in foil. Excited, the nuns hurried over to a bench and began to unwrap their 'dogs'.
 
The mother superior was first to open hers, stared at it for a moment, then leaned over to the other nun and whispered cautiously, "What part did you get?"
***
A man orders a coffee
A man enters a bar and the bartender comes over and asks "Can I help you sir?".

The man answers "What does a cup of coffee cost in this place?".

The bartender says "That would be $2.60".

"Alright, I'll have one." says the client and he takes 26 dimes out of his wallet and he throws them on the ground.
The bartender doesn't want to get involved in a fight so he just picks up the money and he brings the man his coffee.


A week later, the same man enters the bar. He orders a coffee again but this time he pays with a five dollar bill.

The bartender smelled an opportunity for revenge and when he brings the coffee, he throws 48 nickels on the ground as change. The client throws 2 extra dimes on the floor and orders a second coffee.

Edit: Grammar teehee!

Edit 2: This got more attention then expected.. No karma for text post though!
***
A cop on a horse says to a little girl...
Cop on a horse says to little girl on bike, "Did Santa get you that?"  "Yes," replies the little girl.  "Well tell him to put a reflector light on it next year!" and fines her $5.  The little girl looks up at the cop and says, "Nice horse you've got there, did Santa bring you that?"  The cop chuckles and replies, "He sure did!"  "Well," says the little girl, "Next year tell Santa that the d*ck goes under the horse, not on top of it!"
***
A woman goes to the Doctor
A woman goes to the Doctor, worried about her husband 's temper.
The Doctor asks: "What's the problem?
The woman says: "Doctor, I don't know what to do. Every day my husband seems to lose his temper for no reason. It scares me."
The Doctor says: "I have a cure for that. When it seems that your husband is getting angry, just take a glass of water and start swishing it in your mouth. Just swish and swish but don't swallow it until he either leaves the room or calms down.”
Two weeks later the woman comes back to the doctor looking fresh and reborn.
The woman says: "Doctor that was a brilliant idea! Every time my husband started losing it, I swished with water. I swished and swished, and he calmed right down! How does a glass of water do that?"
The Doctor says: "The water itself does nothing. It's keeping your mouth shut that does the trick".

***
What did Arnold Schwarzenegger say when Sylvester Stallone wanted to dress up as classical composers for Halloween?
"You be Beethoven, I'll be Bach."
***
A cell phone rings in a full mens locker room, the man answers the phone
He puts it on speaker.

Man: "Hello!"

Woman: "Hi honey, it's me. Are you at the club?"

Man: "Yes."

Woman: "I'm at the mall and i just saw this beautiful leather coat and it's only $2,000, can i have it?

Man: "Sure!"

Woman: "Oh, and i just stopped by at the Lexus dealership and saw one i really liked, can i have it?

Man "How much is it?"

Woman: "$90,000."

Man: "Well if it's that much i want it with all the features."

Woman: "Ofcourse, one more thing. I just finished talking to Sarah, and the and  the house i wanted is back on the market, they're asking 980.000 for it."

Man: "Ok, make an offer for 900.000, if they don't take it offer them the extra 80k if that's what you really want."

Woman: " Thank you so much honey, love you, bye!"

Man: "Love you too, bye."

The man hung up, everyone in the locker room was staring at him in astonishment. The man then calmly looked around and asked "Ok, whose phone is this?"
***
The new CEO
On his first day, the new head man takes a tour of the main factory where the company's products are made - commenting periodically to his assistants on possible changes. The most common thing he notices is that most of the employees could be working harder than they are. Finally, he spots one guy who's literally just leaning against the wall, twiddling his thumbs.

The CEO is pissed off and decides to send a message. He walks up to the guy, who doesn't seem bothered in the slightest. "Hey, you," the CEO says. "What are you doing?"

"Just, sitting around waiting to get paid," the man said. Now the CEO is really furious.

"Okay, well tell you what. How much do you make in a week?"

The man shrugs, "I don't know, $200."

The CEO pulls out his personal checkbook, writes a check for $400, and hands it to the man. "Two weeks notice. Now get out." The man pauses, thinks for a moment, and then leaves. Feeling satisfied, the CEO turns around to everyone, hoping the message has been received.

"Well? Can anyone tell me what just happened?"

"Well," said one of his employees. "You just tipped the pizza guy a whole lot of money."

***
A girls gotta do what a girls gotta do
As a woman passed her daughter's closed bedroom door, she heard a strange buzzing noise coming from within. Opening the door, she observed her daughter with a vibrator.
Shocked, she asked: 'what in the world are you doing?'
The daughter replied: 'mom, I'm thirty-five years old, unmarried, and this thing is about as close as I'll ever get to a husband. Please, go away and leave me alone.'
The next day, the girl's father heard the same buzz coming from the other side of the closed bedroom door. Upon entering the room, he observed his daughter making passionate love to her vibrator.
To his query as to what she was doing, the daughter said: 'dad I'm thirty-five, unmarried, and this thing is about as close as I'll ever get to a husband. Please, go away and leave me alone.'
A couple days later, the wife came home from a shopping trip, placed the groceries on the kitchen counter, and heard that buzzing noise coming from, of all places, the living room. She entered that area and observed her husband sitting on the couch, downing a cold beer, and staring at the TV.
The vibrator was next to him on the couch, buzzing like crazy. The wife asked: 'What the #@!* are you doing?'
The husband replied: 'I'm watching football with my son-in-law.'
***
The Gynecologist had become
fed up with his job and decided to change professions. One day after seeing an advertisment for an auto mechanic school on TV, he decided to sign up. The Dr studied very hard and gave it the same level of excelence as he did when practicing medicine.

The day of the final exam came. The Dr had to completely rebuild an engine, which he did in record time. When the grades were posted, he was surprised to see that he had achieved a score of 125%. Curious, he spoke to his teacher.

"I don't want to look a gift horse in the mouth or anything but how can I have gotten a score above 100%?" he asked.

"Well" said the instructor, 'You took the engine apart perfectly, that accounts for 50% of the grade, you put it back together flawlessly, that accounts for 50% or the grade. The extra 25% is because never in my career have I seen that all done through a four inch exaust pipe!"

***
Wendy was a prostitute.
Wendy was a prostitute and didn't want her granny to know.  
One day police came across the brothel that she worked at and ordered all prostitutes to stand in a line, so that they could take their names one by one.  
Suddenly, granny comes along and notices Wendy in the line which was now leading outside, and so she walked up to her and said.  
"Wendy dear, why are you standing in this line full of prostitutes?"  
Wendy lied and told granny that the police were giving out free oranges, and she wanted some.  
"That's nice." Said granny and so she went to to back of the line as she wanted some for herself.  
Eventually the police get to her and say "Tut tut tut, still at it your age old lady, how do you do it?"  
Granny smiles and simply replies "It's easy dear, I just pull the skin back and suck them dry!"
***
A bloke is in a queue at the supermarket...
...when he notices that the rather dishy blonde behind him has just raised her hand and smiled hello to him. 

He is rather taken aback that such a looker would be waving to him, and although familiar he can’t place where he might know her from, so he says “sorry do you know me?”

She replies “I maybe mistaken, but I thought you might be the father of one of my children!”

His mind shoots back to the one and only time he has been unfaithful, he says “are you that stripogram on my stag night that I shagged on the snooker table in front of all my mates whilst your mate whipped me with some wet celery and stuck a cucumber up my rear?”

“No”, she replies, “I’m your son’s English Teacher
***
A man bought a horse from a pastor of a church...
The pastor explains to him "to make the horse go yell 'Thank God!' And to make it stop yell 'Hallelujah'". He is riding the horse and gets distracted when he notices he is about to ride off a cliff and begins to yell "Hallelujah! Hallelujah!", and the horse stops just at the edge of the cliff. He wipes his sweat off and says "Phew! Thank God!".

*Old Russian joke my dad used to tell*
***
Donald Trump
Donald Trump has labelled Hillary Clinton "disgusting" for taking a bathroom break during the debate. Trump himself never has to go to the bathroom, as the shit just comes straight out of his mouth.

&nbsp;

Edit: Thanks to everyone that found this joke funny. To all those I offended: Stop being offended by jokes on the internet ;) MERRY CHRISTMAS EVERYONE!!

&nbsp;

Edit: Spelling
***
A woman and a man are involved in a car accident...
a bad one. Both of their cars are totally demolished, but amazingly neither of them is hurt.

After they crawl out of their cars, the woman says, 'Wow, just look at our cars! There's nothing left, but fortunately we are unhurt. This must be a sign from God that we were destined to meet and be friends for the rest of our days.'

The man replies, 'I agree with you completely. This must be a sign from God!'

The woman continues, 'And look at this, here's another miracle. My car is completely demolished but this bottle of wine didn't break. Surely God wants us to drink this wine and celebrate our good fortune.'

Then she hands the bottle to the man. The man nods his head in agreement, opens it and drinks half the bottle before handing it back to the woman.

The woman takes the bottle, immediately puts the cap back on, and hands it to the man.

The man asks, 'Aren't you having any?'

The woman replies, 'No, I think I'll just wait for the police...'

***
One explanation for the gender wage gap is that men typically gravitate towards higher paying jobs like doctor, engineer, CEO...
... While women tend to gravitate towards lower paying jobs like female doctor, female engineer and female CEO. 

All credit to Jeremy McClellan @jeremymcclellan on Twitter and crosspost from r/standupshots

Edit: I just made checked, and this subreddit is r/jokes right? 
***
Horny jack
Jack is one horny guy and is not sure what to do about it. He reaches into
his pocket and pulls out a five dollar bill. He walks down the street to the
local brothel and knocks on the door. 
The madame opens the door and asks Jack what she can do for him.

'I'm really horny, but I only have $5. What can you do for me?' Jack asks
the madam.

She looks over this fellow and tells him, 'Don't worry. We can take care of you. No problem.'

She leads Jack into this room where in the opposite corner is a chicken.
Jack thinks about this a second and figures it can't be that bad. He gives
the madam the $5 and she closes the door behind her. Jack undresses and has the time of his life. When he's done he can't remember when he had ever had such a pleasurable experience.

One week later, and horny again, Jack has saved up $10. Being a satisfied customer he goes back to the same madame and asks what she can do for him for $10.

'Well, for $10 we have a special show,' the madame replies. She leads him into a different room where there are several other people sitting on benches. 'Sit back and enjoy the show, Jack,' she tells him.

Jack gives the money to the madame and takes a seat on one of the benches.

Soon after, the lights dim and the blinds open, revealing another room on the other side of a two-way mirror where two women begin to undress each other. Jack is very impressed. Clearly these women are unaware anyone is watching as they begin to make love to each other passionately. Apparently there is nothing they won't do to each other.

Jack once again feels like he is getting his money's worth. He turns to the person beside him and says, 'This is a pretty good show for ten bucks, eh?!'

The guy turns to Jack and says, 'That's nothing... last week we saw a guy screw a chicken!'
***
Bob is driving home when he sees a sign; "Talking dog for sale"...
...wondering if he's read it correctly, he pulls over and gets out to read it again. Sure enough, it says "Talking dog for sale", and having nowhere to be decides to go in. 

Bob knocks on the door, and well dressed man answers; "Yes?". "I'm here about the 'talking dog'. What does he say; 'Roof'?" asks Bob incredulously. The well dressed man sighs and calls out; "Hey Skip, get in here and introduce yourself." With that a golden retriever happily bounds out from around the corner and stops in front of Bob, looks him dead in the eye, and says "Hi there, I'm Skip." 

Bob is dumbfounded. "That's a talking dog. You're a talking dog." And turning back to the well dressed man; "You have a talking dog." The well dressed man rolls his eyes; "Skip, tell him what you do." "Oh, well I started off as a bomb sniffing dog in Iraq where I helped clear the roads for transports, and when I came home I volunteered at the local children's hospital for animal therapy, and now I work part time as a seeing eye dog for the elderly downtown." says Skip cheerfully. "That's fucking amazing!" says Bob, turning to the owner "Why would you ever want to sell this dog?!" 

"Cause he's a fucking liar, he hasn't done any of that stuff..." 
***
5 Year Old's First Job

Here's  a truly heartwarming story about the bond formed between a little 5-year-old girl and
some construction workers that will make  you believe that we all can make a difference when
we give a child the gift of our time.
A young family moved into a house, next to a vacant lot. One day, a Construction crew turned
up to start building a house on the empty lot.
 
The young family's 5-year-old daughter naturally took an interest in all the activity going on
next door and spent much of each day observing the workers.
 
Eventually the construction crew, all of them "gems-in-the-rough," more or less, adopted her
as a kind of project mascot. They chatted with her, let her sit with them while they had coffee
and lunch breaks, and gave her little jobs to do here and there to make her feel  important.
 
At the end of the first week, they even presented her with a pay envelope containing ten dollars.
The little girl took this home to her mother who suggested that she take her ten dollars "pay"
she'd received to the bank the next day to start a savings account.
 
When the girl and her mom got to the bank, the teller was equally impressed and asked the little
girl how she had come by her very own pay check at such a young age.. The little girl proudly replied,
"I worked last week with a real construction crew building the new house next door to us."
 
"Oh my goodness gracious," said the  teller, "and will you be working on the house again this
week, too?"
 
The little girl replied, "I will, if those assholes at Home Depot ever deliver the damn sheet rock..."
 
 
Kind of brings a tear to the eye - doesn't it?
***
There's a French spy, a Russian spy, and an Italian spy...
who are assigned to work as a team. On a particular mission, they are captured, blindfolded, and are placed in a cell together.

A man tells the spies that they will be tortured until they confess everything they know.

The Frenchman is called out first. He is put on a chair, his hands tied to his back, and tortured. After an hour, he confesses everything he knows.

The Russian is taken next. Similarly, he is put on a chair, his hands tied to his back, and tortured. His resolve remains steady, but after two hours he confesses everything he knows.

Finally, the Italian is led out of the cell. He is put on a chair, his hands are tied to his back, and the torture begins.

An hour passes. Then two. Then four. The Italian spy is tortured for twelve hours, yet he confesses nothing. He is thrown back into the cell, and is greeted by his astounded companions.

"How did you last for so long? Why didn't you confess?" they asked.

"I tried to," the Italian groaned, "but they wouldn't untie my hands!"
***
The power of prayer.
A female CNN journalist heard about a very old Jewish man who had been going to the Western Wall to pray, twice a day, every day, for a long, long time. 

So she went to check it out. She went to the Western Wall and there he was, walking slowly up to the holy site. 

She watched him pray and after about 45 minutes. When he turned to leave, using a cane and moving very slowly, she approached him for an interview. 

"Pardon me, sir, I'm Rebecca Smith from CNN. What's your name? 

"Morris Feinberg," he replied. 

"Sir, how long have you been coming to the Western Wall and praying?" 

"For about 60 years." 

"60 years! That's amazing! What do you pray for?" 

"I pray for peace between the Christians, Jews and the Muslims." 
"I pray for all the wars and all the hatred to stop." 
"I pray for all our children to grow up safely as responsible adults and to love their fellow man." 
"I pray that politicians tell us the truth and put the interests of the people ahead of their own interests."

"How do you feel after doing this for 60 years?" 

"Like I'm talking to a fucking wall."
***
A new pastor was visiting in the homes of his parishioners.
 At one house it seemed obvious that someone was at home, but no answer came to his repeated knocks at the door.

He took out a business card, wrote 'Revelation 3:20' on the back of it and stuck it in the door.

When the offering was processed the following Sunday, he found that his card had been returned. Added to it was this cryptic message, 'Genesis 3:10..'

Reaching for his Bible to check out the citation, he broke up in gales of laughter.

Revelation 3:20 begins 'Behold, I stand at the door and knock.'

Genesis 3:10 reads, 'I heard your voice in the garden and I was afraid for I was naked.'
***
How to be a gracious bitch
Jennifer's wedding day was fast approaching. Nothing could dampen her  excitement, not even her parent's nasty divorce.

Her mother had found the PERFECT dress to wear and would be the best  dressed mother of the bride ever!

A week later, Jennifer was horrified to learn that her father's new young  wife had bought the exact same dress as her mother!

Jennifer asked her father's new young wife to exchange it, but she refused.

'Absolutely not, I look like a million bucks in this dress, and I'm wearing  it,' she replied.

Jennifer told her mother who graciously said, 'Never mind sweetheart.  I'll get another dress. After all, it's your special day.'

A few days later, they went shopping and did find another gorgeous dress.

When they stopped for lunch, Jennifer asked her mother, 'Aren't you  going to return the other dress?  You really don't have another occasion where you could wear it.

Her mother just smiled and replied, 'Of course I do, dear. I'm wearing it to  the rehearsal dinner the night before the wedding.'
***
Since reddit has been all about native americans lately..
An Indian and a cowboy are walking through the prairie one day.
The Indian stops and puts his ear to the ground and says "ah, buffalo come."
In which the cowboy replies:
"Dang, you can tell that from stickin yer ear to the ground?"
Indian says:
"No. Ear sticky."
***
A Guy Walks Into A Bar With An Octopus Under His Arm
He sets the octopus on a stool next to him and announces:
 "This is an amazing octopus. I'll bet anyone in this bar $50 that this octopus can play any instrument set in front of it." 

&nbsp;

None of the people could believe this, so one guy brought up a guitar. The octopus took hold of the guitar and started picking away, better than Jimi Hendrix. The man took $50 from the guitarist. Next someone brings up a trumpet. The octopus started playing the trumpet, better than Herb Alpert. The man won another $50 from the trumpeter. Then some guy brought up some bagpipes. The octopus picked up the bagpipes for a minute and, looking a little puzzled, set them down again. 

&nbsp;


"Can't you play the bagpipes?" asked the man. "Play it?" said the octopus, "I'm gonna screw it as soon as I figure out how to get its pajamas off."
***
I was in a bar when...
I was in a bar in London throwing back brewski's when these two larger women walked in. They both had strong accents so I asked.

*"Are you two ladies from Scotland?"*

One of the ladies turned to me and said,

*"It's Wales you idiot"*

I must've been so drunk that I didn't notice so, I immediately apologized and said,

*"Sorry, are you two whales from Scotland?"*

Don't remember much else.
***
A blonde goes to buy a TV.
A blonde goes out to buy a TV at a department store.

Blonde: I'd like that TV please.

Clerk: Sorry, we don't sell to blondes.

So the blonde goes out and dyes her hair brown. She then goes back to the store.

Blonde: I'd like that TV please.

Clerk: I'm sorry but we don't sell to blondes.

Amazed she goes out and dyes her hair ginger. She later returns to the store.

Blonde: I'd like that TV please.

Clerk: I'm sorry, we don't sell to blondes.

Blonde: How did you know I'm blonde?

Clerk: Because that's a Microwave.

**EDIT**: Corrected format.

***
The Golden Toilet
A man goes out drinking one night and gets blackout drunk. He wakes up the next morning to find that he has lost his credit card. He needs to get it back but he got so drunk he doesn't remember which bar he ended up at. The only thing he remembers is that the bar had a golden toilet. He walks into down and goes into one bar and asked the bartender, "Excuse me, this is a weird question, but do you happen to have a golden toilet here?" "A golden toilet? I don't think so," the bartender said, giving him a strange look. The man walked into another bar,"Excuse me, you don't happen to have a golden toilet here, do you?" said the man. "A golden toilet, huh? Don't be ridiculous." This continues all day until finally the man walks into a bar all the way on the other side of town. He asks the bartender: "Excuse me, I know this is going to sound strange, but do you have a golden toilet here? I got really drunk last night and left my credit card at a bar with a golden toilet." The bartender smiles, turns around and yells, "Hey Bill, I think we found the guy who took a shit in your tuba!"
***
A guy walking down the street sees a girl with perfect breasts
A guy walking down the street sees a girl with perfect breasts. He says to her, “Hey miss, would you let me bite your breasts for $100 dollars?”

“Are you crazy?!” – she says and keeps walking away. 

He turns around, runs around the block and gets to the corner before she does.

“Would you let me bite your breasts for $1,000 dollars?” – he requests again.

“Listen you; I’m not that kind of woman! Got it?”

So the guy runs around the next block and faces her again.

“Would you let me bite your breasts just once for $10,000 dollars?”

She thinks about it for a while and says, “Hmm, $10,000 dollars, eh? Ok, just once, but not here. Let’s go to that dark alley over there.”

So they go into the alley, where she takes off her blouse to reveal the most perfect breasts in the world. As soon as he sees them, he grabs them and starts caressing them, fondling them slowly, kissing them, licking them, burying his face in them, but not biting them.

The woman finally gets annoyed and asks, “Well? Are you gonna bite them or not?”

“Nah”, he replies. “Costs too much…”
***
Three men, a philosopher, a mathematician and an idiot...
were out riding in the car when it crashed into a tree. Before anyone knows it, the three men found themselves standing before the pearly gates of Heaven, where St. Peter and the Devil were standing nearby. "Gentlemen," the Devil started, "Due to the fact that Heaven is now overcrowded, St. Peter has agreed to limit the number of people entering Heaven. If anyone of you can ask me a question which I don't know or cannot answer, then you're worthy enough to go to Heaven; if not, then you'll come with me to Hell."

The philosopher then stepped up, "OK, give me the most comprehensive report on Socrates' teachings." With a snap of his finger, a stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. The philosopher read it and concluded it was correct. "Then, go to Hell!" With another snap of his finger, the philosopher disappeared.

The mathematician then asked, "Give me the most complicated formula ever theorized!" With a snap of his finger, another stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. The mathematician read it and reluctantly agreed it was correct. "Then, go to Hell!" With another snap of his finger, the mathematician disappeared too.

The idiot then stepped forward and said, "Bring me a chair!" The Devil brought forward a chair. "Drill 7 holes on the seat." The Devil did just that. The idiot then sat on the chair and let out a very loud fart. Standing up, he asked, "Which hole did my fart come out from?" The Devil inspected the seat and said,"The third hole from the right." "Wrong," said the idiot, "it's from my asshole." And the idiot went to heaven.
***
a joke that isn't racist
a guy is sitting in a bar and turns to the Asian guy next to him and asks:

"hey do you know, tai quon do, ju jutsu, kung fu or any of that shit?"

offended the Asian man replies: "what you think that just because i'm asian i know martial arts?"

the man replies: "nah its because you're drinking my fucking burbon"

***
The Most Important Body Part
One day the different parts of the body were having an
argument to see which should be in charge.

The brain said "I do all the thinking so I'm the most
important and I should be in charge."

The eyes said "I see everything and let the rest of you
know where we are, so I'm the most important and I
should be in charge."

The hands said "Without me we wouldn't be able to pick
anything up or move anything. So I'm the most important and I should be in charge."

The stomach said "I turn the food we eat into energy for
the rest of you. Without me, we'd starve. So I'm the most important and I should be in charge."

The legs said "Without me we wouldn't be able to move
anywhere. So I'm the most important and I should be in
charge."

Then the rectum said "I think I should be in charge."

All the rest of the parts said "YOU? You don't do
anything!  You're not important! You can't be in charge."

So the rectum closed up.  After a few days, the legs were all wobbly, the stomach was all queasy, the hands were all shaky, the eyes were all watery, and the brain was all cloudy.

They all agreed that they couldn't take any more of this and agreed to put the rectum in charge.

The moral of the story:  You don't have to be the most important to be in charge, just an asshole.


***
Went golfing with my Grandpa yesterday..
We were on the 12th hole and I hit my tee shot a bit to the left. When we got to my ball there was a big 40ft tree right in my way and I was just going to hit around it when my grandpa chimed in:

"Ya know, when I was your age I could hit it right up and over that tree" 

Well not to be outdone my ego took over and I grabbed my 9 iron to hit it right over that tree. I took my shot and *THWACK* the ball hit dead center of the tree and bounced back 30 yards behind me. That's when he chimes in again:

"Of course when I was your age that tree was only 2 feet tall!" 
***
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to the prom...
A teenage boy is getting ready to take his girlfriend to the prom. First he goes to rent a tux, but there’s a long tux line at the shop and it takes forever. Next, he has to get some flowers, so he heads over to the florist and there’s a huge flower line there. He waits forever but eventually gets the flowers. Then he heads out to rent a limo. Unfortunately, there’s a large limo line at the rental office, but he’s patient and gets the job done. Finally, the day of the prom comes. The two are dancing happily and his girlfriend is having a great time. When the song is over, she asks him to get her some punch, so he heads over to the punch table and there’s no punchline.
***
A man walks into a brothel...
A man walks into a brothel. He walks up to the proprietor and says: "What can I get for $1?"

The proprietor says: "Go up the stairs and into the room on the right."

The man walks into the room and sits on the bed, when he notices a small door at the bottom of one of the walls. The door opens up, and a chicken comes walking out.

The man figures out what he has to do, and has his way with the chicken.

The chicken is disgusted, and leaves.

The man comes back the next day and says to the proprietor: "I didn't really like that, and I'd like a refund."

The proprietor says: "Oh, good sir, trust me. Go up the stairs, but this time go into the room on the left, and you won't want your dollar back."

So the man goes into the room, and this room is much larger than the other, with theatre-type seating, and a big curtain on one side. 

A few people are scattered throughout the seats, and the man sits down. The curtain opens up, and it's actually a plexi-glass window into another room, and the people in the seats are watching an orgy.

The man leans over to a guy sitting next to him and says: "Man, this is something, huh?"

The other guy says: "You should have been here yesterday. Some guy was fucking a chicken."
***
New Bull
Three bulls heard the rancher was bringing another bull onto the ranch.

First Bull: "I've been here five years. I'm not giving this new bull any of my 100 cows."

Second Bull: "I've been here three years and have earned my right to 50 cows. I'm keeping all my cows."

Third Bull: "I've only been here a year, and so far, you guys have only let me have 10 cows. I may not be as big as you fellows, but I'm keeping all 10 of my cows."

Just then an 18-wheeler pulls up in the pasture carrying the biggest bull they've ever seen. At 4,700 pounds, each step he takes strains the steel ramp.

First Bull: "I think I can spare a few cows for our new friend."

Second Bull: "I actually have too many cows to take care of. I can spare a few. I'm certainly not looking for an argument."

They look over at the third bull and find him pawing the dirt, shaking his horns and snorting.

First Bull: "Son, don't be foolish -- let him have some of your cows and live to tell about it."

Third Bull: "Hell, he can have all my cows. I'm just making sure he knows I'm a bull."
***
A farmer had three daughters...
and each was going on a date one Friday night.

The first daughters date showed up "Hi I'm Freddy here to pick up Betty to eat spaghetti, is she ready?" 

Betty left with Freddy.

The second daughters date showed up "Hey I'm Joe here to pick up Flo to go to the show, is she ready to go?" 

Flo left with Joe.

The third daughters date showed up "Hello I'm Chuck-" 

The farmer shot chuck.
***
Me and my buddies go-to joke.
A high school senior is in a rush to get everything he needs ready for his high school prom the next day. First thing he needs to get is a tuxedo. He goes to the tux shop and there's a huge line. So he waits in the line, gets his tux, and goes on his way. The next thing he needs are flowers for his date. He gets to the flower shop, and again, there's a huge line. He waits in the line, gets his flowers, and goes on his way. The last thing he needs is his limo to take his date to prom in. He goes to the limo rental center, and once again, there's an enormous line. He waits in the line, rents his limo for the next day, and finally goes home. The next day he shows up to his dates house, tux on, flowers in hand, riding in a fancy limo. His date and him get to the prom, and start dancing. After a while he starts to get really thirsty. He asks his date, "Hey do you want something to drink?" She replies, "Oh sure, could you grab me some punch?" The guy leaves his date to get her some punch, and sure enough, there's no punch line.
***
A Jehovah's Witness knocks on a Jew's door...
A Jehovah's Witness knocks on a Jew's door.

Jew: "Can I help you?"

Witness: "Hello sir, I'm here to tell you about the great Lord Jehovah!"

Jew: "Is that what you call him? You know, we have a name for him too..."

Witness: "No way?!"

Jew: "Yahweh."

***
Two 9/11 conspiracy theorists are in a plane when it crashes
An instant later they find themselves in the afterlife, being judged by Almighty God Himself.

One falls to his knees, "I deplore you, all-powerful Creator of the universe! Before you judge me, I humbly beg you, reveal who was behind the September 11 attacks!"

God sighs. "Muslim extremists. Al-Qaeda and Osama bin Laden did it."

His friend leans down and whispers, "Damn, dude. This thing goes way higher up than we ever realized."

E: If you think the joke is funny you should see all the butthurt 9/11 conspiracy theorists in the comments 
***
An old farmer is sitting on his front porch.
An old farmer is sitting on his front porch watching the sunrise when he sees the neighbor's kid walk by carrying a spool of something metallic under his arm. "Hey boy, whatcha got there?"

"Chicken wire."

"What you gonna do with that?"

"Gonna catch some chickens."

"You damn fool! You can't catch chickens with chicken wire!" says the old man.

The boy just laughs and keeps walking. That evening at sunset, the boy walks by, dragging behind him 30 chickens caught in the chicken wire.

The next morning, the old man sees the boy walk by carrying a shiny roll of something. "Hey boy, whatcha got there?"

"Duct tape."

"What you gonna do with that?"

"Gonna catch me some ducks."

"You damn fool! You can't catch ducks with duct tape!"

The boy just laughs and keeps walking. That evening at sunset, the boy walks by, trailing behind him 30 ducks caught in a long trail of duct tape.

The next morning, the old man sees the boy walking by carrying a branch behind him. "Hey boy, whatcha got there?"

"It's a pussy willow."

"Wait up," says the old man. "I'll get my hat!"
***
Jack wants to go Golfing
Four guys have been going to the same Golfing trip to St Andrews for many years..
Two days before the group is to leave, Jack's wife puts her foot down and tells him he isn't going.
Jack's mates are very upset that he can't go, but what can they do.
Two days later, the three get to St Andrews only to find Jack sitting at the bar with four drinks set up!
                                                          
"Wow, Jack, how long you been here, and how did you talk your missus into letting you go?"
                                                          
"Well, I've been here since last night.. 
Yesterday evening, I was sitting in my living room chair and my wife came up behind me and put her hands over my eyes and asked,  'Guess who?" I pulled her hands off, and there she was, wearing a nightie.
She took my hand and pulled me into our bedroom. The room had candles and rose petals all over. Well she's been reading 50 Shades of Grey......On the bed she had handcuffs, and ropes!  She told me to tie her up and cuff her to the bed, so I  did.   
                                                            
And then she said, "Do whatever you want."   
                                                            
So, Here I am! 
***
At the Welfare office.
A young man with his pants hanging half off his ass, two gold front teeth, and a half inch thick gold chain around his neck; walked into the local welfare office to pick up his check.

He marched up to the counter and said, 
"Hi. You know, I just *Hate* drawing welfare. I'd really rather have a job.. I don't like taking advantage of the system, getting something for nothing." The social worker behind the counter said "Your timing is excellent. We Just got a job opening from a very wealthy old man who wants a chauffeur and
bodyguard for his beautiful daughter. You'll have to drive around in his 2012 Mercedes-Benz CL, and he will supply all of your clothes."

"Because of The long hours, meals will be provided. You'll also be expected to escort the daughter on her overseas holiday trips. This is rather awkward to say
but you will also have, as part of your job, the
assignment to satisfy her sexual urges as the daughter is in her mid-20's and has a rather strong sex drive."

The guy, just plain wide-eyed, said, "You're bullshittin' me!"

The social worker said, "Yeah, well... 
You started it." .....
***
A man is told by his employer that he has to go see the company doctor in order to keep his insurance...
He reluctantly goes, and is amazed to find no examination table, just a wall full of computer equipment. The doctor walks in and says, "Just place your hand on the scanner here" and shows the man a screen. Bewildered, he places his hand on the screen and immediately the panel glows beneath his hand, followed shortly thereafter by a slip of paper that slides out of a slot. 
  The doctor reads the paper and says, "Ah, nearly perfect health! You just have a bit of tennis elbow, nothing too serious!" 
  The man laughs and says "That is ridiculous! You are a quack and your machine here is a fraud! I don't even play tennis!"
  The doctor looks puzzled and replies "Well, it has never been wrong before, but... I tell you what. We can provide a more thorough analysis using morning urine. Return tomorrow with this sample container filled with the first urine of the day and we'll re-check the diagnosis."
  The man, annoyed by now, reluctantly agrees. The next morning he is flat out irritated with the process and decides to have a bit of fun. He lets the dog out and as the pooch lifts his leg the man catches a little of the dogs urine. He then asks his daughter and his wife to help out and they help fill the container a bit as well. After some thought he drains a few drops of oil from the car, and tops it all off by masturbating and adding that to the mixture as well. He then heads to the doctor's office, giggling all the way.
  Upon arrival the doctor looks puzzled at the odd-colored sample but then places it into a tray that slides out from the computer-wall. With the man still giggling in the back ground, the computer buzzes and beeps, seeming to take a bit longer this time. Finally a paper slips out, and the doctor takes it and reads it, with a frown on his face.
  "Well, um... I am sorry to have to tell you, but... your dog has fleas, your daughter is pregnant, your wife has gonorrhea, your car needs an oil change and if you don't stop jerking off so much your tennis elbow will never get better."
  
***
The maid asked for a raise, and the wife was upset.
The maid asked for a raise, and the wife was upset...
She asked, "Now, Helen, why do you think you deserve a pay increase?"
Helen: "There are three reasons. The first is that I iron better than you."
Wife: "Who said that?"
Helen: "Your husband."
Wife: "Oh."
Helen: "The second reason is that I am a better cook than you."
Wife: "Who said that?"
Helen: "Your husband."
Wife: "Oh."
Helen: "The third reason is that I am better at sex than you."
Wife: "Did my husband say that as well?"
Helen: "No, the gardener did."
Wife: "So, how much do you want?"
***
Not having sex tonight
One evening last week, my girlfriend and I were getting into bed. Well, the passion starts to heat up, and she eventually says, 'I don't feel like it, I just want you to hold me.'

I said, 'WHAT??!! What was that?!'

So she says the words that every boyfriend on the planet dreads to hear... 

'You're just not in touch with my emotional needs as a woman enough for me to satisfy your physical needs as a man.' 

She responded to my puzzled look by saying, 'Can't you just love me for who I am and not what I do for you in the bedroom?' 

Realizing that nothing was going to happen that night, I went to sleep. 

The very next day I opted to take the day off of work to spend time with her. We went out to a nice lunch and then went shopping at a big, big unnamed department store. I walked around with her while she tried on several different very expensive outfits. She couldn't decide which one to take, so I told her we'd just buy them all. She wanted new shoes to compliment her new clothes, so I said, 'Lets get a pair for each outfit.' 

We went on to the jewelry department where she picked out a pair of diamond earrings. Let me tell you... she was so excited. She must have thought I was one wave short of a shipwreck. I started to think she was testing me because she asked for a tennis bracelet when she doesn't even know how to play tennis. 

I think I threw her for a loop when I said, 'That's fine, honey.' She was almost nearing sexual satisfaction from all of the excitement. Smiling with excited anticipation, she finally said, 'I think this is all dear, let's go to the cashier.' 

I could hardly contain myself when I blurted out, 'No honey, I don't feel like it.'

Her face just went completely blank as her jaw dropped with a baffled, 'WHAT?' 

I then said, 'Honey! I just want you to HOLD this stuff for a while. You're just not in touch with my financial needs as a man enough for me to satisfy your shopping needs as a woman.' 

And just when she had this look like she was going to kill me, I added, 'Why can't you just love me for who I am and not for the things I buy you?' 

Apparently I'm not having sex tonight.
***
The alien vessel landed quietly on St Peter's square in Rome...
A hatch opened and two little grey men with dazzling smiles appeared. They were promptly granted an audience with the Pope.

After a brief discussion about the weather, the Pope said, "I know this question may sound odd to you, but I was wondering if you and your kind knew about Jesus Christ?"

"Jesus Christ?!" exclaimed the slightly taller of two aliens. "Of course we do! He visits our planet every two years or so. Awesome fellow!"

A hush descended on the audience chamber, and everyone watched the Pope, whose face had turned a rather odd purple.

"Every two years?" he shouted. "We're still waiting for his second coming!"

"Maybe he didn't like your chocolate?" suggested the alien.

"Chocolate?" replied the Pope. "What in heaven's name does chocolate have to do with it?"

"Well," said the alien. "When he came to our planet, we gave him chocolate. Why, what did you do?"
***
The local United Way office never got a donation from the town's most successful lawyer.
The local United Way office realized it had never received a donation from the town's most successful lawyer.

   A fundraiser called him up and said, "Sir, our research shows that you have an income of over $600,000, but you don't give a penny to charity. Wouldn't you like to give back to your community?"

   The lawyer replied, "Did your research show that my mother is dying form a long illness and her medical bills are several times her income?"

   The volunteer said, "No sir, I apologize, we didn't realize..."

   The lawyer continued: "And that my brother, a disabled veteran, is blind and confined to a wheelchair?"

   The caller was about to apologize further, but the lawyer continued: "And my sister's husband was killed in a car accident, leaving her penniless, with three children!?"

   The United Way rep was aghast and just said, "I'm so sorry."

   The lawyer continued: "And I don't give any money to them. So why should I give any to you?"
***
There was a man in Bulgaria who drove a train for a living
There was a man in Bulgaria who drove a train for a living.

He loved his job, driving a train had been his dream ever since he was a child.

He loved to make the train go as fast as possible.

Unfortunately, one day he was a little too reckless and caused a crash.

He made it out, but a single person died.

Well, needless to say, he went to court over this incident.

He was found guilty, and was sentenced to death by electrocution.

When the day of the execution came, he requested a single banana as his last meal.

After eating the banana, he was strapped into the electric chair.

The switch was flown, sparks flew and smoke filled the air- but nothing happened.

The man was perfectly fine.

Well, at the time, there was an old Bulgarian law that said a failed execution was a sign of divine intervention, so the man was allowed to go free.

And somehow, he managed to get his old job back driving the train.

Having not learned his lesson at all, he went right back to driving the train with reckless abandon.

Once again, he caused a train to crash, this time killing two people.

The trial went much the same as the first, resulting in a sentence of execution.

For his final meal, the man requested two bananas.

After eating the bananas, he was strapped into the electric chair.

The switch was thrown, sparks flew, smoke filled the room- and the man was once again unharmed.

Well, this of course meant that he was free to go.

And once again, he somehow manages to get his old job back.

To what should have been the surprise of no one, he crashed yet another train and killed three people.

And so he once again found himself being sentenced to death.

On the day of his execution, he requested his final meal- three bananas.

"You know what? No," said the executioner. "I've had it with you and your stupid bananas and walking out of here unharmed. I'm not giving you a thing to eat, we're strapping you in and doing this now."

Well, it was against protocol, but the man was strapped in to the electric chair without a last meal.

The switch was pulled, sparks flew, smoke filled the room- and the man was still unharmed.

The executioner was speechless.

The man looked at the executioner and said "Oh, the bananas had nothing to do with it. I'm just a bad conductor."
***
An Armless Man on the Beach
Three women see a man lying on the shore of a beach and decide to approach him. The man has no arms or legs. Feeling sorry for the poor man, the British woman of the bunch goes over to him. 
"Have you ever been hugged?" The British woman asks. 
"No." The man replies, sadly. So the British woman goes down to him and hugs him. The man smiles. Next, the Welsh woman goes over to him and asks, "Have you ever been kissed?". 
"No" the man replies. So the Welsh woman bends over and kisses the poor man on his lips. Lastly, the Scottish woman goes over to the man. At this point the man is very excited, and can only imagine what this last woman will do to him. 
"Have you ever been fucked?" The Scottish woman asks. 
"No!" The man says, excitedly.  
"Well you will be when the tide comes in!"
***
Blonde Joke
An old blind cowboy wanders into an all-girl biker bar by mistake...

He finds his way to a bar stool and orders a shot of Jack Daniels.

After sitting there for a while, he yells to the bartender, 'Hey, you wanna hear a blonde joke?'

The bar immediately falls absolutely silent.

In a very deep, husky voice, the woman next to him says, 'Before you tell that joke, Cowboy, I think it is only fair, given that you are blind, that you should know five things:

1. The bartender is a blonde girl with a baseball bat.
2. The bouncer is a blonde girl with a 'Billy-Club'.
3. I'm a 6-foot tall, 175-pound blonde woman with a black belt in karate.
4. The woman sitting next to me is blonde and a professional weight lifter.
5. The lady to your right is blonde and a professional wrestler.

'Now, think about it seriously, Cowboy.... Do you still wanna tell that blonde joke?'

The blind cowboy thinks for a second, shakes his head and mutters, 'No...not if I'm gonna have to explain it five times............'
***
So, Jesus and Satan are sitting on a park bench one day
...just chilling, and Satan asks, "Hey JC, what's it called when little chunks of ice fall from the sky? It's not like I get to see it very often."

Jesus says, "Hail, Satan."

And Satan's all like, "YEEEEEAH, BOI!"

And Jesus is all like, "Oh, you."
***
So a man sits down at a bar that has a huge jar full of cash on it...
The man calls the bartender and says "Hey, what's the jar for?" The bartender tells the man that the bar has a challenge where if a customer can complete 3 tasks they will take home all the money in the jar, but if they lose, they have to empty their wallet into it. The man sizes up the jar and asks the bartender what the tasks were. 

The bartender said " First, you must drink an entire gallon of tequila in less than 5 minutes."

"Second, you must go out into the alley behind the bar where I keep my pet alligator. He has a sore tooth, and you have to pull it out."

"Third, their is a woman in the apartment above the bar who is 83 years old and has never had an orgasm in her life. You would have to give her one."

The man thought for a moment, and with a little liquid confidence told the bartender he would like to try. The man grabbed the tequila and chugged the whole thing in under a minute. After that he hopped up from his stool and stumbled out into the alley, when the rest of the patrons heard the most godawful noise they had ever heard in their life.

After about 10 minutes of noise the man stumbles back in, bloody and bruised, and slurringly says "Okay! So where's the old woman with the sore tooth."
***
TOP ROOSTER
A farmer goes out one day and buys a brand new stud rooster for his chicken coop. The rooster struts over to the old rooster and says, "OK, old fart, time to retire!"

The old rooster replies, "Come on, you can't handle ALL these chickens. Look what it's done to me. Can't you just let me have the two old hens over in the corner?"

The young rooster says, "Beat it! You're washed up and I'm taking over."

The old rooster says "I'll tell you what, young stud, I'll race you around the farmhouse. Whoever wins gets exclusive domain over the entire chicken coop."

The young rooster laughs, "You know you don't stand a chance old man, so just to be fair, I'll give you a head start."

The old rooster takes off running. About 15 seconds later the young rooster takes off after him. They round the front of the farmhouse and the young rooster has closed the gap. He's already about 5 inches behind the old rooster and gaining fast.

The farmer, meanwhile, is sitting on the front porch when he sees the roosters running by, one right behind the other. He grabs his shotgun and BOOM! -- he blows the young rooster to bits.

The farmer sadly shakes his head, "Damn...third gay rooster I've bought this month!"
***
A man escapes from a prison where he’s been locked up for 15 years.

He breaks into a house and inside, he finds a young couple in bed.
He ties him to a chair. While tying the wife to the bed, the convict gets on top of her, kisses her neck, then gets up and goes into the bathroom.


While he’s in there, the husband whispers over to his wife,
“Listen, this guy is an escaped convict. Look at his clothes! He’s probably spent a lot of time in jail and hasn’t seen a woman in years.I saw how he kissed your neck. If he wants sex, don’t resist, don’t complain. Do whatever he tells you. Satisfy him no matter how much he nauseates you. This guy is obviously very dangerous. If he gets angry, he’ll kill us both. Be strong, honey. I love you!”


She responds: “He wasn’t kissing my neck. He was whispering in my ear. He told me that he’s gay, thinks you’re cute, and asked if we had any Vaseline. I told him it was in the bathroom. Be strong honey. I love you, too.”

***
A man, a sheep and a dog were stranded in an island..
A man, a sheep and a dog were survivors of a terrible shipwreck. They found themselves stranded on an island.
After being there a while, they got into the habit of going to the beach every evening to watch the sun go down. One particular evening, the sky was red with beautiful cirrus clouds, the breeze warm and gentle-a perfect night for romance.

As they sat there, the sheep started looking better and better to the man. Soon, he leaned over to the sheep and put his arm around it. But the dog got jealous, growling fiercely until the man took his arm from around the sheep. After that, the three of them continued to enjoy the sunsets together, but there was no more cuddling.
A few weeks passed by and lo and behold, there was another shipwreck. 

The only survivor was a beautiful young woman, the most beautiful woman the man had ever seen. She was badly injured when they rescued her, and they slowly nursed her back to health. When the young maiden was well enough, they introduced her to their evening beach ritual. It was another beautiful evening: red sky, cirrus clouds, a warm and gentle breeze-perfect for a night of romance.


Pretty soon the man started to get "those feelings" again. He fought them as long as he could, but he finally gave in, leaned over to the young woman and cautiously whispered in her ear, " Would you mind taking the dog for a walk? "
***
A teacher gave her fifth grade class an assignment
Get their parents to tell them a story with a moral at the end of it. The next day the kids came back and one by one began to tell their stories.

"Johnny, do you have a story to share?"

"Yes, ma'am, my daddy told a story about my Uncle Bob. Uncle Bob was a pilot in Desert Storm and his plane was hit. He had to bail out over enemy territory and all he had was a small flask of whiskey, a pistol and a survival knife. He drank the whiskey on the way down so it would not break and then his parachute landed right in the middle of twenty enemy troops.

He shot fifteen of them with the gun until he ran out of bullets, killed four more with the knife, 'till the blade broke and then he killed the last Iraqi with his bare hands."

"Good heavens," said the horrified teacher, "What kind of moral did your daddy tell you from that horrible story?

"Stay the hell away from Uncle Bob when he's been drinking! 
***
An old man walks into a bar...
...and orders a beer. The bartender notices the guy's head is the size of a tennis ball.

"I have to ask, sir," says the bartender. "Without sounding rude, what happened to your head?"

The old guy sighs and tells him, "My ship was torpedoed by the Germans in WWII. A mermaid rescued me and promised to grant me three wishes. For my first wish, I asked to return to the States. My second wish was to have all the money I would ever need. Finally, my third wish was to have sex with the mermaid."

"That doesn't sound too bad," says the bartender. "Then what happened?"

"Well," sighs the man, "mermaids can't have sex, so I asked her if I could just have a little head... ."


 
***
An Englishman, an Scotchman, and an Irishman walk into a bar...
They each order a beer.  The barkeep brings them each a beer, and there happens to be a fly in each one.  The Englishmen, a bit put off, says "Sir there's a fly in my beer, I'll need a fresh one please."  The Scotchman, undeterred shrugs and says "I won't be letting a fly ruin me enjoying my beer!" and he chugs his.  The Irishman is enraged and grabs the fly by the wings and yells "SPIT IT OUT YE BASTARD!"
***
A pregnant woman goes into a coma
A pregnant woman goes into a coma moments after she gives birth to twins, one boy and one girl. 
When she finally wakes up several days later, she cries out frantically to see her children. 
The doctors come to her, and the first thing she asks is "How are my children?" 
"Fine" says the doctor, "your brother named them". 
She thinks to herself, "Oh no!" "My brother's an idiot" and she asks the doctor "What did he name them?" 
The doctor says "He named the girl Denise" 
And she thinks, “Well, maybe I misjudged my brother... Denise isn't such a bad name"
What did he name the boy?" 
Replies the doctor "De nephew."

***
A $50 Lesson
A $50 Lesson

I recently asked my friend's little girl what she wanted to be when she grows up.  She said she wanted to be President some day.  Both of her parents, liberal Democrats, were standing there, so I asked her, 'If you were President, what would be the first thing you would do?'  

She replied, 'I'd give food and houses to all the homeless people.'  
   
Her parents beamed with pride.

'Wow...what a worthy goal.' I told her.  'But you don't have to wait until you're President to do that. You can come over to my house and mow the lawn, pull weeds, and sweep my yard, and I'll pay you $50. Then I'll take you over to the grocery store where the homeless guy hangs out, and you can give him the $50 to use toward food and a new house.'  

She thought that over for a few seconds, then she looked  me straight in the eye and asked, ' Why doesn't the homeless guy come over and do the work, and you can just pay him the $50?'  

I said, 'Welcome to the Republican Party.'  

Her parents still aren't speaking to me. 



***
Retirement bonus
The Navy found they had too many officers and decided to offer an early retirement bonus. They promised any officer who volunteered for Retirement a bonus of $1,000 for every inch measured in a straight line between any two points of his body.  The officer got to choose what those two points would be.


The first officer who accepted asked that he be measured from the top of his head to the tip of his toes.  He was measured at six feet and walked out with a bonus of $72,000.


The second officer who accepted was a little smarter and asked to be measured from the tip of his outstretched hands to his toes.
He walked out with $96,000.


The third one was a non-commissioned officer, a grizzly old Chief who, when asked where he would like to be measured replied,'From the tip of my weenie to my testicles.'  It was suggested by the pension man that he might want to reconsider, explaining about the nice big checks the previous two Officers had received.  But the old Chief insisted and they decided to 
go along with him providing the measurement was taken by a Medical Officer.


The Medical Officer arrived and instructed the Chief to 'drop em,' which he did.  The medical officer placed the tape measure on the tip of the Chief's weenie and began to work back.  


"Dear Lord!", he suddenly exclaimed, ''Where are your testicles?'' 
The old Chief calmly replied, ''Vietnam''.
***
A nun sits outside a pub in Ireland...
A man walks up to the pub and is about to go into it when the nun starts shouting. "BEFORE YOU ENTER THIS DEN OF SIN, THINK OF YOUR MOTHER AND YOUR FATHER!" 

He said back to the nun. "They're dead, they're dead and in heaven" 

The nun went for a different tack and said. "Think then! Think of the damage the alcohol will do to your brain!" 

"What? Whatever are ye talking about? Have you ever had a drink?"

And the nun said no. 

"Well how the hell can you stand there and talk about the damage the alcohol is gonna do to your brain if ye never had it? I tell ye what, I'll go in there, buy ye a drink, take it out here, you can try it and if you don't like THEN ye can talk about it. But don't talk about things ye've never experienced. What will ye have?"

And the nun says. "I don't know, what do ladies drink?"

"Gin" 

and she says "Alright I'll have a gin. But get it in a cup so nobody will notice." 

The fella goes into the bar and says to the barman "Get us a pint of beer and a double gin in a cup." 

The barman replies "Ah fer christ's sake is that bloody nun out there again?" 


***
A man has been drinking alone all day at a bar...
And checks his clock.

"1:30am, fuck. I need to go home now or my wife's going to ripp my balls off" - Thinks to himself.

But as he's trying to get up, he falls awkwardly to the floor.

"I'm just way too drunk right now, I need to sober up"

So he asks the barman for a coffe, he drinks it up and 30 minutes later he tries to stand up, but again, falling to the floor, this time, even harder.

At this point he realizes he needs to get home no matter what, so he starts crawling towards his house. After 40 minutes he gets there, lays down next to his (asleep) wife and passes out.

The next morning his wife wakes him up and starts shouting at him:

-So... how was last night, huh? Was it fun drinking all day?

The man is 100% sure his wife was asleep when he got home so he tries to play it cool:

-Not really, just hanging with some coworkers... we didn't drink much... just a couple of beers.

The woman starts nodding sarcastically and responds:

-The bar owner called this morning, your wheelchair's there, you dumbfuck.
***
The aftermath of an Italian affair . . .
For several years, a man was having an affair with an Italian woman. One night, she confided in him that she was pregnant.


Not wanting to ruin his reputation or his marriage, he promised that he would pay her a large sum of money if she would go to Italy to secretly have the child. Furthermore, if she stayed in Italy to raise the child, he would also provide child support until the child turned 18.


She agreed, but she asked how he would know when the baby was born. To keep it discreet, he advised her to simply mail him a post card, and write 'Spaghetti' on the back. He would then arrange for the child support payments to begin.


One day, about nine months later, he came home to his confused wife. Honey, she said, "You received a very strange postcard today."


"Oh, just give it to me and I'll explain it later," he replied. The wife obeyed, and watched her husband as he read the card. He turned white and fainted.


On the card was written:


“Spaghetti, Spaghetti, Spaghetti, Spaghetti, Spaghetti. Three with meatballs. Two without.”
***
SAN FRANCISCO MAN BECOMES FIRST AMERICAN TO GRASP SIGNIFICANCE OF SARCASM
Chuck Fullmer, 38, yesterday became the first American to get to grips with the concept of sarcasm.
"It was weird" Fullmer said. "I was in London and like, talking to this guy and it was raining and he pulled a face and said, "Great weather eh?" and I thought - "Wait a minute, no way is it great weather".
Fullmer then realised that the other man's 'mistake' was in fact deliberate. Fullmer, who is 39 next month and married with two children, aged 8 and 3, plans to use sarcasm himself in future. "I'm, like, using it all the time" he said. "Last weekend I was grilling steaks and I burned them and I said "Hey, great weather."
***
A young woman in New York...
... was so depressed that she decided to end her life by throwing herself into the ocean. She went down to the docks and was about to leap into the frigid water when a handsome young sailor saw her tottering on the edge of the pier, crying. He took pity on her and said, "Look, you have so much to live for. I'm off to Europe in the morning, and if you like, I can stow you away on my ship. I'll take good care of you and bring you food every day." Moving closer, he slipped his arm around her shoulder and added, "I'll keep you happy, and you'll keep me happy." 

The girl nodded yes. After all, what did she have to lose? Perhaps a fresh start in Europe would give her life new meaning.
 
That night, the sailor brought her aboard and hid her in a lifeboat. From then on, every night he brought her three sandwiches and a piece of fruit, and they made passionate love until dawn. Three weeks later, during a routine inspection, she was discovered by the captain.
 
"What are you doing here?" the captain asked. 

"I have an arrangement with one of the sailors," she explained. "I get food and a trip to Europe, and he's screwing me."
 
"He certainly is," the captain said. "This is the Staten Island Ferry."

***
Why aren't you married?
Thomas is 32 years old and he is still single. One day a friend asked, "Why aren't you married? Can't you find a woman who will be a good wife?" Thomas replied, "Actually, I've found many women I wanted to marry, but when I bring them home to meet my parents, my mother doesn't like them." His friend thinks for a moment and says, "I've got the perfect solution, just find a girl who's just like your mother." A few months later they meet again and his friend says, "Did you find the perfect girl? Did your mother like her?" With a frown on his face, Thomas answers, "Yes, I found the perfect girl. She was just like my mother. You were right, my mother liked her very much." The friend said, "Then what's the problem?" Thomas replied, "My father doesn't like her."
***
A guy comes home drunk
A guy comes home completely drunk one night.

He lurches through the door and is met by his scowling wife,
who is most definitely not happy.


“Where the hell have you been all night?” she
demands.

“At this new bar,” he says. “The Golden
Saloon. Everything there is golden. It’s got huge golden
doors, a golden floor and even the urinal’s gold!”


The wife still doesn’t believe his story, and the next
day checks the phone book, finding a place across town
called the Golden Saloon. She calls up the place to check
her husband’s story.

“Is this the Golden Saloon?” she asks when the
bartender answers the phone.


“Yes it is,” bartender answers.

“Do you have huge golden doors?”

“Sure do.” “Do you have golden floors?”

“Most certainly do.”

“What about golden urinals?”


There’s a long pause, then the woman hears the bartender
yelling, “Hey, Duke, I think I got a lead on the guy
that pissed in your saxophone last night!”
***
More Golf Jokes...
On the 16th hole of the golf course, Fred had hit his ball into the woods. Harry, his partner had laughed and poked fun, but then somehow managed to hit his ball into the woods, just a few yards beyond. Fred looked for a long time, getting angrier every minute. Finally, in a patch of pretty yellow buttercups, he found his ball. Instead of just continuing the game, he took his club and thrashed every single buttercup in that patch.

Suddenly, in a flash and puff of smoke, a little old woman appeared. She said, "I'm Mother Nature! Do you know how long it took me to make those buttercups? Just for that, you won't have any butter for your popcorn the rest of your life.....better still; you won't have any butter for your toast for the rest of your life.....as a matter of fact, you won't have any butter for anything the rest of your life!"

Then POOF!...she was gone.

After Fred got a hold of himself, he hollered for his friend, "Harry!... Harry!... where are you?"

Harry yells, "I'm over here, in the pussy willows."

Fred screams back: "DON'T SWING!!! FOR GOD'S SAKE!!! DON'T SWING!!!"
***
Ex-Wife
Tom finally decided to tie the knot with his longtime girlfriend. One evening, after the honeymoon, he was cleaning one of his hot rods for an upcoming show. 

His wife was standing there at the bench watching him. After a long period of silence she finally speaks. "Honey, I've just been thinking, now that we are married maybe it's time you quit spending all your time out here in the garage and you probably should just consider selling all your cars.

Tom gets this horrified look on his face. She says, "Darling, what's wrong?" 

"There for a minute you were starting to sound like my ex-wife." 

"Ex-wife!”, she screams, "YOU NEVER TOLD ME  YOU WERE MARRIED BEFORE!!!!!!!"

Tom's reply: "I wasn't".  

***
2 Irishmen, 2 Scotsmen, and 2 Englishmen
There were 2 Irishmen, 2 Scotsmen, and 2 Englishmen stuck on a deserted island. In one year, the two Irishmen made a still and was brewing beer, the two Scotsmen built a pub and were selling it. The two Englishmen still weren't talking to each other because they weren't properly introduced.
***
Stuttering Cat
A teacher is explaining biology to her 4th grade students. "Human beings are the only animals that stutter", she says.

A little girl raises her hand "I had a kitty-cat who stuttered", she volunteered.

The teacher, knowing how precious some of these stories could become, asked the girl to describe the incident.

"Well", she began, "I was in the back yard with my kitty and the Rottweiler that lives next door got a running start and before we knew it, he jumped over the fence into our yard!"

"That must've been scary", said the teacher.

"It sure was", said the little girl. "My kitty raised his back, went 'Fffff, Fffff, Fffff'....

And before he could say ‘fuck', the Rottweiler ate him!"
***
A girl tells her parents she's pregnant
A girl tells her parents she's pregnant. The Mom goes ape shit and says "you call that bastard over here right now!". 

Later that evening a distinguished gentleman in his 40's arrives in a Lamborghini. He gets out of the car and approaches the girl's parents who are understandably furious.

Distinguished Gentleman: "Hi folks, your daughter has informed me of the news and I just want to tell you that although I cannot marry your daughter or remain in the child's life due to my current career situation I can promise you the child will be taken care of financially. If it's a girl, I will leave her a bank account with $200,000 in it and the ownership of several hair salons. If it's a boy i will leave him a bank account with $300,000 in it and ownership of a shopping plaza. If it's twins I will leave a joint bank account of $500,000 and ownership of multiple real estate apartments. However, if it's a miscarriage"-

-At that point the Father steps in and says "You'll fuck her again"
***
Fifteen Bucks
A successful businessman flew to Vegas for the weekend to gamble. He lost the shirt off his back, and had nothing left but a quarter and the second half of his round trip ticket. All he needed to do was somehow get to the airport, and then he'd be home-free. 

So he went out to the front of the casino where there was a cab waiting. He got in and explained his situation to the cabbie. He promised to send the driver money from home. He offered him his credit card numbers, his drivers license number, his address, etc... 

The cabbie said, ''If you don't have fifteen dollars, get the hell out of my cab!'' 

So the businessman was forced to hitchhike to the airport and was barely in time to catch his flight. 

One year later the businessman, having worked long and hard to regain his financial success, returned to Vegas and this time he won big. Feeling pretty good about himself, he went out to the front of the casino to get a cab ride back to the airport. Well who should he see out there, at the end of a long line of cabs, but his old buddy who had refused to give him a ride when he was down on his luck. 

The businessman thought for a moment about how he could make the guy pay for his lack of charity, and he hit on a plan. 

The businessman got in the first cab in the line, ''How much for a ride to the airport,'' he asked?

 ''Fifteen bucks,'' came the reply.

 ''And how much for you to give me a blowjob on the way?''

 ''What?! Get the hell out of my cab.'' 

The businessman got into the back of each cab in the long line and asked the same questions, with the same result.

When he got to his old friend at the back of the line, he got in and asked, ''How much for a ride to the airport?'' 
The cabbie replied, ''Fifteen bucks.'' 

The businessman said, ''OK,'' and off they went. 

Then, as they drove slowly past the long line of cabs, the businessman gave a big smile and thumbs up sign to each of the other drivers. 
***
Poison Ivy and Harley Quinn decide to go rob a bank.
"Now, remember the plan," Ivy tells Harley.

"Yeah, yeah, no problem!" She says, and walks into the bank. Ivy waits in the getaway car. 
Time passes. Five minutes...ten...Ivy starts getting worried...fifteen... 
Suddenly Harley comes rushing out of the bank, dragging a safe behind her all tied up in rope. Behing her, the guard comes running out with his pants down.

Ivy groans. "Harley, you idiot! I said to tie up the guard and blow the safe!
***
Devil in the church
Satan appeared before a small town congregation. Everyone started screaming and running for the front church door, trampling each other in a frantic effort to get away.
Soon everyone was gone except for an elderly gentleman who sat calmly.
Satan walked up to him and said, "Don't you know who I am?"
The man replied, "Yep, sure do."
Satan asked, "Aren't you going to run?"
"Nope, sure ain't," said the man.
Satan asked, "Why aren't you afraid of me?"
The man replied, "Been married to your sister for over 48 years."
***
I man had a girlfriend named Wendy...
...he decided to get a tattoo of her name on his penis. When erect, it read "Wendy", and when flaccid, all you saw was "W" and "Y". 

Out for dinner one day, he excused himself to the bathroom and went to the urinal, next to him was a Jamaican man. The man took a gander at the Jamaican's member and realized it had "W" and "Y" tattoo'd on it as well.

He looked at him and said: "So you're girlfriend's name is also Wendy?"

The Jamaican replied: "Nah man, it says: Welcome to Jamaica, have a nice day.
***
A teacher asks her class
to use the word "contagious". Roland, the teacher's pet, gets up and says, "Last year I got the measles and my mum said it was contagious."

"Well done, Roland," says the teacher.

"Can anyone else try?"

Katie, a sweet little girl with pigtails, says, "My grandma says there's a bug going round, and it's contagious." 

"Well done, Katie," says the teacher. "Anyone else?"

Little Irish Sean jumps up and says in a broad Dublin accent, "Our next door neighbour is painting his house with a two inch brush, and my dad says it will take the contagious."
***
My daughter caught my wife cheating on me..
"Hello?"

"Hi, honey. This is Daddy. Is Mommy near the phone?"

"No, Daddy. She's upstairs in the bedroom with Uncle Paul."

After a brief pause, Daddy says, "but honey, you don't have an Uncle Paul." 

"Oh yes I do, and he's upstairs in the bedroom with mommy right now." 

Brief pause. "Uh, okay then, this is what I want you to do. I want you to put the phone down, run upstairs and knock on the door and shout to Mommy that Daddy's car just pulled up." 

"Okay, Daddy just a minute." 

A few minutes later, the little girl comes back to the phone. 

"I did it, Daddy." 

"And what happened honey?" 

"Well, mommy got scared, jumped out of bed naked and ran around screaming. Then she tripped on the rug, hit her head on the dresser and now she isn't moving at all."

"Oh my God!! What about your Uncle Paul?" 

"He jumped out of the back window into the pool. But I guess he didn't know you took out the water last week to clean it. He hit the bottom of the pool and I think he's dead! 

**Real long pause** 

Then daddy says, "Swimming pool? Is this 486-5732?" 

***
So God creates Adam...
...and soon after he notices that Adam is lonely. 

God says "Do not fear, my child. For I will create a partner to accompany you and man from this time forth. She will be known, as a woman."

God continues "She will be obedient, loyal, passionate and nurturing."

Adam hesitates..

"What is this gonna cost me?" Adam asks.

God responds "An arm and a leg."

Adam retorts "What can I get for a rib?"


***
A Burglar...
A burglar breaks into a house when he hears "Jesus knows you are here." He shuts his flashlight off and looks around. When he finds nothing he proceeds to unhook the TV when he hears "Jesus can see you" He looks around the room with his flashlight to find a parrot in its cage. 
Burglar: So that was all you?     Parrot: Yep  
Burglar: So whats your name?   Parrot: Moses  
Burglar: Who in the hell names their parrot Moses?   Moses: The same kind of people who name their Rottweiler Jesus.

EDIT: Fixed formatting
***
Elderly couple
An elderly couple were at home watching TV. 
Phil had the remote and was switching back and forth between a fishing channel and the porn channel.

Sally became more and more annoyed and finally said, "For God's sake, Phil... leave it on the porn channel... you know how to fish!" 
***
I had a problem with my computer yesterday...
So I called Eric, the 11 year old next door, whose bedroom looks like Mission Control and asked him to come over.

Eric clicked a couple of buttons and solved the problem.

As he was walking away, I called after him, 'So, what was wrong ?
He replied, 'It was an ID ten T error.'

 I didn't want to appear stupid, but nonetheless inquired,


'An, ID ten T error ? What's that? In case I need to fix it again.'


Eric grinned .... 'Haven't you ever heard of an ID ten T error before ?


'No,' I replied.


'Write it down,' he said, 'and I think you'll figure it out.'
So I wrote down:


ID10T


I used to like Eric, the little bastard.
***
Three women share a birthday and celebrate it together
For their 40th birthday they go to the Lakeview restaurant because the waiters are cute and wear tight pants.

For their 50th birthday they go to the Lakeview restaurant because the prices are reasonable and it has a good wine list.

For their 60th birthday they go to the Lakeview restaurant because its quiet and has a nice view.

For their 70th birthday they go to the Lakeview restaurant because its wheelchair accessible.

For their 80th birthday they go to the Lakeview restaurant because they've never been there before.
***
Daddy, I fell in love & want to date this awesome girl!
Son:"Daddy, I fell in love & want to date this awesome girl!"
Father: "That's great son. Who is she?"
Son: "It's Sandra, the neighbor's daughter"
father: "Ohhh I wish you hadn't said that. I have to tell u something son, but you must promise not to tell your mother. Sandra is actually your sister. "The boy is naturally bummed out, but a couple of months later ...
Son: "Daddy, I fell in love again n she is even hotter!"
Father: "That's great son. Who is she?"
Son: "It's Angela, the other neighbor's daughter."
Father: "Ohhhh I wish you hadn't said that.Angela is also your sister." This went on couple of times and the son was so mad, he went straight to his mother crying.
Son:"Mum I am so mad at dad! I fell in love with six girls but I can't date any of them because dad is their father!"
The mother hugs him affectionately and says: "My love, you can date whoever you want. Dont listen to him He isn't your father."
***
A Couple is Walking in East Berlin on Christmas Eve...
A couple is walking in East Berlin on Christmas Eve. They feel a slight precipitation.

"I think it's raining," says the man.

"No, it's snowing," replies the woman.

"How about we ask this Communist officer here? He is always right!" exclaims the main. "Officer Rudolph, is it raining or snowing?

"Definitely raining," Officer Rudolph replies before walking off.

The man turns to his wife with a smile. "See? Rudolph the Red knows rain, dear."

EDIT: Wow thank you everyone! My first post that got more THEN 1 UPVOTE! :D
***
Why can't I date?
I kid wen't to his father and asked,  
"Daddy, I fell in love and wan't to date this nice girl" 
 
Father: "That's great son. Who is it?"  

Son: "It's Sandra, the neighbor's daughter."
  
Father: "Oh, I wish you hadn't said that. I have to tell you something son, but you must promise me not to tell your mom Sandra is actually your sister."  

The boy is naturally bummed out, but life goes on, a couple of months later ...  

Son: "Daddy, I fell in love again and she is even hotter!"  

Father: "That's great son. Who is it?"  

Son: "It's Angela, The other neighbor's daughter."   

Father: "Oh, I wish you hadn't said that. Angela is also your" sister.

This went on couple of times and the son was so mad, he went straight to his mother crying.  

"Mom I am so mad at dad! I fell in love with six girls but I can't date any of them because dad is their father!"  

The mother hugs him affectionately and says:
"My love, you can date whomever you want. He isn't your father" 

***
The Origin of Yodelling
Many years ago a man was traveling through the mountains of Switzerland. Nightfall was rapidly approaching and he had nowhere to sleep. He went up to a farmhouse and asked the farmer if he could spend the night.

The farmer told him that he could sleep in the barn. As the story goes, the farmer's daughter asked her father, "Who is that man going into the barn?"

"That fellow traveling through," said the farmer. "Needs a place to stay for the night, so, I told him he could sleep in the barn."

The daughter said, "Perhaps he is hungry."

So she prepared him a plate of food for him and then took it out to the barn About an hour later, the daughter returned. Her clothing disheveled and straw in her hair. Straight up to bed she went. The farmer's wife was very observant. She then suggested that perhaps the man was thirsty. So she fetched a bottle of wine, took it out to the barn. And she too did not return for an hour. Her clothing was askew, her blouse buttoned incorrectly. She also headed straight to bed.

The next morning at sunrise the man in the barn got up and continued on his journey, waving to the farmer as he left. When the daughter awoke and learned that the visitor was gone, she broke into tears.

"How could he leave without even saying goodbye," she cried. "We made such passionate love last night!"

"What?" shouted the father as he angrily ran out of the house looking for the man, who by now was halfway up the mountain.

The farmer screamed up at him, "I'm going to get you! You had sex with my daughter!"

The man looked back down from the mountainside, cupped his hand next to his mouth, and yelled out....
"LAIDTHEOLADEETOO...."
***
A wife takes her husband to a Strip Club
A wife treats her man by taking him to a Strip Club for his birthday...
At The Club, The Doorman Says, "Hey Johnny, How are You?"
The wife asks, "How does he know you?
Johnny says, "Oh dear, I play football with him."
Inside the Bartender Says, "The Usual, Johnny?"
Johnny says to Wife, "Before you say anything, He's on the Darts Team."
Next a stripper Says, "Hi Johnny! Do You Crave the Special Again??"
The wife storms out dragging Johnny with her & jumps into a taxi...
The Taxi driver Says, "Hey Johnny Boy! You picked up an ugly one this time...."
***
Lawyer Joke
The United Way realized that it had never received a donation from the city's most successful lawyer. So a United Way volunteer paid the lawyer a visit in his lavish office. 
 
The volunteer opened the meeting by saying, 'Our research shows that even though your annual income is over two million dollars, you don't give a penny to charity. Wouldn't you like to give something back to your community through the United Way?' 
 
The lawyer thinks for a minute and says, 'First, did your research also show you that my mother is dying after a long, painful illness and she has huge medical bills that are far beyond her ability to pay?' 
 
Embarrassed, the United Way rep mumbles, 'Uh . . . No, I didn't know that.' 
 
'Secondly,' says the lawyer, 'did it show that my brother, a disabled veteran, is blind and confined to a wheelchair and is unable to support his wife and six children?' 
 
The stricken United Way rep begins to stammer an apology, but is cut off again. 
 
'Thirdly, did your research also show you that my sister's husband died in a dreadful car accident, leaving her penniless with a mortgage and three children, one of whom is disabled and another that has learning disabilities requiring an array of private tutors?' 
 
The humiliated United Way rep, completely beaten, says, 'I'm so sorry, I had no idea.' 
 
And the lawyer says, 'So . . . If I didn't give any money to them, what makes you think I'd give any to you.

***
We can't have sex...
This guy went to a bar...long story short, he met this broad and they went back to his place. Before they got undressed to do the horizontal mambo, he said, "Listen, I'm sorry but I don't think we should have sex right away". "Why's that?" she said.

"Well you see, I'm hung like a baby, and I wouldn't want you to laugh and decide you didn't want to have sex with me. Why don't we get to know each other first, and then when we feel we're ready, we'll do it."

So the girl agreed, but only because he was a good-looking dude and pretty nice.

Several dates later, they make it back to his place again, and after some conversation, they decide it's time. She undresses and slides into bed. He undresses, pulls out his dick, and slams it onto the bed with a thunderous noise.

She stares at his gigantic dick, in complete shock and awe.

"B-b-but I thought you said you were hung like a baby?"

"I am," he replied. "8 lbs, 14 and 1/2 inches."
***
Ever since I was a child, I’ve always had a fear of someone under my bed at night
Ever since I was a child, I’ve always had a fear of someone under my bed at night.  So I went to a Psychiatrist and told him I’ve got problems.  Every time I go to bed I think there’s somebody under it.  I’m scared.  I think I’m going crazy. "Just put yourself in my hands for one year," said the psychiatrist. "Come talk to me three times a week and we should be able to get rid of those fears." "How much do you charge?" "Eighty dollars per visit," replied the doctor. "I’ll sleep on it and if needed I will come back to you," I said.  Six months later the Psychiatrist met me on the street. "Why didn’t you come to see me about those fears you were having?" he asked. "Well, Eighty bucks a visit three times a week for a year is an awful lot of money! A bartender cured me for $10. I was so happy to have saved all that money that I went and bought me a new SUV." "Is that so!" With a bit of an attitude he said, "and how, may I ask, did a bartender cure you?" "He told me to cut the legs off the bed – ain’t nobody under there now!"
***
A professor gives his psychology class a pop quiz. . .
One question he asks is, "What part of the human anatomy may expand up to ten times under certain circumstances?" He picks a rather overdressed girl in the front row to answer it. "Miss Callahan!" The indicated girl, who heard the question, stammers with some embarrassment: "Professor, I'd rather not answer that question." The professor says, "That's all right, Miss Callahan, you don't need to answer it. Is there anyone present who can answer it?" He notes an interested face in the back of the classroom. "Mr. Hawkins!" Hawkins says, "Yes, Professor, it is the pupil of the eye that may expand to ten times." The professor says, "That is correct, Mr. Hawkins." Then he turns to Miss Callahan. He says, "Young lady, two things are obvious from your reaction to this question. One, you haven't studied this week's assignment; and Two, I'm afraid marriage is going to be a tremendous disappointment to you."
***
A guy is out drinking at a bar on a week night
A guy is out drinking at a bar on a Wednesday evening. Now his wife is sick and tired of him drinking during the week and has made it very clear he's screwed if she catches him doing it again. But tonight he's good. He told her that he would be working late, and he knows that she goes to bed early and is a heavy sleeper. 


So he enjoys his night, but finally the night comes to an end, and it's time for him to go home. He makes sure to close his tab, checks to ensure he has his id and wallet - he does. Knowing that all of his bases are covered he goes to get up to leave and falls flat on his face. 


He's a little drunk, so not entirely surprised. So he tries to get up and walk with the same results - bam, flat on his face. Now he's lying on the floor thinking, "Shit. I can't call my wife, she will have my ass if she found out I was lying about working so I could go drink tonight."


But he's a determined man. He decides if he can't walk, then damnit, he'll fucking crawl. And crawl he does. He crawls the full mile from the bar to his house. By some miracle, he is able to unlock his door and lock it again once he's inside. And by an even bigger miracle, he's able to crawl his way into his bedroom and into bed without waking his wife. The man goes to bed smugly thinking how goddamn smooth he is.


The next morning, he wakes up with his wife standing over him glaring at him with the fury of a thousand hells.


"So... you went to the bar last night, eh?" The wife angrily asks.


"What are you talking about, I was working?" The man replies. In his mind, he's going back over his night. He is positive he covered all of his bases. There's no way his wife could have known.


"Don't lie to me; I know the truth." The wife snaps back.


"How?" The man asks, generally stumped as to how she could possibly know.


"The bartender called... you left your wheelchair at the bar!"
***
Slip of the Tongue
Joe has a broken leg. Mike comes over and asks, "How you doing', Joe?"

Joe says, "Do me a favor: Run upstairs and get my slippers." 

Mike goes upstairs and sees Joe's gorgeous 19-year-old twin daughters. He says, "your dad sent me up here to have sex with both of you."

One girl replies, "Get out of here. Prove it?"

Mike shouts down stairs -, "Hey, Joe, both of 'em?"

Joe shouts back, "of course, both of 'em!" What's the point of fuckin' one?"
***
A blonde, a brunette, and a redhead rob a bank..
A blonde, a brunette, and a redhead decide to rob a bank. Everything goes well-they have their masks on, the bank hands over the money-awesome.

Exiting the bank, they hear sirens and see several cop cars round the corner, so they dash into a small alleyway.

The cops are quick though, and are just about to reach the entrance. There are three empty potato sacks lying against the wall.

"Quick! Hide!" The brunette says, and the three women each crawl into a bag.

A police man comes down the alleyway, looking around for any signs of the women. The potato sacks stick out to him-so he gives the one with the redhead a kick.

"Meow!" goes the redhead, doing her best imitation of a cat.

"Just an alley cat..." The police officer mumbles, moving onto the next bag and delivering a quick nudge with his foot. 

"Woof!" Goes the brunette, imitating a dog.

"Just a stray..." The officer mumbles again, heading to the last bag, and giving it a light kick.

"POOOOE-TAYYY-TOOOEE" grunts the blonde.

_____

Edited to meet popular demand.

For those who don't get the joke, the redhead and brunette both mimic things that might be in an alleyway-a cat and a stray dog. The blonde however wonders "What would be in a potato sack? Potatoes!" and thus tries to blend in by announcing herself as a potato.

Edit Edit: I'm blond. I can make these jokes.
***
A Rich Woman And Her Butler
A rich couple was going out for the evening. The lady of the house decided to give the butler,
Throckmorton, the night off.

She said they would be home very late and he should just enjoy his evening.

As it turned out, the wife didn't have a good time at the party, so she came home early.
She walked into the house and eyed Throckmorton sitting alone in the dining room.
She called for him to follow her. She led him to the master bedroom. 
She closed and locked the door. She looked at him and smiled.

"Throckmorton. Take off my dress." He did so, carefully.

"Throckmorton. Take off my stockings and garter." He silently obeyed her.

"Throckmorton. Remove my bra and panties." The tension mounted as he complied.

Finally she looked at him and said,
"Throckmorton. If I ever catch you wearing my clothes again, you're fired."
***
Single vs. Engaged vs. Married
Sipping her drink, the single girl leered and said, "Last Friday at the end of the work day I went to my boyfriend's office wearing a leather coat. When all the other people had left, I slipped out of it and all I had on was a leather bodice, black stockings and stiletto heels. He was so aroused that we made passionate love on his desk right then and there!" 


The engaged woman giggled and said, "That's pretty much my story! When my fiancé got home last Friday, he found me waiting for him in a black mask, leather bodice, black hose and stiletto pumps. He was so turned on that we not only had sex all night, he wants to move up our wedding date!" 


The married woman put her glass down and said, "I did a lot of planning. I made arrangements for the kids to stay over at Grandma's. I took a long scented-oil bath and then put on my best perfume. I slipped into a tight leather bodice, a black garter belt, black stockings and six-inch stilettos. I finished it off with a black mask. When my husband got home from work, he grabbed a beer and the remote, sat down and yelled, 'Hey, Batman, what's for dinner? 
***
An old couple gets in the mood.
There was this couple who had been married for 50 years. They were sitting at the breakfast table one morning when the old gentleman said to his wife, "Just think, honey, we've been married for 50 years."

 "Yeah," she replied, "Just think, fifty years ago we were sitting here at this breakfast table together." 

"I know," the old man said, "We were probably sitting here naked as jaybirds fifty years ago." 

"Well," Granny snickered, "What do you say...should we get naked?" Where upon the two stripped to the buff and sat down at the table. 

"You know, honey," the little old lady breathlessly replied, "My nipples are as hot for you today as they were fifty years ago." 

"I wouldn't be surprised," replied Gramps. "One's in your coffee and the other is in your oatmeal."
***
Divorce
An elderly man in Oklahoma calls his son in New York and says,
"I hate to ruin your day son, but I have to tell you that your mother and I are getting a divorce; 45 years of marriage... and that much misery is enough!"
"Dad, what are you talking about?" the son yells.
"We can't stand the sight of each other any longer," the old dad explained. "We're sick of each other, and I'm sick of talking about this, so you call your sister in Hong Kong and tell her!".
Frantic, the son calls his sister, who explodes on the phone.
"Like heck they're getting divorced," she shouts, "I'll take care of this."
She calls her elderly father immediately, and screams at him, "You are not getting divorced. Don't do a single thing until I get there. I'm calling my brother back, and we'll both be there tomorrow. Until then, don't do a thing, you hear me?" she yelled as she hung up the phone.
The old man hangs up his phone and turns to his wife. "Okay", he says, "it's all set. They're both coming for Christmas and paying their own air-fare."
***
A chicken walks into a library...
...and she walks up to the counter and says, "book, booook,  book book." So the librarian thinks briefly and comes back with Animal Farm. The hen wanders off with the book.

Next day the hen is back, it has the book with it, the librarian returns the book and the hen goes, "book, boooook, book, book book." The librarian thinks what the hell and grabs it Of Mice and Men and the hen leaves.

Next day sure enough the hen is back, book in beak, "book book boooook." Atlas Shrugged. "Book, booook." Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas. "Book book."... you get the idea. This goes on for about a week until the librarian gets  curious enough to follow the chicken and find out what's happening.

So the next time the chicken comes in the Librarian books out one of Proust's works to slow it down down and follows the hen trying not to be seen. All the way past the outskirts of town, down over Old Farmer Giles' twisted stile. Through the Sweeping Woods and upto a pond, where the chicken shows the book to a frog, which replies.

"Reddit."
***
A recent article in the Daily Post reported that a man, Dave Harper, sued St Pauls Hospital, saying that after his wife had surgery there, she lost all interest in sex.
A Hospital spokesman replied:
Mrs Harper was admitted for cataract surgery. All we did was correct her eyesight.
***
What body part grows ten times its size when stimulated?
The 6th grade science teacher, Mrs. Parks, asked her class, "Which human body part increases to ten times its size when stimulated?" 

No one answered until little Mary stood up and said, "You should not be asking sixth graders a question like that! I'm going to tell my parents, and they will go and tell the principal, who will then fire you!" 

Mrs. Parks ignored her and asked the question again, "Which body part increases to 10 times its size when stimulated?" 

Little Mary's mouth fell open. Then she said to those around her, "Boy, is she going to get in big trouble!" 

The teacher continued to ignore her and said to the class, "Anybody?" 

Finally, Billy stood up, looked around nervously, and said, "The body part that increases 10 times its size when stimulated is the pupil of the eye." 

Mrs. Parks said, "Very good, Billy," then turned to Mary and continued. "As for you, young lady, I have three things to say: 

One, you have a dirty mind. 
Two, you didn't read your homework 
And three, one day you are going to be very, very disappointed. 
***
Afternoon Sex when you have kids......

Afternoon Sex

 Love what kids come up with...they know so much they are not
  given credit for.

  The only way to pull off a Sunday afternoon "quickie” with
  their 8-year-old son in the apartment was to send him out on
  the balcony with a Popsicle and tell him to report on all
  the neighborhood activities...


  - "There's a car being towed from the parking lot," he
  shouted.
  He began his commentary as his parents put their plan into
  operation:
  - "An ambulance just drove by!"
  - "Looks like the Anderson s have company," he called out.
  - "Matt's riding a new bike!"
  - "Looks like the  Sanders are moving!"
  - "Jason is on his skate board!"

  After a few moments he announced...
  - "The Coopers are having sex."

  Startled, his mother and dad shot up in bed.

  Dad cautiously called  out..."How do you know they're
  having sex?"

   “Jimmy Cooper is standing on his balcony with a
  Popsicle."


***
A man was walking in Central Park in NYC...
Suddenly he sees a little girl being attacked by a pit bull dog . He runs over and starts fighting with the dog. He succeeds in killing the dog and saving the girl's life.

A policeman who was watching the scene walks over and says, "You are a hero, tomorrow you can read it in all the newspapers: "Brave New Yorker saves the life of little girl".

The man says, "But I am not a New Yorker!" 

"Oh ,then it will say in newspapers tomorrow morning: 'Brave American saves life of little girl'"  the policeman replied.

"But I am not even an American!" Says the man.

"Oh, what are you then?" The policeman asks.

 The man replies, "I am a Saudi!"

The next day the newspapers says: "Islamic extremist kills innocent American dog."
***
Two men and a woman are stranded on an island
Two men and a woman are stranded on an island after a plane crash. Resourceful, they waste no time, build a house, find food and water, and globally have it good. After one month, the woman goes to the two men and says:

"Okay guys, let's be frank. I have my needs, you have your needs, let's do it. We'll take turns, one day it's you", she says to the first guy, "and the other day it's the other".

And so they have a whale of time taking turns, enjoying their business together for one whole month. However, unfortunately, the woman dies after that month, because of a rotten banana or whatever. The two men mourn the loss of their playmate and partner for the following week. Then, one man goes to the other and says:

"Okay man, let's be frank. I have my needs, you have your needs, let's do it. We'll take turns, one day it's you, and the other day it's me."

And so they have a good time taking turns, enjoying their business together for one whole month. The first man then goes to the other and says:

"Okay man, I need to talk to you.

\- Yeah, me too actually.

\- We had a fun month, but I think we should stop.

\- Yeah, I felt this way too. I feel what we're doing is not natural.

\- That's right. Let's stop."

So they nod their head in common understanding. The second man then says:

"Well then, shall we bury her?"
***
Attorney in the bathroom...
An attorney arrived home late, after a very tough day trying to get a stay of execution. His last minute plea for clemency to the governor had failed and he was feeling worn out and depressed.

As soon as he walked through the door at home, his wife started on him about, 'What time of night to be getting home is this? Where have you been? Dinner is cold and I'm not reheating it'.  And on and on and on.

Too shattered to play his usual role in this familiar ritual, he poured himself a shot of whiskey and headed off for a long hot soak in the bathtub, pursued by the predictable sarcastic remarks as he dragged himself up the stairs.

While he was in the bath, the phone rang. The wife answered and was told that her husband's client, James Edward Wright, had been granted a stay of execution after all. 

Finally realizing what a terrible day he must have had, she decided to go upstairs and give him the good news.

As she opened the bathroom door, she was greeted by the sight of her husband, bent over naked, drying his legs and feet.

'They're not hanging Wright tonight,' she said.

He whirled around and  screamed, 'FOR THE LOVE OF GOD WOMAN, DON'T YOU EVER STOP?!'

***
A Japanese woman went to the bank to exchange yen to US dollars.
The teller gave her $100. A few weeks later, she gave the teller the same amount of yen, but she was given only $90.

She said, "What wrong? I give yen, you only give 90 dorrah?!"

The teller shrugged and said "Fluctuations?"

The woman said "Fuck you white peopre too."
***
Two old guys decide to go out for drinks before they die.
Before Marty and Sam die they decide to go out for old times sake and just get properly gone showed at the bar. About 8 or 9 pints in Marty gets an idea. "Hey Sam, what do you say we get laid one more time before we clock out." Excited and drunk out of their minds they decide to go to the local whore house down the street. They lady at the counter realizes how drunk they are and decides if she puts them in a couple rooms with a blow up doll they won't know the difference. They get to their rooms go in and about 15 minutes later they come out. Sam looks at Marty and says "man if I didn't know any better I'd say my girl was dead cause she was cold and didn't move once. Marty says "Sam your lucky cause I'm pretty sure mine was a witch. I was nibbling on her neck and she farted and flew out the window."
***
A Sea Story
A young New York woman was so depressed that she decided to end her life by throwing herself into the ocean, but just before she could throw herself from the docks, a handsome young man stopped her.
 
"You have so much to live for," said the man. "I'm a sailor, and we are off to Italy tomorrow. I can stow you away on my ship. I'll take care of you, bring you food every day, and keep you happy."
 
With nothing to lose, combined with the fact that she had always wanted to go to Italy, the woman accepted. That night the sailor brought her aboard and hid her in a small but comfortable compartment in the hold. From then on, every night he would bring her three sandwiches, a bottle of red wine, and make love to her until dawn. Three weeks later she was discovered by the captain during a routine inspection.
 
"What are you doing here?" asked the captain.
 
"I have an arrangement with one of the sailors," she replied. "He brings me food and I get a free trip to Italy ."
 
"I see," the captain says.
 
Her conscience got the best of her and she added, "Plus, he's screwing me."
 
"He certainly is," replied the captain. "This is the Staten Island Ferry."
***
A man shows off his appartment to his friends
After a night of drinking a man shows off his new appartment to his friends. In the bedroom they spot a giant gong. What's that gong for? They ask. That's not a gong he says, that's a talking clock. Yeah right, the friends say, show us how it works then. So the man smashes it as hard as he can and takes a step back. His friends are Just staring when suddenly they hear 'stop with the noice you asshole it's 3.45 in the norning!'
***
Asian keanu
Asian Keanu arrives at a party 

Asian Keanu gets bored

Asian keanu Reeves
***
A small church had a very attractive big-busted organist...
...whose breasts were so large that they bounced and jiggled while she played the organ. Unfortunately it distracted the congregation considerably. The very proper church ladies were appalled. They said something had to be done about this or they would have to get another organist.
 
So one of the ladies approached the organist and told her to mash up some green persimmons and rub them on her nipples and over her breasts, which should cause them to shrink in size. She warned her not to taste any of the green persimmons, because they are so sour they would make her mouth pucker up, and she wouldn't be able to talk properly for a while. The organist reluctantly agreed to try it.
 
The following Sunday morning the minister walked up to the pulpit and said..."Dew to thircumsthanthis bewond my contwol, we will not hab a thermon tewday."
***
Muslim Band
I went to see a Muslim Tribute band last night at a Mosque. 

 They were called "Bomb Jovi" and I thought they were brilliant. 

 They performed songs like: 
 "Losing my Head over You", 
 "Rocket Launcher Man", 
 "You're Six, you're Beautiful, and you're Mine". 

 Their last song "Living on a Prayer Mat" almost brought the house down! 

 Then I heard this Muslim guy saying he had the entire Koran on a DVD. 

 I was interested, so I asked him, "Can you burn me a copy?" 

 Well that was when the trouble started. 


***
A man named Jimmy walks into a bar
He sits down at the bar and notices a couple lines of people standing at the other side of the bar. 

Jimmy asks the bartender "what are those people standing over there for?"

The bartender replies, "oh, the owner has a nice system setup for people who can't pay their tabs. He really enjoys causing others pain, so if you stand in the first line you can get kicked by the owner and he lets you go free. In the second, the owner gets to twist your nipples as hard as he wants, but again, you get to go for free."

Jimmy responds "Wow, what an interesting system. You know what would make it a lot better?"

"What's that?" Asks the bartender

"If there was a punchline"
***
An old man was on his death bed. He wanted badly to take some of his money with him. He called his priest, his doctor and his real estate agent to his bedside. “Here’s $30,000 cash to be held by each of you. I trust you to put this in my coffin when I die so I can take all my money with me."
At the funeral, each man put an envelope in the coffin. Riding away in a limousine, the priest suddenly broke into tears and confessed, “I had only put $20,000 into the envelope because I needed $10,000 for a new baptistery.”

“Well, since we’re confiding in each other,” said the doctor, “I only put $10,000 in the envelope because we needed a new machine at the hospital which cost $20,000."

The real estate agent was aghast "I'm ashamed of both of you, I want it known that when I put my envelope in that coffin, it held my personal check for the full $30,000."
***
At the 3rd grade violin rehearsal ...
... Donnie Corleone Jr. walks in, opens his violin case and unveils, to the shock of all, a tommy gun. The teachers are livid, panic nearly ensues, but Donnie just starts laughing uncontrollably.

"What's wrong with you? This is serious! Why are you laughing?"

"Because I just imagined dad holding up the bank with my violin."
***
A sadist, masochist, murderer, necrophile, zoophile, and pyromanic are sitting together.. (nsfw)
A sadist, a masochist, a murderer, a zoophile, and a pyromanic are all sitting on a bench in a mental institution. 
"Let's have sex with a cat?"  Asked the zoophile.
"Let's have sex with a cat and then torture it" says the sadist.
"Let's have sex with a cat, torture it and then kill it" shouted the murderer.
"Let's have sex with a cat, torture it, kill it and then have sex with it again" said the necrophile.
"Let's have sex with a cat, torture it, kill it, have sex with it again and then burn it" said the pyromanic.
There was silence and then the masochist said: "Meow"
***
10 husbands, still a virgin.
A lawyer married a woman who had previously divorced ten husbands.

On their wedding night, she told her new husband, "Please be gentle, I'm still a virgin."

"What?" said the puzzled groom.

"How can that be if you've been married ten times?"

"Well, Husband #1 was a sales representative: he kept telling me how great it was going to be.

Husband #2 was in software services: he was never really sure how it was supposed to function, but he said he'd look into it and get back to me.

Husband #3 was from field services: he said everything checked out diagnostically but he just couldn't get the system up.

Husband #4 was in telemarketing: even though he knew he had the order, he didn't know when he would be able to deliver.

Husband #5 was an engineer: he understood the basic process but wanted three years to research, implement, and design a new state-of-the-art method.

Husband #6 was from finance and administration: he thought he knew how, but he wasn't sure whether it was his job or not.

Husband #7 was in marketing: although he had a nice product, he was never sure how to position it.

Husband #8 was a psychologist: all he ever did was talk about it.

Husband #9 was a gynecologist: all he did was look at it.

Husband #10 was a stamp collector: all he ever did was... 

God! I miss him! But now that I've married you, I'm really excited!"

"Good," said the new husband, "but, why?"

"You're a lawyer. This time I know I'm gonna get screwed!"
***
Against the Law.
A nice, calm and respectable lady went into the pharmacy, walked up to the pharmacist, looked straight into his eyes,



and said, "I would like to buy some cyanide."



The pharmacist asked, "Why in the world do you need cyanide?"



The lady replied, "I need it to poison my husband."



The pharmacist's eyes got big and he explained, "Lord have mercy! I can't give you cyanide to kill your husband, That's against the law! I'll lose my license! They'll throw both of us in jail! All kinds of bad things will happen. Absolutely not! You CANNOT have any cyanide!"




The lady reached into her purse and pulled out a picture of her husband in bed with the pharmacist's wife.




The pharmacist looked at the picture and replied, "You didn't tell me you had a prescription."


***
People say to me Jesus was not Jewish
## I say ofcourse he was Jewish

+ 30 years old, Single, Living at home with his parents
+ Working in his father's business
+ His mother thought he was God's gift

## He's Jewish. Give it up

****
_by Robin Williams_

Happy Birthday Robin!
***
W E N D Y 
A couple just got married and before their honeymoon to Jamaica the young man decided to get his new gals name tattooed on his junk, forever marking it as belonging to her. Normally only the W and Y are visible, but when he gets excited it spells out W E N D Y. 

While in Jamaica they decided to visit a nude beach, and while at the beach the young guy couldn't help but spot a local with what he thought was the same tattoo. He walks up to the local and asks, "Hey man, do you also have a girlfriend named Wendy? It seems we have matching tattoos!" The Jamaican replies, " Na mon, mine says 'Welcome to Jamaica mon, have a nice day.'" 

Edit: spelling/grammer
***
A successful rancher died and left everything to his devoted wife.
She was determined to keep the ranch, but knew very little about ranching, so she placed an ad in the newspaper for a ranch hand. 

Two cowboys applied for the job. One was gay and the other a drunk.

She thought long and hard about it, and when no one else applied she decided to hire the gay guy, figuring it would be safer to have him around the house than the drunk.

He proved to be a hard worker who put in long hours every day and knew a lot about ranching.

 For weeks, the two of them worked hard and the ranch was doing very well.

Then one day, the rancher's widow said "you have done a really good job, and the ranch looks great. You should go into town and kick up your heels."

The hired hand readily agreed and went into town on Saturday night. He returned around 2:30am, and upon entering the room, he found the rancher's widow sitting by the fireplace with a glass of wine, waiting for him. 

She quietly called him over to her.

"Unbutton my blouse and take it off," she said.

Trembling, he did as she directed.

"Now take off my boots." He did as she asked, ever so slowly.

"Now take off my socks." He removed each gently and placed them neatly by her boots.

"Now take off my skirt." He slowly unbuttoned it, constantly watching her eyes in the fire light.

"Now take off my bra." Again, with trembling hands, he did as he was told and dropped it to the floor.

Then she looked at him and said: "If you ever wear my clothes into town again, you're fired!
***
NSA
In some small town, there was a military base next to a small farm. The NSA got reports that the farm has been listening all the bases communications. So bunch of NSA agents show at the doorstep of the farm. One young agent goes to the farmer and tells him:

"I am from the NSA and we have reports that you are spying on the base, so we are going to look in everything."

The farmer tries to argue , but before he has said one word the agent cuts him off and says: 

"Do you see this badge ? It says NSA , I can do whatever I want..."

"Well fine, but don't go in the last room with the 2 big doors in the end of the corridor" says the farmer.

"Do you see this BADGE ? I can do the fuck I want." So naturally the agent goes straight to the big closed doors in the last room in the end of the corridor.

As soon as he opens the doors a big raging bull storms on his ass.

The farmer looks at the scared shitless agent that tries to run and yells "The badgeeee  the badgee, show him the badge !"


PS. English as a second language... :)
***
A man comes to the United States from India
And he's only here a few months when he becomes very ill. He goes to doctor after doctor, but none of them can help him. Finally, he goes to an Indian doctor.

The doctor says, "Take dis bucket, go into de other room, shit in de bucket, piss on de shit, and then put your head down over de bucket and directly smell and breathe in de fumes for ten minutes."

The man takes the bucket, goes into the other room, shits in the bucket, pisses on the shit, bends over, and, eyes wide open, breathes in the fumes for ten minutes through both his nose and mouth.

Then he comes back to the doctor and says, "It worked! I feel terrific. What was it?"

The doctor replies, "You were homesick."
***
As a guitarist, I sometimes get asked to play for people.
 Recently, I was asked by a funeral director to play at a graveside service for a homeless man at 11am.

He had no family or friends, so the service was to be at a pauper’s cemetery on the far outskirts of town..

As I was not familiar with the remote areas, I got lost.

I finally arrived an hour late and saw the funeral guy had evidently left and the hearse was nowhere in sight.

There were only the diggers and crew left and they were eating lunch.

I felt badly and apologized to the men for being late.

I went to the side of the grave and looked down and the vault lid was already in place.

I didn’t know what else to do. I felt terrible having missed this poor man's service. So I started to play.

The workers put down their lunches and began to gather around.

I played out my heart and soul for this man with no family and friends.

I played like I’ve never played before for this homeless man.

And as I played ‘Amazing Grace,’ the workers began to weep.

They wept, I wept, we all wept together. It was somber, and yet, we were together as one.

When I finished, I packed up my guitar and started for my car.

Though my head hung low, my heart was full.

As I opened the door to my car, I heard one of the workers say,

“I never seen nothin’ like that before and I’ve been putting in septic tanks for twenty years.”

Apparently, I was still lost…
***
The Mormon and the Irishman
A Mormon was seated next to an Irishman on a flight from London. 

After the plane was airborne, drink orders were taken.

The Irishman asked for a whiskey which was promptly brought and placed before him.

The flight attendant then asked the Mormon if he would like a drink.

He replied in disgust, "I'd rather be savagely raped by a dozen whores than let liquor touch my lips." 

The Irishman then handed his drink back to the attendant and said, "Me too. I didn't know we had that choice." 
***
Going to Italy
  A young New York woman was so depressed that she decided to end her life by throwing herself into the ocean, but just before she could throw herself from the docks, a handsome young man stopped her.  "You have so much to live for," said the man. "I'm a sailor, and we are off to Italy tomorrow. I can stow you away on my ship. I'll take care of you, bring you food every day, and keep you happy. 

"With nothing to lose,  combined with the fact that she had always wanted to go to Italy, the  woman accepted. That night the sailor brought her aboard and hid her in a small but comfortable compartment in the hold.  From then on, every night he would bring her three sandwiches, a bottle of red wine, and make love to her until dawn.

Two weeks later she was discovered by the captain during a routine inspection. "What are you doing here?" asked the captain.

"I have an arrangement with one of the sailors," she replied. "He brings me food and I'm getting a free trip to Italy ."

"I see," the captain says.  Her  conscience got the best of her and she added, "Plus, he's screwing me."

"He certainly is," replied the captain. "This is the Staten Island Ferry."
***
Two women talking in an office.
Woman 1: "I had sex last night, did you?"

Woman 2: "Yes."

Woman 1: "Was it good?"

Woman 2: "No, it was a disaster... my husband came home, ate his dinner in three minutes, got on top of me, finished having sex in five minutes, rolled over and fell asleep in two minutes. How was yours?"

Woman 1: "Oh it was amazing! My husband came home and took me out to a romantic dinner. After dinner we walked for an hour. When we came home he lit the candles around the house and we had an hour of foreplay. We then had an hour long session of fantastic sex and afterwards talked for an hour. It was like a fairytale!"

At the same time, their husbands are talking at work.

Husband 1: "You wanted sex last night, how was it?"

Husband 2: "Great. I came home, dinner was on the table, I ate, had sex with my wife and fell asleep. It was great! What about you?"

Husband 1: "It was horrible. I came home, there's no dinner because they cut the electricity because I hadn't paid the bill; so I had to take my wife out to dinner which was so expensive that I didn't have money left for a cab. We had to walk home which took an hour - and when we got home I remembered there was no electricity so I had to light candles all over the house! 

I was so angry that I couldn't get it up for an hour and then I couldn't climax for another hour. After I finally did, I was so aggravated that I couldn't fall asleep and my wife was jabbering away for another hour!"
***
50 shades of golf
Four guys have been going to the same golfing trip to St Andrews for many years. Two days before the group is to leave, Jack's wife puts her foot down and tells him he isn't going and that she's got something else planned. Naturally, Jack's mates are very upset that he can't go, but what can they do.
 
Two days later, the three get to St Andrews only to find Jack sitting at the bar with four drinks set up! "Wow, Jack, how long you been here, and how did you talk your missus into letting you go?" they say with astonishment.
 
"Well, actually, I've been here since last night. You see yesterday evening, I was sitting in my living room chair and my wife came up behind me and put her hands over my eyes and asked, 'Guess who?" I pulled her hands off, and there she was, wearing only a see-through nightie. She took my hand and pulled me into our bedroom. On her bedside table I saw the book '50 Shades of Grey'. She had lit candles and sprinkled rose petals around and on the bed she had handcuffs and ropes! Then she slipped off her nightie, laid on the bed and said, "Okay tie me up, hand-cuff me to the bed, and do whatever you want."
 
 
"So, here I am!"
***
Little Johnny puts a dot on the blackboard (NSFW)
The teacher in her first grade class asks her students to come to the chalkboard and draw something that causes a lot of excitement and commotion. Little Johnny comes up and simply puts a dot on the chalkboard. The teacher asks "what is that?" Little Johnny replies, "it's a period." The teacher says "why does it cause excitement and commotion?" Little Johnny says "it doesn't, but my sister said she missed one this morning and my mom fainted, my dad had a heart attack, and the guy next door shot himself"
***
"Doctor," the embarrassed man said
"I have a sexual problem. I can't get it up for my wife anymore."Mr. Thomas, bring her back with you tomorrow and let me see what I can do."The next day, the worried fellow returned with his wife. "Take off your clothes, Mrs. Thomas," the medic said. "Now turn all the way around. Lie down please. Uh-huh, I see. Okay, you may put your clothes back on."The doctor took the husband aside. "You're in perfect health," he said. "Your wife didn't give me an erection either."
***
A customer walks into a restaurant and notices large sign on the wall:


$500 IF WE FAIL TO FILL YOUR ORDER!

When his waitress arrives, he orders elephant dung on rye.

She calmly writes down his order and walks into the kitchen where all hell breaks loose!

The restaurant owner comes storming out of the kitchen. He runs up to the customer's table, slaps five $100 bills down on it and says,

"You got me that time buddy, but I want you to know that's the first time in ten years we've been out of rye bread!"
***
A hunter gets a new gun...
So a hunter gets a new gun one day and decides to go hunting with it. He goes out into the woods and stumbles upon a nice-sized black bear, so he takes his gun and shoots the bear dead. Then he feels a tap on his shoulder...

The man turns around and sees this huge brown bear and the bear says

"That bear you shot was my friend, so the way I see you got two options, either you let me have sex with you or I maul you to death."

Now, the hunter doesn't want to die so he lets the bear have his way, and afterwards he waddles home and doesn't tell anyone. 

Then next year comes around and he's gaining his confidence back so the hunter goes back into the woods and stumbles upon a brown bear. He gets his gun and shoots the bear dead when he feels a tapping on his shoulder.

The man turns around and sees a giant kodiak bear who says,

"That brown bear was my friend so the way I see it either you let me have rough sex with you or I maul you to death."

Again, the man doesn't want to die so he lets the bear have his way and waddles home not telling anyone.

Next year comes around and the man is gaining his confidence again so he goes out and eventually finds a kodiak bear. So the man takes his gun and shoots the bear dead when he feels a tap on his shoulder.

The man turns around and finds an enormous grizzly bear, and the bear says, 

"Let's be honest, you don't come here for the hunting, do you?"
***
Tough to be Irish
"What's your name?", asked the teacher.

"Mohammad," he replied.

"You're in Ireland now," replied the teacher, "So from now on you will be known as Mike.

" Mohammad returned home after school.

"How was your day, Mohammad?", his mother asked.

"My name is not Mohammad. I'm in Ireland and now my name is Mike”.

"Are you ashamed of your name? Are you trying to dishonor your parents, your heritage, your religion? Shame on you!"

And his mother beat the shit out of him. Then she called his father, who beat the shit out of him again.

The next day Mohammad returned to school. The teacher saw all of his fresh bruises.

"What happened to you, Mike?", she asked.


"Well shortly after becoming an Irishman, I was attacked by two fucking Arabs."
***
A cowboy takes a break from the range and heads out to LA for a cowboy convention . . .
When he gets to LA, he decides to stop at a local watering hole and grab a beer. He's sitting there in his hat, jeans, and boots, when a woman walks up and sits down beside him.


Woman: Are you a cowboy?

Cowboy: Well yes ma'am, I am.

Woman: Like a real deal cowboy?

Cowboy: I don't know any other kind.

Woman: I've never met a real cowboy before.

Cowboy: Well now you have.

Woman: Well?

Cowboy: Well what?

Woman: Aren't you going to ask what I am?

Cowboy: Well, uh, what are you?

Woman: I'm a lesbian.

Cowboy: A lesb- . . . I don't believe I know what that is.

Woman: It means that I like women. I like to kiss them and touch them and make love to them.

Cowboy: . . . .


The woman gets up and leaves and another woman comes into the bar. She spots the cowboy sitting there with his beer and takes a seat beside him.


Woman: Are you a cowboy?

Cowboy: Well ma'am, I thought I was, but I just found out I'm a lesbian.


harharhar. 

Edit: Formatting
***
There was a man who had 3 girlfriends, but he didn't know which one to marry. He decided to give each one $5000 and see how each of them spent it...
The first one went out and got a total makeover with the money. She then tells the man, "I spent the money so I could look pretty for you because I love you so much." 


The second one went out and bought new golf clubs, a CD player, a television, a stereo and gave them to the man. She said, "I bought these gifts for you with the money because I love you so much."


The third one takes the $5000 and invests it in the stock market, doubles her investment, returns the $5000 to the man and reinvests the rest. She says, "I am investing the rest of the money for our future because I love you so much." 


The man thought hard and long about how each of the women had spent the money, he  then decided to marry the one with the biggest tits.
***
A mother-in-law doesn't trust her sons-in-law...
...so she decides to test them.

First, she goes to the oldest's house. She jumps into a well, but her son-in-law rescues her promptly. The next morning, the oldest son-in-law finds a brand new Suzuki in front of his house with a little note: "Lots of love, your mother-in-law".

The next day, she goes to her second son-in-law's house. She jumps into a well once again. Her son-in-law rescues her, but only after pondering about the decision for a while. The next morning, the second son-in-law finds a second-hand Trabant in front of his house with a little note: "Love, your mother-in-law".

Finally, the next day she goes to see her third son-in-law. She jumps into a well, but the youngest son-in-law doesn't rescue her, so she drowns and dies. The next morning, the youngest son-in-law finds a splendind new Porsche in front of his house with a little note: "Thank you. Your loving father-in-law".
***
Southern University Psychology Joke
At a southern university, students in the psychology program were attending their first class on emotional extremes. “Just to establish some parameters,” said the professor to the student from Arkansas, “what is the opposite of joy?” “Sadness,” said the student. “And the opposite of depression?” he asked of the young lady from Oklahoma. “Elation,” she said. “And you sir,” he said to the young man from Texas, “what about the opposite of woe?” The Texan replied, “Sir, I believe that would be ‘giddy up’ .” 
***
A man died and...
A man died and went up to the Pearly Gates to stand before Saint Peter. Peter told him, “Before you meet with God, I should tell you — we’ve looked over your life, and to be honest you really didn’t do anything particularly good or bad. We’re not really sure what to do with you. Can you tell us *any*thing you did that can help us make a decision?”

The newly arrived soul thought for a moment and replied, “Well, yeah, once I was driving along and came upon a man who was being harassed by a group of thugs. So I pulled over, got my baseball bat out from behind my seat, and went up to the leader of the thugs. He was a big, muscular guy with a ring pierced through his lip. Well, I tore the ring out of his lip, and told him he and his gang had better stop bothering this guy or they would have to deal with me!”

“Wow that’s impressive, When did this happen?” asked Peter.

“About three minutes ago.”

(Apologies if this is a re-post.)
***
4 nuns died in a car crash.
St. Peter greets them at the pearly gates, and says "The only reason you aren't already inside is because you have sinned and never confessed. This is your amnesty, if you have a confession, now's the time."

The first nun was very hesitant but finally stepped forward. "I saw a man's penis once and had impure thoughts."  

St. Peter replied, "That's okay, just wash your eyes out with holy water, and you may enter."

The second nun stepped forward. "I touched a man's penis once."

"That's okay, Sister," St. Peter replied. "Just wash your hands in holy water, and you may enter."

The fourth nun begins to cut in front of the third, and an all-out brawl breaks out between the two. Habits and hair go flying as St. Peter breaks it up. "Sisters, what has gotten into you two?"

The fourth nun, brushing herself off, says, "I only wanted to rinse my mouth out before she sticks her ass in that water."
***
I call my wife Bambi
She thinks it's because she's cute with big brown eyes. But it's really because I want someone to shoot her mother with a hunting rifle.

**Edit:** Some people have accused me of "being a plagiarist" and "stealing other's jokes"... Their words, not mine...

*Pause for comedic value*

But seriously, this **is** a version of an Ashlee Barnhill joke. Sorry for the bamboozle fellow redditors.
***
A cowboy appears before St. Peter.
A cowboy appeared before St. Peter at the Pearly Gates. "Have you ever done anything of particular merit?" St. Peter asked. "Well, I can think of one thing," the cowboy offered.
"On a trip to the Big Horn Mountains out in Wyoming, I came upon a gang of bikers who were threatening a young woman. I directed them to leave her alone, but they wouldn't listen. So, I approached the largest and most tattooed biker and smacked him in the face, kicked his bike over, ripped out his nose ring, and threw it on the ground." I yelled, "Now, back off or I'll kick the shit out of all of you" Saint Peter was impressed, "When did this happen?"
"Couple of minutes ago."
***
Passwords
"Sorry, your password has been in use for 90 days and has expired - you must register a new one."

roses

"Sorry, too few characters."

pretty roses

"Sorry, you must use at least one numerical character." 

1 pretty rose

"Sorry, you cannot use blank spaces." 

1prettyrose

"Sorry, you must use at least 10 different characters."
 
1fuckingprettyrose

"Sorry, you must use at least one upper case character." 

1FUCKINGprettyrose

"Sorry, you cannot use more than one upper case character consecutively." 

1FuckingPrettyRose

"Sorry, you must use no fewer than 20 total characters."
 
1FuckingPrettyRoseShovedUpYourAssIfYouDon'tGiveMeAccessRightFuckingNow!

"Sorry, you cannot use punctuation."
 
1FuckingPrettyRoseShovedUpYourAssIfYouDontGiveMeAccessRightFuckingNow

"Sorry, that password is already in use."
 




***
There was a man who had three girlfriends
There was a man who had three girlfriends, but he did not know which one to marry. So he decided to give each one $5000 and see how each of them spent it. The first one went out and got a total makeover with the money. She got new clothes, a new hairdo, manicure, pedicure, the works, and tells the man, "I spent the money so I could look pretty for you because I love you so much." The second one went out and bought new golf clubs, a CD player, a television, and a stereo and gave them to the man. She said, "I bought these gifts for you with the money because I love you so much." The third one takes the $5000 and invests it in the stock market, doubles her investment, returns the $5000 to the man and reinvests the rest. She says, "I am investing the rest of the money for our future because I love you so much." The man thought long and hard about how each of the women spent the money. Finally, being the mere man he was, he decided to marry the one with the biggest breasts.
***
Three men, a philosopher, a mathematician and an idiot, were out riding in the car when it crashed into a tree.
Before anyone knows it, the three men found themselves standing before the pearly gates of Heaven, where St. Peter and the Devil were standing nearby.

 "Gentlemen," the Devil started, "Due to the fact that Heaven is now overcrowded, St. Peter has agreed to limit the number of people entering Heaven.

 If anyone of you can ask me a question which I don't know or cannot answer, then you're worthy enough to go to Heaven; if not, then you'll come with me to Hell."

 The philosopher then stepped up, "OK, give me the most comprehensive report on Socrates' teachings."

 With a snap of his finger, a stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. 

The philosopher read it and concluded it was correct. 

"Then, go to Hell!" With another snap of his finger, the philsopher disappeared. 

The mathematician then asked,"Give me the most complicated formula ever theorized!"

 With a snap of his finger, another stack of paper appeared next to the Devil. 

The mathematician read it and reluctantly agreed it was correct. "Then, go to Hell!" With another snap of his finger, the mathematician disappeared too.

 The idiot then stepped forward and said, "Bring me a chair!" The Devil brought forward a chair. 

"Drill 7 holes on the seat." The Devil did just that. 

The idiot then sat on the chair and let out a very loud fart. 

Standing up, he asked, "Which hole did my fart come out from?" 

The Devil inspected the seat and said,"The third hole from the right." "Wrong," said the idiot, "it's from my asshole."

 And the idiot went to heaven.
***
A blonde decides to learn and try horse back riding unassisted without prior experience or lessons...
She mounts the horse with great effort, and the tall, shiny horse springs into motion.

 It gallops along at a steady and rhythmic pace, but the blonde begins to slip from the saddle. 

Out of shear terror, she grabs for the horse's mane but cannot seem to get a firm grip. 

She tries to throw her arms around the horse's neck, but she slides down the side of the horse anyway.

 The horse gallops along, seemingly oblivious to its slipping rider.

 Finally, giving up her frail grip, she leaps away from the horse to try and throw herself to safety. 

Unfortunately, her foot has become entangled in the stirrup. 

She is now at the mercy of the horse's pounding hooves as her head is struck against the ground again and again. 

As her head is battered against the ground, she is mere moments away from unconsciousness or even death, when Frank, the Wal-Mart manager, runs out to shut the horse off.
***
Happy Friday - Blonde Joke :)
A blind man enters a bar and find his way to a barstool. After ordering a drink, and sitting there for a while, the blind guy yells to the bartender, “Hey, you wanna hear a blonde joke?” 

The bar immediately becomes absolutely quiet. In a husky, deep voice, the woman next to him says, “Before you tell that joke, you should know something. The bartender is blonde, the bouncer is blonde and I’m a 6′ tall, 200 pound blonde with a black belt in karate. What’s more, the fella sitting next to me is blonde and he’s a weightlifter. The woman to your right is a blonde, and she’s a pro wrestler. Think about it seriously, mister. You still wanna tell that blonde joke?” 

The blind guy says, “Nah, not if I’m gonna have to explain it five times.”
***
Kids this day. Policeman V/S the girl.
A policeman on his horse says to little girl on her bike, "Did santa get you that?"
"Yes," she replies

"Well tell Santa to put a reflector light on it next year," and fines her $5. The little girl look up at the policeman and says, "Nice horse you've got there. Did Santa bring you that too?"

The Policeman chuckles and replies, "He sure did!" 
"Well," says the little girl,"Next year, tell Santa the fuckin dick goes under the horse, not on top of it"!

Brought to you by- http://learn2geek.com
***
A woman is cleaning out her husband's bedside table...
...and when she gets to the bottom drawer she finds 3 eggs and $3,458.

Confused, she asks her husband about it. He sighs, then says sadly, "You'd better sit down."

She sits, looking anxious. "We've been married for over 30 years", he starts, "and in that time, I've... well I've been unfaithful."

There's an awkward pause, then with tears in her eyes she asks, "What does that have to do with the eggs?" "Well," he explains "whenever I was unfaithful, I put an egg in the drawer."

"Well three times isn't that bad in 30 years, but what about the money?"

"Oh." the husband says, "Whenever I had a dozen eggs, I sold them."
***
Temper cure...
A woman goes to the Doctor, worried about her husband 's temper.     
The Doctor asks: "What's the problem?     
The woman says: "Doctor, I don't know what to do. Every day my husband seems to lose his temper for no reason. It scares me."    
The Doctor says: "I have a cure for that. When it seems that your husband is getting angry, just take a glass of water and start swishing it in your mouth. Just swish and swish but don't swallow it until he either leaves the room or calms down.”    
Two weeks later the woman comes back to the doctor looking fresh and reborn.    
The woman says: "Doctor that was a brilliant idea! Every time my husband started losing it, I swished with water. I swished and swished, and he
calmed right down! How does a glass of water do that?"    
The Doctor says: "The water itself does nothing. It's keeping your mouth shut that does the trick".
***
A women goes to the doctor all black and blue...
Doctor: "What happened?"
Woman: "Doctor, I don't know what to do. Every time my husband comes home drunk on Bud Light he beats me to a pulp."

Doctor: "I have a remedy for that. When your husband comes home drunk on Bud Light, just take a glass of sweet tea and start swishing it in your mouth but don't swallow. Just keep swishing and swishing until he goes to bed in his Bud Light stupor."

Two weeks later the women comes back to the doctor looking fresh and reborn.

Woman: "Doctor, that was a brilliant idea! Every time my husband came home drunk on Bud Light, I swished with sweet tea. I swished and swished and he didn't touch me!" 

Doctor: "You see how much keeping your mouth shut helps?"

**EDIT:** Well this turned into a huge debate. Glad I could make so many people happy and angry at the same time with my first front page post! 
***
Newfie Hooker
A Newfoundlander was walking home late at night and spots a woman in the Shadows.

"Twenty dollars" she whispers.

Perry had never been with a hooker before, but decides what the hell, it's only twenty bucks. So they hide in the bushes.

They're going at it for a minute when all of a sudden a light flashes on them. It is a police officer.

"What's going on here, people?" asks the officer.

"I's makin' love to me wife!", the Newfoundlander answers, annoyed.

"Oh! I'm sorry", says the cop. "I didn't know."

"Well, neidder did I, 'til ya shined that light in 'er face!"
***
A supermarket greeter gets a new job at Asda
About two hours into his first day on the job a very loud, unattractive, mean-acting woman walked into the store with her two kids, yelling obscenities at them all the way through the entrance. He said pleasantly, “Good morning and welcome to Asda. Nice children you have there. Are they twins?’
The woman stopped yelling long enough to say, “Hell no, they ain’t twins. The oldest one is 9, and the other one is 7. Why the hell would you think they’re twins? Are you blind, or just stupid?”
So he replied, “I’m neither blind nor stupid, ma’am. I just couldn’t believe someone slept with you twice. Have a good day and thank you for shopping at Asda  .”

EDIT: pronoun issues
***
Two guys in a bar...
One says "Did your hear the news - Mike is dead!"
"Wooo, what the hell happened to him?"

"Well he was on his way over to my house the other day and when he arrived outside the house he didn't brake properly and boom - He hit the pavement and the car flips up and he crashed through the sunroof - Went flying through the air and smashed through my upstairs bedroom window."

"What a horrible way to die!"

"No no, he survived that, that didn't kill him at all. So, he's landed in my upstairs bedroom and he's all covered in broken glass on the floor. Then, he spots the big old antique wardrobe we have in the room and reaches up for the handle to try to pull himself up. He's just dragging himself up when bang, this massive wardrobe comes crashing down on top of him, crushing him and breaking most of his bones."

"What a way to go, that's terrible!"

"No no, that didn't kill him he survived that. He managed to get the wardrobe off him and crawls out onto the landing, he tries to pull himself up on the banister but under his weight, the banister breaks and he goes falling down on to the first floor. In mid air, all the broken banister poles spin and fall on him, pinning him to the floor, sticking right through him."

"Now that is the most unfortunate way to go!"

"No no, that didn't kill him, he even survived that. So he's on the downstairs landing, just beside the kitchen. He crawls in to the kitchen, tries to pull himself up on the cooker, but reached for a big pot of boiling hot water, whoosh, the whole thing came down on him and burned most of his skin off him."

"Man, what a way to go!"

"No no, he survived that, he survived that ! He's lying on the ground, covered in boiling water and he spots the phone and tries to pull himself up, to call for help, but instead he grabs the light switch and pulls the whole thing off the wall and the water and electricity didn't mix and so he got electrocuted, wallop, 10,000 volts shot through him."

"Now that is one awful way to go!"

"No no, he survived that, he ..."

"Hold on now, just how the hell did he die?"

"I shot him!"

"You shot him? What the hell did you shoot him for?"

"He was wrecking my f**king house."
***
Mahatma Gandhi, as you know...
walked barefoot most of the time, which produced an impressive set of calluses on his feet. He also ate very little, which made him rather frail and, with his odd diet, he suffered from bad breath. This made him (Oh, man, this is so bad, it's good) a super calloused fragile mystic hexed by halitosis.
***
A housewife takes a lover during the day while her husband is at work.
Not aware that 9 year old son was hiding in the closet.  
Her husband came home unexpectedly, so she hid her lover in the closet. The boy now has company.  
Boy: "Dark in here."  
Man: "Yes it is."  
Boy: "I have a baseball." 
Man: "That's nice."  
Boy: "Want to buy it?"  
Man: "No, thanks."  
Boy: "My dad's outside."  
Man: "OK, how much?" 
Boy: "£250."  
In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom's lover are in the closet together. 
Boy: "Dark in here."  
Man: "Yes, it is."  
Boy: "I have a baseball glove."  
Man: "That's nice."  
Boy: "Want to buy it?"  
Man: "No, thanks."  
Boy: "I'll tell."  
Man: "How much?"  
Boy: "£750."  
Man: "Fine."  
A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your glove. Let's go outside and toss the baseball!"  
The boy says, "I can't. I sold them."  
The father asks, "How much did you sell them for?"  
The son says, "£1,000."  
The father says, "That's terrible to over-charge your friends like that. That is way more than those two things cost. I'm going to take you to church and make you confess."  
They go to church and the father alerts the priest and makes the little boy sit in the confession booth and closes the door. 
The boy says, "Dark in here."  
The priest says, "Don't start that sh*t again."
***
A man in a hot air balloon realized he was lost.
He reduced altitude and spotted a woman below. He descended a bit more and shouted, “Excuse me, can you help? I promised a friend I would meet him an hour ago, but I don’t know where I am.”

The woman below replied, “You are in a hot air balloon hovering approximately 30 feet above the ground. You are between 40 and 41 degrees north latitude and between 59 and 60 degrees west longitude.”

You must be an engineer,” said the balloonist.

“I am,” replied the woman, “How did you know?”

“Well,” answered the balloonist, “everything you told me is, technically correct, but I have no idea what to make of your information, and the fact is I am still lost. Frankly, you’ve not been much help so far.”

The woman below responded, “You must be in Management.”

“I am,” replied the balloonist, “but how did you know?”

“Well,” said the woman, “you don’t know where you are or where you are going. You have risen to where you are, due to a large quantity of hot air. You made a promise which you have no idea how to keep, and you expect people beneath you to solve your problems. The fact is you are in exactly the same position you were in before we met, but now, somehow, it’s my fault.” 

***
For 2 years a man was having an affair with an Italian woman......
One night, she confided in him that she was pregnant.

Not wanting to ruin his reputation or his marriage, he promised to pay her a large sum of money if she would go to Italy to secretly have the child.

If she stayed in Italy to raise the child, he also promised to provide child support until the child turned 18.

She agreed, but asked how he would know when the baby was born.

To keep it discreet, he told her to simply mail him a post card, and write 'Spaghetti' on the back.

He would then arrange for the child support payments to begin.

One day, about 9 months later, he came home to his confused wife. 'Honey!' she said, 'you received a very strange post card today.'

'Oh, just give it to me and I'll explain it later,' he said.

The wife obeyed and watched as her husband read the card, turned white, and fainted.

On the card was written: Spaghetti, Spaghetti, Spaghetti, Spaghetti, Spaghetti.

Three with meatballs, two without. Send extra sauce.


***
the bear and his list
It's rumored in the forest, that the bear has a deathlist with the names of all animals he's going to kill. All of the animals are worried about that rumor. 

The deer decides first to go to the bear's cave and ask him out about his list.
 Deer: "Is it true, that you have a deathlist?"
 Bear: "Yes, that's true."
 Deer: "And is my name on the list?"
 Bear: "Yep."

In panic, the deer runs out of the cave and into the woods. The next day the other animals find the deer's corpse in the forest - brutally murdered and without his head. 

Then boar also decides to ask out the bear about his list and visits him in his cave.
 Boar: "So there's your list..."
 Bear: "Yes, that's my list."
 Boar: "You know... is my name on it?"
 Bear: "Yes, your name is on my list."

Same as the deer, the boar flees in panic and the next day the animals also find the boar's corpse in the forest. 

So the rabbit starts to think about the situation. He decides also to visit the bear.
 Rabbit: "So, bear, I heard you have a death list."
 Bear: "Yes, I have a deathlist."
 Rabbit: "And is my name on this list?"
 Bear: "Yes, your name is also on my list."
 Rabbit: "Okay... is it possible to delete my name from the list?"

The bear just responds: "Sure, no problem."
***
A blonde tries to go horseback riding ....
.....
even though she has had no lessons or prior experience.
She mounts the horse unassisted and the horse immediately springs into action. It gallops along at a steady rhythmic pace, but the blonde begins to lose her grip and starts to slide in the saddle.
In terror, she grabs for the mane but can't seem to get a firm grip. She tries to throw her arms around the horses neck, but she slides down the side of the horse anyway. The horse gallops along, seemingly impervious to it's slipping rider.
Unfortunately, the Blonde's foot has become entangled in the stirrup. She is now at the mercy of the hooves as her head is struck against the ground over and over again.
As her head is battered against the ground she is moments away from losing consciousness when, to her great fortune, the Walmart's Manager sees her and unplugs the horse.

***
The Word "Penis" is written on a chalkboard...
On Monday morning, the teacher walked to the blackboard and noticed someone had written the word "penis" in tiny letters. She turned around, but couldn't find the guilty face. She quickly erased it and began her class.

Tuesday, she was again greeted with "penis" on the blackboard, written in larger letters. She looked around in vain for the culprit, and then proceeded with the day's lesson.

Every morning for the rest of the week, "penis" was written on the board in larger and larger letters, and each time, the teacher furiously erased it. By Friday, she'd had enough.

"That's enough," she sputtered. "I -- I can't believe this! Monday morning, I expect an explanation for this behavior!"

On Monday morning, the teacher confidently entered the classroom and found on the board: "Don't you know -- the more you rub it, the bigger it gets?"
***
A man who just died.....
.......is delivered to a local mortuary and he's wearing an expensive, expertly tailored black suit. The mortician asks the deceased's wife how she would like the body dressed, pointing out that the man does look good in the black suit he is already wearing.

The widow, however, says that she always thought her husband looked his best in blue, and that she wants him in a blue suit. She gives the mortician a blank check and says, “I don't care what it costs, but please have my husband in a blue suit for the viewing.”

The woman returns the next day and to her delight, she finds her husband dressed in a gorgeous blue suit with a subtle chalk stripe; the suit fits him perfectly. She says to the mortician, “Whatever this cost, I'm very satisfied. You did an excellent job and I'm very grateful. How much did you spend?”

To her astonishment, the mortician presents her with the blank check, “There's no charge.”

“No, really, I must compensate you for the cost of that exquisite blue suit,” she says.

“Honestly, ma’am it cost nothing. You see, a deceased gentleman of about your husband's size was brought in shortly after you left yesterday, and he was wearing an attractive blue suit. I asked his wife if she minded him going to his grave wearing a black suit instead, and she said it made no difference as long as he looked nice. So I just switched the heads.”
***
Calling in sick...
A young man had just got a job at an electrical store and was to start work on Monday. Unfortunately, he called in sick for the day. The boss was a little annoyed but decided that shit happens and let it go.

The guy came in Tuesday and sold a stack of electronics, and continued on for the rest of the week selling record amounts of computers and TVs and other goods.

The following Monday, the boss got a call - it was the new employee calling in. "Sorry boss - I'm really sick!" The boss was getting more annoyed with him.

Tuesday the young guy was in and selling even more than last week. He finished up the week making a new record for sales for his state.

Next Monday the new guy called in sick again and the boss decided it was time for a chat with him.

So on Tuesday the guy rocks up to work and the boss pulls him aside.
"Bob, you're a great salesman, but you keep calling in sick on Mondays - What's going on?"

"Well boss. My sister's just gone through an awful divorce and she calls me every Monday morning crying, so I go over to her house and comfort her. We always wind up making love for the rest of the day..."

"THAT'S SICK!"

"I told you..."
***
A long time ago in a faraway kingdom the queen was a huge slut.
One day the king had to go for a year long expedition, and knew his queen was going to have sex with everyone through the county, so he turned to his court magistrate for help.

The court magistrate showed the king a pair of metal panties, with a hole in the middle.

"Why, doesn't that just defeat the whole purpose?" asked the King, and the magistrate promptly picked a pencil off his desk and inserted it into the hole.

"SNAP!", the pencil had cleanly sliced into two! "Anything that enters the hole will be sliced off, sire", said the magistrate.

Thoroughly impressed, the King instructed the Queen to wear it for the entire year and left for his expedition. Upon his return, the King called for a meeting of all his country folk.

They were all instructed to drop their pants, and the King made his rounds noticing that many were missing fingers as well as their most vital part. Then, he saw the quiet knight Sir Xavier, fingers and all still intact.

"Xavier, the one and only true knight! Only you among all the nobles have been true to me. What is it in my power to grant you? Name it and it is yours!"

But alas, Sir Xavier was speechless.

Edit: First page guys, thanks!

Edit 2: My inbox has never received so much attention
***
The Mormon and The Irishman
A Mormon was seated next to an Irishman on a flight from London. After the plane was airborne, drink orders were taken.
The Irishman asked for a whiskey, which was promptly brought and placed before him.
The flight attendant then asked the Mormon if he would like a drink.
He replied in disgust, “I’d rather be savagely raped by a dozen whores than let liquor touch my lips.”
The Irishman then handed his drink back to the attendant and said, “Me, too, I didn’t know we had a choice.”
***
Cruise Control
*Author's note: I just came up with this while working my tech-related job, and I'm posting from my phone. I apologize if the joke just isn't as funny as I think it is, or if there are any formatting mistakes.*

A cruise ship is swept up in a violent tropical storm, throwing it off-course. The crew are running back and forth, trying to get the vessel pointed in the right direction. As the ship crests a big, dangerous wave, a tourist in his cabin accidentally drops his laptop off the bed, breaking a key off the keyboard. He thinks, "Well, the storm isn't really THAT bad…" and leaves his cabin to find an electronics store in the ship's mini-mall.

At the electronics store, the shopkeeper is just closing up and securing his store for the storm. Oblivious to the emergency around him, the tourist wanders in and says, "Hey, I broke a key off of my laptop and I was hoping you guys could replace it. It's the one just to the left of the Windows key."

The shopkeeper looks incredulously at the tourist, and very sternly says, "I'm sorry, sir, but you'll have to come back later! We are out of control!"

*Edit: /u/keldoftheisles corrected me on which key is to the right of Control.*
***
A man owned a small farm
A man owned a small farm near Maddock. The North Dakota Wage and Hour Department claimed he was not paying proper wages to his help and sent an agent out to interview him. "I need a list of your employees and how much you pay them," demanded the agent.
"Well, there's my field hand who's been with me for three years. I pay him $600 a week plus free room and board. The cook has been here for 18 months, and I pay her $500 a week, plus free room and board. Then there's the half-wit who works here about 18 hours a day. He makes $10 a week and I go into town and buy him a bottle of bourbon every Saturday night," replied the farmer.

"That's the guy I want to talk to, the half-wit," says the agent.

"That would be me," replied the farmer sadly. 
***
A Rabbi, Lawyer, and Priest are on an airplane...
along with a troupe of boyscouts. The airplane is going down FAST. There are parachuts, but only enough for a few people.

The Rabbi says, "Listen. We need to give the parachuts to the boyscouts. It's the right thing to do."

The Lawyer then responds, "What are you crazy!? Fuck the boyscouts!"

The Priest quickly glances at his watch and says, "DO WE HAVE TIME!?"
***
A man with a stutter goes to the doctor
A man goes to the doctor to consult regarding his stutter.
 
&nbsp;
**Man:** "D-d-d-doctor, have the re-re-re-results come back yet about the source of my st-st-st-stutter?"
 
&nbsp;
**Doctor:** "Yes, after extensive examination, I have determined that the reason for your stutter is because of your enormous penis. We will have to perform surgery and replace it with a regular sized one."
 
Conflicted, the man ultimately agrees as his terrible stutter has hindered him since childhood. He undergoes surgery and had his penis replaced. Thankful, he goes back to his home and returns to his life.
 
After a few days, the man returns to the doctor troubled.
 
&nbsp;
**Man:** "Doctor! I would like to have my old penis back again. My stutter is gone but I can no longer satisfy my wife in bed like I used to. Please perform surgery on me again."
 
&nbsp;
**Doctor:** "N-n-n-no takebacks!"
***
Catholic parrots.
A lady goes to her priest one day and tells him,  

"Father, I have a problem. I have two female parrots, but they only know how to say one thing."  

"What do they say?" the priest inquired..  

They say, "Hi, we're hookers! Do you want to have some fun?"  

"That's obscene!" the priest exclaimed.  

Then he thought for a moment. "You
know," he said, "I may have a solution to your problem.  
"I have two male talking parrots, which I have taught to pray and read the Bible. Bring your two parrots over to my house, and we'll put them in the cage with Francis and Peter.  
My parrots can teach your parrots to pray and worship!"  

"Thank you," the woman responded, "this may very well be the solution."  

The next day, she brought her female parrots to the priest's house. As he ushered her in, she saw that his two male parrots were inside their cage holding rosary beads and praying.  
Impressed, she walked over and placed her parrots in with them. After a few minutes, the female parrots cried out in unison,  
"Hi, we're hookers! Do you want to have some fun?"  

There was stunned silence. Shocked, one male parrot looked over at the other male parrot and exclaimed, "Put the beads away, Frank. Our prayers have been answered."
***
A kid asks his dad what the difference between 'realistically' and 'potentially' is
A kid walks upto his dad. He asks him to explain the difference between the words realistically and potentially. 

His father responds by telling him to go ask his mother if she would sleep with their neighbour, Brett, for a million dollars. He then told him to also ask his sister whether she would sleep with their neighbour, Brett, for a million dollars. And he also told him to ask his brother whether he would sleep with Brett for a million dollars. 

The kid asks everyone. He comes back and tells his dad that they all said yes. 

His father responds that potentially, we're sitting on 3 million dollars. Realistically, we have two whores and a faggot in the family.
***
I bought a parrot at an auction...
I bought a parrot at an auction, hoping that a companion might help me get through some tough times.  The car ride home, the parrot had been quiet and an uneasy tension was building.  Throughout the first night, my parrot remained quiet, but the next morning, I awoke to a machine-gun sequence of swear words, rude insults, and some of the dirtiest jokes I had ever heard.  I was shocked, to say the least.  In an attempt to correct the parrot's behavior, I would read aloud children's books, play Bach and Beethoven over the speakers, and did everything I could to set a calm and relaxing atmosphere.  But it was to no avail.  The parrot remained relentlessly crass, rude, and now, it had even begun talking back and mocking me with every action I took, calling me names.  It was pushing my buttons.  Finally, I was at my last straw, and I began screaming back, trading swear words and scathing insults with this ungrateful excuse of a pet.  But in a sudden moment of clarity, I realized the ridiculousness of this situation and, immediately grabbing the bird by its neck,  placed it in the freezer, with the intent of killing it once and for all.  The parrot kicked and screamed for a good while before the kitchen grew eerily silent.  I slowly opened the freezer to check on my victim, when the parrot flies out calmly, landing on the counter.  The parrot looked up at me and said, "I truly apologize for my behavior.  I realize now I may have been rude and insulting to you, and I will correct my attitude and my behavior from now on."  I was shocked.  Before I could even respond, the bird asked, "So what did the chicken do?"
***
A woman sits down at a bar and asks for a drink.
"I hear you have a drink that is guaranteed to be as good as an orgasm in my mouth or my money back, I'll have one of those."

The Barkeep mixes, stirs, shakes and pours and serves the young lady the drink.

The yound lady takes a sip and spits the drink on the floor. 

"Ugh, this is horrible. It's tastes warm, salty, and slimy, I can't believe I put that in my mouth."

"That'll be $10" says the bartender. 
***